THE 

ACCUMULATION 
OF CAPITAL 

by 
ROSA LUXEMBURG 



translated from the German 
by 

AGNES SCHWARZSCHILD 
{doctor iuris) 



With an Introduction 

by 
JOAN ROBINSON 



LONDON 

ROUTLEDGE AND KEGAN PAUL LTD 



This translation first published in igßi 

by Routledge & Kegan Paul Limited 

68 Carter Lane London E.C.4 

Printed in Great Britain 

by Butler & Tanner Limited 

Frome and London 

Typography by Sean Jennett 



CONTENTS 






translator's note page 7 

A note on ROSA LUXEMBURG 9 

INTRODUCTION I3 

SECTION ONE 
THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

I. THE OBJECT OF OUR INVESTIGATION page 3 1 
II. QUESNAY's and ADAM SMITH's ANALYSES OF 

THE PROCESS OF REPRODUCTION 48 

III. A CRITICISM OF SMITH's ANALYSIS 64 

IV. MARX's SCHEME OF SIMPLE REPRODUCTION 76 
V. THE CIRCULATION OF MONEY 93 

VI. ENLARGED REPRODUCTION IO7 
VII. ANALYSIS OF MARX's DIAGRAM OF ENLARGED 

REPRODUCTION I 20 

VIII. MARX's ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE THE DIFFICULTY 1 39 
IX. THE DIFFICULTY VIEWED FROM THE ANGLE OF 

THE PROCESS OF CIRCULATION 155 

SECTION TWO 
HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

FIRST ROUND 

Sismondi-Malthus v. Say-Ricardo, MacCuUoch 

X. SISMONDI'S THEORY OF REPRODUCTION page I 73 

XI. macculloch v. sismondi 191 

xn. RICARDO V. sismondi 203 

XIII. SAY V. sismondi 211 

xiv. malthus 219 

second round 
The Controversy between Rodbertus and von Kirchmann 

XV. V. KIRCHMANN's THEORY OF REPRODUCTION page 227 

5 



CONTENTS 

XVI. RODBERTUS' CRITICISM OF THE CLASSICAL 

SCHOOL page 238 

XVII. RODBERTUS' ANALYSIS OF REPRODUCTION 252 

THIRD ROUND 

Struve-Bulgakov-Tugan Baranovski r. Vorontsov- 
Nikolayon 

XVIII. A NEW VERSION OF THE PROBLEM page QJ I 

XIX. VORONTSOV AND HIS 'sURPLUS' 276 

XX. NIKOLAYON 284 

XXI. STRUVE's 'third persons' AND 'tHREE 

WORLD empires' 292 

XXII. BULGAKOV AND HIS COMPLETION OF MARX's 

ANALYSIS 298 

XXIII. TUGAN BARANOVSKI AND HIS 'lACK OF PRO- 

PORTION' 311 

XXIV. THE END OF RUSSIAN 'LEGALIST' MARXISM 324 

SECTION THREE 

THE HISTORICAL CONDITIONS 
OF ACCUMULATION 

XXV. CONTRADICTIONS WITHIN THE DIAGRAM OF 

ENLARGED REPRODUCTION page 329 

XXVI. THE REPRODUCTION OF CAPITAL AND ITS 

SOCIAL SETTING 348 

XXVII. THE STRUGGLE AGAINST NATURAL ECONOMY 368 

XXVIII. THE INTRODUCTION OF COMMODITY ECONOMY 386 

XXIX. THE STRUGGLE AGAINST PEASANT ECONOMY 395 

XXX. INTERNATIONAL LOANS 419 

XXXI. PROTECTIVE TARIFFS AND ACCUMULATION 446 

XXXII. MILITARISM AS A PROVINCE OF ACCUMULATION 454 

INDEX 469 



TRANSLATOR'S NOTE 

THIS is an original translation not only of the main body 
of the work but also of a number of quotations from 
foreign authors. Page references thus usually indicate the 
original foreign sources. 

In so far as possible, however, I have availed myself of exist- 
ing translations and have referred to the following standard 
works: 

Karl Marx: Capital, vol. i (transl. by Moore- Aveling, London, 
1920); vol. ii (transl. by E. Untermann, Chicago, 
1907); vol. iii (transl. by E. Untermann, Chicago, 

1909) 
The Poverty of Philosophy (translator's name not given, 
London, 1936). 

Sismondi's introduction to the second edition of Nouveaux 
Principes is quoted from M. Mignet's translation of selected pas- 
sages by Sismondi, entitled Political Economy and the Philosophy 
of Government, London, 1847. No English translation exists of 
Marx's Theorien über den Mehrwert. 

Unfortunately, not all the West European texts, and none of 
the Russian — except Engels' correspondence with Nikolayon — 
were accessible to me, and I regret having been unable to trace 
some quotations and check up on others. In such cases, the Eng- 
lish version follows the German text and will at least bring out 
the point the author wanted to make. 

To save the reader grappling with unfamiliar concepts, I 
have converted foreign currencies and measures into their Eng- 
lish equivalents, at the following rates: 

20 marks — 25 francs — $5 — -£1 (gold standard); i hectare — 
(roughly) 2-5 acres; i kilometre — f mile. 

I am glad of this opportunity to express my gratitude to Dr. 
W. Stark and Mrs. J. Robinson for the helpful criticism and 
appreciation with which my work has met. 

AGNES SCHWARZS CHILD 

7 



A NOTE ON ROSA LUXEMBURG 

ROSA LUXEMBURG was bom on 5 March 1870, at 
Zamosc, a little town of Russian Poland, not far from 
Lthc city of Lublin. She came from a fairly well-to-do 
family of Jewish merchants, and soon showed the two outstand- 
ing traits which were to characterise all her life and work: a high 
degree of intelligence, and a burning thirst for social justice 
which led her, while still a schoolgirl, into the revolutionary 
camp. Partly to escape the Russian police, partly to complete 
her education, she went to Zurich and studied there the sciences 
of law and economics. Her doctoral dissertation dealt with the 
industrial development of Poland and showed up the vital integ- 
ration of Polish industry with the wider economic system of 
metropolitan Russia. It was a work not only of considerable 
promise, but already of solid and substantial achievement. 

Her doctorate won, Rosa Luxemburg looked around for a 
promising field of work and decided to go to Germany, whose 
working-class movement seemed destined to play a leading part 
in the future history of international socialism. She settled 
there in 1896, and two years later contracted a formal mar- 
riage with a German subject which secured her against the 
danger of forcible deportation to Russia. Now, at that moment 
the German Social-Democratic Party was in the throes of a 
serious crisis. In 1899, Eduard Bernstein published his well- 
known work Die Voraussetzungen des Sozialismus und die Au/gaben 
der Sozialdemokratie, which urged the party to drop its revolu- 
tionary jargon and to work henceforth for tangible social re- 
forms within the given economic set-up, instead of trying to 
bring about its final and forcible overthrow. This 'reformism' or 
'revisionism' seemed to Rosa Luxemburg a base as well as a 
foolish doctrine, and she published in the same year a pamphlet 
Sozialreform oder Revolution? which dealt with Bernstein's ideas in 
no uncertain fashion. From this moment onward, she was and 
remained one of the acknowledged leaders of the left wing 
within the German working-class movement. 

The events of the year 1905 gave Rosa Luxemburg a welcome 

9 



A NOTE ON ROSA LUXEMBURG 

opportunity to demonstrate that revolution was to her more 
than a subject of purely academic interest. As soon as the 
Russian masses began to move, she hurried to Warsaw and 
threw herself into the fray. There followed a short span of 
feverish activity, half a year's imprisonment, and, finally, a 
return journey to Berlin. The experiences of the Warsaw rising 
are reflected in a book entitled Massenstreik, Partei und Gewerk- 
schaften, which was published in 1906. It recommends the 
general strike as the most effective weapon in the struggle of the 
proletariat against the bourgeoisie. 

The International Socialist Congress which met at Stuttgart 
in 1907 prepared and foreshadowed the sorry history of Rosa 
Luxemburg's later life. On that occasion she drafted, together 
with Lenin, a resolution which demanded that the workers of 
the world should make any future war an opportunity for the 
destruction of the capitalist system. Unlike so many others, 
she stuck to her resolution when, seven years later, the time of 
testing came. The result was that she had to spend nearly the 
whole of the first World War in jail, either under punishment 
or in protective custody. But imprisonment did not mean in- 
activity. In 191 6, there appeared in Switzerland her book 
Die Krise der Sozialdemokratie, which assailed the leaders of the 
German labour party for their patriotic attitude and called 
the masses to revolutionary action. The foundation of the 
Spartacus League in 19 17, the germ cell out of which the Com- 
munist Party of Germany was soon to develop, was vitally con- 
nected with the dissemination of Rosa Luxemburg's aggressive 
sentiments. 

The collapse of the Kaiserreich on 11 November 1918, gave 
Rosa Luxemburg her freedom and an undreamt-of range of 
opportunities. The two months that followed must have been 
more crowded and more colourful than all her previous life 
taken together. But the end of her career was imminent. The 
fatal Spartacus week, an abortive rising of the Berlin workers, 
led on 15 January 19 19, to her arrest by a government com- 
posed of former party comrades. During her removal to prison 
she was attacked and severely beaten by soldiers belonging to 
the extreme right, a treatment which she did not survive. Her 
body was recovered days later from a canal. 

A type not unlike Trotsky, Rosa Luxemburg had her tender 

10 



A NOTE ON ROSA LUXEMBURG 

and sentimental side, which comes to the surface in her corre- 
spondence, especially in the Briefe aus dem Gefaengnis printed in 
1922. As a thinker she showed considerable honesty and inde- 
pendence of mind. The Accumulation of Capital, first published in 
19 1 3, which is undoubtedly her finest achievement, reveals her 
as that rarest of all rare phenomena — a Marxist critical of Karl 
Marx. 

W. STARK 



II 



INTRODUCTION 

/%CADEMic economists have recently returned from the 
/-A elaboration of static equilibrium to the classical search 
JL JLfor a dynamic model of a developing economy. Rosa 
Luxemburg, neglected by Marxist and academic economists 
alike, offers a theory of the dynamic development of capitalism 
which is of the greatest interest. The book is one of considerable 
difficulty (apart from the vivid historical chapters), and to those 
accustomed only to academic analysis the difficulty is rendered 
well-nigh insurmountable by the Marxist terminology in which 
it is expressed. The purpose of this preface is to provide a glos- 
sary of terms, and to search for the main thread of the argument 
(leaving the historical illustrations to speak for themselves) and 
set it out in simpler language. 

The result is no doubt too simple. The reader must sample 
for himself the rich confusion in which the central core of 
analysis is imbedded, and must judge for himself whether the 
core has been mishandled in the process of digging it out.^ 

Our author takes her departure from the numerical examples 
for simple reproduction (production with a constant stock of 
capital) and expanded reproduction (production with capital 
accumulating) set out in volume ii of Marx's Capital. As she 
points out,^ Marx completed the model for simple reproduction, 
but the models for accumulation were left at his death in a chaos 
of notes, and they are not really fit to bear all the weight she 
puts on them (Heaven help us if posterity is to pore over all the 
backs of old envelopes on which economists have jotted down 
numerical examples in working out a piece of analysis). To 
follow her line of thought, however, it is necessary to examine 
her version of Marx's models closely, to see on what assumptions 
they are based (explicitly or unconsciously) and to search the 
assumptions for clues to the succeeding analysis. 

To begin at the beginning — gross national income (for a 
closed economy) for, say, a year, is written c-\-v-\-s\ that is, con- 

^ For a totally different interpretation see Sweezy; The Theory of Capitalist 
Development, chap, xi, Section 9. ^ See p. 166. 

13 



INTRODUCTION 

stant capital, variable capital and surplus. Variable capital, v, 
is the annual wages bill. Surplus, s, is annual rent, interest, and 
net profit, so that v -{-s represents net national income.* (In this in- 
troduction surplus is used interchangeably with rent, interest and 
net profit.) Constant capital, c, represents at the same time the 
contribution which materials and capital equipment make to 
annual output, and the cost of maintaining the stock of physical 
capital in existence at the beginning of the year. When all com- 
modities are selling at normal prices, these two quantities are 
equal (normal prices are tacitly assumed always to rule,^ an 
assumption which is useful for long-period problems, though 
treacherous when we have to deal with slumps and crises) . Gross 
receipts equal to c-\-v-\-s pass through the hands of the capit- 
alists during the year, of which they use an amount, c, to replace 
physical capital used up during the year, so that c represents 
costs of raw materials and wear and tear and amortisation of 
plant. An amount, v, is paid to workers and is consumed by 
them (saving by workers is regarded as negligible-). The sur- 
plus, s, remains to the capitalists for their own consumption and 
for net saving. The professional classes (civil servants, priests, 
prostitutes, etc.) are treated as hangers-on of the capitalists, and 
their incomes do not appear, as they are not regarded as pro- 
ducing value.^ Expenditure upon them tends to lessen the saving 
of capitalists, and their own expenditure and saving are treated 
as expenditure and saving out of surplus. 

In the model set out in chapter vi there is no technical pro- 
gress (this is a drastic simplification made deliberately*) and the 
ratio of capital to labour is constant (as the stock of capital 
increases employment increases in proportion). Thus real out- 
put per worker employed is constant (hours of work per year do 
not vary) and real wages per man are constant. It follows that 
real surplus per man is also constant. So long as these assump- 
tions are retained Marxian value presents no problem. Value is 
the product of labour-time. Value created per man-year is con- 
stant because hours of work are constant. Real product per man 
year being constant, on the above assumptions, the value of a 
unit of product is constant. For convenience we may assume 
money wages per man constant. Then, on these assumptions, 

' Cf. the quotation from Capital, vol. iii, p. 331. 
* See p. 132. ^ See p. 135. * See p. 130. 

14 



INTRODUCTION 

both the money price of a unit of output and the value of a unit 
of money are constant. This of course merely plasters over all 
the problems of measurement connected with the use of index 
numbers, but provided that the technique of production is 
unchanging, and normal prices are ruling, those problems 
are not serious, and we can conduct the analysis in terms 
of money values.^ (Rosa Luxemburg regards it as a matter of 
indifference whether we calculate in money or in value. ^) 

The assumption of constant real wages presents a difficulty 
which we may notice in passing. The operation of the capitalist 
system is presumed to depress the level of wages down to the 
limit set by the minimum subsistence of the worker and his 
family. But how large a family? It would be an extraordinary 
fluke if the average size of family supported by the given wage 
of a worker were such as to provide for a rate of growth of 
population exactly adjusted to the rate of accumulation of 
capital, and she certainly does not hold that this is the case.^ 
There is a reserve army of labour standing by, ready to take 
employment when the capitalists offer it. While they are un- 
employed the workers have no source of income, but are kept 
alive by sharing in the consumption of the wages of friends and 
relations who are in work.* When an increase in the stock of 
capital takes place, more workers begin to earn wages, those 
formerly employed are relieved of the burden of supporting 
some unemployed relations, and their own consumption rises. 
Thus either they were living below the subsistence minimum 
before, or they are above it now. We may cut this knot by 
simply postulating that real wages per man are constant,^ with- 
out asking why. The important point for the analysis which we 
are examining is that when employment increases the total con- 
sumption of the workers as a whole increases by the amount of 
the wages received by the additional workers.^ 

We may now set out the model for simple reproduction — 
that is, annual national income for an economy in which the 
stock of capital is kept intact but not increased. All output is 

^ Exchanges between industries, however, must take place at 'prices of 
production' not at values. See below, p. 15, note. 

2 See p. 113. 3 See p. 361. * See p. 134. 

^ Later it is assumed that real wages can be depressed by taxation 
(p. 455). 8 Seep. 116. 

15 



INTRODUCTION 

divided into two departments: I, producing capital equipment 
and raw materials, (producers' goods), and II, producing con- 
sumption goods. Then we have 

I: c^-irVi+Si=Ci-rC2 

II: <:2 + ^2 + -^2 = ^l + ^2+-^l+-^2 

Thus 

^2 = ^l + -^l 

This means that the net output of the producers' goods depart- 
ment is equal to the replacement of capital in the consumers' 
goods department. The whole surplus, as well as the whole of 
wages, is currently consumed. 

Before proceeding to the model for accumulation there is a 
difficulty which must be discussed. In the above model the stock 
of capital exists, so to speak, offstage. Rosa Luxemburg is per- 
fectly well aware of the relationship between annual wear and 
tear of capital, which is part off, and the stock of fixed capital,^ 
but as soon as she (following Marx) discusses accumulation she 
equates the addition to the stock of capital made by saving out 
of surplus in one year to the wear and tear of capital in the next 
year. To make sense of this we must assume that all capital is 
consumed and made good once a year. She seems to slip into 
this assumption inadvertently at first, though later it is made 
explicit. 2 She also consciously postulates that v represents the 
amount of capital which is paid out in wages in advance of 
receipts from sales of the commodities produced. (This, as she 
says, is the natural assumption to make for agricultural pro- 
duction, where workers this year are paid from the proceeds of 
last year's harvest.)^ Thus v represents at the same time the 
annual wages bill and the amount of capital locked up in the 
wages fund, while c represents both the annual amortisation of 
capital and the total stock of capital (other than the wages fund) . 
This is a simplification which is tiresome rather than helpful (it 

s 
arises from Marx's ill-judged habit of writing • for the rate of 

profit on capital), but it is no more than a simplification and 
does not invalidate the rest of the analysis. 

Another awkward assumption, which causes serious trouble 

' Sec p. H;,. ^ Sec p. 35,5. ' See p. 76, note 3.f)f,. 

16 



INTRODUCTION 

later, is implicit in the argument. Savings out of the surplus 
accruing in each department (producers' and consumers' goods) 
are always invested in capital in the same department. There is 
no reason to imagine that one capitalist is linked to others in 
his own department more than to those in the other depart- 
ment, so the conception seems to be that each capitalist invests 
his savings in his own business. There is no lending by one 
capitalist to another and no capitalist ever shifts his sphere of 
operations from one department to another. This is a severe 
assumption to make even about the era before limited liability 
was introduced, and becomes absurd afterwards. Moreover it 
is incompatible with the postulate that the rate of profit on 
capital tends to equality throughout the economy,^ for the 
mechanism which equalises profits is the flow of new investment, 
and the transfer of capital as amortisation funds are re-invested, 
into more profitable lines of production and away from less 
profitable lines. ^ 

The assumption that there is no lending by one capitalist 
to another puts limitation upon the model. Not only must the 
total rate of investment be equal to the total of planned saving, 
but investment in each department must be equal to saving 
in that department, and not only must the rate of increase 
of capital lead to an increase of total output compatible 
with total demand, but the increase in output of each depart- 
ment, dictated by the increase in capital in that department, 
must be divided between consumers' and producers' goods in 
proportions compatible with the demand for each, dictated by 
the consumption and the investment plans in each department. 

1 See p. 79. 

2 In the numerical example quoted in chap. vi. (p. 1 17) the rate of profit 
is much higher in Department II than in I. Marx has made the rate of 
exploitation equal in the two departments, and the ratio of constant to 
variable capital higher in Department I. This is evidently an oversight. 
The two departments must trade with each other at market prices, not in 
terms of value. Therefore s^ must represent the profits accruing to Depart- 
ment I, not a proportion (half in the example) of the value generated in 

s s 

Department I. -^ should exceed — to an extent corresponding to the higher 

organic composition of capital in Department I. The point is interesting, as 
it shows that when off guard Marx forgot that he could make prices propor- 
tional to values only when the organic composition of capital is the same in 
all industries. 

17 



INTRODUCTION 

There is no difficulty, however, in choosing numbers which 
satisfy the requirements of the model. The numerical examples 
derived from Marx's jottings are cumbersome and confusing, 
but a clear and simple model can be constructed on the basis of 
the assumptions set out in chapter vii. In each department, 
constant capital is four times variable capital.^ (Constant capital 
is the stock of raw materials which is turned over once a year; 
variable capital is the wages bill, which is equal to the capital 
represented by the wages fund.) Surplus is equal to variable 
capital (net income is divided equally between wages and sur- 
plus) and half of surplus is saved. ^ Savings are allotted between 
constant and variable capital in such a way as to preserve the 
4 to I ratio. Thus four-fifths of savings represents a demand for 
producers' goods, and is added to constant capital each year, 
and one-fifth represents a demand for consumers' goods, and 
is added to the wages fund (variable capital). These ratios dic- 
tate the relationship between Department I (producers' goods) 
and Department II (consumers' goods). ^ It can easily be seen 
that the basic assumptions require that the output of Depart- 
ment I must stand in the ratio of ii to 4 to the output of 
Department II.* We can now construct a much simpler model 
than those provided in the text. 





c 


V 


s Gross Output 


Department I 


44 


1 1 


II 66 


Department II 


16 


4 


4 24 
Total 90 



In Department I, 5-5 units are saved (half of j) of which 4-4 are 
invested in constant capital and i-i in variable capital. In 
Department II 2 units are saved, i-6 being added to constant 
and 04 to variable capital. The 66 units of producers' goods 
provide 44+4-4 constant capital for Department I and 16 + 1 -6 

^ See p. 129. ^ See p. 130. 

^ Since, in this model, the organic composition of capital is the same in 
the two departments, prices correspond to values. 

* Of total gross output, 5 is replacement of constant capital; surplus is 
\ of gross output, and of surplus half is saved; thus savings are Vo of gross 
output; of saving \ is added to constant capital; thus iV of gross output is 
added to constant capital. The output of Department I is therefore | + ^»^ or 
IJ of total gross output. Similarly, the output of Department II \s ^\ of 
total gross output. 

18 



INTRODUCTION 

constant capital for Department II and the 24 units of con- 
sumers' goods provide 1 1 (-4 wages of labour already employed, 
5-5 + 2 for consumption out of surplus, and i-i 4-0-4 addition to 
variable capital, which provide for an addition to employment. 
After the investment has been made, and the labour force 
increased in proportion to the wages bill, we have 





c 


V 


s Gross Output 


Department I 
Department II 


48-4 
17-6 


I2-I 
4.4 


12-1 72-6 

4-4 26-4 

Total 99 



The two departments are now equipped to carry out another 
round of investment at the prescribed rate, and the process of 
accumulation continues. The ratios happen to have been chosen 
so that the total labour force, and total gross output, increase 
by ID per cent per annum. ^ 

But all this, as Rosa Luxemburg remarks, is just arithmetic. ^ 
The only point of substance which she deduces from Marx's 
numerical examples is that it is always Department I which 
takes the initiative. She maintains that the capitalists in Depart- 
ment I decide how much producers' goods to produce, and that 
Department II has to arrange its affairs so as to absorb an 
amount of producers' goods which will fit in with their plans. ^ 
On the face of it, this is obviously absurd. The arithmetic is 
perfectly neutral between the two departments, and, as she her- 
self shows, will serve equally well for the imagined case of a 
socialist society where investment is planned with a view to 
consumption.* 

But behind all this rigmarole lies the real problem which she 
is trying to formulate. Where does the demand come from 
which keeps accumulation going? 

She is not concerned with the problem, nowadays so familiar, 
of the balance between saving and investment. Marx himself 
was aware of that problem, as is seen in his analysis of dis- 
equilibrium under conditions of simple reproduction (zero net 
investment).^ When new fixed capital comes into existence, part 

^ This model bears a strong family resemblance to Mr. Harrod's 'War- 
ranted rate of growth'. Towards a Dynamic Economics, lecture III. 
^ See p. 119. ^ See p. 125. 

* See p. 128. ^ See p. 91. 

19 



INTRODUCTION 

of gross receipts are set aside in amortisation funds without any 
actual outlay being made on renewals. Then total demand falls 
short of equilibrium output, and the system runs into a slump. 
Contrariwise, when a burst of renewals falls due, in excess of the 
current rate of amortisation, a boom sets in. For equilibrium it 
is necessary for the age composition of the stock of capital to 
be such that current renewals just absorb current amortisation 
funds. Similarly, when accumulation is taking place, current 
investment must absorb current net saving. ^ 

It is in connection with the problem of effective demand, in 
this sense, that Marx brings gold-mining into the analysis. When 
real output expands at constant money prices, the increasing 
total of money value of output requires an increase in the stook 
of money in circulation (unless the velocity of circulation rises 
appropriately). The capitalists therefore have to devote part of 
their savings to increasing their holdings of cash (for there is no 
borrowing). This causes a deficiency of effective demand. But 
the increase in the quantity of money in circulation comes from 
newly mined gold, and the expenditure of the gold mining in- 
dustry upon the other departments just makes up the deficiency 
in demand. 2 

Rosa Luxemburg garbles this argument considerably, and 
brushes it away as beside the point. And it is beside the point 
that she is concerned with. She does not admit the savings and 
investment problem, for she takes it for granted that each 
individual act of saving out of surplus is accompanied by a 
corresponding amount of real investment, and that every piece 
of investment is financed by saving out of surplus of the same 
capitalist who makes it.^ What she appears to be concerned with 
is rather the inducement to invest. What motive have the 
capitalists for enlarging their stock of real capital?* How do 
they know that there will be demand for the increased output of 
goods which the new capital will produce, so that they can 
'capitalise' their surplus in a profitable form? (On the purely 

' See p. 115. 

^ See p. 102. The phrase 'zahlungsfähige nachfrage', translated 'effective 
demand', is not the effective demand of Keynes (roughly, current expendi- 
ture) but appears often to mean demand for new capital, or, perhaps, pro- 
spective future demand for goods to be produced by new capital. 

' This assumption is made explicit later (p. 342). 

* See pp. 131 ct scq. 

20 



INTRODUCTION 

analytical plane her affinity seems to be with Hobson rather 
than Keynes.) 

Needless to say, our author does not formulate the problem 
of the inducement to invest in modern terminology, and the 
ambiguities and contradictions in her exposition have left ample 
scope for her critics to represent her theory as irredeemable non- 
sense.^ But the most natural way to read it is also the clearest. 
Investment can take place in an ever-accumulating stock of 
capital only if the capitalists are assured of an ever-expanding 
market for the goods which the capital will produce. On 
this reading, the statement of the problem leads straightfor- 
wardly to the solution propounded in the third Section of this 
book. 

Marx has his own answer to the problem of inducement to 
invest, which she refers to in the first chapter. ^ The pressure of 
competition forces each individual capitalist to increase his 
capital in order to take advantage of economies of large-scale 
production, for if he does not his rivals will, and he will be 
undersold. Rosa Luxemburg does not discuss whether this 
mechanism provides an adequate drive to keep accumulation 
going, but looks for some prospective demand outside the circle 
of production. Here the numerical examples, as she shows, fail 
to help. And this is in the nature of the case, for (in modern 
jargon) the examples deal with ex post quantities, while she is 
looking for ex ante prospects of increased demand for commodi- 
ties. If accumulation does take place, demand will absorb out- 
put, as the model shows, but what is it that makes accumulation 
take place? 

In Section II our author sets out to find what answers have 
been given to her problem. The analysis she has in mind is now 
broader than the strict confines of the arithmetical model. Tech- 
nical progress is going on, and the output of an hour's labour 
rises as time goes by. (The concept of value now becomes 
treacherous, for the value of commodities is continuously falling.) 
Real wages tend to be constant in terms of commodities, thus 
the value of labour power is falling, and the share of surplus in 

. . s 
net income is rising (-, the rate of exploitation, is rising). The 

amount of saving in real terms is therefore rising (she suggests 

^ See Sweezy, loc. cit. ^ See p. 40. 

21 



INTRODUCTION 

later that the proportion of surplus saved rises with surplus, in 
which case real savings increase all the more^). The problem 
is thus more formidable than appears in the model, for the 
equilibrium rate of accumulation of capital, in real terms, is 
greater than in the model, where the rate of exploitation is con- 
stant. At the same time the proportion of constant to variable 
capital is rising. She regards this not as something which is 
likely to happen for technical reasons, but as being necessarily 
bound up with the very nature of technical progress. As pro- 
ductivity increases, the amount of producers' goods handled per 
man-hour of labour increases; therefore, she says, the proportion 
of c to y must increase. ^ This is an error. It arises from thinking 
of constant capital in terms of goods, and contrasting it with 
variable capital in terms of value, that is, hours of labour. She 
forgets Marx's warning that, as progress takes place, the value of 
the commodities making up constant capital also falls. ^ It is 
perfectly possible for productivity to increase without any in- 
crease in the value of capital per man employed. This would 
occur if improvements in the productivity of labour in making 
producers' goods kept pace with the productivity of labour 
in using producers' goods to make consumers' goods (capital- 
saving inventions balance labour-saving inventions, so that 
technical progress is 'neutral'). However, we can easily get out 
of this difficulty by postulating that as a matter of fact tech- 
nical progress is mainly labour-saving, or, a better term, 
capital-using, so that capital per man employed is rising 
through time. 

Rosa Luxemburg treats the authors whom she examines in 
Section II with a good deal of sarcasm, and dismisses them all 
as useless. To some of the points raised her answers seem scarcely 
adequate. For instance, Rodbertus sees the source of all the 
troubles of capitalism in the falhng proportion of wages in 
national income.* He can be interpreted to refer to the propor- 
tion of wages in gross income. In that case, she is right (on the 
assumption of capital-using inventions) in arguing that a fall in 
the proportion of wages is bound up with technical progress, 
and that the proportion could be held constant only by stopping 

* Sec p. 303. 2 See p. 258, 

* This point is, however, later admitted (p. 337). 

* See p. 252. 

22 



INTRODUCTION 

progress. He can also be taken to refer to the share of wages in 
net output, and this is the more natural reading. On this read- 
ing she argues that the fall in share of wages (or rise in rate of 
exploitation) is necessary to prevent a fall in the rate of profit 
on capital^ (as capital per man employed rises, profit per man 
employed must rise if profit per unit of capital is constant). But 
she does not follow up the argument and inquire what rise in 
the rate of exploitation is necessary to keep capitalism going 
(actually, the statisticians tell us, the share of wages in net in- 
come has been fairly constant in modern industrial economies 2). 
It is obvious that the less the rate of exploitation rises, the 
smaller is the rise in the rate of saving which the system has to 
digest, while the rise in real consumption by workers, which 
takes place when the rate of exploitation rises more slowly than 
productivity in the consumption good industries, creates an out- 
let for investment in productive capacity in those industries. 
The horrors of capitalism, and the difficulties which it creates 
for itself, are both exaggerated by the assumption of constant 
real-wage rates and, although it would be impossible to defend 
Rodbertus' position that a constant rate of exploitation is all 
that is needed to put everything right, he certainly makes a 
contribution to the argument which ought to be taken into 
account. 

Tugan-Baranovski also seems to be treated too lightly. His 
conception is that the rising proportion of constant capital 
in both departments (machines to make machines as well as 
machines to make consumers' goods) provides an outlet for 
accumulation, and that competition is the driving force which 
keeps capitalists accumulating. Rosa Luxemburg is no doubt 
correct in saying that his argument does not carry the analysis 
beyond the stage at which Marx left it,^ but he certainly 
elaborates a point which she seems perversely to overlook. Her 
real objection to Tugan-Baranovski is that he shows how, 
in certain conditions, capitalist accumulation might be self- 
perpetuating, while she wishes to establish that the coming 

^ See p. 259. Marx himself failed to get this point clear. Cf. my Essay on 
Marxian Economics, chap. v. 

^ Cf. Kalecki, Essays in the Theory of Economic Fluctuations, pp. 14 et 
seq. 

' See p. 323. 

23 



INTRODUCTION 

disintegration of the capitalist system is not merely probable 
on the evidence, but is a logical necessity.^ 

The authors such as Sismondi, Malthus and Vorontsov, who 
are groping after the problem of equilibrium between saving 
and investment, are treated with even less sympathy (though 
she has a kindly feeling for Sismondi, to whom she considers that 
Marx gave too little recognition^) for she is either oblivious that 
there is such a problem, or regards it as trivial.^ We leave the 
discussion, at the end of Section II, at the same point where we 
entered it, with the clue to the inducement to invest still to find. 

Section III is broader, more vigorous and in general more 
rewarding than the two preceding parts. It opens with a return 
to Marx's model for a capitalist system with accumulation going 
on. Our author then sets out a fresh model allowing for tech- 
nical progress. The rate of exploitation (the ratio of surplus to 
wages) is rising, for real wages remain constant while output per 
man increases. In the model the proportion of surplus saved is 
assumed constant for simplicity, though in reality, she holds, it 
would tend to rise with the real income of the capitalists.'* The 
ratio of constant to variable capital is rising for technical 
reasons. (The convention by which the annual wear and tear 
of capital is identified with the stock of capital now becomes a 
great impediment to clear thinking.) The arithmetical model 
shows the system running into an impasse because the output of 
Department I falls short of the requirements of constant capital 
in the two departments taken together, while the output of 
Department II exceeds consumption.'' The method of argu- 
ment is by no means rigorous. Nothing follows from the fact that 
one particular numerical example fails to give a solution, and 
the example is troublesome to interpret as it is necessary to dis- 
tinguish between discrepancies due to rounding off the figures 

^ See p. 314. Marx did not find himself in this dilemma because he 
held that there is a fundamental 'contradiction' in capitalism which shows 
itself in a strong tendency for the rate of profit on capital to fall as technical 
progress takes place. But Rosa Luxemburg sees that the tendency to a falling 
rate of profit is automatically checked and may even be reversed if real-wage 
rates are constant (p. 338). 

2 Sec p. 217, note. 

^ One passage suggests that she sees the problem, but thinks it irrelevant 
to the real issue (p. 342). 

* See p. 33B. ' See p. 337. 

24 



INTRODUCTION 

from those which arc intended to illustrate a point of principle.^ 
But there is no need to paddle in the arithmetic to find where 
the difficulty lies. The model is over-determined because of the 
rule that the increment of capital within each department at 
the end of a year must equal the saving made within the same 
department during the year. If capitalists from Department II 
were permitted to lend part of their savings to Department I 
to be invested in its capital, a breakdown would no longer be 
inevitable. Suppose that total real wages are constant and that 
real consumption by capitalists increases slowly, so that the real 
output of Department II rises at a slower rate than produc- 
tivity, then the amount of labour employed in it is shrinking. 
The ratio of capital to labour however is rising as a consequence 
of capital-using technical progress. The output of Department I, 
and its productive capacity, is growing through time. Capital 
invested in Department I is accumulating faster than the saving 
of the capitalists in Department I, and capitalists of Depart- 
ment II, who have no profitable outlet in their own industries 
for their savings, acquire titles to part of the capital in Depart- 
ment I by supplying the difference between investment in 
Department I and its own saving. ^ For any increase in the stock 
of capital of both departments taken together, required by 
technical progress and demand conditions, there is an appro- 
priate amount of saving, and so long as the total accumulation 
required and total saving fit, there is no breakdown. 

But here we find the clue to the real contradiction. These 
quantities might conceivably fit, but there is no guarantee that 
they will. If the ratio of saving which the capitalists (taken 
together) choose to make exceeds the rate of accumulation dic- 
tated by technical progress, the excess savings can only be 
'capitalised' if there is an outlet for investment outside the 
system. (The opposite case of deficient savings is also possible. 
Progress would then be slowed down below the technically 
possible maximum; but this case is not contemplated by our 
author, and it would be irrelevant to elaborate upon it.) 

Once more we can substitute for a supposed logical necessity 

^ In this model the rate of exploitation is different in the two depart- 
ments. This means that the numbers represent money value, not value. 

* Rosa Luxemburg seems to regard this process as impossible, but for 
what reason is by no means clear (p. 341). 

25 



INTRODUCTION 

a plausible hypothesis about the nature of the real case, and so 
rescue the succeeding argument. If in reality the distribution of 
income between workers and capitalists, and the propensity to 
save of capitalists, are such as to require a rate of accumulation 
which exceeds the rate of increase in the stock of capital appro- 
priate to technical conditions, then there is a chronic excess of 
the potential supply of real capital over the demand for it and 
the system must fall into chronic depression. (This is the 'stag- 
nation thesis' thrown out by Keynes and elaborated by modern 
American economists, notably Alvin Hansen). How then is it 
that capitalist expansion had not yet (in 19 12) shown any sign 
of slackening? 

In chapter xxvi Rosa Luxemburg advances her central thesis 
— that it is the invasion of primitive economies by capitalism 
which keeps the system alive. There follows a scorching account 
of the manner in which the capitalist system, by trade, conquest 
and theft, swallowed up the pre-capitalist economies, — some 
reduced to colonies of capitalist nations, some remaining nomin- 
ally independent — and fed itself upon their ruins. The thread of 
analysis running through the historical illustrations is not easy 
to pick up, but the main argument seems to be as follows: As 
soon as a primitive closed economy has been broken into, by 
force or guile, cheap mass-produced consumption goods dis- 
place the old hand production of the family or village com- 
munities, so that a market is provided for ever-increasing out- 
puts from the industries of Department II in the old centres 
of capitalism, without the standard of life of the workers who 
consume these commodities being raised.^ The ever-growing 
capacity of the export industries requires the products of 
Department I, thus maintaining investment at home. At the 
same time great capital works, such as railways, are undertaken 
in the new territories. 2 This investment is matched partly by 
savings from surplus extracted on the spot, but mainly by loans 
from the old capitalist countries. There is no difficulty here in 
accounting for the inducement to invest, for the new territories 
yield commodities unobtainable at homc.^ We might set out the 
essence of the argument as follows: Cloth from Lancashire pays 
for labour in America, which is used to produce wheat and 
cotton. These provide wages and raw materials to the Lan- 
> See p. 352. 2 Sec p. 352. ^ See p. 358. 

26 



INTRODUCTION 

cashire mills, while the profits acquired both on the plantations 
and in the mills are invested in steel rails and rolling stock, 
which open up fresh territories, so that the whole process is 
continuously expanding. Moreover, apart from profits earned 
on capital actually invested in the new territories, great capital 
gains are made simply by acquiring possession of land and other 
natural resources.^ Labour to work the resources may be pro- 
vided by the local dispossessed peasantry or by immigration 
from the centres of capitalism. ^ Investment in equipment for it 
to use is more profitable than in that operated by home labour, 
partly because the wretched condition of the colonial workers 
makes the rate of exploitation higher,^ but mainly just because 
they are on the spot, and can turn the natural resources seized 
by the capitalists into means of production. No amount of in- 
vestment in equipment for British labour would produce soil 
bearing cotton, rubber or copper. Thus investment is deflected 
abroad* and the promise of profit represented by the natural 
resources calls into existence, by fair means or foul, the labour 
and capital to make it come true. The process of building up 
this capital provides an outlet for the old industries and rescues 
them from the contradictions inherent in deficiency of demand. 
The analysis of mihtarism in the last chapter over-reaches 
itself by trying to prove too much. The argument is that arma- 
ments are built up out of taxes which fall entirely on wages. ^ 
This can be regarded as a kind of 'forced saving' imposed on the 
workers. These savings are extra to the saving out of surplus. 
They are invested in armaments, and that ends the story. On 
this basis the armaments, in themselves, cannot be held to pro- 
vide an outlet for the investment of surplus (though the use of 
the armaments, as in the Opium War,^ to break up primitive 
economies is a necessary condition for the colonial investment 
already described) and capital equipment to produce arma- 
ments is merely substituted for capital formerly producing con- 
sumers' goods. The analysis which best fits Rosa Luxemburg's 
own argument, and the facts, is that armaments provide an out- 
let for the investment of surplus (over and above any contribu- 
tion there may be from forced saving out of wages), which, un- 
like other kinds of investment, creates no further problem by 

^ See p. 370. 2 See p^ ^28. ^ See p. 435. 

* See p. 421. ^ See p. 455. * See p. 387. 

27 



INTRODUCTION 

increasing productive capacity (not to mention the huge new 
investment opportunities created by reconstruction after the 
capitaUst nations have turned their weapons against each other). 
All this is perhaps too neat an account of what our author is 
saying. The argument streams along bearing a welter of his- 
torical examples in its flood, and ideas emerge and disappear 
again bewilderingly. But something like the above seems to be 
intended. And something like it is now widely accepted as being 
true. Rosa Luxemburg, as we have seen, neglects the rise in real 
wages which takes place as capitalism develops, and denies the 
internal inducement to invest provided by technical progress, 
two factors which help to rescue capitalism from the difficulties 
which it creates for itself. She is left with only one influence 
(economic imperialism) to account for continuous capital 
accumulation, so that her analysis is incomplete. All the same, 
few would deny that the extension of capitalism into new terri- 
tories was the mainspring of what an academic economist has 
called the 'vast secular boom' of the last two hundred years,^ 
and many academic economists account for the uneasy con- 
dition of capitalism in the twentieth century largely by the 
'closing of the frontier' all over the world. ^ But the academic 
economists are being wise after the event. For all its confusions 
and exaggerations, this book shows more prescience than any 
orthodox contemporary could claim. 

JOAN ROBINSON 

Cambridge. 

^ Hicks, Value and Capital, p. 302, note. Mr. Hicks himself, however, 
regards the increase in population as the mainspring. 
2 Cf. A Survey of Contemporary Economics (ed. Ellis), p. 63. 



28 



SECTION ONE 



THE PROBLEM 
OF REPRODUCTION 



CHAPTER I 

THE OBJECT 
OF OUR INVESTIGATION 

KARL MARX made a contribution of lasting service to the 
theory of economics when he drew attention to the prob- 
-lem of the reproduction of the entire social capital. It is 
significant that in the history of economics we find only two 
attempts at an exact exposition of this problem: one by Quesney, 
the father of the Physiocrats, at its very inception; and in its 
final stage this attempt by Marx. In the interim, the problem 
was ever with bourgeois economics. Yet bourgeois economists 
have never been fully aware of this problem in its pure aspects, 
detached from related and intersecting minor problems; they 
have never been able to formulate it precisely, let alone solve it. 
Seeing that the problem is of paramount importance, their 
attempts may all the same help us to some understanding of the 
trend of scientific economics. 

What is it precisely that constitutes this problem of the repro- 
duction of total capital? The literal meaning of the word 'repro- 
duction' is repetition, renewal of the process of production. At 
first sight it may be difficult to see in what respect the idea of 
reproduction differs from that of repetition which we can all 
understand — why such a new and unfamiliar term should be 
required. But in the sort of repetition which we shall consider, 
in the continual recurrence of the process of production, there 
are certain distinctive features. First, the regular repetition of 
reproduction is the general sine qua non of regular consumption 
which in its turn has been the precondition of human civilis- 
ation in every one of its historical forms. The concept of repro- 
duction, viewed in this way, reflects an aspect of the history of 
civilisation. Production can never be resumed, there can be no 
reproduction, unless certain prerequisites such as tools, raw 
materials and labour have been established during the pre- 
ceding period of production. However, at the most primitive 

31 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

level of man's civilisation, at the initial stage of man's power 
over nature, this possibility to re-engage in production depended 
more or less on chance. So long as hunting and fishing were the 
main foundations of social existence, frequent periods of general 
starvation interrupted the regular repetition of production. 
Some primitive peoples recognised at a very early stage that for 
reproduction as a regularly recurring process certain measures 
were essential; these they incorporated into ceremonies of a 
religious nature; and in this way they accepted such measures 
as traditional social commitments. Thus, as the thorough re- 
searches of Spencer and Gillen have taught us, the totem cult of 
the Australian negroes is fundamentally nothing but certain 
measures taken by social groups for the purpose of securing and 
preserving their animal and vegetable foodstuffs; these pre- 
cautions had been taken year by year since time immemorial 
and thus they became fossilised into religious ceremonials. Yet 
the circle of consumption and production which forms the 
essence of reproduction became possible only with the invention 
of tillage with the hoe, with the taming of domestic animals, and 
with cattle-raising for the purpose of consumption. Reproduc- 
tion is something more than mere repetition in so far as it pre- 
supposes a certain level of society's supremacy over nature, or, 
in economic terms, a certain standard of labour productivity. 
On the other hand, at all stages of social development, the 
process of production is based on the continuation of two dif- 
ferent, though closely connected factors, the technical and social 
conditions — on the precise relationship between man and nature 
and that between men and men. Reproduction depends to the 
same degree on both these conditions. We have just seen how 
reproduction is bound up with the conditions of human working 
techniques, how far it is indeed solely the result of a certain 
level of laboüY productivity; but the social forms of production 
prevailing in each case are no less decisive. In a primitive com- 
munist agrarian community, reproduction as well as the whole 
plan of economic life is determined by the community of all 
workers and their democratic organs. The decision to re-engage 
in labour — the organisation of labour — the provision of raw 
materials, tools, and man-power as the essential preliminaries 
of labour — the arrangement of reproduction and the deter- 
mination of its volume are all results of a planned co-operation 

32 



THE OBJECT OF OUR INVESTIGATION 

in which everybody within the boundaries of the community 
takes his part. In an economic system based on slave labour or 
corvee, reproduction is enforced and regulated in all details by 
personal relations of domination. Here the volume of reproduc- 
tion is determined by the right of disposal held by the ruling 
elites over smaller or larger circles of other people's labour. In a 
society producing by capitalist methods, reproduction assumes a 
peculiar form, as a mere glance at certain striking phenomena 
will show us. In every other society known to history, reproduc- 
tion recurs in a regular sequence as far as its preconditions, the 
existing means of production and labour power, make this pos- 
sible. As a rule, only external influences such as a devastating 
war or a great pestilence, depopulating vast areas of former 
cultural life, and consequently destroying masses of labour 
power and of accumulated means of production, can result in a 
complete interruption of reproduction or in its contraction to 
any considerable extent for longer or shorter periods. A despotic 
organisation of the plan of production may on occasion lead to 
similar phenomena. When in ancient Egypt Pharaoh's will 
chained thousands of fellaheen for decades to the building of the 
pyramids; when in modern Egypt Ismail Pasha ordered 20,000 
fellaheen to forced labour on the Suez Canal; or when, about 
two hundred years before Christ, the Emperor Shi Hoang Ti, 
founder of the Chin dynasty, allowed 400,000 people to perish 
of hunger and exhaustion and thus sacrificed a whole genera- 
tion to his purpose of consolidating the Great Wall at China's 
northern frontier, the result was always that vast stretches of 
arable land were left fallow and that regular economic life was 
interrupted for long periods. In all these cases the causes of 
these interruptions of reproduction obviously lay in the one- 
sided determination of the plan of reproduction by those in 
power. 

Societies which produce according to capitalist methods pre- 
sent a different picture. We observe that in certain periods all 
the ingredients of reproduction may be available, both labour 
and means of production, and yet some vital needs of society for 
consumer goods may be left unfulfilled. We find that in spite of 
these resources reproduction may in part be completely sus- 
pended and in part curtailed. Here it is no despotic interference 
with the economic plan that is responsible for the difficulties in 

A.c. 33 B 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

the process of production. Quite apart from all technical con- 
ditions, reproduction here depends on purely social considera- 
tions: only those goods are produced which can with certainty 
be expected to sell, and not merely to sell, but to sell at the cus- 
tomary profit. Thus profit becomes an end in itself, the decisive 
factor which determines not only production but also reproduc- 
tion. Not only does it decide in each case what work is to be 
undertaken, how it is to be carried out, and how the products 
are to be distributed; what is more, profit decides, also, at the 
end of every working period, whether the labour process is to 
be resumed, and, if so, to what extent and in what direction it 
should be made to operate.^ 

In capitalist society, therefore, the process of reproduction as 
a whole, constitutes a peculiar and most complicated problem, 
in consequence of these purely historical and social factors. 
There is, as we shall see, an external characteristic which shows 
clearly this specific historical peculiarity of the capitalist pro- 
cess of reproduction. Comprising not only production but also 
circulation (the process of exchange), it unites these two ele- 
ments. Capitalist production is primarily production by in- 
numerable private producers without any planned regulation. 
The only social link between these producers is the act of 
exchange. In taking account of social requirements reproduc- 
tion has no clue to go on other than the experiences of the 
preceding labour period. These experiences, however, remain 
the private experiences of individual producers and are not inte- 
grated into a comprehensive and social form. Moreover, they 
do not always refer positively and directly to the needs of 
society. They are often rather indirect and negative, for it is 
only on the basis of price fluctuations that they indicate whether 
the aggregate of produced commodities falls short of the effec- 
tive demand or exceeds it. Yet the individual private producers 
make recurrent use of these experiences of the preceding labour 
period when they re-engage in reproduction, so that glut or 
shortage are bound to occur again in the following period. In- 
dividual branches of production may develop independently, so 
that there may be a surplus in one branch and a deficiency in 
another. But as nearly all individual branches of production 

^ 'If production be capitalistic in form, so, too, will be reproduction' 
(Capital, vol. i, p. 578). 

34 



THE OBJECT OF OUR INVESTIGATION 

are interdependent technically, glut or shortage in some of the 
larger branches of production lead to the same phenomenon in 
most of the others. Thus the general supply of products may 
alternate periodically between shortage and surplus relative to 
the social demand. 

Herein lies the peculiar character of reproduction in a capit- 
alist society, which differs from all other known forms of pro- 
duction. In the first place, every branch of production develops 
independently within certain limits, in a way that leads to 
periodical interruptions of production of shorter or longer dura- 
tion. Secondly, the individual branches of reproduction show 
deviations from social requirements amounting to all-round 
disparity and thus resulting in a general interruption of repro- 
duction. These features of capitalist reproduction are quite 
characteristic. In all other economic systems, reproduction runs 
its uninterrupted and regular course, apart from external 
disturbance by violence. Capitalist reproduction, however, to 
quote Sismondi's well-known dictum, can only be represented 
as a continuous sequence of individual spirals. Every such spiral 
starts with small loops which become increasingly larger and 
eventually very large indeed. Then they contract, and a new 
spiral starts again with small loops, repeating the figure up to 
the point of interruption. This periodical fluctuation between 
the largest volume of reproduction and its contraction to 
partial suspension, this cycle of slump, boom, and crisis, as it 
has been called, is the most striking peculiarity of capitalist 
reproduction. 

It is very important, however, to establish quite firmly and 
from the very outset that this cyclical movement of boom, 
slump, and crisis, does not represent the whole problem of 
capitalist reproduction, although it is an essential element of it. 
Periodical cycles and crises are specific phases of reproduction 
in a capitalist system of economy, but not the whole of this pro- 
cess. In order to demonstrate the pure implications of capitalist 
reproduction we must rather consider it quite apart from the 
periodical cycles and crises. Strange as this may appear, the 
method is quite rational; it is indeed the only method of inquiry 
that is scientifically tenable. In order to demonstrate and to 
solve the problem of pure value we must leave price fluctua- 
tions out of consideration. The approach of vulgar economics 

35 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

always attempts to solve the problem of value by reference to 
fluctuations in demand and supply. Classical economists, from 
Adam Smith to Karl Marx, attack the problem in the opposite 
way, pointing out that fluctuations in the mutual relation 
between demand and supply can explain only disparities be- 
tween price and value, not value itself. In order to find the 
value of a commodity, we must start by assuming that 
demand and supply are in a state of equilibrium, that the 
price of a commodity and its value closely correspond to one 
another. Thus the scientific problem of value begins at the 
very point where the effect of demand and supply ceases to 
operate. 

In consequence of periodical cycles and crises capitalist re- 
production fluctuates as a rule around the level of the effective 
total demand of society, sometimes rising above and sometimes 
falling below this level, contracting occasionally even to the 
point of almost complete interruption of reproduction. How- 
ever, if we consider a longer period, a whole cycle with its alter- 
nating phases of prosperity and depression, of boom and slump, 
that is if we consider reproduction at its highest and lowest 
volume, including the stage of suspension, we can set ofTboom 
against slump and work out an average, a mean volume of 
reproduction for the whole cycle. This average is not only a 
theoretical figment of thought, it is also a real objective fact. 
For in spite of the sharp rises and falls in the course of a cycle, 
in spite of crises, the needs of society are always satisfied more 
or less, reproduction continues on its complicated course, and 
productive capacities develop progressively. How can this take 
place, leaving cycles and crises out of consideration? Here the 
real question begins. The attempt to solve the problem of repro- 
duction in terms of the periodical character of crises is funda- 
mentally a device of vulgar economics, just like the attempt to 
solve the problem of value in terms of fluctuations in demand 
and supply. Nevertheless, we shall see in the course of our 
observations that as soon as economic theory gets an inkling of 
the problem of reproduction, as soon as it has at least started 
guessing at the problem, it reveals a persistent tendency sud- 
denly to transform the problem of reproduction into the prob- 
lem of crises, thus barring its own way to the solution of the 
question. When we speak of capitalist reproduction in the fol- 

36 



THE OBJECT OF OUR INVESTIGATION 

lowing exposition, wc shall always understand by this term a 
mean volume of productivity which is an average taken over 
the various phases of a cycle. 

Now, the total of capitalist reproduction is created by an 
unlimited and constantly changing number of private pro- 
ducers. They produce independently of one another; apart from 
the observation of price fluctuations there is no social control — 
no social link exists between the individual producers other than 
the exchange of commodities. The question arises how these 
innumerable disconnected operations can lead to the actual 
total of production. This general aspect of our problem indeed 
strikes us immediately as one of prime importance. But if we 
put it this way, we overlook the fact that such private producers 
are not simply producers of commodities but are essentially 
capitalist producers, that the total production of society is not 
simply production for the sake of satisfying social requirements, 
and equally not merely production of commodities, but essen- 
tially capitalist production. 

Let us examine our problem anew in the light of this fact. 
A producer who produces not only commodities but capital 
must above all create surplus value. The capitalist producer's 
final goal, his main incentive, is the production of surplus value. 
The proceeds from the commodities he has manufactured must 
not only recompense him for all his outlay, but in addition 
they must yield him a value which does not correspond with 
any expense on his part, and is pure gain. If we consider the 
process of production from the point of view of the creation of 
surplus value, we see that the capital advanced by the capitalist 
is divided into two parts: the first part represents his expenses 
on means of production such as premises, raw material, partly 
finished goods and machinery. The second part is spent on 
wages. This holds good, even if the capitalist producer does not 
know it himself, and in spite of the pious stuff about fixed and 
circulating capital with which he may delude himself and the 
world. Marx called this first part constant capital. Its value is 
not changed by its utilisation in the labour process — it is trans- 
ferred in toto to the finished product. The second part Marx 
calls the variable capital. This gives rise to an additional value, 
which materialises when the results of unpaid labour are appro- 
priated. The various components which make up the value of 

37 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

every commodity produced by capitalist methods may be ex- 
pressed by the formula: c-l-v-i-s. In this formula c stands for the 
value of the constant capital laid out in inanimate means of 
production and transferred to the commodity, v stands for the 
value of the variable capital advanced in form of wages, and 
s stands for the surplus value, the additional value of the unpaid 
part of wage labour. Every type of goods shows these three 
components of value, whether we consider an individual com- 
modity or the aggregate of commodities as a whole, whether we 
consider cotton textiles or ballet performances, cast-iron tubes 
or liberal newspapers. Thus for the capitalist producer the 
manufacture of commodities is not an end in itself, it is only a 
means to the appropriation of surplus value. This surplus value, 
however, can be of no use to the capitalist so long as it remains 
hidden in the commodity form of the product. Once the com- 
modity has been produced, it must be realised, it must be con- 
verted into a form of pure value; that is, into money. All capital 
expenses incorporated in the commodity must shed their com- 
modity-form and revert to the capitalist as money to make this 
conversion possible so that he can appropriate the surplus value 
in cash. The purpose of production is fulfilled only when this 
conversion has been successful, only when the aggregate of 
commodities has been sold according to its value. The proceeds 
of this sale of commodities, the money that has been received 
for them, contains the same components of value as the former 
aggregate of commodities and can be expressed by the same 
formula c^v-\-s. Part c recompenses the capitalist for his 
advances on means of production that have been used up, part 
V recompenses him for his advances on wages, and the last part, 
s, represents the expected surplus, the capitalist's clear profit in 
cash.^ 

This conversion of capital from its original form, from the 
starting point of all capitalist production, into means of pro- 
duction, dead and living, such as raw materials, instruments, 
and labour; its further conversion into commodities by a living 

^ Surplus value in our exposition is identical with profit. This is true for 
production as a whole, which alone is of account in our further observations. 
For the time being, we shall not deal with the further division of surplus 
value into its component parts: profit of enterprise, interest, and rent, as this 
subdivision is immaterial to the problem of reproduction. 

38 



THE OBJECT OF OUR INVESTIGATION 

labour process; and its final reconversion into money, a greater 
amount of money indeed than at the initial stage — this trans- 
formation of capital is, however, required for more than the 
production and appropriation of surplus value. The aim and 
incentive of capitaHst production is not a surplus value pure 
and simple, to be appropriated in any desired quantity, but a 
surplus value ever growing into larger quantities, surplus value 
ad infinitum. But to achieve this aim, the same magic means 
must be used over and over again, the means of capitalist pro- 
duction — the ever repeated appropriation of the proceeds of un- 
paid wage labour in the process of commodity manufacture, and 
the subsequent realisation of the commodities so produced. 

Thus quite a new incentive is given to constantly renewed 
production, to the process of reproduction as a regular pheno- 
menon in capitalist society, an incentive unknown to any other 
system of production. In every other economic system known to 
history, reproduction is determined by the unceasing need of 
society for consumer goods, whether they are the needs of all 
the workers determined in a democratic manner as in an 
agrarian and communist market community, or the despotic- 
ally determined needs of an antagonistic class society, as in an 
economy of slave labour or corvee and the like. But in a capitalist 
system of production, it is not consideration of social needs 
which actuates the individual private producer who alone 
matters in this connection. His production is determined entirely 
by the effective demand, and even this is to him a mere means 
for the realisation of surplus value which for him is indispens- 
able. Appropriation of surplus value is his real incentive, and 
production of consumer goods for the satisfaction of the effec- 
tive demand is only a detour when we look to the real motive, 
that of appropriation of surplus value, although for the indivi- 
dual capitalist it is also a rule of necessity. This motive, to 
appropriate surplus value, also urges him to re-engage in repro- 
duction over and over again. It is the production of surplus 
value which turns reproduction of social necessities into a per- 
petuum mobile. Reproduction, for its part, can obviously be only 
resumed when the products of the previous period, the commo- 
dities, have been realised; that is, converted into money; for 
capital in the form of money, in the form of pure value, must 
always be the starting point of reproduction in a capitalist 

39 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

system. The first condition of reproduction for the capitalist 
producer is thus seen to be a successful realisation of the com- 
modities produced during the preceding period of production. 

Now we come to a second important point. Under a system of 
private economy, it is the individual producer who determines 
the volume of reproduction at his discretion. His main incentive 
is appropriation of surplus value, indeed an appropriation in- 
creasing as rapidly as possible. An accelerated appropriation of 
surplus value, however, necessitates an increased production of 
capital to generate this surplus value. Here a large-scale enter- 
prise enjoys advantages over a small one in every respect. In 
fine, the capitalist method of production furnishes not only a 
permanent incentive to reproduction in general, but also a 
motive for its expansion, for reproduction on an ever larger 
scale. 

Nor is that all. Capitalist methods of production do more 
than awaken in the capitalist this thirst for surplus value 
whereby he is impelled to ceaseless expansion of reproduction. 
Expansion becomes in truth a coercive law, an economic con- 
dition of existence for the individual capitalist. Under the rule 
of competition, cheapness of commodities is the most important 
weapon of the individual capitalist in his struggle for a place in 
the market. Now all methods of reducing the cost of commodity 
production permanently amount in the end to an expansion of 
production; excepting those only which aim at a specific in- 
crease of the rate of surplus value by measures such as wage- 
cutting or lengthening the hours of work. As for these latter 
devices, they are as such likely to encounter many obstacles. In 
this respect, a large enterprise invariably enjoys advantages of 
every kind over a small or medium concern. They may range 
from a saving in premises or instruments, in the application of 
more efficient means of production, in extensive replacement 
of manual labour by machinery, down to a speedy exploitation of 
a favourable turn of the market so as to acquire raw materials 
cheaply. Within very wide limits, these advantages increase in 
direct proportion to the expansion of the enterprise. Thus, as 
soon as a few capitalist enterprises have been enlarged, com- 
petition itself forces all others to expand likewise. Expansion 
becomes a condition of existence. A growing tendency towards 
reproduction at a progressively increasing scale thus ensues, 

40 



THE OBJECT OF OUR INVESTIGATION 

which spreads automatically like a tidal wave over ever larger 
surfaces of reproduction. 

Expanding reproduction is not a new discovery of capital. 
On the contrary, it had been the rule since time immemorial in 
every form of society that displayed economic and cultural pro- 
gress. It is true, of course, that simple reproduction as a mere 
continuous repetition of the process of production on the same 
scale as before can be observed over long periods of social his- 
tory. In the ancient agrarian and communist village communi- 
ties, for instance, increase in population did not lead to a 
gradual expansion of production, but rather to the new genera- 
tion being expelled and the subsequent founding of equally 
small and self-sufficient colonies. The old small handicraft units 
of India and China provide similar instances of a traditional 
repetition of production in the same forms and on the same 
scale, handed down from generation to generation. But simple 
reproduction is in all these cases the source and unmistakable 
sign of a general economic and cultural stagnation. No impor- 
tant forward step in production, no memorial of civilisation, 
such as the great waterworks of the East, the pyramids of Egypt, 
the military roads of Rome, the Arts and Sciences of Greece, 
or the development of craftsmanship and towns in the Middle 
Ages would have been possible without expanding reproduc- 
tion; for the basis and also the social incentive for a decisive 
advancement of civilisation lies solely in the gradual expansion 
of production beyond immediate requirements, and in a con- 
tinual growth of the population itself as well as of its demands. 

Exchange in particular, which brought about a class society, 
and its historical development into the capitalist form of 
economy, would have been unthinkable without expanding 
reproduction. In a capitalist society, moreover, expanding re- 
production acquires certain characteristics. As we have already 
mentioned, it becomes right away a coercive law to the indi- 
vidual capitalist. Capitalist methods of production do not ex- 
clude simple or even retrogressive reproduction; indeed, this is 
responsible for the periodical phenomenon of crises following 
phases, likewise periodical, of overstrained expansion of repro- 
duction in times of boom. But ignoring periodical fluctuations, 
the general trend of reproduction is ever towards expansion. 
For the individual capitalist, failure to keep abreast of this 

41 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

expansion means quitting the competitive struggle, economic 
death. 

Moreover, there are certain other aspects to be considered. 
The concept of expanding reproduction appHes only to the 
quantity of products, to the aggregate of manufactured objects. 
So long as production rests solely or mainly upon a natural 
economy, consumption determines the extent and character of 
the individual labour process, as well as that of reproduction in 
general, as an end in itself: this applies to the agrarian and 
communist village communities of India, to the Roman villa 
with its economy of slave labour, and to the medieval feudal 
farm based on corvee. But the picture is different in a capitalist 
economic system. Capitalist production is not production for 
the purpose of consumption, it is production for the purpose of 
creating value. The whole process of production as well as of 
reproduction is ruled by value relationships. Capitalist produc- 
tion is not the production of consumer goods, nor is it merely 
the production of commodities: it is pre-eminently the produc- 
tion of surplus value. Expanding reproduction, from a capitalist 
point of view, is expanding production of surplus value, though 
it takes place in the forms of commodity production and is thus 
in the last instance the production of consumer goods. Changes 
in the productivity of labour during the course of reproduction 
cause continual discrepancies between these two aspects. If 
productivity increases, the same amount of capital and surplus 
value may represent a progressively larger amount of consumer 
goods. Expanding production, understood as the creation of a 
greater amount of surplus value, need not therefore necessarily 
imply expanding reproduction in the capitalist meaning of the 
term. Conversely, capital may, within limits, yield a greater 
surplus value in consequence of a higher degree of exploitation 
such as is brought about by wage-cutting and the like, without 
actually producing a greater amount of goods. But in both cases 
the surplus value has a twofold aspect: it is a quantity of value 
as well as an aggregate of material products, and from a capit- 
alist point of view, its elements in both instances are thus the 
same. 

As a rule, an increased production of surplus value results 
from an increase of capital brought about by addition of part of 
the appropriated surplus value to the original capital, no matter 

42 



THE OBJECT OF OUR INVESTIGATION 

whether this capitalist surplus value is used for the expansion of 

an old enterprise or for founding a new one, an independent 

offshoot. Capitalist expanding reproduction thus acquires the 

specific characteristics of an increase in capital by means of a 

progressive capitalisation of surplus value, or, as Marx has put 

it, by the accumulation of capital. 

The general formula for enlarged reproduction under the 

s s 

rule of capital thus runs as follows: c-^v-\ \-s'. Here - stands 

X X 

for the capitalised part of the surplus value appropriated in an 
earlier period of production; s' stands for the new surplus value 
created by the increased capital. Part of this new surplus value 
is capitalised again, and expanding reproduction is thus, from 
the capitalist point of view, a constantly flowing process of alter- 
nate appropriation and capitalisation of surplus value. 

So far, however, we have only arrived at a general and 
abstract formula for reproduction. Let us now consider more 
closely the concrete conditions which are necessary to apply 
this formula. 

The surplus value which has been appropriated, after it has 
successfully cast off its commodity-form in the market, appears 
as a given amount of money. This money-form is the form of 
its absolute value, the beginning of its career as capital. But as 
it is impossible to create surplus value with money, it cannot, 
in this form, advance beyond the threshold of its career. Capital 
must assume commodity-form, so that the particular portion of 
it which is earmarked for accumulation can be capitalised. For 
only in this form can it become productive capital; that is, 
capital begetting new surplus value. Therefore, like the original 
capital, it must again be divided into two parts; a constant part, 
comprising the inanimate means of production, and a variable 
part, the wages. Only then will our formula c-\-v-^s apply to it 
in the same way as it applied to the old capital. 

But the good intent of the capitalist to accumulate, his thrift 
and abstinence which make him use the greater part of his 
surplus value for production instead of squandering it on per- 
sonal luxuries, is not sufficient for this purpose. On the con- 
trary, it is essential that he should find on the commodity 
market the concrete forms which he intends to give his new 
surplus value. In the first place, he must secure the material 

43 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

means of production such as raw materials, machines etc. re- 
quired for the branch of production he has chosen and planned, 
so that the particular part of the surplus value which corre- 
sponds to his constant capital may assume a productive form. 
Secondly, the other, variable part of his surplus value must also 
be convertible, and two essentials are necessary for this con- 
version: of first importance, the labour market must offer a 
sufficient quantity of additional labour, and secondly, as the 
workers cannot live on money alone, the commodity market, 
too, must offer an additional amount of provisions, which the 
workers newly to be employed may exchange against the vari- 
able part of the surplus value they will get from the capitalist. 

All these prerequisites found, the capitalist can set his capit- 
alised surplus value to work and make it, as operating capital, 
beget new surplus value. But still his task is not completely 
done. Both the new capital and the surplus value produced still 
exist for the time being in the shape of an additional quantity 
of some commodity or other. In this form the new capital is but 
advanced, and the new surplus value created by it is still in a 
form in which it is of no use to the capitalist. The new capital 
as well as the surplus value which it has created must cast off 
their commodity-form, re-assume the form of pure value, and 
thus revert to the capitalist as money. Unless this process is 
successfully concluded, the new capital and surplus value will 
be wholly or partly lost, the capitalisation of surplus value will 
have miscarried, and there will have been no accumulation. It 
is absolutely essential to the accumulation of capital that a 
sufficient quantity of commodities created hy the new capital 
should win a place for itself on the market and be realised. 

Thus we see that expanding reproduction as accumulation of 
capital in a capitalist system is bound up with a whole series 
of special conditions. Let us look at these more closely. The first 
condition is that production should create surplus value, for 
surplus value is the elementary form in which alone increased 
production is possible under capitalist conditions. The entire 
process of production must abide by this condition when deter- 
mining the relations between capitalist and worker in the pro- 
duction of commodities. Once this first condition is given, the 
second is that surplus value must be realised, converted into the 
form of money, so that it can be appropriated for the purposes 

44 



THE OBJECT OF OUR INVESTIGATION 

of expanding reproduction. This second condition thus leads us 
to the commodity market. Here, the hazards of exchange decide 
the further fate of the surplus value, and thus the future of re- 
production. The third condition is as follows: provided that part 
of the realised surplus value has been added to capital for the 
purpose of accumulation, this new capital must first assume its 
productive form of labour and inanimate means of production. 
Moreover, that part of it which had been exchanged for labour 
must be converted into provisions for the workers. Thus we are 
led again to the markets of labour and commodities. If all these 
requirements have been met and enlarged reproduction of com- 
modities has taken place, a fourth condition must be added: the 
additional quantity of commodities representing the new capital 
plus surplus value will have to be realised, that is, reconverted 
into money. Only if this conversion has been successful, can it 
be said that expanding capitalist reproduction has actually 
taken place. This last condition leads us back to the commodity 
market. 

Thus capitalist production and reproduction imply a con- 
stant shifting between the place of production and the com- 
modity market, a shuttle movement from the private office and 
the factory where unauthorised persons are strictly excluded, 
where the sovereign will of the individual capitalist is the highest 
law, to the commodity market where nobody sets up any laws 
and where neither will nor reason assert themselves. But it is 
this very licence and anarchy of the commodity market which 
brings home to the individual capitalist that he is dependent 
upon society, upon the entirety of its producing and consuming 
members. The individual capitalist may need additional means 
of production, additional labour and provisions for these 
workers in order to expand reproduction, but whether he can 
get what he needs depends upon factors and events beyond his 
control, materialising, as it were, behind his back. In order to 
realise his increased aggregate of products, the individual capit- 
alist requires a larger market for his goods, but he has no control 
whatever over the actual increase of demand in general, or of 
the particular demand for his special kind of good. 

The conditions we have enumerated here, which all give ex- 
pression to the inherent contradiction between consumption 
and private production and their social interconnection, are 

45 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

nothing new, and it is not only at the stage of reproduction that 
they become apparent. These conditions express the general 
contradiction inherent in capitalist production. They involve, 
however, particular difficulties as regards the process of repro- 
duction for the following reasons. With regard to reproduction, 
especially expanding reproduction, the capitalist method of 
production not only reveals its general fundamental character, 
but, what is more, it shows, in the various periods of produc- 
tion, a definite rhythm within a continuous progression — the 
characteristic interplay of individual wills. From this point of 
view, we must inquire in a general way how it is possible for 
every individual capitalist to find on the market the means of 
production and the labour he requires for the purpose of 
realising the commodities he has produced, although there 
exists no social control whatever, no plan to harmonize produc- 
tion and demand. This question may be answered by saying 
that the capitalist's greed for surplus value, enhanced by com- 
petition, and the automatic eflfects of capitalist exploitation, 
lead to the production of every kind of commodity, including 
means of production, and also that a growing class of prole- 
tarianised workers becomes generally available for the pur- 
poses of capital. On the other hand, the lack of a plan in this 
respect shows itself in the fact that the balance between demand 
and supply in all spheres can be achieved only by continuous 
deviations, by hourly fluctuations of prices, and by periodical 
crises and changes of the market situation. 

From the point of view of reproduction the question is a dif- 
ferent one. How is it possible that the unplanned supply in the 
market for labour and means of production, and the unplanned 
and incalculable changes in demand nevertheless provide ade- 
quate quantities and qualities of means of production, labour 
and opportunities for selling which the individual capitalist 
needs in order to make a sale? How can it be assured that every 
one of these factors increases in the right proportion? Let us put 
the problem more precisely. According to our well-known for- 
mula, let the composition of the individual capitalist's produc- 
tion be expressed by the proportion 40t + 1 oz; + 1 o^'. His constant 
capital is consequently four times as much as his variable 
capital, and the rate of exploitation is 100 per cent. The aggre- 
gate of commodities is thus represented by a value of 60. Let us 

46 



THE OBJECT OF OUR INVESTIGATION 

now assume that the capitalist is in a position to capitalise and 
to add to the old capital of this given composition half of his 
surplus value. In this case, the formula 44c f i ly + i i^=66 
would apply to the next period of production. 

Let us assume now that the capitalist can continue the annual 
capitalisation of half his surplus value for a number of years. 
For this purpose it is not sufficient that means of production, 
labour and markets in general should be forthcoming, but he 
must find these factors in a proportion that is strictly in keeping 
with his progress in accumulation. 



47 



CHAPTER II 

QUESNAY'S AND ADAM SMITH'S 

ANALYSES OF THE PROCESS OF 

REPRODUCTION 



So far we have taken account only of the individual capit- 
alist in our survey of reproduction; he is its typical repre- 
sentative, its agent, for reproduction is indeed brought 
about entirely by individual capitalist enterprises. This approach 
has already shown us that the problem involves difficulties 
enough. Yet these difficulties increase to an extraordinary degree 
and become even more complicated, when we turn our atten- 
tion from the individual capitalist to the totality of capitalists. 
A superficial glance suffices to show that capitalist repro- 
duction as a social whole must not be regarded simply as a 
mechanical summation of all the separate processes of indi- 
vidual capitalist reproduction. We have seen, for instance, that 
one of the fundamental conditions for enlarged reproduction by 
an individual capitalist is a corresponding increase of his oppor- 
tunities to sell on the commodity market. But the individual 
capitalist may not always expand because of an absolute 
increase in the absorptive capacity of the market, but also as a 
result of the competitive struggle, at the cost of other individual 
capitalists. Thus one capitalist may win what another or many 
others who have been shouldered from the market must write 
off as a loss. This process will enable one capitalist to increase 
his reproduction by the amount that it compels others by losses 
to restrict their own. One capitalist will be able to engage in 
enlarged reproduction because others cannot even achieve 
simple reproduction. In the same way, one capitalist may 
enlarge his reproduction by using labour power and means of 
production which another's bankruptcy, that is his partial or 
complete retirement from reproduction, has set free. 

These commonplaces prove that reproduction of the social 

48 



THE PROCESS OF REPRODUCTION 

capital as a whole is not the same as the reproduction of the 
individual capitalist raised to the nth degree. They show that 
the reproductive activities of individual capitalists ceaselessly 
cut across one another and to a greater or smaller degree may 
cancel each other out. 

Therefore we must clarify our concept of reproduction of 
capital as a whole, before we examine the laws and mechanisms 
of capitalist total reproduction. We must raise the question 
whether it is even possible to deduce anything like total repro- 
duction from the disorderly jumble of individual capitals in 
constant motion, changing from moment to moment according 
to uncontrollable and incalculable laws, partly running a 
parallel course, and partly intersecting and cancelling each 
other out. Can one actually talk of total social capital of society 
as an entity, and if so, what is the real meaning of this concept? 
That is the first question a scientific examination of the laws of 
reproduction has to consider. At the dawn of economic theory 
and bourgeois economics, Quesnay, the father of the Physio- 
crats, approached the problem with classical fearlessness and 
simplicity and took it for granted that total capital exists as a 
real and active entity. In his famous Tableau Economique, so in- 
tricate that no one before Marx could understand it, Quesnay 
demonstrated the phases of the reproduction of aggregate 
capital with a few figures, at the same time taking into account 
that it must also be considered from the aspect of commodity 
exchange, that is as a process of circulation.^ 

Society as Quesnay sees it consists of three classes: the pro- 
ductive class of agriculturists; the sterile class containing all 
those who are active outside the sphere of agriculture — indus- 
try, commerce, and the liberal professions; and lastly the class 
of landowners, including the Sovereign and the collectors of 
tithes. The national aggregate product materialises in the hands 
of the productive class as an aggregate of provisions and raw 

^ 'Quesnay's Tableau Economique shows . . . how the result of national pro- 
duction in a certain year, amounting to some definite value, is distributed by 
means of the circulation in such a way, that . . . reproduction can take 
place. . . . The innumerable individual acts of circulation are at once 
viewed in their characteristic social mass movement — the circulation 
between great social classes distinguished by their economic function' 
{Capital, vol. ii, p. 414). 

49 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

materials to the value of some 5,000 million livres. Of this sum, 
2,000 millions represent the annual working capital of agricul- 
ture, 1,000 millions represent the annual wear and tear of fixed 
capital, and 2,000 millions are the net revenue accruing to the 
landowners. Apart from this total produce, the agriculturists, 
here conceived quite in capitalist terms as tenant farmers, have 
2,000 million livres cash in hand. Circulation now takes place 
in such a way that the tenant class pay the landowners 2,000 
millions cash as rent (as the cost of the previous period of pro- 
duction). For this money the landowning class buy provisions 
from the tenants for 1,000 millions and industrial products from 
the sterile class for the remaining 1,000 millions. The tenants in 
their turn buy industrial products for the 1,000 millions handed 
back to them, whereupon the sterile class buy agricultural pro- 
ducts for the 2,000 millions they have in hand: for 1,000 millions 
raw materials etc., to replace their annual working capital, and 
provisions for the remaining 1,000 millions. Thus the money has 
in the end returned to its starting point, the tenant class; the 
product is distributed among all classes so that consumption is 
ensured for everyone; at the same time the means of production 
of the sterile as well as of the productive class have been re- 
newed and the landowning class has received its revenue. The 
prerequisites of reproduction are all present, the conditions of 
circulation have all been fulfilled, and reproduction can start 
again on its regular course.^ 

We shall see later in the course of our investigation that this 
exposition, though showing flashes of genius, remains deficient 
and primitive. In any case, we must stress here that Quesnay, 
on the threshold of scientific economics, had not the slightest 
doubt as to the possibility of demonstrating total social capital 
and its reproduction. Adam Smith, on the other hand, while 
giving a more profound analysis of the relations of capital, laid 

^ Cf. Analyse du Tableau iSconomique, in Journal de l' Agriculture, du Commerce 
et des Finances, by Dupont (1766), pp. 305 IT. in Oncken's edition of CEuvres 
de F. Quesnay. Quesnay remarks explicitly that circulation as he describes it 
is based upon two conditions: unhampered trade, and a system of taxation 
applying only to rent: 'Yet these facts have indispensable conditions; that 
the freedom of commerce sustains the sale of products at a good price, . . . 
and moreover, that the farmer need not pay any other direct or indirect 
charges but this income, part of which, say two sevenths, must form the 
revenue of the Sovereign' (op. cit., p. 31 1). 

50 



THE PROCESS OF REPRODUCTION 

out what seems like a maze when compared with the clear and 
sweeping outHnes of the Physiocrat conception. By his wrong 
analysis of prices, Smith upset the whole foundation of the 
scientific demonstration of the capitalist process as a whole. 
This wrong analysis of prices ruled bourgeois economics for a 
long time; it is the theory which maintains that, although the 
value of a commodity represents the amount of labour spent in 
its production, yet the price consists of three elements only: the 
wage of labour, the profit of capital, and the rent. 

As this obviously must also apply to the aggregate of com- 
modities, the national product, we are faced with the startling 
discovery that, although the value of the aggregate of com- 
modities manufactured by capitalist methods represents all 
paid wages together with the profits of capital and the rents, 
that is the aggregate surplus value, and consequently can re- 
place these, there is no component of value which corresponds 
to the constant capital used in production. According to Smith, 
v-\-s is the formula expressing the value of the capitalist product 
as a whole. Demonstrating his view with the example of corn, 
Smith says as follows: 

'These three parts (wages, profit, and rent) seem either 
immediately or ultimately to make up the whole price of corn. 
A fourth part, it may perhaps be thought, is necessary for re- 
placing the stock of the farmer, or for compensating the wear 
and tear of his labouring cattle, and other instruments of hus- 
bandry. But it must be considered that the price of any instru- 
ment of husbandry, such as a labouring horse, is itself made up 
of the same three parts: the rent of the land upon which he is 
reared, the labour of tending and rearing him, and the profits 
of the farmer who advances both the rent of this land and the 
wages of this labour. Though the price of the corn, therefore, 
may pay the price as well as the maintenance of the horse, the 
whole price still resolves itself either immediately or ultimately 
into the same three parts of rent, of labour and profit. '^ 

Sending us in this manner Trom pillar to post', as Marx has 
put it. Smith again and again resolved constant capital into 
v-\-s. However, he had occasional doubts and from time to time 
relapsed into the contrary opinion. He says in the second book: 

^ Adam Smith, An Enquiry into the Nature and Causes of the Wealth of Nations 
(ed. McCuUoch, Edinburgh London, 1828), vol. i, pp. 86-8. 

51 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

'It has been shown in the first Book, that the price of the 
greater part of commodities resolves itself into three parts, of 
which one pays the wages of the labour, another the profits of 
the stock, and a third the rent of the land which had been 
employed in producing and bringing them to market . . . Since 
this is the case . . . with regard to every particular commodity, 
taken separately; it must be so with regard to all the commodi- 
ties which compose the whole annual produce of the land and 
labour of every country, taken complexly. The whole price or 
exchangeable value of that annual produce must resolve itself 
into the same three parts, and be parcelled out among the 
different inhabitants of the country, either as the wages of their 
labour, the profits of their stock, or the rent of their land.' ^ 

Here Smith hesitates and immediately below explains: 'But 
though the whole value of the annual produce of the land and 
labour of every country is thus divided among and constitutes 
a revenue to its different inhabitants, yet as in the rent of a 
private estate we distinguish between the gross rent and the neat 
rent, so may we likewise in the revenue of all the inhabitants of 
a great country. 

'The gross rent of a private estate comprehends whatever is 
paid by the farmer; the neat rent, what remains free to the 
landlord after deducting the expense of management, of repairs, 
and all other necessary charges; or what, without hurting his 
estate, he can afford to place in his stock reserved for immediate 
consumption, or to spend upon his table, equipage, the orna- 
ments of his house and furniture, his private enjoyments and 
amusements. His real wealth is in proportion, not to his gross, 
but to his neat rent. 

'The gross revenue of all the inhabitants of a great country 
comprehends the whole annual produce of their land and 
labour; the neat revenue, what remains free to them after 
deducting the expense of maintaining, first, their fixed, and, 
secondly, their circulating capital, or what, without encroach- 
ing upon their capital, they can place in their stock reserved for 
immediate consumption, or spend upon their subsistence, con- 
vcnicncies, and amusements. Their real wealth too is in propor- 
tion, not to their gross, but to their neat revenue. '^ 

Here Smith introduces a portion of value which corresponds 
^ Op. cit., vol. ii, pp. 17-18. ^ Ibid., pp. 18-19. 

52 



THE PROCESS OF REPRODUCTION 

to constant capital, only to eliminate it the very next moment 
by resolving it into wages, profits, and rents. And in the end, the 
matter rests with this explanation: 

'As the machines and instruments of trade, etc. which com- 
pose the fixed capital either of an individual or of a society, 
make no part either of the gross or the neat revenue of either, 
so money, by means of which the whole revenue of the society 
is regularly distributed among all its different members, makes 
itself no part ofthat revenue.'^ 

Constant capital, the fixed capital of Adam Smith, is thus put 
on the same level as money and does not enter into the total 
produce of society, its gross revenue. It does not exist within 
this total product as an element of value. 

You cannot get blood out of a stone, and so circulation, the 
mutual exchange of the total product constituted in this manner, 
can only lead to realisation of the wages (v) and of the surplus 
value {s). However, as it cannot by any means replace the con- 
stant capital, continued reproduction evidently must become 
impossible. Smith indeed knew quite well, and did not dream 
of denying, that every individual capitalist requires constant 
capital in addition to his wages fund, his variable capital, in 
order to run his enterprise. Yet the above analysis of commodity 
prices, when it comes to take note of capitalist production as a 
whole, allows constant capital to disappear without a trace in 
a puzzling way. Thus the problem of the reproduction of capital 
is completely muddled up. It is plain that if the most elementary 
premise of the problem, the demonstration of social capital as 
a whole, were on the rocks, the whole analysis was bound to fail. 
Ricardo, Say, Sismondi and others took up this erroneous 
theory of Adam Smith, and they all stumbled in their observa- 
tions on the problem of reproduction over this most elementary 
difficulty: the demonstration of social capital. 

Another difficulty is mixed up with the foregoing from the 
very outset of scientific analysis. What is the nature of the total 
capital of a society? As regards the individual producer, the 
position is clear: his capital consists of the expenses of his enter- 
prise. Assuming capitalist methods of production, the value of 
his product yields him a surplus over and above his expenses, 
that surplus value which does not replace his capital but con- 

1 Ibid., p. 23. 
53 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

stitutes his net income, which he can consume completely with- 
out encroaching upon his capital and which is thus his fund of 
consumption. It is true that the capitalist may save part of this 
net income, not consuming it himself but adding it to his 
capital. But that is another matter, a new step, the formation 
of a new capital which again must be replaced by subsequent 
reproduction and must again yield him a surplus. In any case, 
the capital of an individual always consists of what he requires 
for production, together with his advances on the running of his 
enterprise, and his income is what he himself actually consumes 
or may consume, his fund of consumption. If we ask a capitalist: 
'What are the wages you pay your workers?' his answer will be: 
'They are obviously part of my working capital.' But if we ask: 
'What are these wages for the workers who have received them?' 
— it is impossible that he should describe them as capital, for 
wages received are not capital for the workers but income, their 
fund of consumption. 

Let us now take another example. A manufacturer of 
machinery produces machines in his factory. The annual out- 
put is a certain number of machines. In its value, however, this 
annual output contains the capital advanced by the manufac- 
turer as well as the net income that has been earned. Part of the 
manufactured machines thus represent income for the manu- 
facturer and are destined to realise this income in the process 
of circulation and exchange. But the person who buys these 
machines from the manufacturer does not buy them as income 
but in order to use them as a means of production; for him they 
are capital. 

These examples make it seem plausible that an object which is 
capital for one person may be income for another and vice versa. 
How can it be possible under these circumstances to construct 
anything in the nature of a total capital of society? Indeed 
almost every scientific economist up to the time of Marx con- 
cluded that there is no social capital.^ Smith was still doubtful, 
undecided, vacillating about this question; so was Ricardo. But 
already Say declared categorically: 

'It is in this way, that the total value of products is distributed 
amongst the members of the community; I say, the total value, 

* As to the concept of 'national capital' specific to Rodbertus, see below. 
Section II. 

54 



THE PROCESS OF REPRODUCTION 

because such part of the whole value produced, as docs not go 
to one of the consuming producers, is received by the rest. The 
clothier buys wool of the fanner, pays his workmen in every 
department, and sells the cloth, the result of their united exer- 
tion, at a price that reimburses all his advances, and affords 
himself a profit. He never reckons as profit, or as the revenue 
of his own industry, anything more than the net surplus, after 
deducting all charges and outgoings; but those outgoings are 
merely an advance of their respective revenues to the previous 
producers, which are refunded by the gross value of the cloth. 
The price paid to the farmer for his wool is the compound of 
the several revenues of the cultivator, the shepherd and the 
landlord. Although the farmer reckons as net produce only the 
surplus remaining after payment of his landlord and his ser- 
vants in husbandry, yet to them these payments are items of 
revenue — rent to the one and wages to the other — to the one, 
the revenue of the land, to the other, the revenue of his industry. 
The aggregate of all these is defrayed out of the value of the 
cloth, the whole of which forms the revenue of some one or 
other, and is entirely absorbed in that way. — Whence it appears 
that the term net produce applies only to the individual revenue 
of each separate producer or adventurer in industry, but that 
the aggregate of individual revenue, the total revenue of the 
community, is equal to the gross produce of its land, capital and 
industry, which entirely subverts the system of the economists 
of the last century, who considered nothing but the net produce 
of the land as farming revenue, and therefore concluded, that 
this net produce was all that the community had to consume; 
instead of closing with the obvious inference, that the whole of 
what had been created, may also be consumed by mankind. '^ 
Say proves his theory in his own peculiar fashion. Whereas 
Adam Smith tried to give a proof by referring each private 
capital unit to its place of production in order to resolve it into 
a mere product of labour, but conceived of every product of 
labour in strictly capitalist terms as a sum of paid and unpaid 
labour, as v-^s, and thus came to resolve the total product of 
society into v^s\ Say, of course, is cocksure enough to 'correct' 
these classical errors by inflating them into common vulgarities. 

^ J. B. Say, A Treatise on Political Economy (transl. by C. R. Prinsep, vol. ii, 
London, 1821), pp. 75-7. 

55 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

His argument is based upon the fact that the entrepreneur at 
every stage of production pays other people, the representatives 
of previous stages of production, for the means of production 
which are capital for him, and that these people in their turn 
put part of this payment into their own pockets as their income 
and partly use it to recoup themselves for expenses advanced in 
order to provide yet another set of people with an income. Say 
converts Adam Smith's endless chain of labour processes into an 
equally unending chain of mutual advances on income and 
their repayment from the proceeds of sales. The worker appears 
here as the absolute equal of the entrepreneur. He has his 
income advanced in the form of wages, paying for it in turn by 
the labour he performs. Thus the final value of the aggregate 
social product appears as the sum of a large number of advanced 
incomes and is spent in the process of exchange on repayment 
of all these advances. It is characteristic of Say's superficiality 
that he illustrates the social connections of capitalist reproduc- 
tion by the example of watch manufacture — a branch of pro- 
duction which at that time and partly even to-day is pure 
'manufacture' where every worker is also an entrepreneur on a 
small scale and the process of production of surplus value is 
masked by a series of successive acts of exchange typical of 
simple commodity production. 

Thus Say gives an extremely crude expression to the con- 
fusion inaugurated by Adam Smith. The aggregate of annual 
social produce can be completely resolved as regards its value 
into a sequence of various incomes. Therefore it is completely 
consumed every year. It remains an enigma how production can 
be taken up again without capital and means of production, 
and capitalist reproduction appears to be an insoluble problem. 

If we compare the varying approaches to the problem from 
the time of the Physiocrats to that of Adam Smith, we cannot 
fail to recognise partial progress as well as partial regression. 
The main characteristic of the economic conception of the 
Physiocrats was their assumption that agriculture alone creates 
a surplus, that is surplus value, and that agricultural labour is 
the only kind of labour which is productive in the capitalist 
sense of the term. Consequently we see in the Tableau £cono- 
mique that the unproductive class of industrial workers creates 
\alue only to the extent of the same 2,000 million livrcs which 

56 



THE PROCESS OF REPRODUCTION 

it consumes as raw materials and foodstuffs. Consequently, too, 
in the process of exchange, the total of manufactured products 
is divided into two parts, one of which goes to the tenant class 
and the other to the landowning class, while the manufacturing 
class does not consume its own products. Thus in the value of 
its commodities, the manufacturing class reproduces, strictly 
speaking, only that circulating capital which has been con- 
sumed, and no income is created for the class of entrepreneurs. 
The only income of society that comes into circulation in excess 
of all capital advances, is created in agriculture and is con- 
sumed by the landowning class in the form of rents, while 
even the tenant class do no more than replace their capital: to 
wit, 1,000 million livres interest from the fixed capital and 
2,000 million circulating capital, two-thirds being raw materials 
and foodstuffs, and one-third industrial products. Further it is 
striking that it is in agriculture alone that Quesnay assumes the 
existence of fixed capital which he calls avarices primitives as dis- 
tinct from avarices annuelles. Industry, as he sees it, apparently 
works without any fixed capital, only with circulating capital 
turned over each year, and consequently does not create in its 
annual output of commodities any element of value for making 
good the wear and tear of fixed capital (such as premises, tools, 
and so on).^ 

In contrast with this obvious defect, the English classical 
school shows a decisive advance above all in proclaiming every 
kind of labour as productive, thus revealing the creation of 
surplus value in manufacture as well as in agriculture. We say: 
the English classical school, because on this point Adam Smith 
himself occasionally relapses quietly into the Physiocrat point 
of view. It is only Ricardo who develops the theory of the value 
of labour as highly and logically as it could advance within the 
limits of the bourgeois approach. The consequence is that we 
must assume all capital investment to produce annual surplus 

^ Attention must be drawn to the fact that Mirabeau in his Explications 
on the Tableau J^conomique explicitly mentions the fixed capital of the un- 
productive class: 'The primary advances of this class, for the establishment 
of manufactures, for instruments, machines, mills, smithies (ironworks) and 
other factories . . . (amount to) 2,000 million livres' {Tableau Economique 
avec ses Explications, 1760, p. 82). In his confusing sketch of the Tableau 
itself, Mirabeau, too, fails to take this fixed capital of the sterile class into 
account. 

57 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

value, in the manufacturing part of social production as a 
whole no less than in agriculture.^ 

On the other hand, the discovery of the productive, value- 
creating property of every kind of labour, alike in agriculture 
and in manufacture, suggested to Smith that agricultural 
labour, too, must produce, apart from the rent for the land- 
owning class, a surplus for the tenant class over and above the 
total of their capital expenses. Thus, in addition to the replace- 
ment of capital, an annual income of the tenant class comes 
into being. - 

Lastly, by a systematic elaboration of the concepts of^ avances 
primitives and avarices annuelles introduced by Quesnay, which he 
calls fixed and circulating capital, Smith has made clear, among 
other things, that the manufacturing side of social production 
requires a fixed as well as a circulating capital. Thus he was 
well on the way to restoring to order the concepts of capital and 
revenue of society, and to describing them in precise terms. The 
following exposition represents the highest level of clarity which 
he achieved in this respect: 

'Though the whole annual produce of the land and labour of 
every country is, no doubt, ultimately destined for supplying the 
consumption of its inhabitants and for procuring a revenue to 
them, yet when it first comes either from the ground or from the 
hands of the productive labourer, it naturally divides itself into 

^ Smith accordingly arrives at this general formulation: 'The value which 
the workmen add to the materials, therefore, resolves itself in this case into 
two parts, of which the one pays their wages, the other the profits of their 
employer upon the whole stock of materials and wages which he advanced' 
(op. cit., vol. i, p. 83). Further, in Book II, chap. 8, on industrial labour in 
particular: 'The labour of a manufacturer adds generally to the value of the 
materials which he works upon, that of his own maintenance and of his 
master's profit. The labour of a menial servant, on the contrary, adds to the 
value of nothing. Though the manufacturer has his wages advanced to him 
by his master, he in reality costs him no expense, the value of those wages 
being generally restored, together with a profit, in the improved value of the 
subject upon which his labour is bestowed' (op. cit., vol. ii, pp. 93-4). 

2 'The labourers . . . therefore, employed in agriculture, not only 
occasion, like the workmen in manufactures, the reproduction of a value 
equal to their own consumption, or to the capital which employs them, 
together with its owner's profit, but of a much greater value. Over and 
above the capital of the farmer and all its profits, they regularly occasion 
the reproduction of the rent of the landlord' (ibid., p. 149). 

58 



THE PROCESS OF REPRODUCTION 

two parts. One of them, and frequently the largest, is, in the first 
place, destined for replacing a capital, or for renewing the pro- 
visions, materials, and finished work, which had been with- 
drawn from a capital; the other for constituting a revenue 
cither to the owner of this capital, as the profit of his stock, or 
to some other person, as the rent of his land.'^ 

'The gross revenue of all the inhabitants of a great country 
comprehends the whole annual produce of their land and 
labour; the neat revenue, what remains free to them after 
deducting the expense of maintaining, first, their fixed, and 
secondly, their circulating capital; or what, without encroach- 
ing upon their capital, they can place in their stock reserved for 
immediate consumption, or spend upon their subsistence, con- 
veniencies, and amusements. Their real wealth too is in propor- 
tion, not to their gross, but to their neat revenue. '^ 

The concepts of total capital and income appear here in a 
more comprehensive and stricter form than in the Tableau 
Economique. The one-sided connection of social income with 
agriculture is severed and social income becomes a broader 
concept; and a broader concept of capital in its two forms, fixed 
and circulating capital, is made the basis of social production as 
a whole. Instead of the misleading differentiation of production 
into two departments, agriculture and industry, other categories 
of real importance are here brought to the fore: the distinc- 
tion between capital and income and the distinction, further, 
between fixed and circulating capital. 

Now Smith proceeds to a further analysis of the mutual rela- 
tions of these categories and of how they change in the course 
of the social process, in production and circulation — in the re- 
productive process of society. He emphasises here a radical 
distinction between fixed and circulating capital from the point 
of view of the society: 

'The whole expense of maintaining the fixed capital must 

^ Ibid., pp. 97-8. Yet already in the following sentence Smith converts 
capital completely into wages, that is variable capital: 'That part of the 
annual produce of the land and labour of any country which replaces a 
capital, never is immediately employed to maintain any but productive 
hands. It pays the wages of productive labour only. That which is im- 
mediately destined for constituting a revenue, either as profit or as rent, 
may maintain indifferently either productive or unproductive hands' (ibid., 
p. 98). 2 Ibid., p. 19. 

59 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

evidently be excluded from the neat revenue of the society. 
Neither the materials necessary for supporting their useful 
machines and instruments of trade, their profitable buildings, 
etc., nor the produce of the labour necessary for fashioning 
those materials into the proper form, can ever make any part of 
it. The price of that labour may indeed make a part of it; as 
the workmen so employed may place the whole value of their 
wages in their stock reserved for immediate consumption. But 
in other sorts of labour, both the price and the produce go to 
this stock, the price to that of the workmen, the produce to that 
of other people whose subsistence, convenience and amusements 
are augmented by the labour of those workmen.'^ 

Here Smith comes up against the important distinction be- 
tween workers who produce means of production and those 
who produce consumer goods. With regard to the former he 
remarks that they create the value — destined to replace their 
wages and to serve as their income — in the form of means of 
production such as raw materials and instruments which in 
their natural form cannot be consumed. With regard to the 
latter category of workers. Smith observes that conversely the 
total product, or better that part of value contained in it which 
replaces the wages, the income of the workers together with its 
other remaining value, appears here in the form of consumer 
goods. (The real meaning latent in this conclusion, though 
Smith does not say so explicitly, is that the part of the product 
which represents the fixed capital employed in its production 
appears likewise in this form.) In the further course of our 
investigation we shall see how close Smith has here come to the 
vantage point from which Marx tackled the problem. The 
general conclusion, however, maintained by Smith without any 
further examination of the fundamental question, is that, in any 
case, whatever is destined for the preservation and renewal of 
the fixed capital of society cannot be added to society's net 
income. 

The position is different with regard to circulating capital. 
'But though the whole expenses of maintaining the fixed capital 
is thus necessarily excluded from the neat revenue of the 
society, it is not the same case with that of maintaining the cir- 
culating capital. Of the four parts of which this latter capital is 
^ Smith, op. cit., vol. ii, pp. 19-20. 
60 



THE PROCESS (JK REPRODUCTION 

composed, money, provisions, materials and finished work, the 
three last, it has already been observed, are regularly withdrawn 
from it and placed either in the fixed capital of the society, or 
in their stock reserved for immediate consumption. Whatever 
portion of those consumable goods is not employed in main- 
taining the former, goes all to the latter, and makes a part of 
the neat revenue of the society, besides what is necessary for 
maintaining the fixed capital.'^ 

We see that Smith here simply includes in this category of 
circulating capital everything but the fixed capital already 
employed, that is to say, foodstuffs and raw materials and in 
part commodities which, according to their natural form, be- 
long to the replacement of fixed capital. Thus he has made the 
concept of circulating capital vague and ambiguous. But a 
further and most important distinction crops up and cuts right 
through this conception: 'The circulating capital of a society is 
in this respect different from that of an individual. That of an 
individual is totally excluded from making any part of his neat 
revenue, which must consist altogether in his profits. But though 
the circulating capital of every individual makes a part of that 
of the society to which he belongs, it is not upon that account 
totally excluded from making a part likewise of their neat 
revenues.'^ 

In the following illustration Smith expounds what he means: 
'Though the whole goods in a merchant's shop must by no 
means be placed in his own stock reserved for immediate con- 
sumption, they may in that of other people, who, from a 
revenue derived from other funds, may regularly replace their 
value to him, together with its profits, without occasioning any 
diminution either of his capital or theirs.'^ 

Here Smith has established fundamental categories with 
regard to the reproduction and movement of circulating social 
capital. Fixed and circulating capital, private and social capital, 
private and social revenue, means of production and consumer 
goods, are marked out as comprehensive categories, and their 
real, objective interrelation is partly indicated and partly 
drowned in the subjective and theoretical contradictions of 
Smith's analysis. The concise, strict, and classically clear scheme 

^ Ibid., vol. i, pp. 21-2. - Ibid. J p. 22. ^ Ibid. 

61 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

of the Physiocrat theory is dissolved here into a disorderly 
jumble of concepts and relations which at first glance appears 
an absolute chaos. But we may already perceive new connec- 
tions within the social process of reproduction, understood by 
Smith in a deeper, more modern and vital way than was within 
Quesnay's grasp, though, like Michelangelo's slave in the un- 
hewn block of marble, they are still inchoate. 

This is the only illustration Smith gives of this problem. 
But at the same time he attacks it from another angle — by an 
analysis of value. This very same theory which represents an 
advance beyond the Physiocrats — the theory that it is an essen- 
tial quality of all labour to create value; the strictly capitalist 
distinction between paid labour replacing wages, and unpaid 
labour creating surplus value; and, finally, the strict division of 
surplus value into its two main categories, of profit and rent — 
all this progress from the analysis of the Physiocrats leads Smith 
to the strange proposition that the price of every commodity 
consists of wages, plus profits, plus rent, or, in Marx's short- 
hand, of V +^. In consequence, the commodities annually pro- 
duced by society as a whole can be resolved completely, as to 
value, into the two components: wages and surplus value. Here 
the category of capital has disappeared all of a sudden; society 
produces nothing but income, nothing but consumer goods, 
which it also consumes completely. Reproduction without 
capital becomes a paradox, and the treatment of the problem 
as a whole has taken an immense backward step against that of 
the Physiocrats. 

The followers of Adam Smith have tackled this twofold 
theory from precisely the wrong approach. Before Marx nobody 
concerned himself with the important beginnings of an exact 
exposition of the problem in Smith's second book, while most 
of his followers jealously preserved Smith's radically wrong 
analysis of prices, accepting it, like Ricardo, without question, 
or else, like Say, elaborating it into a trite doctrine. Where 
Smith raised fruitful doubts and stimulating contradictions. Say 
flaunted the opinionated presumption of a commonplace mind. 
Smith's observation that the capital of one person may be the 
revenue of another induced Say to proclaim every distinction 
between capital and income on the social scale to be absurd. 
The absurdity, however, that income should completely absorb 

62 



THE PROCESS OF REPRODUCTION 

the total value of annual production which is thus consumed 
completely, assumes in Say's treatment the character of an 
absolutely valid dogma. If society annually consumes its own 
total product completely, social reproduction without any 
means of production whatever must become an annual repeti- 
tion of the Miracle of the Creation. 

In this state the problem of reproduction remained up to the 
time of Karl Marx. 



63 



CHAPTER III 
A CRITICISM OF SMITH'S ANALYSIS 

I ET US recapitulate the conclusions to which Smith's 
analysis has brought us: 
-i (i) There is a fixed capital of society, no part of which 
enters into its net revenue. This fixed capital consists in 'the 
materials necessary for supporting their useful machines and 
instruments of trade' and 'the produce of labour necessary for 
fashioning those materials into the proper form'.^ By singling 
out the production of such fixed capital as of a special kind, and 
explicitly contrasting it with the production of consumer goods, 
Smith in eflfect transformed fixed capital into what Marx calls 
'constant capital' — that part of capital which consists of all 
material means of production, as opposed to labour power. 

(2) There is a circulating capital of society. After eliminating 
the part of fixed, or constant, capital, there remains only the 
category of consumer goods; these are not capital for society 
but net revenue, a fund of consumption. 

(3) Capital and net revenue of an individual do not strictly 
correspond with capital and net revenue of society. What is 
nothing but fixed, or constant capital for society as a whole 
cannot be capital for the individual; it must be revenue, too, a 
fund of consumption, comprising as it does those parts of fixed 
capital which represent the workers' wages and the capitalists' 
profits. On the other hand, the circulating capital of the indivi- 
duals cannot be capital for society but must be revenue, especi- 
ally in so far as it takes the form of provisions. 

(4) As regards the value of the total annual social product, no 
trace of capital remains. It can be resolved completely into the 
three kinds of income: wages, profits of capital, and rents. 

If we tried from this haphazard collection of odd ideas to 
build up a picture of the annual reproduction of total social 

^ An Enquiry into the Nature and Causes of the Wealth of Nations, vol. i, 
p. 19. 

64 



A CRITICISM OF SMITH'S ANALYSIS 

capital, and of its mechanism, wc should soon despair of our 
task. Indeed, all these observations leave us infinitely remote 
from the solution of the problem how social capital is annually 
renewed, how everybody's consumption is ensured by his 
income, while the individuals can nevertheless adhere to their 
own points of view on capital and income. Yet if we wish to 
appreciate fully Marx's contribution to the elucidation of this 
problem, we must be fully aware of all this confusion of ideas, 
the mass of conflicting points of view. 

Let us begin with Adam Smith's last thesis which alone would 
suffice to wreck the treatment of the problem of reproduction in 
classical economics. 

Smith's basic principle is that the total produce of society, 
when we consider its value, resolves itself completely into wages, 
profits and rents: this conception is deeply rooted in his scientific 
theory that value is nothing but the product of labour. All 
labour performed, however, is wage labour. This identification 
of human labour with capitalist wage labour is indeed the 
classical element in Smith's doctrine. The value of the aggregate 
product of society comprises both the recompense for wages 
advanced and a surplus from unpaid labour appearing as profit 
for the capitalist and rent for the landowner. What holds good 
for the individual commodity must hold good equally for the 
aggregate of commodities. The whole mass of commodities pro- 
duced by society — taken as a quantity of value — is nothing but 
a product of labour, of paid as well as unpaid labour, and thus 
it is also to be completely resolved into wages, profits, and rents. 

It is of course true that raw materials, instruments, and the 
like, must be taken into consideration in connection with all 
labour. Yet is it not true also that these raw materials and in- 
struments in their turn are equally products of labour which 
again may have been paid or unpaid? We may go back as far as 
we choose, we may twist and turn the problem as much as we 
like, yet we shall find no element in the value of any commodity 
— and therefore none in the price — which cannot be resolved 
purely in terms of human labour. We can distinguish, however, 
two parts in all labour: one part repays the wages and the other 
accrues to the capitalist and landlord. There seems nothing left 
but wages and profits — and yet, there is capital, individual and 
social capital. How can we overcome this blatant contradiction? 

A.c. 65 G 



THE PROBLExM OF REPRODUCTION 

The fact that Marx himself stubbornly pursued this matter for 
a long time without getting anywhere at first as witness his 
Theories of the Surplus Value, ^ proves that this theoretical problem 
is indeed extremely hard to solve. Yet the solution he eventually 
hit on was strikingly successful, and it is based upon his theory 
of value. Adam Smith was perfectly right: nothing but labour 
constitutes the value of the individual commodity and of the 
aggregate of commodities. He was equally right in saying that 
from a capitalist point of view all labour is either paid labour 
which restores the wages, or unpaid labour which, as surplus 
value, accrues to the various classes owning the means of pro- 
duction. What he forgot, however, or rather overlooked, is the 
fact that, apart from being able to create new value, labour 
can also transfer to the new commodities the old values in- 
corporated in the means of production employed. A baker's 
working day of ten hours is, from the capitalist point of view, 
divided into paid and unpaid hours, into v-{-s. But the com- 
modity produced in these ten hours will represent a greater 
value than that often hours' labour, for it will also contain the 
value of the flour, of the oven which is used, of the premises, of 
the fuel and so on, in short the value of all the means of produc- 
tion necessary for baking. Under one condition alone could the 
value of any one commodity be strictly equal to v-^-s', if a man 
were to work in mid-air, without raw materials, without tools or 
workshop. But since all work on materials (material labour) 
presupposes means of production of some sort which themselves 
result from preceding labour, the value of this past labour is of 
necessity transferred to the new product. 

The process in question does not only take place in capitalist 
production; it is the general foundation of human labour, quite 
independent of the historical form of society. The handling of 
man-made tools is a fundamental characteristic of human 
civilisation. The concept of past labour which precedes all new 
labour and prepares its basis, expresses the nexus between man 
and nature evolved in the history of civilisation. This is the 
eternal chain of closely interwoven labouring clTorts of human 
society, the beginnings of which are lost in the grey dawn of 
the socialisation of mankind, and the termination of which 
would imply the end of the whole of civilised mankind. There- 
^ Tlieurien über den Mehrwert (Stuttgart, 1905), vol. i, pp. i79-'i52. 

66 



A CRITICISM OF SMITH'S ANALYSIS 

fore we have to picture all human labour as performed with the 
help of tools which themselves arc already products of ante- 
cedent labour. Every new product thus contains not only the 
new labour whereby it is given its final form, but also past 
labour which had supplied the materials for it, the instruments 
of labour and so forth. In the production of value, that is com- 
modity production into which capitalist production also enters, 
this phenomenon is not suspended, it only receives a particu- 
lar expression. Here the labour which produces commodities 
assumes a twofold characteristic: it is on the one hand useful 
concrete labour of some kind or other, creating the useful object, 
the value-in-use. On the other hand, it is abstract, general, 
socially necessary labour and as such creates value. In its first 
aspect it does what labour has always done: it transfers to the 
new product past labour, incorporated in the means of produc- 
tion employed, with this distinction only, that this past labour, 
too, now appears as value, as old value. In its second aspect, 
labour creates new value which, in capitalist terms, can be 
reduced to paid and unpaid labour, to v-\-s. Thus the value of 
every commodity must contain old value which has been trans- 
ferred by labour qua useful concrete labour from the means of 
production to the commodity, as well as the new value, created 
by the same labour qua socially necessary labour merely as this 
labour is expended hour by hour. 

This distinction was beyond Smith: he did not differentiate 
the twofold character of value-creating labour. Marx once 
claimed to have discovered the ultimate source of Smith's 
strange dogma — that the aggregate of produced values can be 
completely resolved into v-\-s — in his fundamentally erroneous 
theory of value.^ Failure to differentiate between the two aspects 
of commodity-producing labour as concrete and useful labour 
on the one hand, and abstract and socially necessary labour on 
the other, indeed forms one of the most important characteristics 
of the theory of value as conceived not only by Smith but by all 
members of the classical school. 

Disregarding all social consequences, classical economics re- 
cognised that human labour alone is the factor which creates 
value, and it worked out this theory to that degree of clarity 
which we meet in Ricardo's formulation. There is a funda- 
^ Capital, vol. ii, p. 435. 
67 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

mental distinction, however, between Marx's theory of value 
and Ricardo's, a distinction which has been misunderstood not 
only by bourgeois economists but also in most cases by the 
popularisers of Marx's doctrine: Ricardo, conceiving as he did, 
of bourgeois economy in terms of natural law, believed also that 
the creation of value, too, is a natural property of human labour, 
of the specific and concrete labour of the individual human 
being. 

This view is even more blatantly revealed in the writings of 
Adam Smith who for instance declares what he calls the 'pro- 
pensity to exchange' to be a quality peculiar to human nature, 
having looked for it in vain in animals, particularly in dogs. 
And although he doubted the existence of the propensity to 
exchange in animals, Smith attributed to animal as well as 
human labour the faculty of creating value, especially when he 
occasionally relapses into the Physiocrat doctrine: 

'No equal capital puts into motion a greater quantity of pro- 
ductive labour than that of the farmer. Not only his labouring 
servants, but his labouring cattle, are productive labourers . . .'^ 

'The labourers and labouring cattle, therefore, employed in 
agriculture, not only occasion, like the workmen in manufac- 
tures, the reproduction of a value equal to their own consump- 
tion, or to the capital which employs them, together with its 
owner's profits, but of a much greater value. Over and above 
the capital of the farmer and all its profits, they regularly 
occasion the reproduction of the rent of the landlord. '^ 

Smith's belief that the creation of value is a direct physio- 
logical property of labour, a manifestation of the animal 
organism in man, finds its most vivid expression here. Just as the 
spider produces its web from its own body, so labouring man 
produces value — labouring man pure and simple, every man 
who produces useful objects — because labouring man is by birth 
a producer of commodities; in the same way human society 
is founded by nature on the exchange of commodities, and a 
commodity economy is the normal form of human economy. 

It was left to Marx to recognise that a given value covers 
a definite social relationship which develops under definite 
historical conditions. Thus he came to discriminate between the 
two aspects of commodity-producing labour: concrete indivi- 

^ Smith, op. cit., vol. ii, p. 148. ^ Ibid., p. 149. 

68 



A CRITICISM OF SMITH'S ANALYSIS 

dual labour and socially necessary labour. When this distinction 
is made, the solution oftlK- luoiicy proljlem becomes clear also, 
as though a spotlight had been turned on it. 

Marx had to establish a dynamic distinction in the course 
of history between the commodity producer and the labouring 
man, in order to distinguish the twin aspects of labour which 
appear static in bourgeois economy. He had to discover that the 
production of commodities is a definite historical form of social 
production before he could decipher the hieroglyphics of capit- 
alist economy. In a word, Marx had to approach the problem 
with methods of deduction diametrically opposed to those of the 
classical school, he had in his approach to renounce the latter's 
faith in the human and normal element in bourgeois produc- 
tion and to recognise their historical transience: he had to 
reverse the metaphysical deductions of the classics into their 
opposite, the dialectical. 

On this showing Smith could not possibly have arrived at a 
clear distinction between the two aspects of value-creating 
labour, which on the one hand transfers the old value incor- 
porated in the means of production to the new product, and on 
the other hand creates new value at the same time. Moreover, 
there seems to be yet another source of his dogma that total 
value can be completely resolved into v-\-s. We should be wrong 
to assume that Smith lost sight of the fact that every commodity 
produced contains not only the value created by its production, 
but also the values incorporated in all the means of production 
that had been spent upon it in the process of manufacturing it. 
By the very fact that he continually refers us from one stage of 
production to a former one — sending us, as Marx complains, 
from pillar to post, in order to show the complete divisibility of 
the aggregate value into v-{-s — Smith proves himself well aware 
of the point. What is strange in this connection is that he again 
and again resolves the old value of the means of production, too, 
into v-\-s, so as finally to cover the whole value contained in the 
commodity. 

'In the price of corn, for example, one part pays the rent of 
the landlord, another pays the wages of maintenance of the 
labourers and labouring cattle employed in producing it, and 
the third pays the profit of the farmer. These three parts (wages, 
profit, and rent) seem either immediately or ultimately to make 

69 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

up the whole price of corn. A fourth part, it may perhaps be 
thought, is necessary for replacing the stock of the farmer, or for 
compensating the wear and tear of his labouring cattle and 
other instruments of husbandry. But it must be considered that 
the price of any instrument of husbandry, such as a labouring 
horse, is itself made up of the same three parts: the rent of the 
land upon which he is reared, the labour of tending and rearing 
him, and the profits of the farmer who advances both the rent 
of this land and the wages of this labour. Though the price of 
the corn, therefore, may pay the price as well as the main- 
tenance of the horse, the whole price still resolves itself either 
immediately or ultimately into the same three parts of rent, of 
labour, and profit.'^ 

Apparently Smith's confusion arose from the following pre- 
mises: first, that all labour is performed with the help of means 
of production of some kind or other — yet what are these means 
of production associated with any given labour (such as raw 
materials and tools) if not the product of previous labour? Flour 
is a means of production to which the baker adds new labour. 
Yet flour is the result of the miller's work, and in his hands it 
was not a means of production but the very product, in the same 
way as now the bread and pastries are the product of the baker. 
This product, flour, again presupposes grain as a means of pro- 
duction, and if we go one step further back, this corn is not a 
means of production in the hands of the farmer but the product. 
It is impossible to find any means of production in which 
value is embodied, without it being itself the product of some 
previous labour. 

Secondly, speaking in terms of capitalism, it follows further 
that all capital which has been completely used up in the manu- 
facture of any commodity, can in the end be resolved into a 
certain quantity of performed labour. 

Thirdly, the total value of the commodity, including all 
capital advances, can readily be resolved in this manner into a 
certain quantity of labour. What is true for every commodity, 
must go also for the aggregate of commodities produced by a 
society in the course of a year; its aggregate value can similarly 
be resolved into a quantity of performed labour. 

Fourthly, all labour performed under capitalist conditions is 
^ Op. cit., vol. i, pp. 86-7. 
70 



A c;ritici,sm of smith's analysis 

divided into two parts: paid labour which restores the wages 
advanced, and unpaid labour which creates profit and rent, or 
surplus value. All labour carried out under capitalist conditions 
thus corresponds to our formula v-\-s.'^ 

All the arguments outlined above are perfectly correct and 
unassailable. Smith handled them in a manner which proves 
his scientific analysis consistent and undeviating, and his con- 
ceptions of value and surplus value a distinct advance on the 
Physiocrat approach. Only occasionally, in his third thesis, he 
went astray in his final conclusion, saying that the aggregate 
value of the annually produced aggregate of commodities can 
be resolved into the labour of that very year, although he him- 
self had been acute enough to admit elsewhere that the value of 
the commodities a nation produces in the course of one year 
necessarily includes the labour of former years as well, that is the 
labour embodied in the means of production which have been 
handed down. 

But even if the four statements enumerated are perfectly 
correct in themselves, the conclusion Smith draws from them — 
that the total value of every commodity, and ecjually of the 
annual aggregate of commodities in a society, can be resolved 
entirely into v^s — is absolutely wrong. He has the right idea 
that the whole value of a commodity represents nothing but 
social labour, yet identifies it with a false principle, that all 
value is nothing but v-j-s. The formula v-\-s expresses the func- 
tion of living labour under capitalism, or rather its double 
function, first to restore the wages, or the variable capital, and 
secondly, to create surplus value for the capitalist. Wage labour 
fulfils this function whilst it is employed by the capitalists, in 
virtue of the fact that the value of the commodities is realised in 
cash. The capitalist takes back the variable capital he had 
advanced in form of wages, and he pockets the surplus value as 
well, v+s therefore expresses the relation between wage labour 
and capitalist, a relationship that is terminated in every instance 

^ In this connection, we have disregarded the contrary conception which 
also runs through the work of Smith. According to that, the price of the com- 
modity cannot be resolved into v+s, though the value of commodities con- 
sists in v+s. This distinction, however, is more important with regard to 
Smith's theory of value than in the present context where we are mainly 
interested in his formula v + s. 

71 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

as soon as the process of commodity production is finished. Once 
the commodity is sold, and the relation v -\-s is realised for the 
capitalist in cash, the whole relationship is wiped out and leaves 
no traces on the commodity. If we examine the commodity and 
its value, we cannot ascertain whether it has been produced by 
paid or by unpaid labour, nor in what proportion these have 
contributed. Only one fact is beyond doubt: the commodity 
contains a certain quantity of socially necessary labour which is 
expressed in its exchange. It is completely immaterial for the act 
of exchange as well as for the use of the commodity whether the 
labour which produced it could be resolved into v -{-s or not. In 
the act of exchange all that matters is that the commodity repre- 
sents value, and only its concrete qualities, its usefulness, are 
relevant to the use we make of it. Thus the formula v-{-s only 
expresses, as it were, the intimate relationship between capital 
and labour, the social function of wage labour, and in the 
actual product this is completely wiped out. It is different with 
the constant capital which has been advanced and invested in 
means of production, because every activity of labour requires 
certain raw materials, tools, and buildings. The capitalist char- 
acter of this state of affairs is expressed by the fact that these 
means of production appear as capital, as c, as the property of 
a person other than the labourer, divorced from labour, the 
property of those who themselves do not work. Secondly, the 
constant capital c, a mere advance laid out for the purpose of 
creating surplus value, appears here only as the foundation of 
v-\'S. Yet the concept of constant capital involves more than 
this: it expresses the function of the means of production in the 
process of human labour, quite independently of all its historical 
or social forms. Everybody must have raw materials and work- 
ing tools, the means of production, be it the South Sea Islander 
for making his family canoe, the communist peasant community 
in India for the cultivation of their communal land, the Egyp- 
tian fellah for tilling his village lands or for building Pharaoh's 
pyramids, the Greek slave in the small workshops of Athens, 
the feudal serf, the master craftsman of the medieval guild, or 
the modern wage labourer. They all require means of produc- 
tion which, having resulted from human labour, express the 
link between human labour and natural matter, and constitute 
the eternal and universal prerequisites of the human process of 

72 



A CRITICISM OF SMITH'S ANALYSIS 

production, c in the formula c-\^v-{-s stands for a certain function 
of the means of production which is not wiped out in the succes- 
sion of the labour process. Whereas it is completely immaterial, 
for both the exchange and the actual use made of a commodity, 
whether it has been produced by paid or by unpaid labour, by 
wage labour, slave labour, forced labour or any other kind of 
labour; on the other hand, it is of decisive importance, as for 
using it, whether the commodity is itself a means of production 
or a consumer good. Whether paid or unpaid labour has been 
employed in the production of a machine, matters to the machin- 
ery manufacturer and to his workers, but only to them; for 
society, when it acquires this machine by an act of exchange, 
only the quality of this machine as a means of production, only 
its function in the process of production is of importance. Just as 
every producing society, since time immemorial, has had to give 
due regard to the important function of the means of production 
by arranging, in each period of production, for the manufacture 
of the means of production requisite for the next period, so 
capitalist society, too, cannot achieve its annual production of 
value to accord with the formula v-\-s — which indicates the 
exploitation of wage labour — unless there exists, as the result of 
the preceding period, the quantity of means of production 
necessary to make up the constant capital. This specific connec- 
tion of each past period of production with the period following 
forms the universal and eternal foundation of the social process 
of reproduction and consists in the fact that in every period 
parts of the produce are destined to become the means of pro- 
duction for the succeeding period: but this relation remained 
hidden from Smith's sight. He was not interested in means of 
production in respect of their specific function within the process 
to which they are applied; he was only concerned with them 
in so far as they are like any other commodity, themselves the 
product of wage labour that has been employed in a capitalist 
manner. The specifically capitalist function of wage labour in 
the productive process completely obscured for him the eternal 
and universal function of the means of production within the 
labour process. His narrow bourgeois approach overlooked com- 
pletely the general relations between man and nature under- 
neath the specific social relations between capital and wage 
labour. Here, it seems, is the real source of Adam Smith's strange 

73 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

dogma, that the total value of the annual social product can be 
resolved into v^s. He overlooked the fact that c as the first link 
in the formula c-\-v^s is the essential expression of the general 
social foundation of exploitation of wage labour by capital. 
We conclude that the value of every commodity must be 
expressed by the formula c-\-v-i-s. The question now arises how 
far this formula applies to the aggregate of commodities within 
a society. Let us turn to the doubts expressed by Smith on this 
point, the statement that an individual's fixed and circulating 
capital and his revenue do not strictly correspond to the same 
categories from the point of view of society. (Cf above, p. 64, 
no. 3.) What is circulating capital for one person is not capital 
for another, but revenue, as for instance capital advances for 
wages. This statement is based upon an error. If the capitalist 
pays wages to the workers, he does not abandon his variable 
capital and let it stray into the workers' hands, to become their 
income. He only exchanges the value-form of his variable 
capital against its natural form, labour power. The variable 
capital remains always in the hand of the capitalist, first as 
money, and then as labour power, to revert to him later 
together with the surplus value as the cash proceeds from the 
commodities. The worker, on the other hand, never gains 
possession of the variable capital. His labour power is never 
capital to him, but it is his only asset, the power to work is the 
only thing he possesses. Again, if he has sold it and taken a 
money wage, this wage is for him not capital but the price of his 
commodity which he has sold. Finally, the fact that the worker 
buys provisions with the wages he has received, has no more 
connection with the function this money once fulfilled as vari- 
able capital in the hands of the capitalist, than has the private 
use a vendor of a commodity can make of the money he has 
obtained by a sale. It is not the capitalist's variable capital 
which becomes the workers' income, but the price of the 
worker's commodity 'labour power' which he has sold, while the 
variable capital, now as ever, remains in the hands of the capit- 
alist and fulfils its specific function. Equally erroneous is the 
conception that the income of the capitalist (the surplus value) 
which is hidden in machines — in our example of a machinery 
manufacturer — which has not as yet been realised, is fixed 
capital for another person, the buyer of the machines. It is not 

74 



A CRITICISM OF SMITH'S ANALYSIS 

the machines, or parts of them, which form the income of the 
machinery manufacturer, but the surplus value that is hidden 
in them — the unpaid labour of his wage labourers. After the 
machine has been sold, this income simply remains as before in 
the hand of the machinery manufacturer; it has only changed 
its outward shape: it has been changed from the 'machine-form' 
into the 'money-form'. Conversely, the buyer of this machine 
has not, by its purchase, newly obtained possession of his fixed 
capital, for he had this fixed capital in hand even before the 
purchase, in the form of a certain amount of cash. By buying this 
machine, he has only given to his capital the adequate mat- 
erial form for it to become productive. The income, or surplus 
value, remains in the hands of the machinery manufacturer 
before and after the sale of the machine, and the fixed capital 
remains in the hands of the other person, the capitalist buyer 
of the machine, just as the variable capital in the first example 
always remained in the hands of the capitalist and the income 
in the hands of the worker. 

Smith and his followers have caused confusion because, in 
their investigation of capitalist exchange, they mixed up the use- 
form of the commodities with their relations of value. Further, 
they did not distinguish the individual circulations of capitals 
and commodities which are ever interlacing. One and the same 
act of exchange can be circulation of capital, when seen from 
one aspect, and at the same time simple commodity exchange 
for the purpose of consumption. The fallacy that whatever is 
capital for one person must be income for another, and vice 
versa, must be translated thus into the correct statement that 
what is circulation of capital for one person, may be simple 
commodity exchange for another, and vice versa. This only 
expresses the capacity of capital to undergo transformations of 
its character, and the interconnections of various spheres of 
interest in the social process of exchange. The sharply outlined 
existence of capital in contrast with income still stands in both 
its clearly defined forms of constant and variable capital. Even 
so, Smith comes very close to the truth when he states that 
capital and income of the individual are not strictly identical 
with the same categories from the point of view of the com- 
munity. Only a few further connecting links are lacking for a 
clear revelation of the true relationship. • 

75 



CHAPTER IV 

MARX'S SCHEME 
OF SIMPLE REPRODUCTION 

I ET US now consider the formula c-]-v-\-s as the expression 
of the social product as a whole. Is it only a theoretical 
-^abstraction, or does it convey any real meaning when 
applied to social life — has the formula any objective existence in 
relation to society as a whole? It was left to Marx to establish the 
fundamental importance of r, the constant capital, in economic 
theory. Yet Adam Smith before him, working exclusively with 
the categories of fixed and circulating capital, in effect trans- 
formed this fixed capital into constant capital, though he was 
not aware of having achieved this result. This constant capital 
comprises not only those means of production which wear out 
in the course of years, but also those which are completely 
absorbed by production in any one year. His very dogma that 
the total value is resolved into v-\-s and his arguments on this 
point lead Smith to distinguish between the two categories of 
production — living labour and inanimate means of production. 
On the other hand, when he tries to construe the social process 
of reproduction on the basis of the capitals and incomes of 
individuals, the fixed capital he conceives of as existing apart 
from these, is, in fact, constant capital. 

Every individual capitalist uses for the production of his com- 
modities certain material means of production such as premises, 
raw materials and instruments. In order to produce the aggre- 
gate of commodities in a given society, an aggregate of all 
material means of production used by the individual capitalists 
is an obvious requisite. The existence of these means of produc- 
tion within the society is a real fact, though they themselves 
exist in the form of purely private individual capitals. This is the 
universal absolute condition of social production in all its 
historical forms. ^ 

^ For the sake of simplicity, we shall follow general usage and speak here 
ancffn the following of annual production, though this term, strictly speak- 

76 



MARX'S SCHEME OF SIMPLE REPRODUCTION 

The specific capitalist form manifests itself in the fact that the 
material means of production function as c, as constant capital, 
the property of those who do not work; it is the opposite pole to 
proletarianised labour power, the counterpart of wage labour. 
The variable capital, y, is the aggregate of wages actually paid 
in the society in the course of a year's production. This fact, too, 
has real objective existence, although it manifests itself in an 
innumerable mass of individual wages. In every society the 
amount of labour power actually engaged in production and the 
annual maintenance of the workers is a question of decisive 
importance. Where this factor takes the specific capitalist form 
of y, the variable capital, it follows that the means of subsistence 
first come to the workers in form of a wage which is the price of 
the labour power they have sold to another person, the owner 
of the material means of production who does not work himself; 
under this aspect, it is the latter's capitalist property. Further, 

V is an aggregate of money, that is to say it is the means of sub- 
sistence for the workers in a form of pure value. This concept of 

V implies that the workers are free in a double sense — free in 
person and free of all means of production. It also expresses the 
fact that in a given society the universal form of production is 
commodity production. 

Finally, s, the surplus value, stands for the total of all surplus 
values gained by the individual capitalists. Every society per- 
forms surplus labour, and even a socialist society will have to do 
the same. It must perform surplus labour in a threefold sense: 
it has to provide a quantity of labour for the maintenance of 
non-workers (those who are unable to work, such as children, 
old people, invalids, and also civil servants and the so-called 
liberal professions who do not take an immediate part in the 
satisfaction of material^ wants), it has to provide a fund of social 
insurance against elementary disasters which may threaten the 
annual produce, such as bad harvests, forest fires and floods; 

ing, applies in general to agriculture only. The periods of industrial produc- 
tion, or of the turnover of capitals, need not coincide with calendar years. 

^ The distinction between intellectual and material labour need not 
involve special categories of the population in a planned society, based on 
common ownership of the means of production. It will always find expres- 
sion in the existence of a certain number of spiritual leaders who must be 
materially maintained. The same individuals may exercise these various 
functions at different times. 

77 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

and lastly it must provide a fund for the purpose of increasing 
production, either because of an increase in the population, or 
because higher standards of civiHsation lead to additional wants. 
It is in two respects that the capitalist character manifests itself: 
surplus labour comes into being (i) as surplus value, i.e. in 
commodity-form, realisable in cash, and (2) as the property of 
non- workers, of those who own the means of production. 

Similarly, if we consider v+s, these two amounts taken 
together, we see that they represent objective quantities of 
universal validity: the total of living labour that has been per- 
formed within a society in the course of one year. Every human 
society, whatever its historical form, must take note of this 
datum, with reference to both the results that have been 
achieved, and the existing and available labour power. The 
division into v -{-s is a universal phenomenon, independent of the 
society's particular historical form. In its capitalist form, this 
division shows itself not only in the qualitative peculiarities of 
both V and s as already outlined, but also in their quantitative 
relationship: v tends to become depressed to a minimum level, 
just sufficient for the physiological and social existence of the 
worker, and s tends to increase continually at the cost of, and 
relative to, v. 

The predominant feature of capitalist production is expressed 
in this last circumstance: it is the fact that the creation and 
appropriation of surplus value is the real purpose of, and the 
incentive to, production. 

We have examined the relations upon which the capitalist 
formula of the aggregate product is based, and have found them 
universally valid. In every planned economy they are made the 
object of conscious regulation on the part of society; in a com- 
munist society by the community of workers and their demo- 
cratic organs, and in a society based upon class-rule by the 
nucleus of owners and their despotic power. In a system of 
capitalist production there is no such planned regulation. The 
aggregate of the society's capitals and the aggregate of its com- 
modities alike consist in reality of innumerable fragments of 
individual capitals and individual items of merchandise, taken 
together. 

Thus the question arises whether tiicsc sums themselves mean 
anything more in a capitalist society than a mere statistical 

78 



MARX'S SCHEME OF SIMPLE REPRODUCTION 

enumeration which is, moreover, inexact and fluid. Apply- 
ing the standards of society as a whole, we perceive that the 
completely independent and sovereign individual existence of 
private enterprises is only the historically conditioned form, 
whereas it is social interconnections that provide the founda- 
tion. Although individual capitals act in complete independence 
of one another, and a social regulation is completely lacking, the 
movement of capitals forms a homogeneous whole. This move- 
ment, too, appears in specifically capitalist forms. In every 
planned system of production it is, above all, the relation be- 
tween all labour, past and present, and the means of production 
(between v+s and c, according to our formula), or the relation 
between the aggregate of necessary consumer goods (again, in 
the terms of our formula, v+s) and c which are subjected to 
regulation. Under capitalist conditions, on the other hand, all 
social labour necessary for the maintenance of the inanimate 
means of production and also of living labour power is treated 
as one entity, as capital, in contrast with the surplus labour that 
has been performed, i.e. with the surplus value s. The relation 
between these two quantities c and {v-]-s) is a palpably real, 
objective relationship of capitalist society: it is the average rate 
of profit; every capital is in fact treated only as part of a common 
whole, the whole of social capital, and assigned the profit to 
which it is entitled, according to its size, out of the surplus value 
wrested from society, regardless of the quantity which this 
particular capital has actually created. Thus social capital and 
its counterpart, the whole of social surplus value, are not merely 
real quantities, having an objective existence, but, what is more, 
the relation between them, the average profit, guides and directs 
the whole process of exchange. This it does in three ways: 
(i) by the mechanism of the law of value which establishes the 
quantitative relations of exchange between the individual kinds 
of commodities independently of their specific value relation- 
ship; (2) by the social division of labour, the assignment of 
certain portions of capital and labour to the individual spheres 
of production; (3) by the development of labour productivity 
which on the one hand stimulates individual capitals to engage 
in pioneering work for the purpose of securing a higher profit 
than the average, and on the other hand extends the progress 
that has been achieved by individuals over the whole field of 

79 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

production. By means of the average rate of profit, in a word, 
the total capital of society completely governs the seemingly 
independent motions of individual capitals. 

The formula c+v+s thus applies to the aggregate of com- 
modities produced in a society under capitalism no less than 
to the value composition of every individual commodity. It is, 
however, only the value-composition for which this holds good 
— the analogy cannot be carried further. 

The formula is indeed perfectly exact if we regard the total 
product of a capitalistically producing society as the output of 
one year's labour, and wish to analyse it into its respective com- 
ponents. The quantity c shows how much of the labour of former 
years has been taken over towards the product of the present 
year in the form of means of production. Quantities v -i-s show 
the value components of the product created by new labour 
during the last year only; the relation between v and s finally 
shows us how the annual labour programme of society is appor- 
tioned to the two tasks of maintaining the workers and 
maintaining those who do not work. This analysis remains valid 
and correct also with regard to the reproduction of individual 
capital, no matter what may be the material form of the product 
this capital has created. All three, c, v, and s, appear alike to a 
capitalist of the machinery industry in the form of machinery 
and its parts; to the owner of a music hall they are represented 
by the charms of the dancers and the skill of the acrobats. So 
long as the product is left undifferentiated, c, v, and s differ from 
one another only in so far as they are aliquot components of 
value. This is quite sufficient for the reproduction of individual 
capital, as such reproduction begins with the value-form of 
capital, a certain amount of money that has been gained by the 
realisation of the manufactured product. The formula c-\-v-\-s 
then is the given basis for the division of this amount of money; 
one part for the purchase of the material means of production, 
a second part for the purchase of labour power, and a third part 
— in the case of simple reproduction assumed in the first instance 
— for the capitalist's personal consumption. In the case of 
expanding reproduction part three is further subdivided, only a 
fraction of it being devoted to the capitalist's personal consump- 
tion, the remainder to increasing his capital. In order to repro- 
duce his capital actually, the capitalist must, of course, turn 

80 



MARX'S SCHEME OF SIMPLE REPRODUCTION 

again to the commodity market with the capital he has divided 
in this manner, so that he can acquire the material prerequisites 
of production such as raw materials, instruments, and so on. It 
seems a matter of course to the individual capitalist as well as to 
his scientific ideologist, the 'vulgar economist', that he should in 
fact find there just those means of production and labour power 
he needs for his business. 

The position is different as regards the total production of 
a society. From the point of view of society as a whole, the 
exchange of commodities can only effect a shifting around, 
whereby the individual parts of the total product change hands. 
The material composition of the product, however, cannot be 
changed by this process. After this change of places, as well as 
before it, there can be reproduction of total capital, if, and only 
if, there is in the total product of the preceding period: first, 
a sufficient quantity of means of production, secondly, adequate 
provisions to maintain the same amount of labour as hitherto, 
and, last but not least, the goods necessary to maintain the 
capitalist class and its hangers-on in a manner suitable to their 
station. This brings us to a new plane: we are now concerned 
with material points of view instead of pure relations of value. 
It is the use-form of the total social product that matters now. 
What the individual capitalist considers nobody else's business 
becomes a matter of grave concern for the totality of capitalists. 
Whereas it does not make the slightest difference to the indivi- 
dual capitalist whether he produces machinery, sugar, artificial 
manure or a progressive newspaper — provided only that he can 
find a buyer for his commodity so that he can get back his 
capital plus surplus value — it matters infinitely to the 'total 
capitalist' that his total product should have a definite use-form. 
By that we mean that it must provide three essentials: the means 
of production to renew the labour process, simple provisions for 
the maintenance of the workers, and provisions of higher quality 
and luxury goods for the preservation of the 'total capitalist' 
himself. His desire in this respect is not general and vague, but 
determined precisely and quantitatively. If we ask what quanti- 
ties of all three categories are required by the 'total capitalist', 
the value-composition of last year's total product gives us a 
definite estimate, as long, that is, as we confine ourselves to 
simple reproduction, which we have taken for our starting 

8i 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

point. Hitherto we have conceived of the formula c-i-v-i-s as a 
merely quantitative division of the total value, applicable alike 
to total capital and to individual capital, and representing the 
quantity of labour contained in the annual product of society. 
Now we see that the formula is also the basis of the material 
composition of the product. Obviously the 'total capitalist', if 
he is to take up reproduction to the same extent as before, must 
find in his new total product as many means of production as 
correspond to the size of c, as many simple provisions for the 
workers as correspond to the sum of wages v, and as many pro- 
visions of better quality for himself and his hangers-on as corres- 
pond to s. In this way our analysis of the value of the society's 
aggregate product is translated into a general recipe for this 
product as follows: the total c of society must be re-embodied 
in an equal quantity of means of production, the v in provisions 
for the workers, and the s in provisions for the capitalists, in 
order that simple reproduction may take place. 

Here we come up against palpable differences between the 
individual capitalist and the total capitalist. The manner in 
which the former always reproduces his constant and variable 
capital as well as his surplus value is such that all three parts 
are contained in the same material form within his homogeneous 
product, that this material form, moreover, is completely irrel- 
evant and may have different qualities in the case of each 
individual capitalist. The 'total capitalist', for his part, repro- 
duces every component of the value of his annual product in a 
different material form, c as means of production, v as provisions 
for the workers, and s as provisions for the capitalists. In the 
case of the reproduction of individual capitals, there is no dis- 
crepancy between relations of value and material points of view. 
Besides, it is quite clear that individual capital may concentrate 
on aspects of value, accepting material conditions as a law from 
heaven, as self-evident phenomena of commodity-exchange, 
whereas the 'total capitalist' has to reckon with material points 
of view. If the total c of society were not reproduced annually 
in the form of an equal amount of means of production, every 
individual capitalist would be doomed to search the commodity 
market in vain with his c realised in cash, unable to find the 
requisite materials for his individual reproduction. From the 
point of view of reproducing the total capital, the formula 

'82 



MARX'S SCHEME OF SIMPLE REPRODUCTION 

ci-V'\-s is inadequate. This again is proof of the fact that tlic 
concept of total capital is something real and does not merely 
paraphrase the concept of production. We must, however, make 
general distinctions in our exposition of total capital: instead of 
showing it as a homogeneous whole, we must demonstrate its 
three main categories; and we shall not vitiate our theory if, for 
the sake of simplicity, we consider for the present only two 
departments of total capital: the production of producer goods, 
and that of consumer goods for workers and capitalists. We have 
to examine each department separately, adhering to the funda- 
mental conditions of capitalist production in each case. At the 
same time, we must also emphasise the mutual connections be- 
tween these two departments from the point of view of repro- 
duction. For only if each is regarded in connection with the 
other, do they make up the basis of the social capital as a whole. 

We made a start by investigating individual capital. But we 
must approach the demonstration of total capital and its total 
product in a somewhat different manner. Quantitatively, as a 
quantity of value, the c of society consists precisely in the total of 
individual constant capitals, and the same applies to the other 
amounts, v and s. But the outward shape of each has changed — 
the c of constant capitals re-emerges from the process of pro- 
duction as an element of value with infinitely varied facets, 
comprising a host of variegated objects for use, but in the total 
product it appears, as it were, contracted into a certain quantity 
of means of production. Similarly with v and s, which in the case 
of the individual capitalist re-emerge as items in a most colourful 
jumble of commodities, being provisions in adequate quantities 
for the workers and capitalists. Adam Smith came very close to 
recognising this fact when he observed that the categories of 
fixed and circulating capital and of revenue in relation to the 
individual capitalist do not coincide with these categories in the 
case of society. 

We have come to the following conclusions: 

(i) The formula c^v-\-s serves to express the production of 
society viewed as a whole, as well as the production of indi- 
vidual capitalists. 

(2) Social production is divided into two departments, 
engaged in the production of producer and consumer goods 
respectively. 

83 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

(3) Both departments work according to capitalist methods, 
that is to say they both aim at the production of sui'plus value, 
and thus the formula c-{-v-]-s will apply to each of them. 

(4) The two departments are interdependent, and are there- 
fore bound to display a certain quantitative relationship, namely 
the one department must produce all means of production, the 
other all provisions for the workers and capitalists of both 
departments. 

Proceeding from this point of view, Marx devised the follow- 
ing diagram of capitalist reproduction: 

I. 4,oooc+ 1,0001;+ 1,000^^=6,000 means of production 
II. 2,oooc+ 500y+ 500^=3,000 articles of consumption.^ 

The figures in this diagram express quantities of value, 
amounts of money which are chosen arbitrarily, but their ratios 
are exact. Each department is characterised by the use-form of 
the commodities produced. Their mutual circulation takes place 
as follows: Department I supplies the means of production for 
the entire productive process, for itself as well as for Depart- 
ment II. From this alone it follows that for the undisturbed 
continuance of reproduction — for we still presume simple repro- 
duction on the old scale — the total produce of Department I 
(I 6,000) must have the same value as the sum of constant 
capitals in both departments: (I 4,000c +11 2,000c). Similarly, 
Department II supplies provisions for the whole of society, for 
its own workers and capitalists as well as for the workers and 
capitalists of Department I. Hence it follows that for the un- 
disturbed course of consumption and production and its renewal 
on the old scale it is necessary that the total quantity of pro- 
visions supplied by Department II should equal in value all 
the incomes of the employed workers and capitalists of society 
[here II 3,000 = I(i,oooz; + i,oooj-) -[11(500^ + 5005-)]. 

Here we have indeed expressed relationships of value which 
are the foundation not only of capitalist reproduction but of 
reproduction in every society. In every producing society, what- 
ever its social form, in the primitive small village community of 
the Bakairi of Brazil, in the oikos of a Timon of Athens with its 
slaves, or in the imperial corvee farm of Charlemagne, the labour 
power available for society must be distributed in sucii a way 
^ Capital, vol. ii, p. 459. 
84 



MARX'S SCHEME OF SIMPLE REPRODUCTION 

that means of production as well as provisions are produced in 
adequate quantities. The former must suffice for the immediate 
production of provisions as well as for the future renewal of the 
means of production themselves, and the provisions in their turn 
must suffice for the maintenance of the workers occupied in the 
production alike of these same provisions and of the means of 
production, and moreover for the maintenance of all those who 
do not work. 

In its broad outline, Marx's scheme corresponds with the 
universal and absolute foundation of social reproduction, with 
only the following specifications: socially necessary labour 
appears here as value, the means of production as constant 
capital, the labour necessary for the maintenance of the workers 
as variable capital and that necessary for the maintenance of 
those who do not work as surplus value. 

In capitalist society, however, the connections between these 
two great departments depend upon exchange of commodities, 
on the exchange of equivalents. The workers and capitalists of 
Department I can only obtain as many provisions from Depart- 
ment II as they can deliver of their own commodities, the 
means of production. The demand of Department II for means 
of production, on the other hand, is determined by the size of its 
constant capital. It follows therefore that the sum of the variable 
capital and of the surplus value in the production of producer 
goods [here I(i,oooy+i,oooi')] must equal the constant capital 
in the production of provisions [here 11(2, oooc)]. 

An important proviso remains to be added to the above 
scheme. The constant capital which has been spent by the two 
departments is in reality only part of the constant capital used 
by society. This constant capital is divided into two parts; the 
first is fixed capital— premises, tools, labouring cattle — which 
functions in a number of periods of production, in every one of 
which, however, only part of its value is absorbed by the pro- 
duct, according to the amount of its wear and tear. The second 
is circulating capital such as raw materials, auxiliary semi- 
finished products, fuel and lighting — its whole value is com- 
pletely absorbed by the new product in every period of produc- 
tion. Yet only that part of the means of production is relevant 
for reproduction which is actually absorbed by the production 
of value; without becoming less correct, an exact exposition of 

85 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

social circulation may disregard the remaining part of the fixed 
capital which has not been absorbed by the product, though it 
should not completely forget it. This is easy to prove. 

Let us assume that the constant capital, 6,oooc, in the two 
departments, which is in fact absorbed by the annual product 
of these departments, consists of i ,500c fixed and 4,500c circulat- 
ing capital, the 1,500c of fixed capital representing here the 
annual wear and tear of the premises, machinery and labouring 
cattle. This annual wear and tear equals, say, 10 per cent of 
the total value of the fixed capital employed. Then the total 
social capital would really consist of 19, 500c +1,50027, the con- 
stant capital in both departments being 1,500c of fixed and 
4,500c of circulating capital. Since the term of life of the 
aggregate fixed capital, with a 10 per cent wear and tear, is 
ten years ex hypothesi, the fixed capital needs renewal only after 
the lapse of ten years. Meanwhile one-tenth of its value enters 
into social production in every year. If all the fixed capital of 
a society, with the same rate of wear and tear, were of equal 
durability, it would, on our assumption, need complete renewal 
once within ten years. This, however, is not the case. Some of 
the various use-forms which are part of the fixed capital may 
last longer and others shorter, wear and tear and duration of 
life are quite different in the different kinds and individual 
representations of fixed capital. In consequence, fixed capital 
need not be renewed — reproduced in its concrete use-form — all 
at once, but parts of it are continually renewed at various stages 
of social production, while other parts still function in their 
older form. Our assumption of a fixed capital of 15,000c with 
a 10 per cent rate of wear and tear does not mean that this must 
be renewed all at once every ten years, but that an annual 
average renewal and replacement must be effected of a part 
of the total fixed social capital corresponding to one- tenth of its 
value; that is to say, Department I which has to satisfy the needs 
of society for means of production must reproduce, year by year, 
not only all its raw and partly finished materials, etc., its circu- 
lating capital to the value of 4,500, but must also reproduce the 
use-forms of its fixed capital — premises, machinery, and the like 
— to the extent of 1,500, corresponding with the annual wear 
and tear of fixed capital. If Department I continues in this man- 
ner to renew one-tenth of the fixed capital in its use-form every 

86 



MARX'S SCHEME OF SIMPLE REPRODUCTION 

year, the result will be that every ten years the total fixed capital 
of society will have been replaced throughout by new items; 
thus it follows that the reproduction of those parts disregarded 
so far is also completely accounted for in the above scheme. 

In practice, the procedure is that every capitalist sets aside 
from his annual production, from the realisation of his com- 
modities, a certain amount for the redemption of his fixed 
capital. These individual annual deductions must amount to a 
certain quantity of capital, therefore the capitalist has in fact 
renewed his fixed capital, that is, he has replaced it by new and 
more efficient items. This alternating procedure of building up 
annual reserves of money for the renewal of fixed capital and 
of the periodical employment of the accumulated amounts for 
the actual renewal of fixed capital varies with the individual 
capitalist, so that some are accumulating reserves, while others 
have already started their renewals. Thus every year part of the 
fixed capital is actually renewed. The monetary procedure here 
only disguises the real process which characterises the reproduc- 
tion of fixed capital. 

On closer observation we see that this' is as it should be. The 
whole of the fixed capital takes part in the process of production, 
for physically the mass of usable objects, premises, machinery, 
labouring cattle, are completely employed. It is their peculiarity 
as fixed capital, on the other hand, that only part of the value is 
absorbed in the production of value, since in the process of 
reproduction (again postulating simple reproduction), all that 
matters is to replace in their natural form the values which have 
been actually used up as means of subsistence and production 
during a year's production. Therefore, fixed capital need only 
be reproduced to the extent that it has in fact been used up in 
the production of commodities. The remaining portion of value, 
embodied in the total use-form of fixed capital, is of decisive 
importance for production as a labour process, but does not 
exist for the annual reproduction of society as a process of 
value-formation. 

Besides, this process which is here expressed by relations of 
value applies equally to every society, even to a community 
which does not produce commodities. If once upon a time, for 
instance, say ten years' labour of i,ooo fellaheen was required 
for the construction of the famous Lake Moeris and the related 

87 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

Nile canals — that miraculous lake, which Herodotus tells us was 
made by hand — and if for the maintenance of this, the most 
magnificent drainage system of the world, the labour of a further 
100 fellaheen was annually required (the figures, of course, are 
chosen at random), we might say that after every hundred years 
the Moeris dam and the canals were reproduced anew, although 
in fact the entire system was not constructed as a whole in every 
century. This is manifestly true. When, amid the stormy in- 
cidents of political history and alien conquests, the usual crude 
neglect of old monuments of culture set in — as displayed, e.g. by 
the English in India when the reproductional needs of ancient 
civilisations were understood no longer^ — then in the course of 
time the whole Lake Moeris, its water, dikes and canals, the two 
pyramids in its midst, the colossus upon it and other marvellous 
erections, disappeared without a trace, as though they had never 
been built. Only ten lines in Herodotus, a dot on Ptolemy's map 
of the world, traces of old cultures, and of villages and cities 
bear witness that at one time rich life sprang from this magnifi- 
cent irrigation system, where to-day there are only stretches of 
arid desert in inner Lybia, and desolate swamps along the coast. 
There is only one point where Marx's scheme of simple repro- 
duction may appear unsatisfactory or incomplete in relation to 
constant capital, and that is when we go back to that period of 
production, when the total fixed capital was first created. 
Indeed, society possesses transformed labour amounting to more 
than those parts of fixed capital which are absorbed into the 
value of the annual product and are in turn replaced by it. In 
the figures of our example the total social capital does not con- 
sist of6,oooc-r i,^oov, as in the diagram, but of 19,500t: + 1,500^. 
Though 1,500 of the fixed capital (which, on our assumption, 
amounts to 15,000) are annually reproduced in the form of 
appropriate means of production, an equal amount is also con- 
sumed by the same production each year, though the whole of 
the fixed capital as a use-form, an aggregate of objects, has been 
renewed. After ten years, society possesses in the eleventh, just 
as in any other year, a fixed capital of 15,000, whereas it has 
annually achieved only 1,500c; and its constant capital as a 
whole is 19,500, whereas it has created only 6,000. Obviously, 
since it must have created this surplus of 13,500 fixed capital by 
its labour, it possesses more accumulated past labour than our 

88 



MARX'S SCHEME OF SIMPLE REPRODUCTION 

scheme of reproduction warrants. Even at this stage, the annual 
labour of society must be based on some previous annual labour 
that has been hoarded. This question of past labour, however, 
as the foundation of all present labour, brings us to the very first 
beginning which is as meaningless with regard to the economic 
development of mankind as it is for the natural development of 
matter. The scheme of reproduction grasps the social process as 
perpetually in motion, as a link in the endless chain of events, 
it neither wants to demonstrate its initial origin, nor should it do 
so. The social reproductive process is always based on past 
labour, we may trace it back as far as we like. Social labour has 
no beginning, just as it has no end. Like the historical origin of 
Herodotus' Lake Moeris, the beginnings of the reproductive 
process in the history of civilisation are lost in the twilight 
of legend. With the progress of techniques and with cultural 
development, the means of production change their form, crude 
paleoliths are replaced by sharpened tools, stone implements 
by elegant bronze and iron, the artisan's tool by steam-driven 
machinery. Yet, though the means of production and the social 
organisation of the productive process continually change their 
form, society already possesses for its labour process a certain 
amount of past labour serving as the basis for annual 
reproduction. 

Under capitalist methods of production past labour of society 
preserved in the means of production takes the form of capital, 
and the question of the origin of this past labour which forms the 
foundation of the reproductive process becomes the question of 
the genesis of capital. This is much less legendary, indeed it is 
writ in letters of blood in modern history. The very fact, how- 
ever, that we cannot think of simple reproduction unless we 
assume a hoard of past labour, surpassing in volume the labour 
annually performed for the maintenance of society, touches the 
sore spot of simple reproduction; and it shows that simple repro- 
duction is a fiction not only for capitalist production but also for 
the progress of civilisation in general. If we merely wish to 
understand this fiction properly, and to reduce it to a scheme, 
we must presume, as its sine qua ?ion, results of a past productive 
process which cannot possibly be restricted to simple reproduc- 
tion but inexorably points towards enlarged reproduction. By 
way of illustration, we might compare the aggregate fixed 

89 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

capital of society with a railway. The durability and con- 
sequently the annual wear and tear of its various parts is very 
different. Parts such as viaducts and tunnels may last for cen- 
turies, steam engines for decades, but other rolling stock will be 
used up in a short time, in some instances in a few months. Yet 
it is possible to work out an average rate of wear and tear, say 
thirty years, so that the value of the whole is annually depreci- 
ated by one thirtieth. This loss of value is now continually made 
good by partial reproduction of the railway (which may count 
as repairs), so that a coach is renewed to-day, part of the engine 
to-morrow, and a section of sleepers the day after. On our 
assumption then, the old railway is replaced by a new one after 
thirty years, a similar amount of labour being performed each 
year by the society so that simple reproduction takes place. But 
the railway can only be reproduced in this manner — it cannot 
be so produced. In order to make it fit for use and to make 
good its gradual wear and tear, the railway must have been 
completed in the first place. Though the railway can be re- 
paired in parts, it cannot be made fit for use piecemeal, an axle 
to-day and a coach to-morrow. Indeed, the very essence of fixed 
capital is always to enter into the productive process in its 
entirety, as a material use-value. In order to get this use-form 
ready in the first place, society must apply a more concentrated 
amount of labour to its manufacture. In terms of our example, 
the labour of thirty years that is used for repairs, must be com- 
pressed into, say, two or three years. During this period of 
manufacture, society must therefore expend an amount of 
labour far greater than the average, that is to say it must have 
recourse to expanding reproduction; later, when the railway is 
finished, it may return to simple reproduction. Though we need 
not visualise the aggregate fixed capital as a single coherent use- 
object or a conglomeration of objects which must be produced 
all at once, the manufacture of all the more important means of 
production, such as buildings, transport facilities, and agricul- 
tural structures, requires a more concentrated application of 
labour, and this is true for the modern railway or steamship as 
much as it was for the rough stone-axe and the handmill. There- 
fore it is only in theory that simple reproduction can be con- 
ceived as alternating with enlarged reproduction; the latter is 
not only a general condition of a progressive civilisation and an 

90 



MARX'S SCHEME OF SIMPLE REPRODUCTION 

expanding population, but also the sine qua non for the economic 
form of fixed capital, or those means of production which in 
every society correspond to the fixed capital. 

Marx deals with this conflict between the formation of fixed 
capital and simple reproduction but indirectly, in connection 
with fluctuations in the wear and tear of the fixed capital, more 
rapid in some years than in others. Here he emphasises the need 
for perpetual 'over-production', i.e. enlarged reproduction, 
since a strict policy of simple reproduction would periodically 
lead to reproductive losses. In short, he regards enlarged repro- 
duction under the aspect of an insurance fund for the fixed 
capital of the society, rather than in the light of the actual pro- 
ductive process.^ 

In cjuite a different context Marx appears to endorse the 
opinion expressed above. In Theories on the Surplus Value, vol ii, 
part 2, analysing the conversion of revenue into capital, he 
speaks of the peculiar reproduction of the fixed capital, the re- 
placement of which in itself already provides a fund for accumu- 
lation. He draws the following conclusion: 

'The point we have in mind is as follows: even if the aggregate 
capital employed in machine manufacture were just large 
enough to make good the annual wear and tear of the machines, 
many more machines could be annually produced than are re- 
quired, since the wear and tear is in parts merely idealiter and 
must be made good realiter, in natura, only after a certain number 
of years. Capital so employed supplies each year a mass of 
machinery which becomes available for, and anticipates new, 
capital investments. Let us suppose, for instance, a machine 
manufacturer who starts production this year. During this year, 
he supplies machines for ^^(^i 2,000. If he were merely to repro- 
duce the machines he has manufactured, he would have to 
produce, during the subsequent eleven years, machines for 
;^i,ooo only, and even then, a year's production would not be 
consumed within the year. Still less could it be consumed, if he 
were to employ the whole of his capital. To keep this capital 
working, to keep it reproducing itself every year, a new and 
continuous expansion of the branches of manufacture that re- 
quire these machines, is indispensable. This applies even more, 

^ Capital, vol. ii, pp. 544-7. Cf. also p. 202 on the necessity of enlarged 
reproduction under the aspect of a reserve fund. 

91 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

if the machine manufacturer himself accumulates. In con- 
sequence, even if the capital invested in one particular branch of pro- 
duction is simply being reproduced,^ a continuous accumulation in 
the other branches of production must go with it.'^ 

We might take the machine manufacturer of Marx's example 
as illustrating the production of fixed capital. Then the infer- 
ence is that if society maintains simple reproduction in this 
sphere, employing each year a similar amount of labour for the 
production of fixed capital (a procedure which is, of course, 
impossible in practical life), then annual production in all other 
spheres must expand. But if here, too, simple reproduction is to 
be maintained, then, if the fixed capital once created is to be 
merely renewed, only a small part of the labour employed in its 
creation can be expended. Or, to put it the other way round: 
if society is to provide for investment in fixed capital on a large 
scale, it must, even assuming simple reproduction to prevail on 
the whole, resort periodically to enlarged reproduction. 

With the advance of civilisation, there are changes not only in 
the form of the means of production but also in the quantity 
of value they represent — or better, changes in the social labour 
stored up in them. Apart from the labour necessary for its 
immediate preservation, society has increasingly more labour 
time and labour power to spare, and it makes use of these for the 
manufacture of means of production on an ever increasing scale. 
How does this affect the process of reproduction? How, in terms 
of capitalism, does society create out of its annual labour a 
greater amount of capital than it formerly possessed? This ques- 
tion touches upon enlarged reproduction, and it is not yet time 
to deal with it. 

^ Marx's italics. ^ Theorien über den Mehrwert, vol. ii, part a, p. 248. 



92 



CHAPTER V 
THE CIRCULATION OF MONEY 

IN our study of the reproductive process we have not so far 
considered the circulation of money. Here we do not refer to 
money as a measuring rod, an embodiment of value, because 
all relations of social labour have been expressed, assumed and 
measured in terms of money. What we have to do now is to test 
our diagram of simple reproduction under the aspect of money 
as a means of exchange. 

Quesnay already saw that we shall only understand the social 
reproductive process if we assume, side by side with the means of 
production and consumer goods, a certain quantity of money. ^ 
Two questions now arise: (i) by whom should the money be 
owned, and (2) how much of it should there be? The answer to 
the first question, no doubt, is that the workers receive their 
wages in the form of money with which they buy consumer 
goods. From the point of view of society, this means merely that 
the workers are allocated a certain share of the fund for con- 
sumption: every society, whatever its historical form of produc- 
tion, makes such allocations to its workers. It is, however, an 
essential characteristic of the capitalist form of production that 
the workers do not obtain their share directly in the form of 
goods but by way of commodity exchange, just as it is an essen- 
tial feature of the capitalist mode of production that their 

^ In his seventh note to the Tableau ßconomique, following up his argu- 
ments against the mercantilist theory of money as identical with wealth, 
Quesnay says: 'The bulk of money in a nation cannot increase unless this 
reproduction itself increases; otherwise, an increase in the bulk of money 
would inevitably be prejudicial to the annual production of wealth. . . . 
Therefore we must not judge the opulence of states on the basis of a greater 
or smaller quantity of money: thus a stock of money, equal to the income 
of the landowners, is deemed much more than enough for an agricultural 
nation where the circulation proceeds in a regular manner, and where 
commerce takes place in confidence and fixll liberty' {Analyse du Tableau 
l£conomique, ed. Oncken, pp. 324-5). 

93 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

labour power is not applied directly, as a result of a relation of 
personal domination, but again byway of commodity exchange: 
the workers selling their labour power to the owners of the 
means of production, and purchasing freely their consumer 
goods. Variable capital in its money form is the expression and 
medium of both these transactions. 

Money, then, comes first into circulation by the payment of 
wages. The capitalist class must therefore set a certain quantity 
of money circulating in the first place, and this must be equal to 
the amount they pay in wages. The capitalists of Department I 
need i,ooo units of money, and the capitalists of Department II 
need 500 to meet their wages bill. Thus, according to our 
diagram, two quantities of money are circulating: I(i,oooy) and 
11(500^). The workers spend the total of 1,500 on consumer 
goods, i.e. on the products of Department II. In this way, 
labour power is maintained, that is to say the variable capital 
of society is reproduced in its natural form, as the foundation of 
all other reproductions of capital. At the same time, the capit- 
alists of Department II dispose of their aggregate product 
(1,500) in the following manner: their own workers receive 500 
and the workers of Department I receive 1,000. This exchange 
gives the capitalists of Department II possession of 1,500 money 
units: 500 are their own variable capital which has returned to 
them; these may start circulating again as variable capital but 
for the time being they have completed their course. The other 
1,000 accrue to them year by year out of the realisation of one- 
third of their own products. The capitalists of Department II 
now buy means of production from the capitalists of Depart- 
ment I for these 1,000 money units in order to renew the part 
of their own constant capital that has been used up. By means 
of this purchase, Department II renews in its natural form half 
of the constant capital lie it requires. Department I now has 
in return 1,000 money units which are nothing more than the 
money originally paid to its own workers. Now, after having 
changed hands twice, the money has returned to Department I, 
to become effective later as variable capital. This completes the 
circulation of this quantity of money for the moment, but the 
circulation within society has not yet come to an end. The 
capitalists of Department I have not yet realised their surplus 
value to buy consumer goods for themselves; it is still contained 

94 



THE CIRCULATION OF MONEY 

in their product in a form which is of no use to them. More- 
over, the capitalists of Department II have not yet renewed the 
second half of their constant capital. These two acts ofexchange 
are identical both in substance and in value, for the capitalists 
of Department I receive their goods from Department II in 
exchange for the I(i,ooot) means of production needed by the 
capitalists of Department IL However, a new quantity of money 
is required to effect this exchange. It is true that the same 
money which has already completed its course, might be 
brought into circulation again for this purpose — in theory, there 
could be no objection to this. In practice, however, this solution 
is out of the question, for the needs of the capitalists, as con- 
sumers, must be satisfied just as constantly as the needs of the 
workers — they run parallel to the process of production and 
must be mediated by specific quantities of money. Hence it 
follows that the capitalists of both departments — that is to say 
all capitalists — must have a further cash reserve in hand, in 
addition to the money required as variable capital, in order to 
realise their own surplus value in the form of consumer goods. 
On the other hand, before the total product is realised and 
during the process of its production, certain parts of the con- 
stant capital must be bought continually. These are the cir- 
culating parts of the constant capital, such as raw and auxiliary 
materials, semi-finished goods, lighting and the like. Therefore, 
not only must the capitalists of Department I have certain 
quantities of money in hand to satisfy their needs as consumers, 
but the capitalists of Department II must also have money to 
meet the requirements of their constant capital. The exchange 
of 1,000^' I (the surplus value of Department I contained in the 
means of production) against goods is thus effected by money 
which is advanced partly by the capitalists of Department I in 
order to satisfy their needs as consumers, and partly by the 
capitalists of Department II in order to satisfy their needs as 
producers.^ Both lots of capitalists may each advance 500 units 

^ Marx {Capital, vol. ii, p. 482) takes the money spent directly by the 
capitalists of Department II as the starting point of this act of exchange. 
As Engels rightly says in his footnote, this does not affect the final result of 
circulation, but the assumption is not the correct condition of circulation 
within society. Marx himself has given a better exposition in Capital, vol. ii, 
pp. 461-2. 

95 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

of the money necessary for the exchange, or possibly the two 
departments will contribute in different proportions. At any 
rate, two things are certain: (a) the money set aside for the pur- 
pose by both departments must suffice to effect the exchange 
between I(i,oooj-) and II(i,oooc); {b) whatever the distribution 
of this money between the two departments may have been, the 
exchange transaction completed, each department of capitalist 
production must again possess the same amount of money it had 
earlier put into circulation. This latter maxim applies quite 
generally to social circulation as a whole: once the process of 
circulation is concluded, money will always have returned to its 
point of origin. Thus all capitalists, after universal exchange, 
have achieved a twofold result: first they have exchanged pro- 
ducts which, in their natural form, were of no use to them, 
against other products which, in their natural form, the capit- 
alists require either as means of production or for their own 
consumption. Secondly, they have regained possession of the 
money which they set in circulation so as to effect these acts of 
exchange. 

This phenomenon is unintelligible from the point of view of 
simple commodity circulation, where commodity and money 
continually change places — possession of the commodity ex- 
cluding the possession of money, as money constantly usurps the 
place which the commodity has given up, and vice versa. Indeed, 
this is perfectly true with regard to every individual act of com- 
modity exchange which is the form of social circulation. Yet 
this social circulation itself is more than mere exchange of com- 
modities: it is the circulation of capital. It is, however, an essen- 
tial and characteristic feature of this kind of circulation, that it 
does not only return to the capitalist the value of his original 
capital plus an increase, the surplus value, but that it also assists 
social reproduction by providing the means of production and 
labour power in the natural form of productive capital, and by 
ensuring the maintenance of those who do not work. Possessing 
both the means of production and the money needed, the capit- 
alists start the total social process of circulation; as soon as the 
social capital has completed its circuit, everything is again in 
their hands, apportioned to each department according to the 
investments made by it. The workers have only temporary 
possession of money during which time they convert the variable 

96 



THE CIRCULATION OF MONEY 

capital from its money form into its natural form. The variable 
capital in the capitalists' hands is nothing but the outward 
shape of part of their capital, and for this reason it must always 
revert to them. 

So far, we have only considered circulation as it takes place 
between the two large departments of production. Yet 4,000 
units of the first Department's produce remain there in the form 
of means of production to renew its constant capital of 4,000c. 
Moreover 500 of the consumer goods produced in Depart- 
ment II [corresponding to the surplus value II(500J-)] also re- 
main in this department in the form of consumer goods for the 
capitalist class. Since in both departments the mode of produc- 
tion is capitalistic, that is unplanned, private production, each 
department can distribute its own products — means of produc- 
tion in Department I and consumer goods in Department II — 
amongst its own capitalists only byway of commodity exchange, 
i.e. by a large number of individual sale transactions between 
capitalists of the same department. Therefore the capitalists of 
both departments must have a reserve of money with which to 
perform these exchange transactions — to renew both the means 
of production in Department I and the consumer goods for the 
capitalist class in Department II. This part of circulation does 
not present any features of specific interest, as it is merely simple 
commodity circulation. Vendor and purchaser alike belong to 
the same category of agents of production, and circulation is 
concerned only with money and commodity changing hands 
within the same class and department. All the same, the money 
needed for this circulation must from the outset be in the hands 
of the capitalist class: it is part of their capital. 

So far, the circulation of total social capital presents no 
peculiarities, even if we consider the circulation of money. From 
the very outset it is self-evident that society must possess a cer- 
tain quantity of money to make this circulation possible, and 
this for two reasons: first, the general form of capitalist produc- 
tion is that of commodity production which implies the circu- 
lation of money; secondly, the circulation of capital is based 
upon the continuous alternation of the three forms of capital: 
money capital, productive capital, and commodity capital. 
And as it is this very money, finally, which operates as capital — 
our diagram referring to capitalist production exclusively — the 
A.c. 97 D 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

capitalist class must have possession of this money, as it has 
possession of every other form of capital; it throws it into circu- 
lation in order to regain possession as soon as the process of 
circulation has been completed. 

At first glance, only one detail might strike us: if the capit- 
alists themselves have set in motion all the money which circu- 
lates in society, they must also advance the money needed for 
the realisation of their own surplus value. Thus it seems that the 
capitaUsts as a class ought to buy their own surplus value with 
their own money. As the capitahst class has possession of this 
money resulting from previous periods of production, even prior 
to the realisation of the product of each working period, the 
appropriation of surplus value at first sight does not seem to be 
based upon the unpaid labour of the wage labourer — as it in 
fact is — but merely the result of an exchange of commodities 
against an equivalent quantity of money both supplied by the 
capitalist class itself A little reflection, however, dispels this 
illusion. After the general completion o fcir culation, the capit- 
alists, now as before, possess their money funds which either 
reverted to them or remained in their hands. Further, they 
acquired consumer goods for the same amount which they 
have consumed. (Note that we are still confining ourselves to 
simple reproduction as the prime condition of our diagram of 
reproduction: the renewal of production on the old scale and 
the use of all surplus value produced for the personal con- 
sumption of the capitalist class.) 

Moreover, the illusion vanishes completely if we do not con- 
fine ourselves to one period of production but observe a number 
of successive periods in their mutual interconnections. The 
value the capitalist puts into circulation to-day in the form of 
money for the purpose of reahsing his own surplus value, is in 
fact nothing but his surplus value resulting from the preceding 
period of production in form of money. The capitalist must 
advance money out of his own pocket in order to buy his goods 
for consumption. On the one hand, the surplus value which he 
produces each year either exists in a natural form which renders 
it unfit for consumption, or, if it takes a consumable form, it 
is temporarily in the hands of another person. On the other 
hand, he (the capitalist) has regained possession of the money, 
and he is now making his advances by realising his surplus 

98 



THE CIRCULATION OF MONEY 

value from the preceding period. As soon as he has realised his 
new surplus value, which is still embodied in the commodity- 
form, this money will return to him. Consequently, in the course 
of several periods of production, the capitalist class draws its 
consumer goods from the pool, as well as the other natural 
forms of its capital. The quantity of money originally in its 
possession, however, remains unaffected by this process. 

Investigation of the circulation of money in society shows that 
the individual capitalist can never invest the whole of his money 
capital in production but must always keep a certain money 
reserve to be employed as variable capital, i.e. as wages. 
Further, he must keep a capital reserve for the purchase of 
means of production at any given period, and in addition, he 
must have a cash reserve for his personal consumption. 

The process of reproducing the total social capital thus 
entails the necessity of producing and reproducing the sub- 
stance of money. Money is also capital, for Marx's diagram 
which we have discussed before, conceives of no other than 
capitalist production. Thus the diagram seems incomplete. We 
ought to add a further department, that of production of the 
means of exchange, to the other two large departments of social 
production [those of means of production (I) and of consumer 
goods (II)]. It is, indeed, a characteristic feature of this third 
department that it serves neither the purposes of production 
nor those of consumption, merely representing social labour in 
an undifferentiated commodity that cannot be used. Though 
money and its production, like the exchange and production 
of commodities, are much older than the capitalist mode of pro- 
duction, it was only the latter which made the circulation of 
money a general form of social circulation, and thus the essen- 
tial element of the social reproductive process. We can only 
obtain a comprehensive diagram of the essential points of capit- 
alist production if we demonstrate the original relationship 
between the production and reproduction of money and the 
two other departments of social production. 

Here, however, we deviate from Marx. He included the pro- 
duction of gold (we have reduced the total production of money 
to the production of gold for the sake of simplicity) in the first 
department of social production. 

'The production of gold, like that of metals generally, belongs 

99 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

to department I, which occupies itself with means of pro- 
duction.'^ 

This is correct only in so far as the production of gold is the 
production of metal for industrial purposes (jewellery, dental 
stoppings, etc.). But gold in its capacity as money is not a metal 
but rather an embodiment of social labour in abstracto. Thus it 
is no more a means of production than it is a consumer good. 
Besides, a mere glance at the diagram of reproduction itself 
shows what inconsistencies must result from confusing means of 
exchange with means of production. If we add a diagrammatic 
representation of the annual production of gold as the substance 
of money to the two departments of social production, we get 
the following three sets of figures: 

I. 4,oooc-|-i,oooy+i,oooj=6,ooo means of production 
II. 2,oooc-\- 500^4- 500^=3,000 means of subsistence 
III. 20t+ 5^+ 5-^= 30 means of exchange 

This quantity of value of 30, chosen by Marx as an example, 
obviously does not represent the quantity of money which cir- 
culates annually in society; it only stands for that part which is 
annually reproduced, the annual wear and tear of the money 
substance which, on the average, remains constant so long as 
social reproduction remains on the same level. The turnover of 
capital goes on in a regular manner and the realisation of com- 
modities proceeds at an equal pace. If we consider the third line 
as an integral part of the first one, as Marx wants us to do, the 
following difficulty arises: the constant capital of the third 
department consists of real and concrete means of production, 
premises, tools, auxiliary materials, vessels, and the like, just as 
it does in the two other departments. Its product, however, the 
30^ which represent money, cannot operate in its natural form 
as constant capital in any process of production. If we therefore 
include this 30^ as an essential part of the product of Depart- 
ment I (6,000 means of production) the means of production 
will show a social deficit of this size which will prevent Depart- 
ments I and II from resuming their reproduction on the old 
scale. According to the previous assumption — which forms the 
foundation of Marx's whole diagram — reproduction as a whole 
starts from the product of each department in its actual use- 

^ Capital, vol. ii, p. 548. 
100 



THE CIRCULATION OF MONEY 

form. The proportions of the diagram are based upon this 
assumption; without it, they dissolve in chaos. Thus the first 
fundamental relation of value is based upon the equation: 
I(6,ooo) equals l{^,oooc) | II(2,oooc). This cannot apply to the 
product 111(30^), since neither department can use gold as a 
means of production [say, in the proportion of I (qo^:) +II(ioc)]. 
The second fundamental relation derived from this is based 
upon the equation I(i,oooy) +I(i,oooj^) =11 (2,000t). This would 
mean, with regard to the production of gold, that as many con- 
sumer goods are taken from Department II as there are means 
of production supplied to it. But this is equally untrue. Though 
the production of gold removes concrete means of production 
from the total social product and uses them as its constant 
capital, though it takes concrete consumer goods for the use of 
its workers and capitalists, corresponding to its variable capital 
and surplus value, the product it supplies yet cannot operate in 
any branch of production as a means of production, nor is it a 
consumer good, fit for human consumption. To include the 
production of money in the activities of Department I, there- 
fore, is to run counter to all the general proportions which 
express the relations of value in Marx's diagram, and to 
diminish the diagram's validity. 

The attempt by Marx to find room for the production of gold 
within Department I (means of production) moreover leads to 
dubious results. The first act of circulation between this new 
sub-Department (called by Marx I_^) and Department II (con- 
sumer goods) consists as usual in the workers' purchase of con- 
sumer goods from Department II with the money obtained as 
wages from the capitalists. This money is not yet a product of 
the new period of production. It has been reserved by the 
capitalists of Department I^ out of the money contained in 
their product of an earlier period. This, indeed, is the normal 
procedure. But now Marx allows the capitalists of Depart- 
ment II to buy gold from I^ with the money they have re- 
served, gold as a commodity material to the value of 2. This is 
a leap from the production of money into the industrial pro- 
duction of gold which is no more to do with the problem of the 
production of money than with the production of boot-polish. 
Yet out of the ^Ig v that have been reserved, 3 still remain, and 
as the capitalist, unable to use them as constant capital, does not 

lOI 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

kno\v what to do with them, Marx arranges for him to add 
them on to his own reserx^e of money. Marx further finds the 
following way out to avoid a deficit in the constant capital of 
II which must be exchanged completely against the means of 
production (ly+Ii"): 

'Therefore, this money must be entirely transferred from 11^: 
to lis, no matter whether it exists in necessities of life or articles 
of luxury, and vice versa, a corresponding value of commodities 
must be transferred from lis to Ilr. Result: A portion of the 
surplus-value is accumulated as a hoard of money.'^ 

A strange result, in all conscience! We have" achieved an in- 
crease in money, a surplus of the money substance, by simply 
confining ourselves to the annual wear and tear of the money 
fund. This surplus value comes into existence, for some un- 
known reason, at the expense of the capitalists in the consumer 
goods department. They practise abstinence, not because they 
may want to expand their production of surplus value, let us 
say, but in order to secure a sufficient quantity of consumer 
goods for the workers engaged in the production of gold. 

The capitalists of Department II, however, get poor reward 
for this Christian virtue. In spite of their abstinence, they are 
not only unable to expand their reproduction, but they are no 
longer even in the position to resume their production on its 
former scale. Even if the corresponding 'commodity value' is 
transferred from 11^ to lie, it is not only the value but its 
actual and concrete form which matters. As the new part of the 
product of I now consists of money which cannot be used as a 
means of production, Department II, in spite of its abstinence, 
cannot renew its constant material capital on the old scale. As 
our diagram presupposes simple reproduction, its conditions are 
thus violated in two directions: surplus value is being hoarded, 
and the constant capital shows a deficit. Marx's own results, 
then, prove that the production of gold cannot possibly find a 
place in either of the two departments of his diagram; the whole 
diagram is upset as soon as the first act of exchange between 
Departments I and II has been completed. As Engels remarks, 
in his footnote, 'the analysis of the exchange of newly produced 
gold within the constant capital of Department I is not con- 
tained in the MS.'^ Besides, the inconsistency would then only 
^ Capital, vol. ii, p. 550. " ^ Ibid., p. 551. 

102 



THE CIRCULATION OF MONEY 

have been greater. The point of view we advocate is confirmed 
by Marx himself when he gives an exhaustive answer to the 
question, as striking as it is brief: 'Money in itself is not an 
element of actual reproduction.'^ 

There is another important reason why we should put the 
production of money in a third and separate department of 
social production as a whole: Marx's diagram of simple repro- 
duction is valid as the starting-point and foundation of the 
reproductive process not only for capitalism but also, mutatis 
mutandis, for every regulated and planned economic order, for 
instance a socialist one. However, the production of money, 
just like the commodity-form of the products, becomes obsolete 
when private ownership of the means of production is abolished. 
It constitutes the 'illegitimate' liabilities, the faux frais of the 
anarchic economy under capitalism, a peculiar burden for a 
society based upon private enterprise, which implies the annual 
expenditure of a considerable amount of labour on the manu- 
facture of products which are neither means of production nor 
yet consumer goods. This peculiar expenditure of labour by a 
society producing under capitalism will vanish in a socially 
planned economy. It is most adequately demonstrated by 
means of a separate department within the process of repro- 
ducing social capital. It is quite immaterial in this connection 
whether we picture a country which produces its own gold or a 
country which imports gold from abroad. The same expendi- 
ture of social labour which in the first case is necessary for the 
direct production of gold, is required in the second case to effect 
the exchange transactions. 

These observations show that the problem of the reproduc- 
tion of total capital is not so crude as it often appears to those 
who approach it merely from the point of view of crises. The 
central problem might be formulated as follows: how is it 
possible that, in an unplanned economy, the aggregate produc- 
tion of innumerable individual capitalists can satisfy all the 
needs of society? One answer that suggests itself points to the 
continual fluctuations in the level of production in accordance 
with the fluctuating demand, i.e. the periodical changes in the 
market. This point of view, which regards the aggregate pro- 
duct of society as an undifferentiated mass of commodities, and 

1 Ibid., p. 572. 
103 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

treats social demand in an equally absurd way, overlooks the 
most important element, the differentia specifica of the capitalist 
mode of production. We have seen that the problem of capitalist 
reproduction contains quite a number of precisely defined rela- 
tions referring to specific capitalist categories and also, mutatis 
mutandis, to the general categories of human labour. The real 
problem consists in their inherent tendencies towards both con- 
flict and harmony. Marx's diagram is the scientific formulation 
of the problem. 

Inquiry must now be made into the implications of this 
diagram analytic of the process of production. Has it any real 
bearing on the problems of actual life? According to the 
diagram, circulation absorbs the entire social product; all con- 
sumers' needs are satisfied, and reproduction takes place with- 
out friction. The circulation of money succeeds the circulation 
of commodities, completing the cycle of social capital. But what 
is the position in real life? The relations outlined in the diagram 
lay down a precise first principle for the division of social labour 
in a planned production — always providing a system of simple 
reproduction, i.e. no changes in the volume of production. But 
no such planned organisation of the total process exists in a 
capitalist economy, and things do not run smoothly, along a 
mathematical formula, as suggested by the diagram. On the 
contrary, the course of reproduction shows continual deviations 
from the proportions of the diagram which become manifest 
[a] in the fluctuations of prices from day to day; {b) in the con- 
tinual fluctuations of profits; [c] in the ceaseless flow of capital 
from one branch of production to another, and finally in the 
periodical and cyclical swings of reproduction between over- 
production and crisis. 

And yet, apart from all these deviations, the diagram pre- 
sents a socially necessary average level in which all these move- 
ments must centre, to which they are always striving to return, 
once they have left it. That is why the fluctuating movements 
of the individual capitalists do not degenerate into chaos but 
are reduced to a certain order which ensures the prolonged 
existence of society in spite of its lack of a plan. 

In comparison, the similarities and the profound discrepan- 
cies between Marx's diagram of reproduction and Qucsnay's 
Tableau llconomique strike us at once. These two diagrams, the 

104 



THE CIRCULATION OF MONEY 

beginning and end of the period of classical economics, are the 
only attempts to describe an apparent chaos in precise terms, a 
chaos created by the interrelated movements of capitalist pro- 
duction and consumption, and by the disparity of innumerable 
private producers and consumers. Both writers reduce this 
chaotic jumble of individual capitals to a few broadly conceived 
rules which serve, as it were, as moorings for the development 
of capitalist society, in spite of its chaos. They both achieve a 
synthesis between the two aspects which are the basis of the 
whole movement of social capital: that circulation is at one and 
the same time a capitalist process of producing and appro- 
priating surplus value, and also a social process of producing 
and consuming material goods necessary to civilised human 
existence. Both show the circulation of commodities to act as a 
mediator for the social process as a whole, and both conceive 
of the circulation of money as a subsidiary phenomenon, an 
external and superficial expression of the various stages within 
the circulation of commodities. 

It is socially necessary labour which creates value. This 
inspired fundamental law of Marx's theory of value which 
provided the solution of the money problem, amongst others, 
further led him first to distinguish and then to integrate those 
two aspects in the total reproductive process: the aspect of 
value and that of actual material connections. Secondly, Marx's 
diagram is based upon the precise distinction between con- 
stant and variable capital which alone reveals the internal 
mechanisms of the production of surplus value and brings it, as 
a value-relationship, into precise relation with the two material 
categories of production: that of producer and consumer goods. 

After Quesnay, some classical economists, Adam Smith and 
Ricardo in particular, came fairly close to this point of view. 
Ricardo's contribution, his precise elaboration of the theory of 
value, has even been frequently confused with that of Marx. On 
the basis of his own theory of value, Ricardo saw that Smith's 
method of resolving the price of all commodities into v -{-s — a 
theory which wrought so much havoc in the analysis of repro- 
duction — is wrong; but he was not much interested in Smith's 
mistake, nor indeed very enthusiastic about the problem of re- 
production as a whole. His analysis, in fact, represents a certain 
decline after that of Adam Smith, just as Smith had partly 

105 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

retrogressed as against the Physiocrats. If Ricardo expounded 
the fundamental value categories of bourgeois economy — wages, 
surplus value and capital — much more precisely and con- 
sistently than his predecessors, he also treated them more 
rigidly. Adam Smith had shown infinitely more understanding 
for the living connections, the broad movements of the whole. 
In consequence he did not mind giving two, or, as in the case of 
the problem of value, even three or four different answers to the 
same question. Though he contradicts himself quite cheerfully 
in the various parts of his analysis, these very contradictions are 
ever stimulating him to renewed effort, they make him approach 
the problem as a whole from an ever different point of view, 
and so to grasp its dynamics. Ultimately, it was the limitation 
of their bourgeois mentahties which doomed both Smith and 
Ricardo to failure. A proper understanding of the fundamental 
categories of capitaHst production, of value and surplus value as 
living dynamics of the social process demands the understand- 
ing of this process in its historical development and of the cate- 
gories themselves as historically conditioned forms of the general 
relations of labour. This means that only a socialist can really 
solve the problem of the reproduction of capital. Between the 
Tableau Economique and the diagram of reproduction in the 
second volume of Capital there lies the prosperity and decline of 
bourgeois economics, both in time and in substance. 



1 06 



CHAPTER VI 
ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

THE shortcomings of the diagram of simple reproduction 
are obvious: it explains the laws of a form of reproduc- 
tion which is possible only as an occasional exception in 
a capitalist economy. It is not simple but enlarged reproduc- 
tion which is the rule in every capitalist economic system, even 
more so than in any other. ^ 

Nevertheless, this diagram is of real scientific importance in 
two respects. In practice, even under conditions of enlarged 
reproduction, the greater part of the social product can be 
looked on as simple reproduction, which forms the broad basis 
upon which production in every case expands beyond its former 
limits. In theory, the analysis of simple reproduction also pro- 
vides the necessar/ starting point for all scientific exposition of 
enlarged reproduction. The diagram of simple reproduction 
of the aggregate social capital therefore inevitably introduces 
the further problem of the enlarged reproduction of the total 
capital. 

We already know the historical peculiarity of enlarged re- 
production on a capitalist basis. It must represent itself as 
accumulation of capital, which is both its specific form and its 
specific condition. That is to say, social production as a whole 
— which on a capitalist basis is the production of surplus value 

^ 'The premise of simple reproduction, that \(v-\-s) is equal to lie, is 
irreconcilable with capitalist production, although this does not exclude the 
possibility that a certain year in an industrial cycle of ten or eleven years 
may not show a smaller total production than the preceding year, so that 
there would not have been even a simple reproduction, compared to the 
preceding year. Indeed, considering the natural growth of population per 
year, simple reproduction could take place only in so far as a correspond- 
ingly larger number of unproductive servants would partake of the 1,500 
representing the aggregate surplus-product. But accumulation of capital, 
actual capitalist production, would be impossible under such circumstances' 
{Capital, vol. ii, p. 608). 

107 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

— can in every case be expanded only in so far as the social 
capital that has been previously active is now augmented by 
surplus value of its own creation. This use of part of the surplus 
value (and in particular the use of an increasing part of it) for 
the purpose of production instead of personal consumption by 
the capitalist class, or else the increase of reserves, is the basis of 
enlarged reproduction under capitalist conditions of production. 

The characteristic feature of enlarged reproduction of the 
aggregate social capital — just as in our previous assumption of 
simple reproduction — is the reproduction of individual capitals, 
since production as a whole, whether regarded as simple or as 
enlarged production, can in fact only occur in the form of 
innumerable independent movements of reproduction per- 
formed by private individual capitals. 

The first comprehensive analysis of the accumulation of indi- 
vidual capitals is given in volume i of Marx's Capital, section 7, 
chapters 22, 23. Here Marx treats of [a) the division of the 
surplus value into capital and revenue; [b) the circumstances 
which determine the accumulation of capital apart from this 
division, such as the degree of exploitation of labour power and 
labour productivity; [c] the growth of fixed capital relative to 
the circulating capital as a factor of accumulation; and [d) the 
increasing development of an industrial reserve army which is 
at the same time both a consequence and a prerequisite of the 
process of accumulation. In the course of this discussion, Marx 
deals with two inspired notions of bourgeois economists with 
regard to accumulation: the 'theory of abstinence' as held by 
the more vulgar economists, who proclaim that the division of 
surplus value into capital, and thus accumulation itself, is an 
ethical and heroic act of the capitalists; and the fallacy of the 
classical economists, their doctrine that the entire capitalised 
part of the surplus value is used solely for consumption by the 
productive workers, that is to say spent altogether on wages for 
the workers employed year by year. This erroneous assumption, 
which completely overlooks the fact that every increase of pro- 
duction must manifest itself not only in the increased number of 
employed workers but also in the increase of the material means 
of production (premises, tools, and, certainly, raw materials) is 
obviously rooted in that 'dogma' of Adam Smith which we 
have already discussed. Moreover, the assumption that the ex- 

108 



ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

pcnditurc of a greater amount of capital on wages is sufTicicnt 
to expand production, also results from the mistaken idea that 
the prices of all commodities arc completely resolved into wages 
and surplus value, so that the constant capital is disregarded 
altogether. Strangely enough, even Ricardo who was, at any 
rate occasionally, aware of this element of error in Smith's 
doctrine, subscribes most emphatically to its ultimate inferences, 
mistaken though they were: 

'It must be understood, that all the productions of a country 
are consumed; but it makes the greatest difference imaginable 
whether they are consumed by those who reproduce, or by those 
who do not reproduce another value. When we say that revenue 
is saved, and added to capital, what we mean is, that the por- 
tion of revenue, so said to be added to capital, is consumed 
by productive, instead of unproductive labourers.'^ 

If all the goods produced are thus swallowed up by human 
consumption, there can clearly be no room to spare in the total 
social product for such unconsumable means of production as 
tools and machinery, new materials and buildings, and conse- 
quently enlarged reproduction, too, will have to take a peculiar 
course. What happens — according to this odd conception — is 
simply that staple foodstuffs for new workers will be produced 
to the amount of the capitalised part of surplus value instead of 
the choice delicacies previously provided for the capitalist class. 
The classical theory of enlarged reproduction does not admit 
of any variations other than those connected with the produc- 
tion of consumer goods. After our previous observations it is not 
surprising that Marx could easily dispose of this elementary 
mistake of both Ricardo and Smith. Just as simple reproduction 
requires a regulated renewal of the constant capital, the material 
means of production, quite apart from the production of con- 
sumer goods in the necessary quantity for labourer and capit- 
alist, equally so in the case of expanding production must 
part of the new additional capital be used to enlarge the con- 
stant capital, that is to add to the material means of production. 
Another law, Marx discovered, must also be applied here. The 
constant capital, continually overlooked by the classical eco- 
nomists, increases relative to the variable capital that is spent 

^ Ricardo, Principles, chap, viii, 'On Taxes'. MacGulloch's edition of 
Ricardo's Works, p. 87, note. (Reference not given in original.) 

109 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

on wages. This is merely the capitahst expression of the general 
effects of increasing labour productivity. With technical pro- 
gress, human labour is able to set in motion ever larger masses 
of means of production and to convert them into goods. In 
capitalist terms, this means a progressive decrease in expenses 
for living labour, in wages, relative to the expenses for inani- 
mate means of production. Contrary to the assumption of Adam 
Smith and Ricardo, enlarged reproduction must not only start 
with the division of the capitalised part of the surplus value into 
constant and variable capital, but, as the technique of produc- 
tion advances, it is bound to allocate in this division ever 
increasing portions to the constant, and ever diminishing por- 
tions to the variable capital. This continuous qualitative change 
in the composition of capital is the specific manifestation of the 
accumulation of capital, that is to say of enlarged reproduction 
on the basis of capitalism. ^ 

^ 'The specifically capitalist mode of production, the development of the 
productive power of labour corresponding to it, and the change thence 
resulting in the organic composition of capital, do not merely keep pace 
with the advance of accumulation, or with the growth of social wealth. 
They develop at a much quicker rate, because mere accumulation, the 
absolute increase of the total social capital, is accompanied by the centralisa- 
tion of the individual capitals of which that total is made up; and because 
the change in the technological composition of the additional capital goes 
hand in hand with a similar change in the technological composition of the 
original capital. With the advance of accumulation, therefore, the propor- 
tion of constant to variable capital changes. If it was originally say i:i, it 
now becomes successively 2:1, 3:1, 4:1, 5:1, 7:1, etc., so that, as the capital 
increases, instead of ^ of its total value, only ^, }, ^, ^, I, etc., is transformed 
into labour-power, and, on the other hand, |, J, f, I, I into means of 
production. Since the demand for labour is determined not by the amount 
of capital as a whole, but by its variable constituent alone, that demand 
falls progressively with the increase of the total capital, instead of, as 
previously assumed, rising in proportion to it. It falls relatively to the 
magnitude of the total capital, and at an accelerated rate, as this magnitude 
increases. With the growth of the total capital, its variable constituent or the 
labour incorporated in it, also docs increase, but in a constantly diminishing 
proportion. The intermediate pauses are shortened, in which accumulation 
works as simple extension of production, on a given technical basis. It is not 
merely that an accelerated accumulation of total capital, accelerated in a 
constantly growing progression, is needed to absorb an additional number 
of labourers, or even, on account of the constant metamorphosis of old 
capital, to keep employed those already functioning. In its turn, this increas- 
ing accumulation and centralisation becomes a source of new changes in the 

no 



ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

The other side of this picture of continual changes in the 
relation between the portions of constant and variable capital 
is the formation of a relative surplus population, as Marx called 
it, that is to say that part of the working population which 
exceeds the average needs of capital, and thus becomes redun- 
dant. This reserve of unemployable industrial labour (taken 
here in a broader sense, and including a proletariat that is 
dominated by merchant capital) is always present. It forms a 
necessary prerequisite of the sudden expansion of production 
in times of boom, and is another specific condition of capitalist 
accumulation. 1 

From the accumulation of individual capitals we can there- 
fore deduce the following four characteristic phenomena of 
enlarged reproduction: 

(i) The volume of enlarged reproduction is independent, 
within certain limits, of the growth of capital, and can transcend 
it. The necessary methods for achieving this are: increased ex- 
ploitation of labour and natural forces, and increased labour 
productivity (including increased efficiency of the fixed capital). 

(2) All real accumulation starts with that part of the surplus 
value which is intended for capitalisation being divided into 
constant and variable capital. 

(3) Accumulation as a social process is accompanied by con- 
tinuous changes in the relation between constant and variable 
capital, whereby that portion of capital which is invested in 
inanimate means of production continually increases as com- 
pared with that expended on wages. 

(4) Concomitant with the accumulative process, and as a 
condition of the latter, there develops an industrial reserve 
army. 

These characteristics, derived from the reproductive process 
as it is performed by the individual capitals, represent an enor- 

composition of capital, of a more accelerated diminution of its variable, as 
compared with its constant constituent' {Capital, vol. i, pp. 642-3). 

^ 'The course characteristic of modern industry, viz., a decennial cycle 
(interrupted by smaller oscillations), of periods of average activity, produc- 
tion at high pressure, crisis and stagnation, depends on the constant forma- 
tion, the greater or less absorption, and the re-formation of the industrial 
reserve army or surplus population. In their turn, the vaiying phases of the 
industrial cycle recruit the surplus population, and become one of the most 
energetic agents of its reproduction' (ibid., pp. 646-7). 

Ill 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

mous step forward as compared with the analyses of bourgeois 
economists. Now, however, our problem is to demonstrate the 
accumulation of the aggregate capital which originates from 
these movements of individual capitals, and on the basis of the 
diagram of simple reproduction to establish the precise relations 
between the aspects of value prevalent in the production of 
surplus value and the material considerations in the production 
of consumer and producer goods, with a view to accumulation. 

The essential difference between enlarged reproduction and 
simple reproduction consists in the fact that in the latter the 
capitalist class and its hangers-on consume the entire surplus 
value, whereas in the former a part of the surplus value is set 
aside from the personal consumption of its owners, not for the 
purpose of hoarding, but in order to increase the active capital, 
i.e. for capitalisation. To make this possible, the new additional 
capital must also find the material prerequisites for its activity 
forthcoming. Here the concrete composition of the aggregate 
social product becomes important. Marx says already in 
volume i, when he considers the accumulation of individual 
capitals: 

'The annual production must in the first place furnish all 
those objects (use-values) from which the material components 
of capital, used up in the course of the year, have to be replaced. 
Deducting these there remains the net or surplus-product, in 
which the surplus-value lies. And of what does this surplus- 
product consist? Only of things destined to satisfy the wants and 
desires of the capitalist class, things which, consequently, enter 
into the consumption fund of the capitalists? Were that the case, 
the cup of surplus-value would be drained to the very dregs, 
and nothing but simple reproduction would ever take place. — 
To accumulate it is necessary to convert a portion of the surplus- 
product into capital. But we cannot, except by a miracle, con- 
vert into capital anything but such articles as can be employed 
in the labour-process (i.e. means of production), and such 
further articles as are suitable for the sustenance of the labourer, 
(i.e. means of subsistence). Consequently, a part of the annual 
surplus-labour must have been applied to the production of 
additional means of production and subsistence, over and above 
the quantity of these things required to replace the capital 
advanced. In one word, surplus-value is convertible into capital 

112 



ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

solely because the surplus-product, whose value it is, already 
comprises the material elements of new capital.'^ 

Additional means of production, however, and additional 
consumer goods for the workers alone are not sufficient; to get 
enlarged reproduction really going, additional labour is also re- 
quired. Marx now finds a specific difficulty in this last condition: 

'For this the mechanism of capitalist production provides 
beforehand, by converting the working class into a class depen- 
dent on wages, a class whose ordinary wages suffice, not only for 
its maintenance, but for its increase. It is only necessary for 
capital to incorporate this additional labour-power, annually 
supplied by the working class in the shape of labourers of all 
ages, with the surplus means of production comprised in the 
annual produce, and the conversion of surplus-value into capital 
is complete. '2 

This is the first solution which Marx gave to the problem of 
the accumulation of the aggregate capital. Having dwelt on 
this aspect of the question already in volume i of Capital^ Marx 
returns to the problem at the end of the second volume of his 
main work whose concluding 2 ist chapter is devoted to accumu- 
lation and enlarged reproduction of the aggregate capital. 

Let us examine Marx's diagrammatic exposition of accumula- 
tion more closely. On the model of the diagram of simple repro- 
duction with which we are already familiar, he devised a 
diagram for enlarged reproduction, the difference appearing 
most clearly if we compare the two. 

Assuming that society's annual aggregate product can be 
represented by an amount to the value of 9,000 (denoting 
millions of working hours, or, in capitalist monetary terms, any 
arbitrary amount of money), the aggregate product is to be 
distributed as follows: 

I. 4,oooc+ 1, oooy+ 1,000^=6,000 

II. 2,OOOC+ 500^^-}- 5005' = 3,000 

Total: 9,000 

Department I represents means of production. Department II 

consumer goods. One glance at the proportion of the figures 

shows that in this case simple reproduction alone is possible. 

The means of production made in Department I equal the total 

1 Capital, vol. i, pp. 593-4. ^ Ibid., p. 594. 

113 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

of the means of production actually used by the two depart- 
ments. If these are merely renewed, production can be repeated 
only on its previous scale. On the other hand, the aggregate 
product of Department II equals the total of wages and surplus 
value in both departments. This shows that the consumer goods 
available permit only the employment of just as many workers 
as were previously employed, and that the entire surplus value 
is similarly spent on consumer goods, i.e. the personal con- 
sumption of the capitalist class. 

Now let us take the same aggregate product of 9,000 in the 
following equation: 

I. 4,000^4- 1 j000ü4- 1,000^=6,000 
II. i,50oc+ 750Ü+ 750j=3,ooo 

Total: 9,000 

Here a double disproportion confronts us: 6,000 means of 
production are created — more than those which are actually 
used by the society, i.e. 4,000c + 1,500^, leaving a surplus of 500. 
Similarly, less consumer goods (3,000) are produced than the 
sum of what is paid out in wages (i.e. 1,000^ + 750!:;, the require- 
ment of the workers), plus the aggregate of surplus value that 
has been produced (1,000^ + 750^). This results in a deficit of 
500. Since our premises do not allow us to decrease the number 
of workers employed, the consequence must be that the capit- 
alist class cannot consume the entire surplus value it has 
pocketed. This proves fully consistent with the two material pre- 
conditions of enlarged reproduction on a capitalist basis: part of 
the appropriated surplus value is not to be consumed but is 
used for the purposes of production; and more means of pro- 
duction must be produced so as to ensure the use of the capit- 
alised surplus value for the actual expansion of reproduction. 

In considering the diagram of simple reproduction, we saw 
that its fundamental social conditions are contained in the fol- 
lowing equation: the aggregate of means of production (the 
product of Department I) must be equivalent to the constant 
capital of both departments, but the aggregate of consumer 
goods (the product of Department II) must equal the sum of 
variable capitals and surplus values of the two departments. As 
regards enlarged reproduction, we must now infer a precise 
inverse double ratio. The general precondition of enlarged re- 

114 



ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

production is that the product of Department I must be greater 
in value than the constant capital of both departments taken 
together, and that of Department II must be so much less than 
the sum total of both the variable capital and the surplus value 
in the two departments. 

This, however, by no means completes the analysis of enlarged 
reproduction; rather has it led us merely to the threshold of the 
question. Having deduced the proportions of the diagram, we 
must now pursue their further activities, the flow of circulation 
and the continuity of reproduction. Just as simple reproduction 
may be compared to an unchanging circle, to be repeated time 
and again, so enlarged reproduction, to quote Sismondi, is com- 
parable to a spiral with ever expanding loops. Let us begin by 
examining the loops of this spiral. The first general question 
arising in this connection is how actual accumulation proceeds 
in the two departments under the conditions now known to us, 
i.e. how the capitalists may capitalise part of their surplus value, 
and at the same time acquire the material prerequisites neces- 
sary for enlarged reproduction. 

Marx expounds the question in the following way: 
Let us assume that half the surplus value of Department I is 
being accumulated. The capitalists, then, use 500 for their con- 
sumption but augment their capital by another 500. In order to 
become active, this additional capital of 500 must be divided, as 
we now know, into constant and variable capital. Assuming the 
ratio of 4 to i remains what it was for the original capital, the 
capitalists of Department I will divide their additional capital 
of 500 thus: they will buy new means of production for 400 and 
new labour for 100. This does not present any difficulties, since 
we know that Department I has already produced a surplus of 
500 means of production. Yet the corresponding enlargement of 
the variable capital by 100 units of money is not enough, since 
the new additional labour power must also find adequate con- 
sumer goods which can only be supplied by Department II. 
Now the circulation between the two large departments is shift- 
ing. Formerly, under conditions of simple reproduction. Depart- 
ment I acquired 1,000 consumer goods for its own workers, and 
now it must find another 100 for its new workers. Department I 
therefore engages in enlarged reproduction as follows: 

4,400^: + 1,100z;. 
115 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

Department II, in turn, after selling these consumer goods to 
the value of lOO, is now in a position to acquire additional 
means of production to the same amount from Department I. 
And in fact, Department I still has precisely one hundred of its 
surplus product left over which now find their way into Depart- 
ment II, enabling the latter to expand its own reproduction as 
well. Yet here, too, the additional means of production alone 
are not much use; to make them operate, additional labour 
power is needed. Assuming again that the previous composition 
of capital has been maintained, with a ratio of 2 to i as regards 
constant and variable capital, additional labour to the tune of 
50 is required to work the additional 100 means of production. 
This additional labour, however, needs additional consumer 
goods to the amount of its wages, which are in fact supplied by 
Department II itself. This department must therefore produce, 
in addition to the 100 additional consumer goods for the new 
workers of Department I and the goods for the consumption of 
its own workers, a further amount of consumer goods to the tune 
of 50 as part of its aggregate product. Department II therefore 
starts on enlarged reproduction at a rate of i,6ooc+8ooy. 

Now the aggregate product of Department I (6,000) has been 
absorbed completely. 5,500 were necessary for renewing the old 
and used-up means of production in both departments, and the 
remaining 500 for the expansion of production: 400 in Depart- 
ment I and 100 in Department II. As regards the aggregate 
product of Department II (3,000), 1,900 have been used for the 
increased labour force in the two departments, and the 1,100 
consumer goods which remain serve the capitalists for their per- 
sonal consumption, the consumption of their surplus value. 500 
are consumed in Department I, and 600 in Department II 
where, out of a surplus value of 700, only 150 had been capit- 
alised (100 being expended on means of production and 50 on 
wages) . 

Enlarged reproduction can now proceed on its course. If we 
maintain our rate of exploitation at 100 per cent, as in the case 
of the original capital, the next period will give the following 
results: 

I. 4,4ooc+i,iooy+i,iGOj'=6,6oo 
II. i,6ooc-\- 8ooy-|- 8ooj=3,200 

Total: 9,800 
116 



ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

The aggregate product of society has grown from 9,000 to 
9,800, the surplus value of Department I from 1,000 to 1,100, 
and of Department II from 750 to 800. The object of the 
capitalist expansion of production, the increased production of 
surplus value, has been gained. At the same time, the material 
composition of the aggregate social product again shows a sur- 
plus of 600 as regards the means of production (6,600) over and 
above those which are actually needed (4,400 + 1,600), and also 
a deficit in consumer goods as against the sum total made up by 
the wages previously paid (i,iooy+8ooy) and the surplus value 
that has been created (1,1 ooj^ + 8005) . And thus we again have 
the material possibility as well as the necessity to use part of the 
surplus value, not for consumption by the capitalist class, but 
for a new expansion of production. 

The second enlargement of production, and increased pro- 
duction of surplus value, thus follows from the first as a matter 
of course and with mathematical precision. The accumulation 
of capital, once it has started, automatically leads farther and 
farther beyond itself. The circle has become a spiral which 
winds itself higher and higher as if compelled by a natural law 
in the guise of mathematical terms. Assuming that in the fol- 
lowing years there is always capitalisation of half the surplus 
value, while the composition of the capital and the rate of 
exploitation remain unchanged, the reproduction of capital 
will result in the following progression: 

zndyear: I. 4,840^+1, 210^+1,210^=7,260 

II. 1,760^+ 88oy+ 880^=3,520 

Total: 10,780 

Srdyear: I. 5,324^+1,331^+1,331^=7,986 

II. i,936(;+ 968y+ 968^=3,872 

Total: 11,858 

4th year: I. 5,856^+1,464«+ 1,4645' =8, 784 

II. 2,129^+1,0651;+ 1,065^=4,259 

Total: 13,043 

^thyear: I. 6,442c+i,6ioy+i,6ioi'=9,662 

II. 2,342c+i,i72y+i,i72i'=4,686 

Total: 14,348 
117 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

Thus, after five years of accumulation, the aggregate social 
product is found to have grown from 9,000 to 14,348, the social 
aggregate capital from (5, 500^ + 1, 750^ = 7,250) to (8,784c + 
2, 782?:;= 1 1 ,566) and the surplus value from ( i jOOOi^ + 5005^= i ,500) 
to (1,464^ + 1,0655=2,529), whereby the surplus value for per- 
sonal consumption, being 1,500 at the beginning of accumula- 
tion, has grown to 732+958 = 1,690 in the last year.^ The 
capitalist class, then, has capitalised more, it has practised 
greater abstinence, and yet it has been able to live better. 
Society, in a material respect, has become richer, richer in 
means of production, richer in consumer goods, and it has 
equally become richer in the capitalist sense of the term since it 
produces more surplus value. The social product circulates in 
toto in society. Partly it serves to enlarge reproduction and 
partly it serves consumption. The requirements of capitalist 
accumulation correspond to the material composition of the 
aggregate social product. What Marx said in volume i of 
Capital is true: the increased surplus value can be added on to 
capital because the social surplus product comes into the world 
from the very first in the material form of means of production, 
in a form incapable of utilisation except in the productive pro- 
cess. At the same time reproduction expands in strict con- 
formity with the laws of circulation: the mutual supply of the 
two departments of production with additional means of pro- 
duction and consumer goods proceeds as an exchange of equi- 
valents. It is an exchange of commodities in the course of which 
the very accumulation of one department is the condition of 
accumulation in the other and makes this possible. The com- 
plicated problem of accumulation is thus converted into a 
diagrammatic progression of surprising simplicity. We may 
continue the above chain of equations ad infinitum so long as we 
observe this simple principle: that a certain increase in the con- 
stant capital of Department I always necessitates a certain 
increase in its variable capital, which predetermines beforehand 
the extent of the increase in Department II, with which again 
a corresponding increase in the variable capital must be co- 
ordinated. Finally, it depends on the extent of increase in the 
variable capital in both departments, how much of the total 
may remain for personal consumption by the capitalist class. 

^ Op. cit.j vol. ii, pp. 596-601. 
118 



ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

The extent of this increase will also show that this amount of 
consumer goods which remains for private consumption by the 
capitalist is exactly equivalent to that part of the surplus value 
which has not been capitalised in either department. 

There are no limits to the continuation of this diagrammatic 
development of accumulation in accordance with the few easy 
rules we have demonstrated. But now it is time to take care lest 
we should only have achieved these surprisingly smooth results 
through simply working out certain fool-proof mathematical 
exercises in addition and subtraction, and we must further 
inquire whether it is not merely because mathematical equa- 
tions are easily put on paper that accumulation will continue 
ad infinitum without any friction. 

In other words: the time has come to look for the concrete 
social conditions of accumulation. 



119 



CHAPTER VII 

ANALYSIS OF MARX'S DIAGRAM 
OF ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

The first enlargement of reproduction gave the following 
picture : 

I. 4,400^+1,100^4-15100^=6,600 
IL i,6ooc+ 8ooi;-[- 800^=3,200 



Total: 9,800 

This already clearly expresses the interdependence of the 
two departments — but it is a dependence of a peculiar kind. 
Accumulation here originates in Department I, and Depart- 
ment II merely follows suit. Thus it is Department I alone that 
determines the volume of accumulation. Marx effects accumu- 
lation here by allowing Department I to capitalise one-half of its 
surplus value; Department II, however, may capitalise only as 
much as is necessary to assure the production and accumulation 
of Department I. He makes the capitalists of Department II 
consume 600J' as against the consumption of only ^oos by the 
capitalists of Department I who have appropriated twice the 
amount of value and far more surplus value. In the next year, 
he assumes the capitalists of Department I again to capitalise 
half their surplus value, this time making the capitalists of 
Department II capitalise more than in the previous year — 
summarily fixing the amount to tally exactly with the needs of 
Department I. 500^" now remain for the consumption of the 
capitalists of Department II — less than the year before — surely 
a rather queer result of accumulation on any showing. Marx 
now describes the process as follows: 

'Then let Department I continue accumulation at the same 
ratio, so that 550J are spent as revenue, and 55J accumulated. 
In that case, 1,100 \v are first replaced by 1,100 L, and 550 Is 
must be realised in an equal amount of commodities of II, 

120 



ANALYSIS OF ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

making a total of 1,650 I(y-i-.r). But the constant capital of II, 
which is to be replaced, amounts only to 1,600, and the remain- 
ing 50 must be made up out of 800 lis. Leaving aside the money 
aspect of the matter, we have as a result of this transaction: 

'I. 4,400c +550J' (to be capitalised); furthermore, realised in 
commodities of II for the fund for consumption of the capitalists 
and labourers of I, 1,650 (v+s). 

'II. 1,650c +8252; + 725^. 

'In Department I, 550J^ must be capitalised. If the former pro- 
portion is maintained, 440 of this amount form constant capital, 
and no variable capital. These no must be eventually taken 
out of 725 lis, that is to say, articles of consumption to the value 
of no are consumed by the labourers of I instead of the 
capitalists of II, so that the latter are compelled to capitalise 
these iios which they cannot consume. This leaves 615 lis of 
the 725 Us. But if II thus converts these no into additional 
constant capital, it requires an additional variable capital of 55. 
This again must be taken out of its surplus value. Subtracting 
this amount from 615 Us, we find that only 560 IIj" remain for 
the consumption of the capitalists of II, and we obtain the 
following values of capital after accomplishing all actual and 
potential transfers: 

I. {^,/^ooc-\-44oc)-\-{i,ioov-{'iiov)=4.,8/i.oc-\-i,2iov =6,050 
II. ( 1, 6ooc-}-50c+ hoc) +800^+25^+55!:;) = 1,760^+880^=2,640 

Total: 8,690'! 

This quotation is given at length since it shows very clearly 
how Marx here effects accumulation in Department I at the 
expense of Department II. In the years that follow, the capit- 
alists of the provisions department get just as rough a deal. 
Following the same rules, Marx allows them in the third year to 
accumulate 2645- — a larger amount this time than in the two 
preceding years. In the fourth year they are allowed to capitalise 
290^^ and to consume 678^-, and in the fifth year they accumulate 
320J" and consume 7455". Marx even says: 'If things are to pro- 
ceed normally, accumulation in II must take place more rapidly 
than in I, because that portion of ^y+i') which must be con- 
verted into commodities of lie, would otherwise grow more 
rapidly than lie, for which it can alone be exchanged.' ^ 
1 Capital, vol. ii, pp. 598-9. 2 ihid., p. 599. 

121 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

Yet the figures we have quoted fail to show a quicker accumu- 
lation in Department II, and in fact show it to fluctuate. Here 
the principle seems to be as follows: Marx enables accumulation 
to continue by broadening the basis of production in Depart- 
ment I. Accumulation in Department II appears only as a con- 
dition and consequence of accumulation in Department I: 
absorbing, in the first place, the other's surplus means of pro- 
duction and supplying it, secondly, with the necessary surplus of 
consumer goods for its additional labour. Department I retains 
the initiative all the time, Department II being merely a passive 
follower. Thus the capitalists of Department II are only allowed 
to accumulate just as much as, and are made to consume no 
less than, is needed for the accumulation of Department I. 
While in Department I half the surplus value is capitalised 
every time, and the other half consumed, so that there is an 
orderly expansion both of production and of personal consump- 
tion by the capitalists, the twofold process in Department II 
takes the following erratic course: 

ist year: 150 are capitalised, 600 consumed 
2nd 240 660 

3rd 254 626 

4th 290 678 

5th 320 745 

Here there is no rule in evidence for accumulation and con- 
sumption to follow; both are wholly subservient to the require- 
ments of accumulation in Department I. 

Needless to say, the absolute figures of the diagram are 
arbitrary in every equation, but that does not detract from their 
scientific value. It is the quantitative ratios which are relevant, 
since they are supposed to express strictly determinate relation- 
ships. Those precise logical rules that lay down the relations of 
accumulation in Department I, seem to have been gained at 
the cost of any kind of principle in construing these relations for 
Department II; and this circumstance calls for a revision of the 
immanent connections revealed by the analysis. 

It might, however, be permissible to assume the defect to lie 
in a rather unhappy choice of example. Marx himself, dis- 
satisfied with the diagram quoted above, proceeded forthwith 
to give a second example in order to elucidate the movements 

122 



ANALYSIS OF ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

of accumulation, where the figures of the equation run in the 
following order: 

L 5, oooc-|- 1, 000^1- 1,000^=7,000 
II. Ij43oc-j- 285^1- 285^=2,000 



Total: 9,000 

In contrast to the previous example, the capital of both 
departments is here seen to have the same composition, i.e. 
constant and variable capital arc in a ratio of 5 to i. This 
already presupposes a considerable development of capitalist 
production, and accordingly of social labour productivity — a 
considerable preliminary expansion of the scale of production, 
and finally, a development of all the circumstances which 
bring about a relatively redundant surplus population in the 
working class. We are no longer introduced to enlarged repro- 
duction, as in the first example, at the stage of the original 
transition from simple to enlarged reproduction — the only point 
of that is in any case for the sake of abstract theory. This time, 
we are brought face to face with the process of accumulation 
as it goes on at a definite and rather advanced stage of develop- 
ment. It is perfectly legitimate to assume these conditions, and 
they in no way distort the principles we must employ in order to 
work out the individual loops of the reproductive spiral. Here 
again Marx takes for a starting point the capitalisation of half 
the surplus value in Department I. 

'Now take it that the capitalist class of I consumes one-half of 
the surplus-value, or 500, and accumulates the other half In 
that case (i,oooü+500j') I, or 1,500, must be converted into 
1,500 lie. Since lie amounts to only 1,430, it is necessary to take 
70 from the surplus-value. Subtracting this sum from 2851 leaves 
215 lis. Then we have: 

'I. 5,oooc+500i' (to be capitalised) +1,500 {v-'rs) in the fund 
set aside for consumption by capitalists and labourers. 

'II. 1,430^ + 703- (to be capitalised) +285z; + 2I5J'. As 70 IIj- 
are directly annexed by llf, a variable capital of 70:5, or 14, 
is required to set this additional constant capital in motion. 
These 14 must come out of the 21 y, so that only 201 remain, 
and we have: 

'II ( 1, 430) + 70<: + (285^ + 142;)+ 20 u.' 1 

* Capital, vol. ii, pp. 600-1. 
123 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

After these preliminary arrangements, capitalisation can now 
proceed. This is done as follows: 

In Department I the 500^' which have been capitalised are 
divided into five-sixths (41 7^:) + one-sixth (8327). These 830 
withdraw a corresponding amount from 11^ which serves to 
buy units of constant capital and thus accrues to lie. An 
increase of lie by 83 involves the necessity of an increase in 
IIz; by 17 (one-fifth of 83). After the completion of this turnover 
we therefore have: 

I. (5,000^+41 7j) + (i,oooy+83j)z;=5,4i7(;+ 1,0830=6,500 
II. (i,50oc+ 83^)+ (299^+175)= 1,538^+ 3161^=1,899 



Total: 8,399 

The capital of Department I has grown from 6,000 to 6,500, i.e. 
by one-twelfth; in Department II it has grown from 1,715 to 
1,899, i-^- by just over one-ninth. 

At the end of the next year, the results of reproduction on this 
basis are: 

I. 5,417^+1,083^+1,083^=7,583 
II. 1,583^+ 316Ü+ 316^=2,215 



Total: 9,798 

If the same ratio is maintained in the continuance of accumu- 
lation, the result at the end of the second year is as follows: 

I. 5,869^+1,173^+1,173^=8,215 
II. i,7i5c+ 342^^+ 342^=2,399 



Total: 10,614 

And at the end of the third year: 

I. 6,358^+1,2712;+ 1,271^=8,900 
II. 1,858^+ 3711'+ 371^=2,600 



Total: 11,500 

In the course of three years, the total social capital has in- 
creased from 1.6,000+11.1,715 = 7,715 to 1.7,629 + 11.2,229 = 
9,858, and the total product from 9,000 to 11,500. 

Accumulation in both departments here proceeds uniformly, 

124 



ANALYSIS OF ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

in marked difference from the first example. From the second 
year onwards, both departments capitalise half their surplus 
value and consume the other half A bad choice of figures in the 
first example thus seems to be responsible for its arbitrary 
appearance. But we must check up to make sure that it is not 
only a mathematical manipulation with cleverly chosen figures 
which this time ensures the smooth progress of accumulation. 

In the first as well as in the second example, we are continu- 
ally struck by a seemingly general rule of accumulation: to make 
any accumulation possible, Department II must always enlarge 
its constant capital by precisely the amount by which Depart- 
ment I increases {a) the proportion of surplus value for con- 
sumption and (b) its variable capital. If we take the example of 
the first year as an illustration, the constant capital of Depart- 
ment II must be increased by 70. And why? because this capital 
was only 1,430 before. 

But if the capitalists of Department I wish to accumulate half 
their surplus value ( i ,000) and to consume the other half, they 
need consumer goods for themselves and for their workers to the 
tune of 1,500 units which they can obtain only from Depart- 
ment II in exchange for their own products — means of produc- 
tion. Since Department II has already satisfied its own demand 
for producer goods to the extent of its own constant capital 
(1,430), this exchange is only possible if Department II decides 
to enlarge its own constant capital by 70. This means that it 
must enlarge its own production — and it can do so only by 
capitalising a corresponding part of its surplus value. If this 
surplus value amounts to 285 in Department II, 70 of it must be 
added to the constant capital. The first step towards expansion 
of production in Department II is thus demonstrated to be at 
the same time the condition for, and the consequence of, in- 
creased consumption by the capitalists of Department I. But to 
proceed. Hitherto, the capitalists of Department I could only 
spend one-half of their surplus value (500) on personal consump- 
tion. To capitalise the other half, they must redistribute these 
500^ in such a way as to maintain at least the previous ratio of 
composition, i.e. they must increase the constant capital by 417 
and the variable capital by 83. The first operation presents no 
difficulties: the surplus value of 500 belonging to the capitalists 
of Department I is contained in a natural form in their own 

125 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

product, the means of production, and is fit straightway to enter 
into the process of production; Department I can therefore 
enlarge its constant capital with the appropriate quantity of its 
own product. But the remaining 83 can only be used as variable 
capital if there is a corresponding quantity of consumer goods 
for the newly employed workers. Here it becomes evident for the 
second time that accumulation in Department I is dependent 
upon Department II: Department I must receive for its workers 
83 more consumer goods than before from Department II. As 
this is again possible only by way of commodity exchange, 
Department I can satisfy its demands only on condition that 
Department II is prepared for its part to take up products of 
Department I, producer goods, to the tune of 83. Since Depart- 
ment II has no use for the means of production except to em- 
ploy them in the process of production, it becomes not only 
possible but even necessary that Department II should increase 
its own constant capital by these very 83 which will now be 
used for capitalisation and are thus again withdrawn from the 
consumable surplus value of this department. The increase in 
the variable capital of Department I thus entails the second 
step in the enlargement of production in Department II. All 
material prerequisites of accumulation in Department I are now 
present and enlarged reproduction can proceed. Department II, 
however, has so far made only two increases in its constant 
capital. The result of this enlargement is that if the newly 
acquired means of production are indeed to be used, the 
quantity of labour power must be increased correspondingly. 
Maintaining the previous ratio, the new constant capital of 153 
requires a new variable capital of 3 1 . This implies the necessity 
to capitalise a corresponding further amount of the surplus 
value. Thus the fund for the capitalists' personal consumption in 
Department II comes to be what remains of the surplus value 
(2855) after deduction of the amounts used for twice enlarging 
the constant capital (70+83) and a commensurate increase in 
the variable capital (31) — a fund of loi, after deducting a total 
of 184. Similar operations in the second year of accumulation 
result for Department II in its surplus value being divided into 
1 58 for capitahsation and 1 58 for the consumption of its capit- 
alists, and in the third year, the figures become 172 and 170 
respectively. 

126 



ANALYSIS OF ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

Wc have studied this process so closely, tracing it step by 
step, because it shows clearly that the accumulation of Depart- 
ment II is completely determined and dominated by the 
accumulation of" Department I. Though this dependence is no 
longer expressed, as in Marx's first example, by arbitrary changes 
in the distribution of the surplus value, it does not do away 
with the fact itself, even if now the surplus value is always neatly 
halved by each department, one-half for capitalisation and the 
other for personal consumption. Though there is nothing to 
choose between the capitalists of the two departments as far as 
the figures are concerned, it is quite obvious that Department I 
has taken the initiative and actively carries out the whole 
process of accumulation, while Department II is merely a passive 
appendage. This dependence is also expressed in the following 
precise rule: accumulation must proceed simultaneously in both 
departments, and it can do so only on condition that the pro- 
visions-department increases its constant capital by the precise 
amount by which the capitalists of the means-of-production- 
department increase both their variable capital and their fund 
for personal consumption. This equation (increase IIi:=increase 
ly+increase Is.c.)'^ is the mathematical cornerstone of Marx's 
diagram of accumulation, no matter what figures we may 
choose for its concrete application. But now we must see whether 
capitalist accumulation does in actual fact conform to this hard 
and fast rule. 

Let us first return to simple reproduction. Marx's diagram, it 
will be remembered, was as follows: 

I. 4,ooof4-i)OOoy+i5000j'=6,ooo means of production 
II. 2,000(74- 50oy+ 500^^=3,000 means of consumption 



9,000 total production 

Here, too, we established certain equations which form the 
foundation of simple reproduction; they were: 

(a) The product of Department I equals in value the sum of 
the two constant capitals in Departments I and II. 

(b) The constant capital of Department II equals the sum of 
variable capital and surplus value in Department I — a neces- 
sary consequence of {a). 

^ Surplus consumption. 
127 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

(c) The product of Department II equals the sum of variable 
capital and surplus value in both departments — a necessary 
consequence of {a) and {b). 

These equations correspond to the conditions of capitalist 
commodity production (at the restricted level of simple repro- 
duction, however). Equation {b), for instance, is a result of the 
production of commodities, entailed by the fact, in other words, 
that the entrepreneurs of either department can only obtain the 
products of the other by an exchange of equivalents. Variable 
capital and surplus value in Department I together represent 
the demand of this department for consumer goods. The pro- 
duct of Department II must provide for the satisfaction of this 
demand, but consumer goods can only be obtained in exchange 
for an equivalent part of the product of Department I, the 
means of production. These equivalents, useless to Depart- 
ment II in their natural form if not employed as constant 
capital in the process of production, will thus determine how 
much constant capital there is to be in Department II. If this 
proportion were not adhered to, if, e.g., the constant capital of 
Department II (as a quantity of value) were larger than I(!:; -\-s), 
then it could not be completely transformed into means of pro- 
duction, since the demand of Department I for consumer goods 
would be too small; if the constant capital (II) were smaller 
than I{v-{-s.c), either the previous quantity of labour power 
could not be employed in this department, or the capitalists 
could not consume the whole of their surplus value. In all these 
cases, the premises of simple reproduction would be violated. 

These equations, however, are not just an exercise in mathe- 
matics, nor do they merely result from the system of com- 
modity production. To convince us of this fact, there is a simple 
means at hand. Let us imagine for a moment that, instead of 
a capitalist method of production, we have a socialist, i.e. a 
planned society in which the social division of labour has come 
to replace exchange. This society also will divide its labour 
power into producers of means of production and producers of 
means of consumption. Let us further imagine the technical 
development of labour to be such that two-thirds of social labour 
are employed in the manufacture of producer goods and one- 
third in the manufacture of consumer goods. Suppose that 
under these conditions 1,500 units (reckoned on a daily, 

128 



ANALYSIS OF ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

monthly, or yearly basis) suffice to maintain the whole working 
population of the society, one thousand of these being employed, 
according to our premise, in Department soc. I (making means 
of production), and five hundred in Department soc. II (making 
consumer goods), and that the means of production dating from 
previous labour periods and used up during one year's labour, 
represent 3,000 labour units. This labour programme, however, 
would not be adequate for the society, since considerably more 
labour will be needed to maintain all those of its members who 
do not work in the material, the productive sense of the term: 
the child, the old and sick, the civil servant, the artist and the 
scientist. Moreover, every society needs certain reserves against 
a rainy day, as a protection against natural calamities. Taking 
it that precisely the same quantity of labour and, similarly, of 
means of production as that required for the workers' own main- 
tenance is needed to maintain all the non-workers and to build 
up the reserves, then, from the figures previously assumed, we 
should get the following diagram for a regulated production: 

I. 4,oooc+i,oooy+i,ooo.y = 6,ooo means of production 
II. 2,oooc4- 500!:;4- 500^=3,000 means of consumption 

Here c stands for the material means of production that have 
been used, expressed in terms of social labour time; v stands for 
the social labour time necessary to maintain the workers them- 
selves and s for that needed to maintain those who do not work 
and to build up the reserves. 

If we check up on the proportions of this diagram, we obtain 
the following result: there is neither commodity production nor 
exchange, but in truth a social division of labour. The products 
of Department I are assigned to the workers of Department II 
in the requisite quantities, and the products of Department II 
are apportioned to everyone, worker or no, in both depart- 
ments, and also to the reserve-fund; all this being the outcome 
not of an exchange of equivalents but of a social organisation 
that plans and directs the process as a whole — because existing 
demands must be satisfied and production knows no other end 
but to satisfy the demands of society. 

Yet all that does not detract from the validity of the equations. 
The product of Department I must equal Ic + IIc: this means 
simply that Department I must annually renew all the means 

A.c. 129 E 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

of production which society has used up during one year's 
labour. The product of Department II must equal the sum of 
l{v-\-s)-\-II{v-'rs): this means that society must each year pro- 
duce as many consumer goods as are required by all its mem- 
bers, whether they work or not, plus a quota for the reserve 
fund. The proportions of the diagram are as natural and as 
inevitable for a planned economy as they are for a capitalist 
economy based upon anarchy and the exchange of commodi- 
ties. This proves the diagram to have objective social validity, 
even if, just because it concerns simple reproduction, it has 
hardly more than theoretical interest for either a capitalist or 
a planned economy, finding practical application only in the 
rarest of cases. 

The same sort of scrutiny must now be turned on the diagram 
of enlarged reproduction. Taking Marx's second example as the 
basis for our test, let us again imagine a socialist society. From 
the point of view of a regulated society we shall, of course, have 
to start with Department II, not with Department I. Assuming 
this society to grow rapidly, the result will be an increasing 
demand for provisions by its members, whether they work or 
not. This demand is growing so quickly that a constantly in- 
creasing quantity of labour — disregarding for the moment the 
progress of labour productivity — will be needed for the produc- 
tion of consumer goods. The quantities required, expressed in 
terms of social labour incorporated in them, increase from year 
to year in a progression of, say, 2,000 : 2,215 : 2,399 • 2,600 and 
so on. Let us further assume that technical conditions demand 
an increasing amount of means of production for producing this 
growing quantity of provisions, which, again measured in terms 
of social labour, mounts from year to year in the following pro- 
gression: 7,000:7,583:8,215:8,900 and so on. To achieve this 
enlargement of production, we must further have a growth in 
the labour performed per annum according to the following pro- 
gression: 2,570:2,798:3,030:3,284. [The figures correspond to 
the respective amounts of 1(1' +i) +II(y+^).] Finally, the labour 
performed annually must be so distributed that one-half is 
always used for maintaining the workers themselves, a quarter 
for maintaining those who do not work, and the last quarter for 
the purpose of enlarging production in the following year. Thus 
we obtain the proportions of Marx's second diagram of enlarged 

130 



ANALYSIS OF ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

reproduction for a socialist society. In fact, three conditions are 
indispensable if production is to be enlarged in any society, even 
in a planned economy: (i) the society must have an increasing 
quantity of labour power at its disposal; (2) in every working 
period, the immediate needs of society must not claim the 
whole of its working time, so that part of the time can be de- 
voted to making provision for the future and its growing 
demands; (3) means of production must be turned out year 
after year in sufficiently growing quantities — without which 
production cannot be enlarged on a rising scale. In respect 
of all these general points, Marx's diagram of enlarged repro- 
duction has objective validity — mutatis mutandis — for a planned 
society. 

It remains to test whether it is also valid for a capitalist 
economy. Here we must ask first of all: what is the starting point 
of accumulation? That is the approach on which we have to 
investigate the mutual dependence of the accumulative process 
in the two departments of production. There can be no doubt 
that under capitalist conditions Department II is dependent 
upon Department I in so far as its accumulation is determined 
by the additional means of production available. Conversely, 
the accumulation in Department I depends upon a correspond- 
ing quantity of additional consumer goods being available for 
its additional labour power. It does not follow, however, that 
so long as both these conditions are observed, accumulation in 
both departments is bound, as Marx's diagram makes it appear, 
to go on automatically year after year. The conditions of 
accumulation we have enumerated are no more than those 
without which there can be no accumulation. There may even 
be a desire to accumulate in both departments, yet the desire to 
accumulate plus the technical prerequisites of accumulation is 
not enough in a capitalist economy of commodity production. 
A further condition is required to ensure that accumulation can 
in fact proceed and production expand: the effective demand 
for commodities must also increase. Where is this continu- 
ally increasing demand to come from, which in Marx's 
diagram forms the basis of reproduction on an ever rising 
scale? 

It cannot possibly come from the capitalists of Departments 
I and II themselves — so much is certain right away — it cannot 

131 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

arise out of their personal consumption. On the contrary, it is 
the very essence of accumulation that the capitalists refrain from 
consuming a part of their surplus value which must be ever 
increasing — at least as far as absolute figures are concerned — 
that they use it instead to make goods for the use of other people. 
It is true that with accumulation the personal consumption of 
the capitalist class will grow and that there may even be an 
increase in the total value consumed; nevertheless it will still 
be no more than a part of the surplus value that is used for 
the capitalists' consumption. That indeed is the foundation of 
accumulation: the capitalists' abstention from consuming the 
whole of their surplus value. But what of the remaining surplus 
value, the part that is accumulated? For whom can it be 
destined? According to Marx's diagram. Department I has the 
initiative: the process starts with the production of producer 
goods. And who requires these additional means of production? 
The diagram answers that Department II needs them in order 
to produce means of consumption in increased quantities. Well 
then, who requires these additional consumer goods? Depart- 
ment I, of course— replies the diagram — because it now employs 
a greater number of workers. We are plainly running in circles. 
From the capitalist point of view it is absurd to produce more 
consumer goods merely in order to maintain more workers, and 
to turn out more means of production merely to keep this sur- 
plus of workers occupied. Admittedly, as far as the individual 
capitalist is concerned, the worker is just as good a consumer, 
i.e. purchaser of his commodity, as another capitalist or anyone 
else, provided that he can pay. Every individual capitalist 
realises his surplus value in the price of his commodity, whether 
he sells it to the worker or to some other buyer. But this does not 
hold true from the point of view of the capitalist class as a whole. 
The working class in general receives from the capitalist class no 
more than an assignment to a determinate part of the social 
product, precisely to the extent of the variable capital. The 
workers buying consumer goods therefore merely refund to the 
capitalist class the amount of the wages they have received, their 
assignment to the extent of the variable capital. They cannot 
return a groat more than that; and if they are in a position to 
save in order to make themselves independent as small entre- 
preneurs, they may even return less, though this is the exception. 

132 



ANALYSIS OF ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

Part of the surplus value is consumed by the capitalist class 
itself in form of consumer goods, the money exchanged for these 
being retained in the capitalists' pockets. But who can buy the 
products incorporating the other, the capitalised part of the 
surplus value? Partly the capitalists themselves — the diagram 
answers — who need new means of production for the purpose 
of expanding production, and partly the new workers who will 
be needed to work these new means of production. But that 
implies a previous capitalist incentive to enlarge production; if 
new workers are set to work with new means of production, 
there must have been a new demand for the products which are 
to be turned out. 

Perhaps the answer is that the natural increase of the popula- 
tion creates this growing demand. In fact, the growth of the 
population and its needs provided the starting point for our 
examination of enlarged reproduction in an hypothetical 
socialist society. There the requirements of society could serve 
as an adequate basis, since the only purpose of production was 
the satisfaction of wants. In a capitalist society, however, the 
matter is rather different. What kind of people are we thinking 
of when we speak of an increase in the population? There are 
only two classes of the population according to Marx's diagram, 
the capitalists and the workers. The natural increase of the 
former is already catered for by that part of the surplus value 
which is consumed inasmuch as it increases in absolute quantity. 
In any case, it cannot be the capitalists who consume the re- 
mainder, since capitalist consumption of the entire surplus value 
would mean a reversion to simple reproduction. That leaves the 
workers, their class also growing by natural increase. Yet a 
capitalist economy is not interested in this increase for its own 
sake, as a starting point of growing needs. 

The production of consumer goods for Iv and llv is not an 
end in itself, as it would be in a society where the economic 
system is shaped for the workers and the satisfaction of their 
wants. In a capitalist system, Department II does not produce 
means of consumption in large quantities simply to keep the 
workers of Departments I and IL Quite the contrary: a certain 
number of workers in Departments I and II can support them- 
selves in every case because their labour power is useful under 
the obtaining conditions of supply and demand. This means 

133 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

that the starting point of capitalist production is not a given 
number of workers and their demands, but that these factors 
themselves are constantly fluctuating, 'dependent variables' of 
the capitalist expectations of profit. The question is therefore 
whether the natural increase of the working class also entails a 
growing effective demand over and above the variable capital. 
And that is quite impossible. The only source of money for the 
working class in our diagram is the variable capital which must 
therefore provide in advance for the natural increase of the 
workers. One way or the other: either the older generation must 
earn enough to keep their oflfspring — who cannot, then, count 
as additional consumers; or, failing that, the next generation, 
the young workers, must turn to work in order to obtain wages 
and means of subsistence for themselves — in which case the new 
working generation is already included in the number of 
workers employed. On this count, the process of accumulation 
in Marx's diagram cannot be explained by the natural increase 
of the population. 

But wait! Even under the sway of capitalism, society does not 
consist exclusively of capitalists and wage labourers. Apart from 
these two classes, there are a host of other people: the land- 
owners, the salaried employees, the liberal professions such as 
doctors, lawyers, artists and scientists. Moreover, there is the 
Church and its servants, the Clergy, and finally the State with its 
officials and armed forces. All these strata of the population can 
be counted, strictly speaking, neither among the capitalist nor 
among the working class. Yet society has to feed and support 
them. Perhaps it is they, these strata apart from the capitalists 
and wage labourers, who call forth enlarged reproduction by 
their demand. But this seeming solution cannot stand up to a 
closer scrutiny. The landowners must as consumers of rent, i.e. 
of part of the surplus value, quite obviously be numbered among 
the capitalist class; since we are here concerned with the surplus 
value in its undivided, primary form, their consumption is 
already allowed for in the consumption of the capitalist class. 
The liberal professions in most cases obtain their money, i.e. the 
assignment to part of the social product, directly or indirectly 
from the capitalist class who pay them with bits of their own 
surplus value. And the same applies to the Clergy, with the 
difference only that its members also obtain their purchasing 

134 



ANALYSIS OF ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

power in part from the workers, i.e. from wages. The upkeep of 
the State, lastly, with its officers and armed forces is borne by the 
rates and taxes, which arc in their turn levied upon either the 
surplus value or the wages. Within the limits of Marx's diagram 
there are in fact only the two sources of income in a society: the 
labourers' wages and the surplus value. All the strata of the 
population we have mentioned as apart from the capitalists and 
the workers, are thus to be taken only for joint consumers of 
these two kinds of income. Marx himself rejects any suggestion 
that these 'third persons' are more than a subterfuge: 

'All members of society not directly engaged in reproduction, 
with or without labour, can obtain their share of the annual 
produce of commodities — in other words, their articles of con- 
sumption . . . only out of the hands of those classes who are the 
first to handle the product, that is to say, productive labourers, 
industrial capitalists, and real estate owners. To that extent their 
revenues are substantially derived from wages (of the produc- 
tive labourers), profit and ground rent, and appear as indirect 
derivations when compared to these primary sources of revenue. 
But, on the other hand, the recipients of these revenues, thus 
indirectly derived, draw them by grace of their social functions, 
for instance that of a king, priest, professor, prostitute, soldier, 
etc., and they may regard these functions as the primary sources 
of their revenue.'^ 

And about the consumers of interest and ground rent as 
buyers, Marx says: 'Now, if that portion of the surplus-value of 
commodities, which the industrial capitalist yields in the form 
of ground rent or interest to other shareholders in the surplus- 
value, cannot be in the long run converted into money by the 
sale of the commodities, then there is an end to the payment of 
rent and interest, and the landowners or recipients of interest 
can no longer serve in the role of miraculous interlopers, who 
convert aliquot portions of the annual reproduction into money 
by spending their revenue. The same is true of the expenditure 
of all so-called unproductive labourers. State officials, physicians, 
lawyers, etc., and others who serve economists as an excuse 
for explaining inexplicable things, in the role of the 'general 
public'. 2 

Seeing that we cannot discover within capitalist society any 
^ Capital, vol. ii, p. 429. 2 ibid., pp. 531-2. 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

buyers whatever for the commodities in which the accumulated 
part of the surplus value is embodied, only one thing is left: 
foreign trade. But there are a great many objections to a method 
that conceives of foreign trade as a convenient dumping ground 
for commodities which cannot be found any proper place in the 
reproductive process. Recourse to foreign trade really begs 
the question: the difficulties implicit in the analysis are simply 
shifted — quite unresolved — from one country to another. Yet if 
the analysis of the reproductive process actually intends not any 
single capitalist country but the capitalist world market, there 
can be no foreign trade: all countries are 'home'. This point is 
made by Marx already in the first volume oi Capital, in connec- 
tion with accumulation: 

'We here take no account of export trade, by means of which 
a nation can change articles of luxury either into means of pro- 
duction or means of subsistence, and vice versa. In order to 
examine the object of our investigation in its integrity, free from 
all disturbing subsidiary circumstances, we must treat the whole 
world as one nation and assume that capitalist production is 
everywhere established and has possessed itself of every branch 
of industry.'^ 

The same difficulty presents itself if we consider the matter 
from yet another aspect. In Marx's diagram of accumulation we 
assumed that the portion of the social surplus value intended 
for accumulation exists from the first in a natural form which 
demands it to be used for capitalisation. 

'In one word, surplus-value is convertible into capital solely 
because the surplus-product, whose value it is, already com- 
prises the material elements of new capital. '^ 

In the figures of our diagram: 

I. 5,oooc4-i,oooz'+ij00oj=7,ooo means of production 
II. i,430c+ 2852;+ 285^=2,000 means of consumption 

Here, a surplus value of 570^^ can be capitalised because from 
the very outset it consists in means of production. To this 
quantity of producer goods there correspond besides additional 
consumer goods to the amount of 114J so that 684J can be 
capitalised in all. But the process here assumed of simply trans- 

^ Op. cit., vol. i, p. 594, note i. ^ Ibid., p. 594. 

136 



ANALYSIS OF ENLARGED REPRODUCTION 

ferring means of production to constant capital on the one hand, 
consumer goods to variable capital on the other, in commen- 
surate quantities, is in contradiction with the very structure of 
capitalist commodity production. Whatever natural form the 
surplus value may have, there can be no immediate transfer to 
the place of production for the purpose of accumulation. It must 
first be realised, it must be turned into hard cash.^ 

Of the surplus value in Department I, 500 are fit to be capit- 
alised, but not until they have first been realised; the surplus 
value has to shed its natural form and assume the form of pure 
value before it can be added to productive capital. This is true 
for each individual capitalist and also for the 'aggregate capit- 
alist' of society, it being a prime condition for capitalist produc- 
tion that the surplus value must be realised in the form of pure 
value. Accordingly, regarding reproduction from the point of 
view of society as a whole — 

'We must not follow the manner copied by Proudhon from 
bourgeois economy, which looks upon this matter as though a 
society with a capitalist mode of production would lose its 
specific historical and economic characteristics by being taken 
as a unit. Not at all. We have, in that case, to deal with the 
aggregate capitalist.'^ 

The surplus value must therefore shed its form as surplus pro- 
duct before it can re-assume it for the purpose of accumulation; 
by some means or other it must first pass through the money 
stage. So the surplus product of Departments I and II must be 
bought — by whom? On the above showing, there will have to 
be an effective demand outside I and II, merely in order to 
realise the surplus value of the two departments, just so that the 
surplus product can be turned to cash. Even then, we should 
only have got to the stage where the surplus value has become 
money. If this realised surplus value is further to be employed in 
the process of enlarging reproduction, in accumulation, an even 
larger demand must be expected for the future, a demand which 
is again to come from outside the two departments. Either the 

^ Here we can leave out of account instances of products capable in part 
of entering the process of production without any exchange, such as coal in 
the mines. Within capitalist production as a whole such cases are rare 
(cf. Marx, Theorien . . ., vol. ii, part 2, pp. 255 ff.). 

2 Capital, vol. ii, p. 503. 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

demand for the surplus product will therefore have to increase 
annually in accordance with the rate of increase of the accumu- 
lated surplus value, or — vice versa — accumulation can only pro- 
ceed precisely in so far as the demand outside I and II is 
rising. 



138 



CHAPTER VIII 

MARX'S ATTEMPT 
TO RESOLVE THE DIFFICULTY 

COMPLETE abstraction from the circulation of money, 
though making the process of accumulation so smooth 
and simple in the diagram of enlarged reproduction, has 
great disadvantages of its own, we see. There was much to be 
said for this method in the analysis of simple reproduction, 
where consumption is the be-all and end-all of production. 
Money there had an ephemeral part, mediating the distribution 
of the social product among the various groups of consumers — 
the agent for the renewal of capital. In the process of accumu- 
lation, however, the money form has an essential function: it no 
longer serves as a mere agent in the circulation of commodities 
— here it has come to be a feature of capital itself, an element in 
the circulation of capital. Even if the transformation of the 
surplus value is not essential to real reproduction, it is the 
economic sinequanon of capitalist accumulation. In the transition 
from production to reproduction, the surplus product is thus 
subjected to two metamorphoses: first it casts off its use-form 
and then it assumes a natural form which is fit for the purpose 
of accumulation. The point here is not that the different cycles 
of production are counted off in units of years. It would be just 
as well to take the month; for that matter, the successive trans- 
formation of individual portions of the surplus value in Depart- 
ments I and II may even intersect in time. Series of years here 
do not mean units of time but really intend the sequence of 
economic transformations. What matters is that this sequence 
must be observed if accumulation is to keep its capitalist char- 
acter, whether it extends over a longer or a shorter period of 
time. This brings us back to the old question: How, and by 
whom, is the accumulated surplus value to be realised? 

Marx was well aware that his seemingly water-tight scheme 
of accumulation did not cover this point adequately, and he 

139 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

himself kept reviewing the problem from various angles. What 
he says is this: 

'It has been shown in volume i, how accumulation works in 
the case of the individual capitalist. By the conversion of the 
commodity-capital into money, the surplus-product, in which 
the surplus-value is incorporated, is also monetised. The capit- 
alist reconverts the surplus-value thus monetised into additional 
natural elements of his productive capital. In the next cycle of 
production the increased capital furnishes an increased product. 
But what happens in the case of the individual capital, must 
also show in the annual reproduction of society as a whole, just 
as we have seen it does in the case of reproduction on a simple 
scale, where the successive precipitation of the depreciated 
elements of fixed capital in the form of money, accumulated as 
a hoard, also makes itself felt in the annual reproduction of 
society.'^ 

He examines the mechanism of accumulation further from 
this very point of view, focusing on the fact that surplus value 
must pass through the money stage before it is accumulated. 

'For instance, capitalist A, who sells during one year, or 
during a number of successive years, certain quantities of com- 
modities produced by him, thereby converts that portion of the 
commodities, which bears surplus-value, the surplus-product, 
or, in other words, the surplus-value produced by himself, 
successively into money, accumulates it gradually, and thus 
makes for himself a new potential money-capital. It is potential 
money-capital on account of its capacity and destination of 
being converted into the elements of productive capital. But 
practically he merely accumulates a simple hoard, which is not 
an element of actual production. His activity for the time being 
consists only in withdrawing circulating money out of circula- 
tion. Of course, it is not impossible that the circulating money 
thus laid away by him was itself, before it entered into circula- 
tion, a portion of some other hoard.' ^ 'Money is withdrawn 
from circulation and accumulated as a hoard by the sale of com- 
modities without a subsequent purchase. If this operation is 
conceived as one taking place universally, then it seems inexplic- 
able where the buyers are to come from, since in that case 
everybody would want to sell in order to hoard, and no one 

^ Capital, vol, ii, p. 571. - Ibid., p. 572. 

140 



MARX'S ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE THE DIFFICULTY 

would want to buy. And it must be so conceived, since every 
individual capital may be in process of accumulation. 

'If we were to conceive of the process of circulation as one 
taking place in a straight line between the various divisions of 
annual reproduction — which would be incorrect as it consists 
with a few exceptions of mutually retroactive movements — then 
we should have to start out from the producer of gold (or silver) 
who buys without selling, and to assume that all others sell to 
him. In that case, the entire social surplus-product of the 
current year would pass into his hands, representing the entire 
surplus-value of the year, and all the other capitalists would 
distribute among themselves their relative shares in his surplus- 
product, which consists naturally of money, gold being the 
natural form of his surplus- value. For that portion of the product 
of the gold producer, which has to make good his active capital, 
is already tied up and disposed of The surplus-value of the gold 
producer, in the form of gold, would then be the only fund from 
which all other capitalists would have to derive the material for 
the conversion of their annual surplus-product into gold. The 
magnitude of its value would then have to be equal to the entire 
annual surplus-value of society, which must first assume the 
guise of a hoard. Absurd as this assumption would be, it would 
accomplish nothing more than to explain the possibility of a 
universal formation of a hoard at the same period. It would not 
further reproduction itself, except on the part of the gold pro- 
ducer, one single step. 

'Before we solve this seeming difficulty, we must distinguish . . .'^ 
The obstacle in the way of realising the surplus value which 
Marx here calls a 'seeming difficulty' nevertheless is important 
enough for the whole further discussion in Capital, volume ii, 
to be concentrated on overcoming it. As a first attempt, Marx 
proffers the solution of a hoard which, owing to the separation 
of the different individual constant capitals in the process of 
circulation, will inevitably be formed in a capitalist system of 
production. Inasmuch as different capital investments have 
different spans of life, and there is always an interval before the 
parts of a plant are due for renewal, at any given moment we 
may find that one individual capitalist is already busy renewing 
his plant, while another is still building up reserves from the 

1 Ibid., pp. 573-4. 
141 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

proceeds yielded by the sale of his commodities against the day 
when he will have enough to renew his fixed capital. 

'For instance, let A sell 600, representing 400^ + 100^ + 100^ 
to B, who may represent more than one buyer. A sells 600 in 
commodities for 600 in money, of which 100 are surplus-value 
which he withdraws from circulation and hoards in the form of 
money. But these 100 in money are but the money-form of the 
surplus-product in which a value of 100 was incorporated.'^ 

In order to comprehend the problem in complete purity, 
Marx here assumes the whole of the surplus value to be capit- 
alised, for which reason he ignores altogether that part of the 
surplus value is used for the capitalists' personal consumption; 
in addition. A', A" and A'" as well as B', B" and B'" here 
belong to Department L 

'The formation of a hoard, then, is not a production, nor is it 
an increment of production. The action of the capitalist consists 
merely in withdrawing from circulation 100 obtained by the 
sale of his surplus-product, in holding and hoarding this amount. 
This operation is carried on, not alone on the part of A, but at 
numerous points of the periphery of circulation by other capit- 
alists named A', A", A'" . . . However, A accomplishes the 
formation of a hoard only to the extent that he acts as a seller, 
so far as his surplus-product is concerned, not as a buyer. His 
successive production of surplus-products, the bearers of his 
surplus-value convertible into money, is therefore a premise for 
the formation of his hoard. In the present case, where we are 
dealing only with the circulation within Department I, the 
natural form of the surplus-product, and of the total product of 
which it is a part, is that of an element of constant capital of I, 
that is to say it belongs to the category of a means of production 
creating means of production. We shall see presently what 
becomes of it, what function it performs, in the hands of the 
buyers such as B, B', B", etc. 

'It must particularly be noted at this point that A, while 
withdrawing money from circulation and hoarding it, on the 
other hand throws commodities into it without withdrawing 
other commodities in return. The capitalists, B, B', B", etc., are 
thereby enabled to throw only money into it and withdraw only 
commodities from it. In the present case, these commodities, 
^ Capital, vol. ii, p. 375. 
142 



MARX'S ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE THE DIFFICULTY 

according to their natural form and destination, become a fixed 
or circulating element of the constant capital of B, B', etc.'^ 

There is nothing new about this whole process. Marx had 
already described it extensively in connection with simple re- 
production, since it alone can explain how a society is able to 
renew constant capital under conditions of capitalist reproduc- 
tion. How this process can lay the besetting problem of our 
analysis of enlarged reproduction is far from self-evident. The 
difficulty had been that for the purpose of accumulation, part 
of the surplus value is not consumed by the capitalists but added 
to capital in order to expand production, giving rise to the 
question of buyers for this additional product. The capitalists do 
not want to consume it and the workers are not able to do so, 
their entire consumption being covered in every case by the 
available variable capital. Whence the demand for the accumu- 
lated surplus value? or, as Marx would have it: Whence the 
money to pay for the accumulated surplus value? 

If, by way of answer, we are referred to the process of hoard- 
ing attendant upon the gradual renewal of the constant capital 
by the individual capitalists at various times, the connection 
between these two points remains obscure. As long as B, B' and 
B", etc., buy producer goods from their colleagues A, A' and 
A" in order to renew their constant capital that has in fact been 
used up, the limits of simple reproduction are not transcended, 
and the whole thing has nothing to do with our problem. The 
moment the producer goods purchased by B, B', B", etc., serve 
to increase their constant capital, however, for purposes of 
accumulation, a number of new questions clamour for atten- 
tion. First and foremost where do the B's get the cash to buy an 
additional product from the A's? The only way they could have 
made their money is by sale of their own surplus product. 
Before they can acquire new means of production for expanding 
their enterprises, before they appear as buyers, that is to say, of 
the surplus product that is to be accumulated, they must first 
have disposed of their own surplus product — in a word, B, B', 
B", etc., must have been vendors themselves. But who could 
have bought their surplus product? It is obvious that the diffi- 
culty is simply shifted from the A's to the B's without having 
been mastered. 

1 Ibid., pp. 575-6. 
143 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

At one stage of the analysis it really does seem for a time as if 
a solution were found at last. After a short digression, Marx 
returns to the main line of his investigation in the following 
words: 

'In the present case, this surplus-product consists at the outset 
of means of production used in the creation of means of pro- 
duction. It is not until it reaches the hands of B, B', B", etc., 
(I), that this surplus-product serves as an additional constant 
capital. But it is virtually that even in the hands of the accumu- 
lators of hoards, the capitalists A, A', A", (I), before it is sold. 
If we consider merely the volume of values of the reproduction 
on the part of I, then we are still moving within the limits of 
simple reproduction, for no additional capital has been set in 
motion for the purpose of creating this virtual additional 
capital (the surplus-product), nor has any greater amount of 
surplus-labour been performed than that done on the basis of 
simple reproduction. The difference is here only one of the form 
of the surplus-labour performed, of the concrete nature of its 
particularly useful service. It is expended in means of produc- 
tion for Department Ic instead of lie, in means of production of 
means of production instead of means of production of articles 
of consumption. In the case of simple reproduction it had been 
assumed that the entire surplus-value was spent as revenue in 
the commodities of II. Hence it consisted only of such means of 
production as restore the constant capital of lie in its natural 
form. In order that the transition from simple to expanded re- 
production may take place, the production in Department I 
must be enabled to create fewer elements for the constant capital 
of II and more for that of I. . . . Considering the matter merely 
from the point of view of the volume of values, it follows, then, 
that the material requirements of expanded reproduction are 
produced within simple reproduction. It is simply a question of 
the expenditure of the surplus-labour of the working class of I 
for the production of means of production, the creation of 
virtual additional capital of I. The virtual additional money- 
capital, created on the part of A, A', A", by the successive sale 
of their surplus-product, which was formed without any capit- 
alist expenditure of money, is in this case simply the money- 
form of the additional means of production made by I.'^ 
* Capital, vol. ii, pp. 579-81. 
144 



MARX'S ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE THE DIFFICULTY 

On this interpretation, the difficulty seems to dissolve into 
thin air at our touch. Accumulation requires no new sources of 
money at all. Before, when the capitalists themselves consumed 
their surplus value, they had to have a corresponding money 
reserve in hand, the analysis of simple reproduction already 
having proved that the capitalist class must itself put into circu- 
lation the money needed for the realisation of their surplus 
value. Now, instead of consumer goods, the capitalist class, or 
rather B, B', and B", buy an equivalent amount of means of 
production in order to expand their production. In this way, 
money to the same value is accumulated in the hands of the 
other capitalist group, viz. A, A', A", etc. 

'This hoarding . . . does not in any way imply an addition 
to the wealth in precious metals, but only a change of function 
on the part of money previously circulating. A while ago it 
served as a medium of circulation, now it serves as a hoard, as 
a virtual additional money-capital in process of formation.'^ 

And that is that! Yet this way out of the difficulty is open to us 
only on one condition, and that is not far to seek: Marx here 
takes accumulation in its first rudiments, in statu nascendi, as it 
begins to evolve from simple reproduction. In respect of the 
amount of value, production is not yet enlarged, it has only been 
rearranged so that its material elements are grouped in a differ- 
ent way. That the sources of money also seem adequate is 
therefore not surprising. This solution, however, is only true for 
one specific moment, the period of transition from simple repro- 
duction to enlarged reproduction — in short, a moment that has 
no reference to reality and can only be conceived speculatively. 
Once accumulation has been established for some time, when 
increasing amounts of value are thrown upon the market in 
every period of production, buyers for these additional values 
cannot fail to become a problem. And on this point the prof- 
fered solution breaks down. For that matter, it was never more 
than a seeming solution, not a real one. On closer scrutiny, it fails 
us even at the precise instant it appears to have smoothed the 
way for us. For if we take accumulation just at the very moment 
of its emergence from simple reproduction, the prime condition 
it demands is a decrease in the consumption of the capitalist 
class. No sooner have we discovered a way to expand reproduc- 

1 Ibid., p. 581. 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

tion with the means of circulation already at hand, than we 
find previous consumers trickling away at the same rate. What, 
then, is the good of expanding production; who is there able to 
buy from B, B' and B" this increased amount of products which 
they could turn out only by denying themselves the money they 
need for buying new means of production from A, A' and A"? 

That solution, we see, was a mere illusion — the difficulty still 
persists. Marx himself at once re-opens the question where B, 
B' and B" get the money to buy the surplus product of A, A' 
and A". 

'To the extent that the products created by B, B', B", etc., 
(I) re-enter in their natural form into their own process, it goes 
without saying that a corresponding portion of their own 
surplus-product is transferred directly (without any interven- 
tion of circulation) to their productive capital and becomes an 
element of additional constant capital. To the same extent they 
do not help to convert any surplus-product of A, A', A", etc., 
(I) into money. Aside from this, where does the money come 
from? We know that they have formed their hoard in the same 
way as A, A', etc., by the sale of their respective surplus- 
products. Now they have arrived at the point where their 
accumulated hoard of virtual money-capital is to enter effectu- 
ally upon its function as additional money-capital. But this is 
merely turning around in a circle. The question still remains: 
Where does the money come from, which the various B's (I) 
withdrew from the circulation and accumulated?'^ 

His prompt reply again seems surprisingly simple: 'Now we 
know from the analysis of simple reproduction, that the capit- 
alists of I and II must have a certain amount of ready money 
in their hands, in order to be able to dispose of their surplus- 
products. In that case, the money which served only for the 
spending of revenue in articles of consumption returned to the 
capitalists in the same measure in which they advanced it for 
the purpose of disposing of their commodities. Here the same 
money reappears, but in a different function. The A's and B's 
supply one another alternately with the money for converting 
their surplus-product into virtual additional capital, and throw 
the newly formed money-capital alternately into circulation as 
a medium of purchase.'^ 

^ Capital, vol. il, pp. 583-4. ^ Ibid., p. 584. 

146 



MARX'S ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE THE DIFFICULTY 

That is harking back to simple reproduction all over again. It 
is quite true, of course, that the capitalists A and the capitaHsts 
B are constantly accumulating a hoard of money bit by bit so as 
to be able to renew their constant (fixed) capital from time to 
time, and in this way they really are assisting one another in 
realising their products. Yet this accumulating hoard does not 
drop from the clouds — it is simply a natural precipitation of the 
fixed capital that is (in terms of value) continually being trans- 
ferred in instalments to the products which are then one by one 
realised in the process of sale. Owing to its very nature, the 
accumulated hoard can only cover the renewal of the old 
capital; there cannot possibly be enough to serve further for 
purchasing additional constant capital. That means that we are 
still within the limits of simple reproduction. Perhaps, though, 
that part of the medium of circulation which hitherto served 
the capitalists for their personal consumption, and is now to be 
capitalised, becomes a new source of additional money? For that 
to be true, however, we should have to be back at the unique 
and fleeting moment that has no more than theoretical existence 
— the period of transition from simple to enlarged reproduction. 
Beyond this gap accumulation cannot proceed — we are in ti\ith 
going round in circles. 

So the capitalist hoarding will not do as a way out of our 
difficulties. This conclusion should not come as a surprise, since 
the very exposition of the difficulty was misleading. It is not the 
source of money that constitutes the problem of accumulation, 
but the source of the demand for the additional goods produced 
by the capitalised surplus value; not a technical hitch in the 
circulation of money but an economic problem pertaining to 
the reproduction of the total social capital. Quite apart from 
the question which had claimed Marx's entire attention so far, 
namely where B, B', etc., (I), get the money to buy additional 
means of production from A, A', etc., (I), successful accumu- 
lation will inevitably have to face a far more serious problem: 
to whom can B, B', etc., now sell their increased surplus 
product? Marx finally makes them sell their products to one 
another: 

Tt may be that the different B, B', B", etc., (I), whose virtual 
new capital enters upon its active function, are compelled to 
buy from one another their product (portions of their surplus- 

147 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

product) or to sell it to one another. In that case, the money 
advanced by them for the circulation of their surplus-product 
flows back under normal conditions to the different B's in the 
same proportion in which they advanced it for the circulation 
of their respective commodities.'^ 

'In that case' — the problem simply has not been solved, for 
after all B, B', and B" have not cut down on their consumption 
and expanded their production just so as to buy each other's 
increased product, i.e. means of production. Eventhat, incident- 
ally, would only be possible to a very limited extent. Marx 
assumes a certain division of labour in Department I itself: the 
A's turn out means of production for making producer goods 
and the B's means of production for making consumer goods, 
which is as much as to say that, though the product of A, A', 
etc., need never leave Department I, the product of B, B', etc., 
is by its natural form predestined from the first for Depart- 
ment II. Already the accumulation of B, B', etc., it follows, must 
lead us to circulation between Departments I and II. Thus 
Marx's analysis itself confirms that, if Department I is to 
accumulate, the department for means of consumption must, in 
the last resort, increase its immediate or mediate demand for 
means of production, and so it is to Department II and its 
capitalists that we must look for buyers for the additional pro- 
duct turned out by Department I. 

Sure enough, Marx's second attack on the problem takes up 
from there: the demand of capitalists in Department II for 
additional means of production. Such a demand inevitably 
implies that the constant capital lie is in process of expanding. 
This is where the difficulty becomes truly formidable: 

'Take it now that A(I) converts his surplus-product into gold 
by selling it to a capitalist B in Department II. This can be done 
only by the sale of means of production on the part of A (I) to 
B(II) without a subsequent purchase of articles of consumption, 
in other words, only by a one-sided sale on A's part. Now we 
have seen that lie cannot be converted into the natural form of 
productive constant capital unless not only Iv but also at least 
a portion of Ij-, is exchanged for a portion of lie, which lie exists 
in the form of articles of consumption. But now that A has 
converted his Is into gold by making this exchange impossible 

^ Capital, vol. ii, p. 585. 
148 



MARX'S ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE THE DIFFICULTY 

and withdrawing the money obtained from lie out of circula- 
tion, instead of spending it for articles of consumption of lie, 
there is indeed on the part of A(I) a formation of additional 
virtual money-capital, but on the other hand there is a corres- 
ponding portion of the value of the constant capital B(II) held 
in the form of commodity-capital, unable to transform itself 
into natural productive constant capital. In other words, a 
portion of the commodities of B(II), and at that a portion 
which must be sold if he wishes to reconvert his entire constant 
capital into its productive form, has become unsaleable. To that 
extent, there is an overproduction which clogs reproduction, 
even on the same scale. '^ 

Department I's efforts to accumulate by selling its additional 
product to Department 1 1 have met with an unlooked-for result: 
a deficit for the capitalists of Department II serious enough to 
prevent even simple reproduction on the old scale. 

Having got to this crucial point, Marx seeks to lay bare the 
root of the problem by a careful and detailed exposition: 

'Let us now take a closer look at the accumulation in Depart- 
ment II. The first difficulty with reference to lie, that is 
to say the conversion of an element of the commodity-capital 
of II into the natural form of constant capital of II, concerns 
simple reproduction. Let us take the formula previously used. 
(i,oooy + i,oooj') I are exchanged for 2,000 lie. Now, if one half 
of the surplus-product of I, or ^oos, is reincorporated in Depart- 
ment I as constant capital, then this portion, being detained 
in Department I, cannot take the place of any portion of lie. 
Instead of being converted into articles of consumption, it is 
made to serve as an additional means of production in Depart- 
ment I itself. ... It cannot perform this function simultaneously 
in I and II. The capitalist cannot spend the value of his surplus- 
product for articles of consumption, and at the same time 
consume the surplus-product itself productively, by incorporat- 
ing it in his productive capital. Instead of 2,000 I {v-\-s), only 
1,500 are exchangeable for 2,000 lie, namely i,oooy+500J'of I. 
But 500 Ic cannot be reconverted from the form of commodities 
into productive constant capital of 11.'^ 

By now, hardly anybody could fail to be convinced that the 
difficulty is real, but we have not taJcen a single step nearer a 
1 Ibid., pp. 586-7. 2 Ibid., pp. 588-9. 

149 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

solution. This, incidentally, is where Marx has to do penance 
for his ill-advised continual recourse in an earlier over-simpli- 
fication, to a fictitious moment of transition — in order to eluci- 
date the problem of accumulation — from simple reproduction 
to enlarged reproduction, making his major premise accumula- 
tion at its very inception, in its feeble infancy instead of its 
vigorous stride. There was something to be said, at least, for this 
fiction, so long as it was just a question of accumulation within 
Department I. The capitalists of Department I, who denied 
themselves part of what they had been wont to consume, at once 
had a new hoard of money in hand with which they could start 
capitalisation. But when it comes to Department II, the same 
fiction only piles on the difficulties. The 'abstinence' of the 
capitalists in Department I here finds expression in a painful 
loss of consumers for whose expected demand production had 
largely been calculated. Since the capitalists of Department II, 
on whom we tried the experiment whether they might not 
possibly be the long-sought buyers of the additional product of 
accumulation in Department I, are themselves in sore straits — 
not knowing as yet where to go with their own unsold product — 
they are even less likely to be of any help to us. There is no 
shutting our eyes to the fact that an attempt to make one group 
of capitalists accumulate at the expense of the other is bound to 
get involved in glaring inconsistencies. 

Yet another attempt to get round the difficulty is sub- 
sequently mentioned by Marx who at once rejects it as a subter- 
fuge. The unmarketable surplus value in Department II that is 
the result of accumulation in Department I might be considered 
a reserve of commodities the society is going to need in the 
course of the following year. This interpretation Marx counters 
with his usual thoroughness: 

'(i) . . . the forming of such supplies and the necessity for it 
applies to all capitalists, those of I as well as of II. Considering 
them in their capacity as sellers of commodities, they differ only 
by the fact that they sell different kinds of commodities. A 
supply of commodities of II implies a previous supply of com- 
modities of I. If we neglect this supply on the one side, we must 
also do so on the other. But if we count them in on both sides, 
the problem is not altered in any way. (2) Just as this year closes 
on the side of II with a supply of commodities for the next year, 

150 



MARX'S ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE THE DIFFICULTY 

SO it was opened by a supply of commodities on the same side, 
taken over from last year. In the analysis of annual reproduc- 
tion, reduced to its abstract form, wc must therefore strike it out 
at both ends. By leaving this year in possession of its entire 
production, including the supply held for next year, we take 
from it the supply of commodities transferred from last year, and 
thus we have actually to deal with the aggregate product of an 
average year as the object of our analysis. (3) The simple 
circumstance that the difficulty which must be overcome did 
not show itself in the analysis of simple reproduction proves that 
it is a specific phenomenon due merely to the different arrange- 
ment of the elements of Department I with a view to repro- 
duction, an arrangement without which reproduction on an 
expanded scale cannot take place at all.'^ 

The last remark, be it noted, is equally damaging to his own 
earlier attempt at resolving the specific difficulties of accumu- 
lation by moments pertaining to simple reproduction, viz. the 
formation of a hoard consequent upon the gradual turnover of 
the fixed capital in the hands of the capitalists which was pre- 
viously adduced as the explanation of accumulation in Depart- 
ment I. 

Marx then proceeds to set out enlarged reproduction in the 
form of diagrams. But no sooner does he begin to analyse his 
diagram, than the same difficulty crops up anew in a slightly 
different guise. Assuming that the capitalists of Department II 
must for their part convert 140^' into constant capital so as to 
make accumulation possible for the others, he asks: 

'Therefore Department II must buy 140J for cash without 
recovering this money by a subsequent sale of its commodities to 
I. And this is a process which is continually repeated in every 
new annual production, so far as it is reproduction on an 
enlarged scale. Where does II get the money for this?'- 

In the following, Marx tries out various approaches in order 
to discover this source. First the expenditure on variable capital 
by the capitalists in Department II is closely scrutinised. True, 
it exists in the form of money; but its proper function is the 
purchase of labour power, and it cannot possibly be withdrawn 
and made to serve, maybe, for purchasing additional means of 
production. 

^ Capital, vol. ii, pp. 590-1. 2 ibid., p. 593. 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

'This continually repeated departure from and return to the 
starting point, the pocket of the capitalist, does not add in any 
way to the money moving in this cycle. This, then, is not a 
source of the accumulation of money. '^ 

Marx then considers all conceivable dodges, only to show 
them up as evading the issue. 

'But stop!' he exclaims. 'Isn't there a chance to make a little 
profit? '1 

He considers whether the capitalists could not manage to save 
a little of the variable capital by depressing the wages of the 
workers below the normal average and thus to tap a new source 
of money for accumulation. A mere flick of his fingers, of course, 
disposes of this notion: 

'But it must not be forgotten that the wages actually paid 
(which determine the magnitude of the variable capital under 
normal conditions) do not depend on the benevolence of 
the capitalists, but must be paid under certain conditions. 
This does away with this expedient as a source of additional 
money.'^ 

He even explores what hidden methods there may be of 
'saving' on the variable capital, such as the truck system, frauds, 
etc., only to comment finally: 'This is the same operation as 
under ( i ), only disguised and carried out by a detour. Therefore 
it must likewise be rejected as an explanation of the present 
problem. '2 

All efforts to make the variable capital yield a new source of 
money for the purpose of accumulation are thus unrewarded: 
'In short, we cannot accomplish anything with 376 llv for the 
solution of this question.'^ 

Marx next turns to the cash reserves which the capitalists in 
Department II keep for the circulation of their own consump- 
tion and investigates whether none of this money can be diverted 
to the purposes of capitalisation. Yet this, he allows, is 'still 
more impossible'. 

'Here the capitalists of the same department are standing face 
to face, heavily buying and selling their articles of consumption. 
The money required for these transactions serves only as a 
medium of circulation and must flow back to the interested 
parties in the normal course of things, to the extent that they 
1 Capital, vol. ii, p. 594. ^ Ibid., p. 595. 



MARX'S ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE THE DIFFICULTY 

have advanced it to the circulation, in order to pass again and 
again over the same course.'^ 

The next attempt to follow belongs, as was to have been 
expected, to the category of those 'subterfuges' which Marx 
ruthlessly refutes: the attempt to explain that money-capital can 
be formed in the hands of one capitalist group in Department II 
by defrauding the other capitalists within the same department 
— viz. in the process of the mutual selling of consumer goods. No 
time need be wasted on this little effort. 

Then comes a more sober proposition: 'Or, a certain portion 
of IIj-, represented by necessities of life, might be directly con- 
verted into new variable capital of Department II. '^ 

It is not quite clear how this can help us over the hurdle, help 
to get accumulation going. For one thing, the formation of 
additional variable capital in Department II is not much use 
if we have no additional constant capital for this department, 
being in fact engaged on the task of finding it. For another 
thing, our present concern is to see if we can find in Depart- 
ment IIa source of money for the purchase of additional means 
of production from I, and Department II's problem how to 
place its own additional product in some way or other in the 
process of production is beside the point. Further, is the im- 
plication that the respective consumer goods should be used 
'direct', i.e. without the mediation of money, in the production 
of Department II, so that the corresponding amount of money 
can be diverted from variable capital to the purpose of accumu- 
lation? If so, we could not accept the solution. Under normal 
conditions of capitalist production, the remuneration of the 
workers by consumer goods direct is precluded, one of the 
corner-stones of capitalist economy being the money-form of the 
variable capital, the independent transaction between the 
worker as buyer of commodities and producer of consumer 
goods. Marx himself stresses this point in another context: 

'We know that the actual variable capital consists of labour- 
power, and therefore the additional must consist of the same 
thing. It is not the capitalist of I who among other things buys 
from II a supply of necessities of life for his labourers, or 
accumulates them for this purpose, as the slave holder had to do. 
It is the labourers themselves who trade with 11.'^ 

^ Ibid., p. 595. 2 Ibid., p. 596. ^ Ibid., p. 601. 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

And that goes for the capitaHsts of Department II just as 
much as for those of Department I, thus disposing of Marx's last 
effort. 

Marx ends up by referring us to the last part of Capital, 
volume ii, chapter 21, the 'Concluding Remarks sub iv\ as 
Engels has called them. Here we find the curt explanation: 

'The original source for the money of II is v-\-s of the gold 
producers in Department I, exchanged for a portion of \\c. 
Only to the extent that the gold producer accumulates surplus- 
value or converts it into means of production of I, in other 
words, to the extent that he expands his production, does his 
v+s stay out of Department II. On the other hand, to the 
extent that the accumulation of gold on the part of the gold 
producer himself leads ultimately to an expansion of produc- 
tion, a portion of the surplus-value of gold production not spent 
as revenue passes into Department II as additional variable 
capital of the gold producers, promotes the accumulation of 
new hoards in II and supplies it with means by which to buy 
from I without having to sell to it immediately.'^ 

After the breakdown of all conceivable attempts at explaining 
accumulation, therefore, after chasing from pillar to post, from 
A I to B I, and from B I to A II, we are made to fall back in the 
end on the very gold producer, recourse to whom Marx had at 
the outset of his analysis branded as 'absurd'. The analysis of 
the reproductive process, and the second volume of Capital 
finally comes to a close without having provided the long 
sought-for solution to our difficulty. 

^ Capital, vol. ii, p. 610. 



154 



CHAPTER IX 

THE DIFFICULTY VIEWED FROM THE 

ANGLE OF THE PROCESS OF 

CIRCULATION 

THE flaw in Marx's analysis is, in our opinion, the mis- 
guided formulation of the problem as a mere question of 
'the sources of money', whereas the real issue is the effec- 
tive demand, the use made of goods, not the source of the 
money which is paid for them. As to money as a means of circu- 
lation: when considering the reproductive process as a whole, 
we must assume that capitalist society must always dispose of 
money, or a substitute, in just that quantity that is needed for 
its process of circulation. What has to be explained is the great 
social transaction of exchange, caused by real economic needs. 
While it is important to remember that capitalist surplus value 
must invariably pass through the money stage before it can be 
accumulated, we must nevertheless try to track down the econ- 
omic demand for the surplus product, quite apart from the 
puzzle where the money comes from. As Marx himself says in 
another passage: 

'The money on one side in that case calls forth expanded re- 
production on the other, because the possibility for it exists 
without the money. For money in itself is not an element of 
actual reproduction.'^ 

And in a different context, Marx actually shows the question 
about the 'sources of money' to be a completely barren formu- 
lation of the problem of accumulation. 

In fact, he had come up against this difficulty once before 
when examining the process of circulation. Still dealing with 
simple reproduction, he had asked, in connection with the 
circulation of the surplus value: 

'But the commodity capital must be monetised before its 
conversion into productive capital, or before the surplus-value 
1 Capital, vol. ii, p. 572. 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

contained in it can be spent. Where does the money for this 
purpose come from? This question seems difficult at the first 
glance, and neither Tooke nor anyone else has answered it so 
far.'i 

And he was then quite uncompromising about getting to 
the root of the matter: 'The circulating capital of 500 p.st. 
advanced in the form of money-capital, whatever may be its 
period of turn-over, may now stand for the total capital of 
society, that is to say, of the capitalist class. Let the surplus- 
value be 100 p.st. How can the entire capitalist class manage to 
draw continually 600 p.st. out of the circulation, when they 
continually throw only 500 p.st. into it?'^ 

All that, mind you, refers to simple reproduction, where the 
entire surplus value is used for the personal consumption of the 
capitalist class. The question should therefore from the outset 
have been put more precisely in this form: how can the capit- 
alists secure for themselves consumer goods to the amount of 
;^ioo surplus value on top of putting ^^500 into circulation for 
constant and variable capital? It is immediately obvious that 
those ;^500 which, in form of capital, always serve to buy means 
of production and to pay the workers, cannot simultaneously 
defray the expense of the capitalists' personal consumption. 
Where, then, does the additional money come from? — the £100 
the capitalists need to realise their own surplus value? Thus all 
theoretical dodges one might devise for this point are summarily 
disposed of by Marx right away: 

'It should not be attempted to avoid this difficulty by 
plausible subterfuges. 

'For instance: So far as the constant circulating capital is 
concerned, it is obvious that not all invest it simultaneously. 
While the capitalist A sells his commodities so that his advanced 
capital assumes the form of money, there is on the other hand, 
the available money-capital of the buyer B which assumes the 
form of his means of production which A is just producing. The 
same transaction, which restores that of B to its productive 
form, transforms it from money into materials of production and 
labour-power; the same amount of money serves in the two- 
sided process as in every simple purchase C-M. On the other 
hand, when A reconverts his money into means of production, 
^ Capital, vol. ii, pp. 380-1. ^ Ibid., p. 381. 

156 



THE DIFFICULTY AS REGARDS CIRCULATION 

he buys from C, and this man pays B with it, etc., and thus the 
transaction would be explained. 

'But none of the laws referring to the quantity of the circulat- 
ing money, which have been analysed in the circulation of 
commodities (vol. i, chap, iii), are in any way changed by the 
capitalist character of the process of production. 

'Hence, when we have said that the circulating capital of 
society, to be advanced in the form of money, amounts to 
500 p. St., we have already accounted for the fact that this is on 
the one hand the sum simultaneously advanced, and that, on 
the other hand, it sets in motion more productive capital than 
500 p. St., because it serves alternately as the money fund of 
different productive capitals. This mode of explanation, then, 
assumes that money as existing whose existence it is called upon 
to explain. 

'It may be furthermore said: Capitalist A produces articles 
which capitalist B consumes unproductively, individually. The 
money of B therefore monetises the commodity-capital of A, 
and thus the same amount serves for the monetisation of the 
surplus-value of B and the circulating constant capital of A. But 
in that case, the solution of the question to be solved is still more 
directly assumed, the question: Whence does B get the money 
for the payment of his revenue? How does he himself monetise 
this surplus-portion of his product? 

'It might also be answered that that portion of the circulating 
variable capital, which A continually advances to his labourers, 
flows back to him continually from the circulation, and only an 
alternating part stays continually tied up for the payment of 
wages. But a certain time elapses between the expenditure and 
the reflux, and meanwhile the money paid out for wages might, 
among other uses, serve for the monetisation of surplus-value. 
But we know, in the first place, that, the greater the time, the 
greater must be the supply of money which the capitalist A 
must keep continually in reserve. In the second place, the 
labourer spends the money, buys commodities for it, and thus 
monetises to that extent the surplus-value contained in them. 
Without penetrating any further into the question at this point, 
it is sufficient to say that the consumption of the entire capitalist 
class, and of the unproductive persons dependent upon it, keeps 
step with that of the labouring class; so that, simultaneously 

157 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

with the money thrown into circulation by the labouring class, 
the capitahsts must throw money into it, in order to spend their 
surplus-value as revenue. Hence money must be withdrawn 
from circulation for it. This explanation would merely reduce 
the quantity of money required, but not do away with it. 

'Finally it might be said: A large amount of money is continu- 
ally thrown into circulation when fixed capital is first invested, 
and it is not recovered from the circulation until after the lapse 
of years, by him who threw it into circulation. May not this sum 
suflSce to monetise the surplus-value? The answer to this is that 
the employment as fixed capital, if not by him who threw it into 
circulation, then by some one else, is probably implied in the 
sum of 500 p. St. (which includes the formation of a hoard for 
needed reserve funds). Besides, it is already assumed in the 
amount expended for the purchase of products serving as fixed 
capital, that the surplus-value contained in them is also paid, 
and the question is precisely, where the money for this purpose 
came from.'^ 

This parting shot, by the way, is particularly noteworthy in 
that Marx here expressly repudiates the attempt to explain 
realisation of the surplus value, even in the case of simple repro- 
duction, by means of a hoard formed for the periodical renewal 
of fixed capital. Later on, with a view to realising the surplus 
value under the much more difficult conditions of accumulation, 
he makes more than one tentative effort to substantiate an 
explanation of this type which he himself dismissed as a 
'plausible subterfuge'. 

Then follows a solution which has a somewhat disconcerting 
ring: 'The general reply has already been given: When a mass 
of commodities valued at x times 1,000 p.st. has to circulate, it 
changes absolutely nothing in the quantity of the money re- 
quired for this circulation, whether this mass of commodities 
contains any surplus-value or not, and whether this mass of 
commodities has been produced capitalistically or not. In other 
words, the problem itself does not exist. All other conditions being 
given, such as velocity of circulation of money, etc., a definite 
sum of money is required in order to circulate the value of com- 
modities worth X times 1,000 p.st., quite independently of the 
fact how much or how little of this value falls to the share of the 

^ Capital, vol. ii, pp. 381-3. 



THE DIFFICULTY AS REGARDS CIRCULATION 

direct producers of these commodities. So far as any problem 
exists here, it coincides with the general problem: Where does 
all the money required for the circulation of the commodities 
of a certain country come from?'^ 

The argument is quite sound. The answer to the general 
question about the origin of the money for putting a certain 
quantity of commodities into circulation within a country will 
also tell us where the money for circulating the surplus value 
comes from. The division of the bulk of value contained in these 
commodities into constant and variable capital, and surplus 
value, does not exist from the angle of the circulation of money 
— in this connection, it is quite meaningless. But it is only from 
the angle of the circulation of money, or of a simple commodity 
circulation, that the problem has no existence. Under the aspect 
of social reproduction as a whole, it is very real indeed; but it 
should not, of course, be put in that misleading form that brings 
us back to simple commodity circulation, where it has no mean- 
ing. We should not ask, accordingly: Where does the money 
required for realising the surplus value come from? but: Where 
are the consumers for this surplus value? It is they, for sure, who 
must have this money in hand in order to throw it into circula- 
tion. Thus, Marx himself, although he just now denied the 
problem to exist, keeps coming back to it time and again: 

'Now, there are only two points of departure: The capitalist 
and the labourer. All third classes of persons must either receive 
money for their services from these two classes, or, to the extent 
that they receive it without any equivalent services, they are 
joint owners of the surplus-value in the form of rent, interest, 
etc. The fact that the surplus- value does not all stay in the pocket 
of the industrial capitalist, but must be shared by him with 
other persons, has nothing to do with the present question. The 
question is: How does he maintain his surplus- value, not, how 
does he divide the money later after he has secured it? For the 
present case, the capitalist may as well be regarded as the sole 
owner of his surplus-value. As for the labourer it has already 
been said that he is but the secondary point of departure, while 
the capitalist is the primary starting point of the money thrown 
by the labourer into circulation. The money first advanced as 
variable capital is going through its second circulation, when 

1 Ibid., p. 383. 
159 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

the labourer spends it for the payment of means of sub- 
sistence. 

'The capitahst class, then, remains the sole point of departure 
of the circulation of money. If they need 400 p.st. for the pay- 
ment of means of production, and 100 p.st. for the payment of 
labour-power, they throw 500 p.st. into circulation. But the 
surplus-value incorporated in the product, with a rate of surplus- 
value of 100 per cent, is equal to the value of 100 p.st. How can 
they continually draw 600 p.st. out of circulation, when they 
continually throw only 500 p.st. into it? From nothing comes 
nothing. The capitalist class as a whole cannot draw out of 
circulation what was not previously in it.'^ 

Marx further explodes another device which might conceiv- 
ably be thought adequate to the problem, i.e. a more rapid 
turnover of money enabling a larger amount of value to circu- 
late by means of a smaller amount of money. The dodge will not 
work, of course, since the velocity of money in circulation is 
already taken into account by equating the aggregate bulk of 
commodities with a certain number of pounds sterling. But then 
at last we seem in sight of a proper solution: 

'Indeed, paradoxical as it may appear at first sight, it is the 
capitalist class itself that throws the money into circulation 
which serves for the realisation of the surplus-value incorporated 
in the commodities. But, mark well, it is not thrown into circu- 
lation as advanced money, not as capital. The capitalist class 
spends it for their individual consumption. The money is not 
advanced by them, although they are the point of departure of 
its circulation.'^ 

This lucid and comprehensive account is the best evidence 
that the problem is not just imaginary but very real. It provides 
a solution, not by disclosing a new 'source of money' for the 
realisation of the surplus value, but by pointing out at last the 
consumers of this surplus value. We are still, on Marx's assump- 
tion, within the bounds of simple reproduction; the capitalist 
class, that is to say, use the whole of their surplus value for 
personal consumption. Since the capitalists are the consumers of 
surplus value, it is not so much a paradox as a truism that they 
must, in the nature of things, possess the money for appropriat- 
ing the objects of consumption, the natural form of this surplus 
^ Capital, vol. ii, pp. 384-5. ^ Ibid., p. 385. 

160 



THE DIFFICULTY AS REGARDS CIRCULATION 

value. The circulatory transaction of exchange is the necessary 
consequence of the fact that the individual capitalist cannot 
immediately consume his individual surplus value, and accord- 
ingly the individual surplus product, as could, for instance, the 
employer of slave labour. As a rule the natural material form of 
the surplus product tends to preclude such use. The aggregate 
surplus value of the capitalists in general is, however, contained 
in the total social product — as long as there is simple reproduc- 
tion — as expressed by a corresponding quantity of consumer 
goods for the capitalist class, just as the sum total of variable 
capital has its corresponding equivalent in the quantity of con- 
sumer goods for the working class, and as the constant capital 
of all individual capitalists taken together is represented by 
material means of production in an equivalent quantity. In 
order to exchange the unconsumable individual surplus values 
for a corresponding amount of consumer goods, a double trans- 
action of commodity exchange is needed: first, the sale of one's 
own surplus product and then the purchase of consumer goods 
out of the surplus product of society. These two transactions can 
only take place among members of the capitalist class, among 
individual capitalists, which means that their agent, the money, 
thereby merely changes hands as between one capitalist and 
another without ever being alienated from the capitalist class in 
general. Since simple reproduction inevitably implies the ex- 
change of equivalents, one and the same amount of money can 
serve year by year for the circulation of the surplus value, and 
only an excess of zeal will inspire the further query: where does 
the money which mediates the capitalists' own consumption 
come from in the first place? This question, however, reduces to 
a more general one: how did money capital initially come into 
the hands of the capitalists, that money capital of which they 
always retain a certain part for their personal consumption, 
apart from what they use for productive investment? Put in this 
way, however, the question belongs in the chapter of so-called 
'primitive accumulation', i.e. the historical genesis of capital, 
going beyond the framework of an analysis of the process of 
circulation as well as of reproduction. 

Thus the fact is clear and unequivocal — so long as we remain 
within the bounds of simple reproduction. Here the problem is 
solved by the premises themselves; in fact, the solution is already 

A.C. i6i F 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

anticipated by the very concept of simple reproduction which 
indeed is based on the entire surplus value being consumed by 
the capitalist class. This implies that it must also be the latter 
who buy it, that is to say, individual capitalists must buy it from 
each other. 

'In the present case', Marx says himself, 'we had assumed, 
that the sum of money which the capitalist throws into circula- 
tion until the first surplus-value flows back to him, is exactly 
equal to the surplus-value which he is going to produce and 
monetise. This is obviously an arbitrary assumption, so far as 
the individual capitalist is concerned. But it must be correct 
when applied to the entire capitalist class, when simple repro- 
duction is assumed. It expresses the same thing that this assump- 
tion does, namely, that the entire surplus-value is consumed 
unproductively, but it only, not any portion of the original 
capital stock.'i 

But simple reproduction on a capitalist basis is after all an 
imaginary quantity in economic theory: no more and no less 
legitimate, and quite as unavoidable as ^/ — i in mathematics. 
What is worse, it cannot offer any help at all with the problem 
of realising the surplus value in real life, i.e. with regard to 
enlarged reproduction or accumulation. Marx himself says so 
for a second time in the further development of his analysis. 

Where does the money for realising the surplus value come 
from if there is accumulation, i.e. not consumption but capitalisa- 
tion of part of the surplus value? Marx's first answer is as follows: 

'In the first place, the additional money-capital required for 
the function of the increasing productive capital is supplied by 
that portion of the realised surplus-value which is thrown into 
circulation by the capitalists as money-capital, not as the money 
form of their revenue. The money is already present in the 
hands of the capitalists. Only its employment is different.'^ 

Our investigation of the reproductive process has already 
made us familiar with this explanation, and we are equally 
familiar with its defects; for one thing, the answer rests on the 
moment of the first transition from simple reproduction to 
accumulation. The capitalists only yesterday consumed their 
entire surplus value, and thus had in hand an appropriate 
amount of money for their circulation. To-day they decide to 
^ Capital, vol. ii, p. 387. * Ibid., p. 397. 

162 



THE DIFFICULTY AS REGARDS CIRCULATION 

'save' part of the surplus value and to invest it productively 
instead of squandering it. Provided that material means of 
production were manufactured instead of luxury goods, they 
need only put part of their personal money fund to a different 
use. But the transition from simple reproduction to expanded 
reproduction is no less a theoretical fiction than simple repro- 
duction of capital itself, for which reason Marx immediately 
goes on to say: 

'Now, by means of the additional productive capital, its pro- 
duct, an additional quantity of commodities, is thrown into 
circulation. Together with this additional quantity of com- 
modities, a portion of the additional money required for its 
circulation is thrown into circulation, so far as the value of this 
mass of commodities is equal to that of the productive capital 
consumed in their production. This additional quantity of 
money has precisely been advanced as an additional money- 
capital, and therefore it flows back to the capitalist through the 
turn-over of his capital. Here the same question reappears, 
which we met previously. Where does the additional money 
come from, by which the additional surplus-value now con- 
tained in the form of commodities is to be realised?'^ 

The problem could not be put more precisely. But instead of 
a solution, there follows the surprising conclusion: 

'The general reply is again the same. The sum total of the 
prices of the commodities has been increased, not because the 
prices of a given quantity of commodities have risen, but because 
the mass of the commodities now circulating is greater than that 
of the previously circulating commodities, and because this 
increase has not been offset by a fall in prices. The additional 
money required for the circulation of this greater quantity of 
commodities of greater value must be secured, either by greater 
economy in the circulating quantity of money — whether by 
means of balancing payments, etc., or by some measure which 
accelerates the circulation of the same coins, — or by the trans- 
formation of money from the form of a hoard into that of a 
circulating medium.' ^ 

All this amounts to an exposition along these lines: under 
conditions of developing and growing accumulation, capitalist 
reproduction dumps ever larger masses of commodity values on 
1 Ibid., p. 397. 2 Ibid., pp. 397-8. 

163 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

the market. To put this commodity mass of a continually 
increasing value into circulation requires an ever larger amount 
of money. This increasing amount of money must be found 
somehow or other. All this is, no doubt, plausible and correct 
as far as it goes, but our problem is not solved, it is merely 
wished away. 

One thing or the other! Either we regard the aggregate social 
product in a capitalist economy simply as a mass, a con- 
glomeration of commodities of a certain value, seeing under 
conditions of accumulation, a mere increase in this undifferenti- 
ated mass of commodities and in the bulk of its value. Then all 
we need say is that a corresponding quantity of money is required 
for circulating this bulk of value, that with an increasing bulk 
of value the quantity of money must also increase, unless this 
growth of value is offset by acceleration of, and economy in, 
the traffic. And the final question, where does all money origin- 
ally come from, could then be answered on Marx's recipe: from 
the gold mines. This, of course, is one way of looking at things, 
that of simple commodity circulation. But in that case there is 
no need to drag in concepts such as constant and variable 
capital, or surplus value, which have no place in simple com- 
modity circulation, belonging essentially to the circulation of 
capitals and to social reproduction; nor is there need to inquire 
for sources of money for the realisation of the social surplus 
value under conditions of first simple, and then enlarged, repro- 
duction. Under the aspect of simple commodity circulation 
puzzles of this kind are without meaning or content. But once 
these questions have been raised, once the course has been set 
for an investigation into the circulation of capitals and social 
reproduction, there can be no appealing to the sphere of simple 
commodity circulation, where there is no such problem at all, 
and consequently no solution to it. There can be no looking for 
the answer there, and then saying triumphantly that the prob- 
lem has long been solved and in fact never really existed. 

All this time, it appears, Marx has been tackling the problem 
from a wrong approach. No intelligent purpose can be served by 
asking for the source of the money needed to realise the surplus 
value. The question is rather where the demand can arise — to 
find an effective demand for the surplus value. If the problem 
had been put in this way at the start, no such long-winded 

164 



THE DIFFICULTY AS REGARDS CIRCULATION 

detours would have been needed to show whether it can be 
solved or not. On the basis of simple reproduction, the matter 
is easy enough: since all surplus value is consumed by the capit- 
alists, they themselves arc the buyers and provide the full 
demand for the social surplus value, and by the same token they 
must also have the requisite cash in hand for circulation of the 
surplus value. But on this showing it is quite evident that under 
conditions of accumulation, i.e. of capitalisation of part of the 
surplus value, it cannot, ex hypothesi, be the capitalists them- 
selves who buy the entire surplus value, that they cannot 
possibly realise it. True, if the capitalised surplus value is to be 
realised at all, money must be forthcoming in adequate quanti- 
ties for its realisation. But it is quite impossible that this money 
should come from the purse of the capitalist class itself. Just 
because accumulation is postulated, the capitalists cannot buy 
their surplus value themselves, even though they might, in 
abstracto, have the money to do so. But who else could provide 
the demand for the commodities incorporating the capitalised 
surplus value? 

'Apart from this class (the capitalists), there is, according to 
our assumption — the general and exclusive domination of capit- 
alist production— no other class but the working class. All that 
the working class buys is equal to the sum total of its wages, 
equal to the sum total of the variable capital advanced by the 
entire capitalist class. '^ 

The workers, then, are even less able than the capitalist class 
to realise the capitalised surplus value. Somebody must buy it, 
if the capitalists are still to be able to recover the capital they 
have accumulated and advanced; and yet — we cannot think of 
any buyers other than capitalists and workers. 'How can the 
entire capitalist class accumulate money under such circum- 
stances?'^ 

Realisation of the surplus value outside the only two existing 
classes of society appears as indispensable as it looks impossible. 
The accumulation of capital has been caught in a vicious circle. 
At any rate, the second volume of Capital offers no way out. 

If we should now ask why Marx's Capital affords no solution 

to this important problem of the accumulation of capital, we 

must bear in mind above all that this second volume is not a 

^ Capital, vol. ii, p. 401. 

165 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

finished whole but a manuscript that stops short half way 
through. 

The external form of its last chapters in particular proves 
them to be in the nature of notes, intended to clear the author's 
own mind, rather than final conclusions ready for the reader's 
enlightenment. This fact is amply authenticated by the man 
best in the position to know: Friedrich Engels, who edited the 
second volume. In his introduction to the second volume he 
reports in detail on the conditions of the preliminary studies and 
the manuscripts Marx had left, which were to form the basis of 
this volume: 

'The mere enumeration of the manuscripts left by Marx as 
a basis for Volume II proves the unparalleled conscientiousness 
and strict self-criticism which he practised in his endeavour to 
fully elaborate his great economic discoveries before he pub- 
lished them. This self-criticism rarely permitted him to adapt his 
presentation of the subject, in content as well as in form, to his 
ever widening horizon, which he enlarged by incessant study. 

'The material . . . consists of the following parts: First, a 
manuscript entitled "A contribution to the Critique of Political 
Economy", containing 1,472 quarto pages in 23 divisions, 
written in the time from August, 1861, to June, 1863. It is a 
continuation of the work of the same title, the first volume of 
which appeared in Berlin, in 1859. • • • This manuscript, valu- 
able though it is, could not be used in the present edition of 
Volume II. 

'The manuscript next following in the order of time is that of 
Volume III . . . 

'The period after the publication of Volume I, which is next 
in order, is represented by a collection of four manuscripts for 
Volume II, marked I-IV by Marx himself Manuscript I (150 
pages) presumably written in 1865 or 1867, is the first in- 
dependent, but more or less fragmentary, elaboration of the 
questions now contained in Volume II. This manuscript is like- 
wise unsuited for this edition. Manuscript III is partly a com- 
pilation of quotations and references to the manuscripts contain- 
ing Marx's extracts and comments, most of them relating to the 
first section of Volume II, partly an elaboration of special points, 
particularly a critique of Adam Smith's statements as to fixed 
and circulating capital and the source of profits; furthermore, 

166 



THE DIFFICULTY AS REGARDS CIRCULATION 

a discussion of the relations of the rate of surplus-value to the 
rate of profit, which belongs in Volume III. The references 
furnished little that was new, while the elaborations for Volumes 
II and III were rendered valueless through subsequent revisions 
and had to be ruled out for the greater part. Manuscript IV is 
an elaboration, ready for printing, of the first section and the 
first chapters of the second section of Volume II, and has been 
used in its proper place. Although it was found that this manu- 
script had been written earlier than Manuscript II, yet it was 
far more finished in form and could be used with advantage for 
the corresponding part of this volume. I had to add only a few 
supplementary parts of Manuscript II. This last manuscript is 
the only fairly completed elaboration of Volume II and dates 
from the year 1870. The notes for the final revision, which I 
shall mention immediately, say explicitly: "The second elabora- 
tion must be used as a basis." 

*There is another interruption after 1870, due mainly to ill 
health. Marx employed this time in his customary way, that is 
to say he studied agronomics, agricultural conditions in America 
and especially Russia, the money market and banking institu- 
tions, and finally natural sciences, such as geology and physio- 
logy. Independent mathematical studies also form a large part 
of the numerous manuscripts of this period. In the beginning 
of 1877, Marx had recovered sufficiently to resume once more 
his chosen life's work. The beginning of 1877 is marked by 
references and notes from the above named four manuscripts 
intended for a new elaboration of Volume II, the beginning of 
which is represented by Manuscript V (56 pages in folio). It 
comprises the first four chapters and is not very fully worked 
out. Essential points are treated in footnotes. The material is 
rather collected than sifted, but it is the last complete presenta- 
tion of this most important first section. A preliminary attempt 
to prepare this part for the printer was made in Manuscript VI 
(after October, 1877, and before July, 1878), embracing 17 
quarto pages, the greater part of the first chapter. A second and 
last attempt was made in Manuscript VII, dated July 2, 1878, 
and consisting of 7 pages in folio. 

'About this time Marx seems to have realised that he would 
never be able to complete the second and third volume in a 
manner satisfactory to himself, unless a complete revolution in 

167 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

his health took place. Manuscripts V-VIII show traces of hard 
struggles against depressing physical conditions far too fre- 
quently to be ignored. The most difficult part of the first section 
had been worked over in Manuscript V. The remainder of the 
first, and the entire second section, with the exception of 
Chapter 17, presented no great theoretical difficulties. But the 
third section, dealing with the reproduction and circulation of 
social capital, seemed to be very much in need of revision. 
Manuscript II, it must be pointed out, had first treated of this 
reproduction without regard to the circulation which is instru- 
mental in effecting it, and then taken up the same question with 
regard to circulation. It was the intention of Marx to eliminate 
this section and to reconstruct it in such a way that it would 
conform to his wider grasp of the subject. This gave rise to 
Manuscript VIII, containing only 70 pages in quarto. A com- 
parison with Section III, as printed after deducting the para- 
graphs inserted out of Manuscript II, shows the amount of 
matter compressed by Marx into this space. 

'Manuscript VIII is likewise merely a preliminary presenta- 
tion of the subject, and its main object was to ascertain and 
develop the new points of view not set forth in Manuscript II, 
while those points were ignored about which there was nothing 
new to say. An essential part of Chapter 17, Section II, which is 
more or less relevant to Section III, was at the same time drawn 
into this discussion and expanded. The logical sequence was 
frequently interrupted, the treatment of the subject was incom- 
plete in various places, and especially the conclusion was very 
fragmentary. But Marx expressed as nearly as possible what he 
intended to say on the subject. 

'This is the material for Volume II, out of which I was 
supposed "to make something", as Marx said to his daughter 
Eleanor shortly before his death. '^ 

We cannot but admire this 'something' which Engels man- 
aged to 'make' from material of such a kind. As far as our pre- 
sent problem is concerned, however, this detailed report makes 
it clear that no more than the first two of the three sections that 
make up volume ii were anything like ready for print in the 
manuscripts Marx left: the section 'On the Circulation of 

^ Capital, vol. ii, pp. 8 ff. 
168 



THE DIFFICULTY AS REGARDS CIRCULATION 

Money and Commodity Capital' and on 'The Causes of Circu- 
lation and the Turnover of Capital'. The third section which 
treats of the reproduction of total capital is merely a collection 
of fragments which Marx himself considered to be 'very much 
in need of revision'. Yet it is the last part of this section, i.e. 
chapter 21, 'On Accumulation and Enlarged Reproduction', 
which is of primary importance in the present context, and of 
the whole book this is the most incomplete. It comprises thirty- 
five pages of print in all and breaks off right in the middle of 
the analysis. 

Besides this extraneous circumstance, we would suggest 
another point of great influence. Marx's investigation of the 
social reproductive process starts off, as we have seen, from the 
analysis of Adam Smith which came to grief, among other 
reasons, because of the erroneous doctrine that the price of all 
commodities is composed of y+j-. Polemics against this dogma 
dominated Marx's entire analysis of the reproductive process. 
He devoted all his attention to proving that the total capital of 
society must serve, not only for consumption to the full amount 
of the various sources of revenue, but also for renewal of the 
constant capital. And inasmuch as the purest theoretical form 
for this line of reasoning is given, not by enlarged reproduction, 
but by simple reproduction, Marx tends to consider reproduc- 
tion mainly from a point of view that is the very opposite of 
accumulation, from the assumption that the entire surplus value 
is consumed by the capitalists. How greatly these polemics in- 
fluenced his analysis is proved by his returning time and again 
in the course of his work to the attack on Adam Smith from the 
most various angles. So already in volume i, the following pages 
are devoted to it: vol. i, sect. 7, chap. 24, (2), pp. 588-602, and 
in vol. ii, pp. 4^-5^, P- 473. PP- 504-8, and pp. 554 f. 

Marx again takes up the question of total reproduction in 
volume iii but from the start becomes once more involved with 
the problem set by Smith to which he devotes the whole of his 
49th chapter and most of chapter 50 (pp. 968-92 and 992- 
1022). Finally, in Theorien ueber den Mehrwert, we again find 
detailed polemics against Smith's dogma: pp. 164-253 in vol. i, 
and pp. 92, 95, 126, 233, and 262 in vol. ii, part 2. Marx 
repeatedly stressed and emphasised the fact that he considered 
replacement of the constant capital from the aggregate social 

169 



THE PROBLEM OF REPRODUCTION 

product the most difficult and important problem of reproduc- 
tion.^ The other problem, that of accumulation, i.e. realisation 
of the surplus value for the purpose of capitalisation, was thus 
pushed into the background, so that in the end Marx hardly 
touched upon it. 

This problem being of such paramount importance for capit- 
alist economy, it is not surprising that bourgeois economists 
have dealt with it again and again. Attempts to grapple with 
this vital question for capitalist economy, with the question 
whether capital accumulation is possible in practice, come up 
time and again in the history of economic theory. To these 
historical attempts, before and after Marx, at solving this pro- 
blem we shall now turn. 

1 Cf. e.g. Capital, vol. ii, pp. 430, 522, and 529. 



170 



SECTION TWO 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION 
OF THE PROBLEM 



FIRST ROUND 

SISMONDI-MALTHUS v. 

SAY-RIGARDO— MacCULLOCH 



CHAPTER X 

SISMONDI'S THEORY 
OF REPRODUCTION 

THE first grave doubts as to the divine character of the 
capitaHst order came to bourgeois economists under the 
immediate impact of the first crises of 1815 and 1818-19 
in England. Even then it had still been external circumstances 
which led up to these crises, and they appeared to be ephemeral. 
Napoleon's blockade of the Continent which for a time had cut 
off England from her European markets and had favoured a 
considerable development of home industries in some of the 
continental countries, was partly responsible; for the rest the 
material exhaustion of the Continent, owing to the long period 
of war, made for a smaller demand for English products than 
had been expected when the blockade was lifted. Still, these 
early crises were enough to reveal to the contemporary world 
the sinister aspects of this best of all social orders. Glutted 
markets, shops filled with goods nobody could buy, frequent 
bankruptcies — and on the other hand the glaring poverty of 
the toiling masses — for the first time all this starkly met the eyes 
of theorists who had preached the gospel of the beautiful 
harmonies of bourgeois laissez-faire and had sung its praises 
in all keys. All contemporary trade reports, periodicals and 
travellers' notes told of the losses sustained by English mer- 
chants. In Italy, Germany, Russia, and Brazil, the English dis- 
posed of their commodity stocks at a loss of anything between 
25 per cent and 33I per cent. People at the Cape of Good Hope 
in 1818 complained that all the shops were flooded with 
European goods oflfered at lower prices than in Europe and still 
unmarketable. From Calcutta there came similar complaints. 
From New Holland whole cargoes returned to England. In the 
United States, a contemporary traveller reports, 'there was no 
town nor hamlet from one end to the other of this immense 
and prosperous continent where the amount of commodities 

173 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

displayed for sale did not considerably exceed the means of the 
purchasers, although the vendors tried to attract custom by 
long-term credits, all sorts of facilities for payment, payment by 
instalments and acceptance of payment in kind'. 

At the same time, England was hearing the desperate outcry 
of her workers. The Edinburgh Review of 1820^ quotes an address 
by the Nottingham frame-work knitters which contained the 
following statements: 

'After working from 14 to 16 hours a day, we only earn from 
^. to ']s. a week, to maintain our wives and families upon; and 
we farther state, that although we have substituted bread and 
water, or potatoes and salt, for that more wholesome food an 
Englishman's table used to abound with, we have repeatedly 
retired, after a heavy day's labour, and have been under the 
necessity of putting our children supperless to bed, to stifle the 
cries of hunger. We can most solemnly declare, that for the last 
eighteen months we have scarcely known what it was to be free 
from the pangs of hunger.' 2 

Then Owen in England, and Sismondi in France, almost 
simultaneously raised their voices in a weighty indictment of 
capitalist society. Owen, as a hard-headed Englishman and 
citizen of the leading industrial state, constituted himself spokes- 
man for a generous social reform, whereas the petty-bourgeois 

^ In the review of an essay on Observations on the injurious Consequences of the 
Restrictions upon Foreign Commerce, by a Member of the late Parliament, London, 
1820 {Edinburgh Review, vol. Ixvi, pp. 331 ff.). This interesting docunaent, 
from which the following extracts are taken, an essay with a Free Trade 
bias, paints the general position of the workers in England in the most 
dismal colours. It gives the facts as follows: 'The manufacturing classes in 
Great Britain . . . have been suddenly reduced from affluence and pros- 
perity to the extreme of poverty and misery. In one of the debates in the late 
Session of Parliament, it was stated that the wages of weavers of Glasgow 
and its vicinity which, when highest, had averaged about 25J. or 2']s. a 
week, had been reduced in 1816 to \os.; and in 1819 to the wretched 
pittance of 5-6^. or 6j. They have not since been materially augmented.' 
In Lancashire, according to the same evidence, the direct weekly wage of 
the weavers was from 6s. to I2J. a week for 15 hours' labour a day, whilst 
half-starved children worked 12 to 16 hours a day for 2s. or 35^. a week. 
Distress in Yorkshire was, if possible, even greater. As to the address by the 
frame-work knitters of Nottingham, the author says that he himself investi- 
gated conditions and had come to the conclusion that the declarations of 
the workers 'were not in the slightest degree exaggerated'. 

2 Ibid., p. 334. 



SISMONDI'S THEORY OF REPRODUCTION 

Swiss rather lost himself in sweeping denunciations of the im- 
perfections of the existing social order and of classical economics. 
And yet, by so doing, Sismondi gave bourgeois economics a 
much harder nut to crack than Owen, whose fertile practical 
activities were directly applied to the proletariat. 

Sismondi explained in some detail that the impetus for his 
social criticism came from England, and especially her first 
crisis. In the second edition of his Nouveaux Principes d'Economie 
Politique Ou De La Richesse Dans Ses Rapports Avec La Populations^ 
eight years after the publication of the first edition in 1819, he 
writes as follows: 

'It was in England that I performed the task of preparing the 
new edition. England has given birth to the most celebrated 
Political Economists: the science is cultivated even at this time 
with increased ardour. . . . Universal competition or the effort 
always to produce more and always cheaper, has long been 
the system in England, a system which I have attacked as 
dangerous. This system has used production by manufacture to 
advance with gigantic steps, but it has from time to time pre- 
cipitated the manufacturers into frightful distress. It was in pre- 
sence of these convulsions of wealth that I thought I ought to 
place myself, to review my reasonings and compare them with 
facts. — The study of England has confirmed me in my "New 
Principles". In this astonishing country, which seems to be 
subject to a great experiment for the instruction of the rest of the 
world, I have seen production increasing, whilst enjoyments 
were diminishing. The mass of the nation here, no less than 
philosophers, seems to forget that the increase of wealth is not 
the end in political economy, but its instrument in procuring 
the happiness of all. I sought for this happiness in every class, 
and I could nowhere find it. The high English aristocracy has 
indeed arrived to a degree of wealth and luxury which surpasses 
all that can be seen in other nations; nevertheless it does not 
itself enjoy the opulence which it seems to have acquired at the 
expense of the other classes; security is wanting and in every 
family most of the individuals experience privation rather than 
abundance. . . . Below this titled and not titled aristocracy, I 
see commerce occupy a distinguished rank; its enterprises em- 
brace the whole world, its agents brave the ices of the poles, 

1 Paris, 1827. 

175 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

and the heats of the equator, whilst every one of its leading men, 
meeting on Exchange, can dispose of thousands. At the same 
time, in the streets of London, and in those of the other great 
towns of England, the shops display goods sufficient for the con- 
sumption of the world. — But have riches secured to the English 
merchant the kind of happiness which they ought to secure 
him? No: in no country are failures so frequent, nowhere are 
those colossal fortunes, sufficient in themselves to supply a public 
loan to uphold an Empire, or a republic, overthrown with as 
much rapidity. All complain that business is scarce, difficult, 
not remunerative. Twice, within an interval of a few years, a 
terrible crisis has ruined part of the bankers, and spread desola- 
tion among all the English manufacturers. At the same time 
another crisis has ruined the farmers, and been felt in its re- 
bound by retail dealers. On the other hand, commerce, in spite 
of its immense extent, has ceased to call for young men who have 
their fortunes to make; every place is occupied, in the superior 
ranks of society no less than in the inferior; the greater number 
offer their labour in vain, without being able to obtain re- 
muneration. — Has, then, this national opulence, whose material 
progress strikes every eye, nevertheless tended to the advantage 
of the poor? Not so. The people of England are destitute of 
comfort now, and of security for the future. There arc no longer 
yeomen, they have been obliged to become day labourers. In 
the towns there are scarcely any longer artisans, or independent 
heads of a small business, but only manufacturers. The opera- 
tive, to employ a word which the system has created, does not 
know what it is to have a station; he only gains wages, and as 
these wages cannot suffice for all seasons, he is almost every year 
reduced to ask alms from the poor-rates. — This opulent nation 
has found it more economical to sell all the gold and silver 
which she possessed, to do without coin, and to depend entirely 
on a paper circulation; she has thus voluntarily deprived herself 
of the most valuable of all the advantages of coin: stability of 
value. The holders of the notes of the provincial banks run the 
risk every day of being ruined by frequent and, as it were, 
epidemic failures of the bankers; and the whole state is exposed 
to a convulsion in the fortune of every individual, if an invasion 
or a revolution should shake the credit of the national bank. 
The English nation has found it more economical to give up 

176 



SISMONDI'S THEORY OF REPRODUCTION 

those modes of cultivation which require much hand-labour, 
and she has dismissed half the cultivators who lived in the 
fields. She has found it more economical to supersede workmen 
by steam-engines; she has dismissed . . . the operatives in towns, 
and weavers giving place to power-looms, are now sinking 
under famine; she has found it more economical to reduce all 
working people to the lowest possible wages on which they can 
subsist, and these working people being no longer anything but 
a rabble, have not feared plunging into still deeper misery by 
the addition of an increasing family. She has found it more 
economical to feed the Irish with potatoes, and clothe them in 
rags; and now every packet brings legions of Irish, who, working 
for less than the English, drive them from every employment. 
What is the fruit of this immense accumulation of wealth? Have 
they had any other effect than to make every class partake of 
care, privation and the danger of complete ruin? Has not Eng- 
land, by forgetting men for things, sacrificed the end to the 
means?'^ 

This mirror, held up to capitalist society almost a century 
before the time of writing, is clear and comprehensive enough in 
all conscience. Sismondi put his finger on every one of the sore 
spots of bourgeois economics: the ruin of small enterprise; the 
drift from the country; the proletarisation of the middle classes; 
the impoverishment of the workers; the displacement of the 
worker by the machine; unemployment; the dangers of the 
credit system; social antagonisms; the insecurity of existence; 
crises and anarchy. His harsh, emphatic scepticism struck a 
specially shrill discord with the complacent optimism, the idle 
worship of harmony as preached by vulgar economics which, in 
the person of MacCulloch in England and of Say in France, was 
becoming the fashion in both countries. It is easy to imagine 
what a deep and painful impression remarks like the following 
were bound to make: 

'There can only be luxury if it is bought with another's 
labour; only those will work hard and untiringly who have to 
do so in order to get not the frills but the very necessities of life.' '^ 

'Although the invention of the machine which increases man's 

^ Preface to the second edition. Translation by M. Mignet, in Political 
Economy and the Philosophy of Government (London, 1847), pp. 1 14 ff. 
^ Nouveanx Principes . . . (2nd ed.), vol. i, p. 79. 

177 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

capacity, is a blessing for mankind, it is made into a scourge for 
the poor by the unjust distribution we make of its benefits.'^ 

'The gain of an employer of labour is sometimes nothing if not 
despoiling the worker he employs; he does not benefit because 
his enterprise produces much more than it costs, but because he 
does not pay all the costs, because he does not accord the 
labourer a remuneration equal to his work. Such an industry is 
a social evil, for it reduces those who perform the work to utmost 
poverty, assuring to those who direct it but the ordinary profits 
on capital.' 2 

'Amongst those who share in the national income, one group 
acquires new rights each year by new labours, the other have 
previously acquired permanent rights by reason of a primary 
effort which makes a year's labour more advantageous.'^ 

'Nothing can prevent that every new discovery in applied 
mechanics should diminish the working population by that 
much. To this danger it is constantly exposed, and society pro- 
vides no remedy for it.'^ 

'A time will come, no doubt, when our descendants will con- 
demn us as barbarians because we have left the working classes 
without security, just as we already condemn, as they also will, 
as barbarian the nations who reduced those same classes to 
slavery.'^ 

Sismondi's criticism thus goes right to the root of the matter; 
for him there can be no compromise or evasion which might try 
to gloss over the dark aspects of capitalist enrichment he ex- 
posed, as merely temporary shortcomings of a transition period. 
He concludes his investigation with the following rejoinder to 
Say: 

'For seven years I have indicated this malady of the social 
organism, and for seven years it has continuously increased. I 
cannot regard such prolonged suffering as the mere frictions 
which always accompany a change. Going back to the origin of 
income, I believe to have shown the ills we experience to be the 
consequence of a flaw in our organisation, to have shown that 
they are not likely to come to an end.'^ 

The disproportion between capitalist production and the dis- 

' Nouveaux Principes . . . (2nd ed.), vol. i, p. xv. 
^ Ibid., p. 92. 3 Ibid., pp. 1 1 1-12. '' Ibid., p. 335. 

^ Op. cit., vol. ii, p. 435. ' Ibid., p. 463. 

178 



SISMONDI'S THEORY OF REPRODUCTION 

tribution of incomes determined by the former appears to him 
the source of all evil. This is the point from which he comes to 
the problem of accumulation with which we are now concerned. 

The main thread of his criticism against classical economics is 
this: capitalist production is encouraged to expand indefinitely 
without any regard to consumption; consumption, however, is 
determined by income. 

'AH the modern economists, in fact, have allowed that the 
fortune of the public, being only the aggregation of private 
fortunes, has its origin, is augmented, distributed and destroyed 
by the same means as the fortune of each individual. They all 
know perfectly well, that in a private fortune, the most import- 
ant fact to consider is the income, and that by the income must 
be regulated consumption or expenditure, or the capital will be 
destroyed. But as, in the fortune of the public, the capital of one 
becomes the income of another, they have been perplexed to 
decide what was capital, and what income, and they have 
therefore found it more simple to leave the latter entirely out of 
their calculations. By neglecting a quality so essential to be 
determined, Say and Ricardo have arrived at the conclusion, 
that consumption is an unlimited power, or at least having no 
limits but those of production, whilst it is in fact limited by 
income. . . . They announced that whatever abundance might 
be produced, it would always find consumers, and they have 
encouraged the producers to cause that glut in the markets, 
which at this time occasions the distress of the civilised world; 
whereas they should have forewarned the producers that they 
could only reckon on those consumers who possessed income. '^ 

Sismondi thus grounds his views in a theory of income. What 
is income, and what is capital? He pays the greatest attention to 
this distinction which he calls 'the most abstract and difficult 
question of political economies'. The fourth chapter of his 
second book is devoted to this problem. As usual, Sismondi 
starts his investigation with Robinson Crusoe. For such a one, 
the distinction between capital and income was still 'confused'; 
it becomes 'essential' only in society. Yet in society, too, this 
distinction is very difficult, largely on account of the already 
familiar myth of bourgeois economics, according to which 'the 
capital of one becomes the income of another', and vice versa. 
^ Op. cit., vol. i, p. xiii (pp. 120-1 of Mignet's translation). 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

Adam Smith was responsible for this confusion which was then 
elevated to an axiom by Say in justification of mental inertia 
and superficiality. It was loyally accepted by Sismondi. 

'The nature of capital and of income are always confused by 
the mind; we see that what is income for one becomes capital 
for another, and the same object, in passing from hand to hand, 
successively acquires different denominations; the value which 
becomes detached from an object that has been consumed, 
appears as a metaphysical quantity which one expends and the 
other exchanges, which for one perishes together with the object 
itself and which for the other renews itself and lasts for the time 
of circulation. '1 

After this promising introduction, Sismondi dives right into 
the difficult problem and declares: all wealth is a product of 
labour; income is part of wealth, and must therefore have the 
same origin. However, it is 'customary' to recognise three kinds 
of income, called rent, profit and wage respectively, which 
spring from the three sources of 'land, accumulated capital and 
labour'. As to the first thesis, he is obviously on the wrong tack. 
As the wealth of a society, i.e. as the aggregate of useful objects, 
of use-values, wealth is not merely a product of labour but also 
of nature who both supplies raw materials and provides the 
means to support human labour. Income, on the other hand, is 
a concept of value. It indicates the amount to which an indivi- 
dual or individuals can dispose over part of the wealth of society 
or of the aggregate social product. In view of Sismondi's in- 
sistence that social income is part of social wealth, we might 
assume him to understand by social income the actual annual 
fund for consumption. The remaining part of wealth that has 
not been consumed, then, is the capital of society. Thus we 
obtain at least a vague outline of the required distinction be- 
tween capital and income on a social basis. At the very next 
moment, however, Sismondi accepts the 'customary' distinction 
between three kinds of income, only one of which derives 
exclusively from 'accumulated capital' while in the other two 
'land' or 'labour' are conjoined with capital. The concept of 
capital thus at once becomes hazy again. However, let us see 
what Sismondi has to say about the origin of these three kinds 
of income which betray a rift in the foundations of society. He 
^ Nouveaux Principes . . . (and ed.), vol. i, p. 84. 
180 



SISMONDI'S THEORY OF REPRODUCTION 

is right to take a certain development of labour productivity 
as his point of departure. 

'By reason of the advances both in industry and science, by 
which man has subjugated the forces of nature, every worker 
can produce more, far more, in a day than he needs to 
consume.'^ 

Sismondi thus rightly stresses the fact that the productivity 
of labour is an indispensable condition for the historical founda- 
tion of exploitation. Yet he goes on to explain the actual origin 
of exploitation in a way typical of bourgeois economics: 'But 
even though his labour produces wealth, this wealth, if he is 
called upon to enjoy it, will make him less and less fit for work. 
Besides, wealth hardly ever remains in the possession of the man 
who must live by the work of his hands. '^ 

Thus he makes exploitation and class antagonism the neces- 
sary spur to production, quite in accord with the followers of 
Ricardo and Malthus. But now he comes to the real cause 
of exploitation, the divorce of labour power from the means of 
production. 

'The worker cannot, as a rule, keep the land as his own; land, 
however, has a productive capacity which human labour but 
directs to the uses of man. The master of the land on which 
labour is performed, reserves a share in the fruits of labour to 
which his land has contributed, as his remuneration for the 
benefits afforded by this productive capacity. '^ 

This is called rent. And further: 'In our state of civilisation, 
the worker can no longer call his own an adequate fund of 
objects for his consumption, enough to live while he performs 
the labours he has undertaken — until he has found a buyer. 
He no longer owns the raw materials, often coming from far 
away, on which he must exercise his industry. Even less does he 
possess that complicated and costly machinery which facilitates 
his work and makes it infinitely more productive. The rich man 
who possesses his consumption goods, his raw materials and his 
machines, need not work himself, for by supplying the worker 
with all these, he becomes in a sense the master of his work. As 
reward for the advantages he has put at the worker's disposal, 
he takes outright the greater part of the fruits of his labour.'^ 

This is called capital profits. What remains of wealth, after 
1 Ibid., p. 85. 2 Ibid., p. 86. 3 Ibid., pp. 86-7. 

181 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

the cream has been taken off twice, by landlord and capitalist, 
is the wage of labour, the income of the worker. And Sismondi 
adds: 'He can consume it without reproduction.'^ 

Thus, Sismondi makes the fact of non-reproduction the 
criterion of income as distinct from capital for wages as well as 
for rent. In this, however, he is only right with regard to rent 
and the consumed part of capital profits; as for the part of the 
social product which is consumed in form of wages, it certainly 
does reproduce itself; it becomes the labour power of the wage 
labourer, for him a commodity by whose sale he lives, which he 
can bring to market again and again; for society it becomes the 
material form of variable capital which must reappear time and 
again in the aggregate reproduction of a year, if there is to be 
no loss. 

So far so good. Hitherto we have only learned two facts: the 
productivity of labour permits of the exploitation of the workers 
by those who do not work themselves, and exploitation becomes 
the actual foundation of the distribution of income owing to the 
divorce of the worker from his means of production. But we 
still do not know what is capital and what income, and Sis- 
mondi proceeds to clarify this point, starting as usual with 
Robinson Crusoe: 

'In the eyes of the individual all wealth was nothing but a 
provision prepared beforehand for the time of need. Even so, 
he already distinguished two elements in this provision . . . one 
part which he budgets to have at hand for immediate or almost 
immediate use, and the other which he will not need until it is 
to afford him new production. Thus one part of his corn must 
feed him until the next harvest, another part, reserved for sow- 
ing, is to bear fruit the following year. The formation of society 
and the introduction of exchange, permit to increase this seed, 
this fertile part of accumulated wealth, almost indefinitely, and 
this is what is called capital. '^ 

Balderdash would be a better name for all this. In using the 
analogy of seed, Sismondi here identifies means of production 
and capital, and this is wrong for two reasons. First, means of 
production are capital not intrinsically, but only under quite 
definite historical conditions; secondly, the concept of capital 
covers more than just the means of production. In capitalist 

^ Nouveaux Principes . . . , vol. i, p. 87. ^ Ibid., pp. 87-8. 

182 



SISMONDI'S THEORY OF REPRODUCTION 

society — with all the conditions Sismondi ignores — the means of 
production arc only a part of capital, i.e. they arc constant 
capital. 

Sismondi here lost his thread plainly because he tried to 
establish a connection between the capital concept and the 
material aspects of social reproduction. Earlier, so long as he 
was concerned with the individual capitalist, he listed means of 
subsistence for the workers together with means of production 
as component parts of capital — again a mistake in view of the 
material aspects of the reproduction of individual capitals. Yet 
as soon as he tries to focus the material foundations of social 
reproduction and sets out to make the correct distinction be- 
tween consumer goods and means of production, the concept of 
capital dissolves in his hands. 

However, Sismondi well knows that the means of production 
are not the sole requisites for production and exploitation; 
indeed, he has the proper instinct that the core of the relation of 
exploitation is the very fact of exchange with living labour. 
Having just reduced capital to constant capital, he now im- 
mediately reduces it exclusively to variable capital: 

'When the farmer has put in reserve all the corn he expects 
to need till the next harvest, he will find a good use for the 
surplus corn: he will feed what he has left over to other people 
who are going to work for him, till his land, spin and weave 
his hemp and wool, etc. ... By this procedure, the farmer con- 
verts a part of his income into capital, and in fact, this is the 
way in which new capital is always formed. . . . The corn he 
has reaped over and above what he must eat while he is work- 
ing, and over and above what he will have to sow in order to 
maintain the same level of exploitation, is wealth which he can 
give away, squander and consume in idleness without becoming 
any poorer; it was income, but as soon as he uses it to feed 
producers, as soon as he exchanges it for labour, or for the fruits 
to come from the work of his labourers, his weavers, his miners, 
it is a permanent value that multiplies and will no longer 
perish; it is capital.'^ 

Here there is some grain mixed up with quite a lot of chaff. 
Constant capital seems still required to maintain production on 
the old scale, although it is strangely reduced to circulating 

1 Ibid., pp. 88-9. 
183 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

capital, and although the reproduction of fixed capital is com- 
pletely ignored. Circulating capital apparently is also super- 
fluous for the expansion of reproduction, for accumulation: the 
whole capitalised part of the surplus value is converted into 
wages for new workers who evidently labour in mid-air, without 
material means of production. The same view is expressed even 
more clearly elsewhere: 

'^Vhen the rich man cuts down his income in order to add to 
his capital, he is thus conferring a benefit on the poor, because 
he himself shares out the annual product; and whatever he calls 
income, he will keep for his own consumption; whatever he calls 
capital, he gives to the poor man to constitute an income for 
him.'i 

Yet at the same time Sismondi gives due weight to the 'secret 
of profit-making' and the origin of capital. Surplus value arises 
from the exchange of capital for labour, from variable capital, 
and capital arises from the accumulation of surplus value. 

With all this, however, we have not made much progress 
towards a distinction between capital and income. Sismondi 
now attempts to represent the various elements of production 
and income in terms of the appropriate parts of the aggregate 
social product. 

'The employer of labour, as also the labourer, does not use 
all his productive wealth for the sowing; he devotes part of it to 
buildings, mills and tools which render the work easier and 
more productive, just as a share of the labourer's wealth had 
been devoted to the permanent work of making the soil more 
fertile. Thus we see how the different kinds of wealth succes- 
sively come into being and become distinct. One part of the 
wealth accumulated by society is devoted by every one who 
possesses it to render labour more profitable by slow con- 
sumption, and make the blind forces of nature execute the work 
of man; this part is called ßxed capital and comprises reclaiming, 
irrigation, factories, the tools of trade, and mechanical contriv- 
ances of every description. A second part of wealth is destined 
for immediate consumption, to reproduce itself in the work it 
gets done, to change its form, though not its value, without 
cease. This part is called circulating capital and it comprises seed, 
raw materials for manufacture, and wages. Finally, a third part 
^ Nouveaux Principes . . . , vol. i, pp. 108-9. 
184 



SISMONDI'S THEORY OF REPRODUCTION 

of wealth becomes distinguishable from the second: it is the 
value by which the finished job exceeds the advances which had 
to be made: this part is called income on capitals and is destined 
to be consumed without reproduction.'^ 

After this laborious attempt to achieve a division of the aggre- 
gate social production according to incommensurable cate- 
gories, fixed capital, circulating capital, and surplus value, 
Sismondi soon shows unmistakable signs that he means constant 
capital when he speaks of fixed capital, and variable capital 
when he speaks of circulating capital. For 'all that is created', is 
destined for human consumption, though fixed capital is con- 
sumed 'mediately' while the circulating capital 'passes into the 
consumption fund of the worker whose wage it forms'. ^ Thus 
we are a little nearer to the division of the social product into 
constant capital (means of production), variable capital (pro- 
visions for the workers) and surplus value (provisions for the 
capitalists). But so far Sismondi's explanations are not parti- 
cularly illuminating on the subject which he himself describes as 
'fundamental'. In this welter of confusion, at any rate, we 
cannot see any progress beyond Adam Smith's 'massive 
thought'. 

Sismondi feels this himself and would clarify the problem 'by 
the simplest of all methods', sighing that 'this movement of 
wealth is so abstract and requires such great power of concentra- 
tion to grasp it properly'. ^ Thus again we put on blinkers with 
a focus on Robinson [Crusoe], who in the meantime has 
changed to the extent that he has produced a family and is now 
a pioneer of colonial policy: 

'A solitary farmer in a distant colony on the border of the 
desert has reaped lOO sacks of corn this year; there is no market 
where to bring them; this corn, in any case, must be consumed 
within the year, else it will be of no value to the farmer; yet the 
farmer and his family eat only 30 sacks of it; this will be his 
expenditure, constituting the exchange of his income; it is not 
reproduced for anybody whatever. Then he will call for workers, 
he will make them clear woods, and drain swamps in his neigh- 
bourhood and put part of the desert under the plough. These 
workers will eat another 30 sacks of corn: this will be their 
expenditure; they will be in a position to afford this expenditure 
1 Ibid., pp. 93-4. 2 Ibid., p. 95. 

185 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

at the price of their revenue, that is to say their labour; for the 
farmer it will be an exchange: he will have converted his 30 
sacks into fixed capital. In the end, he is left with 40 sacks. He 
will sow them that year, instead of the 20 he had sown the pre- 
vious year; this constitutes his circulating capital which he will 
have doubled. Thus the 100 sacks will have been consumed, but 
of these 100 sacks 70 are a real investment for him, which will 
reappear with great increase, some of them at the very next 
harvest, and the others in all subsequent harvests. — The very 
isolation of the farmer we have just assumed gives us a better 
feeling for the limitations of such an operation. If he has only 
found consumers for 60 of the 100 sacks harvested in that year, 
who is going to eat the 200 sacks produced the following year 
by the increase in his sowing? His family, you might say, which 
will increase. No doubt; but human generations do not multiply 
as quickly as subsistence. If our farmer had hands available to 
repeat this assumed process each year, his corn harvest will be 
doubled every year, and his family could at the most be doubled 
once in 25 years. '^ 

Though the example is naive, the vital question stands out 
clearly in the end: where are the buyers for the surplus value 
that has been capitalised? The accumulation of capital can in- 
definitely increase the production of the society. But what about 
the consumption of society? This is determined by the various 
kinds of income. Sismondi explains this important subject in 
chapter v of book ii, 'The Distribution of the National Income 
Among the Various Glasses of Citizens', in a resumed effort to 
describe the components of the social product. 

'Under this aspect, the national income is composed of two 
parts and no more; the one consists in annual production . . . 
the profit arising from wealth. The second is the capacity for 
work which springs from life. This time we understand by 
wealth both territorial possessions and capital, and by profit the 
net income accruing to the owners as well as the profit of the 
capitalist. '2 

Thus all the means of production are separated from the 
national income as 'wealth', and this income is divided into 
surplus value and labour power, or better, its equivalent, the 
variable capital. This, then, though still far too vague, is our 

^ Nouveaux Principes . . . , vol. i, pp. 95-6. '' Ibid., pp. 104-5. 

186 



SISMONDI'S THEORY OF REPRODUCTION 

division into constant capital, variable capital and surplus 
value. But 'national income', it soon transpires, means for 
Sismondi the annual aggregate product of society: 

'Similarly, annual production, or the result of all the nation's 
work in the course of a year, is composed of two parts: one we 
have just discussed — the profit resulting from wealth; the other 
is the capacity for work, which is assumed to equal the part of 
wealth for which it is exchanged, or the subsistence of the 
workers. '1 

The aggregate social product is thus resolved, in terms of 
value, into two parts: variable capital and surplus value — con- 
stant capital has disappeared. We have arrived at Smith's 
dogma that the commodity price is resolved into v-\-s (or is 
composed of v-j-s) — in other words, the aggregate product 
consists solely of consumer goods for workers and capitalists. 

Sismondi then goes on to the problem of realising the aggre- 
gate product. On the one hand, the sum total of incomes in a 
society consists of wages, capital profits and rents, and is thus 
represented by v-\-s; on the other hand, the aggregate social 
product, in terms of value, is equally resolved into v-{-s 'so that 
national income and annual production balance each other 
(and appear as equal quantities)', i.e. so that they must be 
equal in value. 

'Annual production is consumed altogether during the year, 
but in part by the workers who, by exchanging their labour for 
it, convert it into capital and reproduce it; in part by the 
capitalists who, exchanging their income for it, annihilate it. 
The whole of the annual income is destined to be exchanged for 
the whole of annual production.'^ 

This is the basis on which, in the sixth chapter of book ii, 
'On Reciprocal Determination of Production and Consump- 
tion', Sismondi finally sets up the following precise law of repro- 
duction: 'It is the income of the past year which must pay for 
the production of the present year.'^ 

If this is true, how can there be any accumulation of capital? 
If the aggregate product must be completely consumed by the 
workers and capitalists, we obviously remain within the bounds 
of simple reproduction, and there can be no solution to the 
problem of accumulation. Sismondi's theory in fact amounts to 

^ Ibid., p. 105. 2 Ibid., pp. 105-6. 3 Ibid., pp. 113, 120. 

187 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

a denial of the possibility of accumulation. The aggregate social 
demand being the bulk of wages given to the workers and the 
previous consumption of the capitalists, who will be left to buy 
the surplus product if reproduction expands? On this count, 
Sismondi argues that accumulation is objectively impossible, as 
follows: 

'What happens after all is always that we exchange the whole 
of production for the whole production of the previous year. 
Besides, if production gradually increases, the exchange, at the 
same time as it improves future conditions, must entail a small 
loss every year.'^ 

In other words, when the aggregate product is realised, 
accumulation is bound each year to create a surplus that cannot 
be sold. Sismondi, however, is afraid of drawing this final con- 
clusion, and prefers a 'middle course', necessitating a somewhat 
obscure subterfuge: 'If this loss is not heavy, and evenly dis- 
tributed, everyone will bear with it without complaining about 
his income. This is what constitutes the national economy, and 
the series of such small sacrifices increases capital and common 
wealth.' 1 

If, on the other hand, there is ruthless accumulation, this 
surplus residue becomes a public calamity, and the result is a 
crisis. Thus a petty-bourgeois subterfuge becomes the solution of 
Sismondi: putting the dampers on accumulation. He constantly 
polemises against the classical school which advocates un- 
restricted development of the productive forces and expan- 
sion of production; and his whole work is a warning against 
the fatal consequences of giving full rein to the desire to 
accumulate. 

Sismondi's exposition proves that he was unable to grasp the 
reproductive process as a whole. Quite apart from his unsuccess- 
ful attempt to distinguish between the categories of capital and 
income from the point of view of society, his theory of reproduc- 
tion suffers from the fundamental error he took over from Adam 
Smith: the idea that personal consumption absorbs the entire 
annual product, without leaving any part of the value for the 
renewal of society's constant capital, and also, that accumu- 
lation consists merely of the transformation of capitalised surplus 
value into variable capital. Yet, if later critics of Sismondi, e.g. 

' Nouieaux Principes . . . , vol. i, p. I2i. 

1 88 



SISMONDI'S THEORY OF REPRODUCTION 

the Russian Marxist Ilyin,^ think that pointing out this funda- 
mental error in the analysis of the aggregate product can justify 
a cavalier dismissal of Sismondi's entire theory of accumulation 
as inadequate, as 'nonsense', they merely demonstrate their own 
obtuseness in respect of Sismondi's real concern, his ultimate 
problem. The analysis of Marx at a later date, showing up the 
crude mistakes of Adam Smith for the first time, is the best 
proof that the problem of accumulation is far from solved just 
by attending to the ecjuivalent of the constant capital in the 
aggregate product. This is proved even more strikingly in the 
actual development of Sismondi's theory: his views involved 
him in bitter controversy with the exponents and popularisers of 
the classical school, with Ricardo, Say and MacCulloch. The 
two parties to the conflict represent diametrically opposed 
points of view: Sismondi stands for the sheer impossibility, the 
others for the unrestricted possibility, of accumulation. Sismondi 
and his opponents alike disregard constant capital in their ex- 
position of reproduction, and it was Say in particular who 
presumed to perpetuate Adam Smith's confused concept of the 
aggregate product as v -\-s as an unassailable dogma. 

The knowledge we owe to Marx that the aggregate product 
must, apart from consumer goods for the workers and capitalists 
{v-\-s), also contain means of production to renew what has 
been used, that accumulation accordingly consists not merely 
in the enlargement of variable but also of constant capital, is 
not enough, as amply demonstrated by this entertaining turn 
of events, to solve the problem of accumulation. Later we shall 
see how this stress on the share of constant capital in the repro- 
ductive process gave rise to new fallacies in the theory of 
accumulation. At present it will suffice to put on record that the 
deference to Smith's error about the reproduction of aggregate 
capital is not a weakness unique to Sismondi's position but is 
rather the common ground on which the first controversy about 
the problem of accumulation was fought out. Scientific research, 
not only in this sphere, proceeds in devious ways; it often tackles 
the upper storeys of the edifice, as it were, without making sure 
of the foundations; and so this conflict only resulted in that 
bourgeois economics took on the further complicated problem 
of accumulation without even having assimilated the elementary 
^ Vladimir Ilyich [Lenin], Economic Studies and Essays, St. Petersburg, i8gg. 

189 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

problem of simple reproduction. At all events, Sismondi, in his 
critique of accumulation, had indubitably given bourgeois 
economics a hard nut to crack — seeing that in spite of his trans- 
parently feeble and awkward deductions, Sismondi's opponents 
were still unable to get the better of him. 



190 



CHAPTER XI 
MacGULLOCH v. SISMONDI 

SiSMONDi's emphatic warnings against the ruthless ascend- 
ancy of capital in Europe called forth severe opposition on 
three sides: in England the school of Ricardo, in France 
J. B. Say, the commonplace vulgariser of Adam Smith, and the 
St. Simonians. While Owen in England, profoundly aware of 
the dark aspects of the industrial system and of the crises in 
particular, saw eye to eye with Sismondi in many respects, the 
school of that other great European, St. Simon, who had 
stressed the world-embracing conception of large industrial 
expansion, the unlimited unfolding of the productive forces of 
human labour, felt perturbed by Sismondi's alarms. Here, how- 
ever, we are interested in the controversy between Sismondi and 
the Ricardians which proved the most fruitful from the theoreti- 
cal point of view. In the name of Ricardo, and, it seemed, with 
Ricardo's personal approval, MacCulloch anonymously pub- 
lished a polemical article^ against Sismondi in the Edinburgh 

^ The article in the Edinburgh Review was really directed against Owen, 
sharply attacking on 24 pages of print the latter 's four treatises: (i) 'A New 
View of Society, or Essays on the formation of Human Character', (2) 
'Observations on the Effects of the Manufacturing System', (3) 'Two 
Memorials on Behalf of the Working Classes, Presented to the Governments 
of America and Europe', and finally (4) 'Three Tracts' and 'An Account of 
Public Proceedings relative to the Employment of the Poor'. 'Anonymous' 
here attempts a detailed proof that Owen's reformist ideas by no means get 
down to the real causes of the misery of the English proletariat, these causes 
being: the transition to the cultivation of barren land (Ricardo's theory of 
ground rent!), the corn laws and high taxation pressing upon farmer and 
manufacturer alike. Free trade and laissez-faire thus is his alpha and omega. 
Given unrestricted accumulation, all increase in production will create for 
itself an increase in demand. Owen is accused of 'profound ignorance' as 
regards Say and James Mill. — 'In his reasonings, as well as in his plans, Mr. 
Owen shows himself profoundly ignorant of all the laws which regulate the 
production and distribution of wealth.' — From Owen, the author proceeds 
to Sismondi and formulates the point of contention as follows: 'He [Owen] 
conceives that when competition is unchecked by any artificial regulations, 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

Review in October 1819, i.e. immediately after the publication 
of the Xouveaux Principes. 

In 1820, Sismondi replied in Rossi's Annales de Jurisprudence 
with an essay entitled: 'Does the Power of Consuming Neces- 
sarily Increase with the Power to Produce? An Enquiry.'^ 

In his reply Sismondi- himself states that his polemics were 
conceived under the impact of the commercial crisis: 'This 
truth we are both looking for, is of utmost importance under 
present conditions. It may be considered as fundamental for 
economics. Universal distress is in evidence in the trade, in 
industry and, in many countries certainly, even in agriculture. 
Such prolonged and extraordinary suffering has brought mis- 
fortune to countless families and insecurity and despondency to 
all, until it threatens the very bases of the social order. Two 
contrasting explanations have been advanced for the distress 
that has caused such a stir. Some say: we have produced too 
much, and others: we have not produced enough. "There will 
be no equilibrium," say the former, "no peace and no pros- 
perity until we consume the entire commodity surplus which 
remains unsold on the market, until we organise production for 
the future in accordance with the buyers' demand." — "There 
will be a new equilibrium," say the latter, "if only we double 
our efforts to accumulate as well as to produce. It is a mistake 
to believe that there is a glut on the market; no more than half 
our warehouses are full; let us fill the other half, too, and the 
mutual exchange of these new riches will revive our trade." ''^ 

and industry permitted to flow in its natural channels, the use of machi„^i7 
may increase the supply of the several articles of wealth beyond the demand 
for them, and by creating an excess of all commodities, throw the working 
classes out of employment. This is the position which we hold to be funda- 
mentally erroneous; and as it is strongly insisted on by the celebrated M. de 
Sismondi in his Nouveaux Principes d'Economie Politique, we must entreat the 
indulgence of our readers while we endeavour to point out its fallacy, and to 
demonstrate, that the power of consuming necessarily increases with every 
increase in the power of producing' (Edinburgh Review, Oct. 18 19, p. 470). 

^ The original title is: Examen de cette question: Le pouvoir de consommer 
5'' accroit-il toujours dans la societe avec le pouvoir de produire? We have not been 
able to obtain a copy of Rossi's Annales, but the essay as a whole was incor- 
porated by Sismondi in the second edition of his Nouveaux Principes. 

^ At the time of writing, Sismondi was still in the dark as to the identity 
of 'Anonymous' in the Edinburgh Review. 

3 Sismondi, op. cit., vol. ii, pp. 376-8. 

iqa 



MacCULLOCH v. sismondi 

In this supremely lucid way, Sismondi sets out and underlines 
the real crux of the dispute. MacCulloch's whole position in 
truth stands or falls with the statement that exchange is actually 
an interchange of commodities; every commodity accordingly 
represents not only supply but demand. The dialogue then 
continues as follows: 

'Demand and supply are truly correlative and convertible 
terms. The supply of one set of commodities constitutes the 
demand for another. Thus, there is a demand for a given 
quantity of agricultural produce, when a quantity of wrought 
goods equal thereto in productive cost is offered in exchange for 
it; and conversely, there is an effectual demand for this quantity 
of wrought goods, when the supply of agricultural produce 
which it required the same expense to raise, is presented as its 
equivalent.'^ 

The Ricardian's dodge is obvious: he has chosen to ignore the 
circulation of money and to pretend that commodities are im- 
mediately bought and paid for by commodities. 

From the conditions of highly developed capitalist produc- 
tion, we are thus suddenly taken to a stage of primitive barter 
such as we might find still flourishing at present in Central 
Africa. There is a distant element of truth in this trick since 
money, in a simple circulation of commodities, plays merely the 
part of an agent. But of course, it is just the intervention of an 
agent which separates the two transactions of circulation, sale 
and purchase, and makes them independent of one another in 
respect of both time and place. That is why a further purchase 
need not follow hard upon a sale for one thing; and secondly, 
sale and purchase are by no means bound up with the same 
people: in fact, they will involve the same performers only in 
rare and exceptional cases. MacCulloch, however, makes just 
this baseless assumption by confronting, as buyer and seller, 
industry on the one hand and agriculture on the other. The 
universality of these categories, qua total categories of exchange, 
obscures the actual splitting up of this social division of labour 
which results in innumerable private exchange transactions 
where the sale and purchase of two commodities rarely come to 
the same thing. MacCulloch's simplified conception of com- 
modity exchange in general which immediately turns the 
^ MacCulloch, loc. cit., p. 470 
A.C. 193 G 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

commodity into money and pretends that it can be directly 
exchanged, makes it impossible to understand the economic 
significance of money, its historical appearance. 

Sismondi's answer to this is regrettably clumsy. In order to 
show that MacCulloch's explanation of commodity exchange 
has no application for capitalist production, he takes recourse 
to the Leipsic Book Fair.^ 

'At the Book Fair of Leipsic, booksellers from all over Ger- 
many arrive, each with four or five publications of his own in 
some 40 or 50 dozen copies; these are exchanged for others and 
every seller takes home 200 dozen books, just as he has brought 
200 dozen, with the sole difference, that he brought four differ- 
ent works and takes home 200. This is the demand and the 
production which, according to M. Ricardo's disciple, are cor- 
relative and convertible; one buys the other, one pays for the 
other, one is the consequence of the other. But as far as we 
are concerned, for the bookseller and for the general public, 
demand and consumption have not even begun. For all that it 
has changed hands at Leipsic, a bad book will still be just as 
unsold (a bad mistake of Sismondi's, this!), it will still clutter 
up the merchants' shops, either because nobody wants it, or 
because everyone has a copy already. The books exchanged at 
Leipsic will only sell if the booksellers can find individuals who 
not only want them but are also prepared to make sacrifices in 
order to withdraw them from circulation. They alone constitute 
an effective demand. '^ 

Although this example is rather crude, it shows clearly that 
Sismondi was not side-tracked by his opponent's trick, that he 
knows after all what he is talking about. 

MacCulloch then attempts to turn the examination from 
abstract commodity exchange to concrete social conditions: 
'Supposing, for the sake of illustration, that a cultivator 

^ Incidentally, Sismondi's Leipsic Book Fair, as a microcosm of the 
capitalist world, has staged a come-back after 55 years — in Eugen Dueh- 
ring's 'system'. Engels, in his devastating criticism of that unfortunate 
'universal genius' adduces this idea as proof that Duchring, by attempting 
to elucidate a real industrial crisis by means of an imaginary one on the 
Leipsic Book Fair, a storm at sea by a storm in a teacup, has shown himself a 
'real German literatus'. But, as in many other instances exposed by Engels, the 
great thinker has simply borrowed here from someone else on the sly. 

* Sismondi, op. cit., vol. ii, pp. 381-2. 



MagCULLOCH v. sismondi 

advanced food and clothing for loo labourers, who raised for 
himyboö^for 200; while a master-manufacturer also advanced 
food and clothing for 100, who fabricated for him clothing for 
200. Then the farmer, besides replacing the food of his own 
labourers, would have food for 100 to dispose of; while the 
manufacturer, after replacing the clothing of his own labourers, 
would have clothing for 100 to bring to market. In this case, the 
two articles would be exchanged against each other, the supply 
of food constituting the demand for the clothing, and that of the 
clothing the demand for the food.'^ 

What are we to admire more in this hypothesis: the absurdity 
of the set-up which reverses all actual relations, or the effrontery 
which simply takes for granted in the premises all that is later 
claimed proven? In order to prove that it is always possible to 
create an unlimited demand for all kinds of goods, MacCulloch 
chooses for his example two commodities which pertain to the 
most urgent and elementary wants of every human being: food 
and clothing. In order to prove that commodities may be 
exchanged at any time, and without regard to the needs of 
society, he chooses for his example two products in quantities 
which are right from the start in strict conformity with these 
needs, and which therefore contain no surplus as far as society 
is concerned. And yet he calls this quantity needed by society 
a surplus — viz. as measured against the producer's personal 
requirements for his own product, and is consequently able to 
demonstrate brilliantly that any amount of commodity 'sur- 
plus' can be exchanged for a corresponding 'surplus' of other 
commodities. Finally, in order to prove that different privately 
produced commodities can yet be exchanged, although their 
quantity, production costs and social importance must of course 
be different, he chooses for his example commodities whose 
quantity, production cost and general social necessity are pre- 
cisely the same right from the start. In short, MacCulloch posits 
a planned, strictly regulated production without any over- 
production in order to prove that no crisis is possible in an 
unplanned private economy. 

The principal joke of canny Mac, however, lies elsewhere. 

What is at issue is the problem of accumulation. Sismondi was 

worried by, and worried Ricardo and his followers with, the 

* MacCulloch, loc. cit.j p. 470. 

195 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

following question: if part of the surplus value is capitalised, i.e. 
used to expand production over and above the income of 
society, instead of being privately consumed by the capitalists, 
where are we to find buyers for the commodity surplus? What 
will become of the capitalised surplus value? Who will buy 
the commodities in which it is hidden? Thus Sismondi. And 
the flower of Ricardo's school, its official representative on the 
Chair of London University, the authority for the then English 
Ministers of the Liberal Party and for the City of London, the 
great Mr. MacCulloch replies — by constructing an example in 
which no surplus value whatever is produced. His 'capitalists' 
slave away in agriculture and industry in the name of charity, 
and all the time the entire social product, including the 'sur- 
plus ', is only enough for the needs of the workers, for the wages, 
while the 'farmer' and 'manufacturer' see to production and 
exchange without food and clothing. 

Sismondi, justly impatient, now exclaims: 'The moment we 
want to find out what is to constitute the surplus of production 
over consumption of the workers, it will not do to abstract 
from that surplus which forms the due profit of labour and the 
due share of the master.'^ 

MacCulloch's only reaction is to multiply his silly argument 
by a thousand. He asks the reader to assume 'i,ooo farmers', and 
'also 1,000 master-manufacturers' all acting as ingenuously as 
the individuals. The exchange, then, proceeds as smoothly as 
can be desired. Finally, he exactly doubles labour productivity 
'in consequence of more skilful application of labour and of the 
introduction of machinery — thus that every one of the i,ooo 
farmers, by advancing food and clothing for lOO labourers, 
obtains a return consisting of ordinary food for 200 together 
with sugar, grapes and tobacco equal in production cost to that 
food', while every manufacturer obtains, by an analogous pro- 
cedure, in addition to the previous quantity of clothing for all 
workers, 'ribbands, cambrics and lace, equal in productive cost, 
and therefore in exchangeable value, to that clothing'. ^ After 
such complete reversal of the chronological order, the assump- 
tion, that is, of first the existence of private property with wage 
labour, and then, at a later stage, such level of labour produc- 
tivity as makes exploitation possible at all, he now assumes 

* Sismondi, op. cit., vol. ii, p. 384. ^ MacCulloch, loc. cit., p. 471, 

196 



MacCULLOCH v. sismondi 

labour productivity to progress with equal speed in all spheres, 
the surplus product to contain precisely the same amount of 
value in all branches of industry, and to be divided among 
precisely the same number of people. When these various sur- 
plus products are then exchanged against one another, is it any 
wonder that the exchange proceeds smoothly and completely to 
everybody's satisfaction? It is only another of his many absurdi- 
ties that MacCulloch makes the capitalists who had hitherto 
lived on air and exercised their profession in their birthday suits, 
now live exclusively on sugar, tobacco and wine, and array 
themselves only in ribbons, cambrics and lace. 

The most ridiculous performance, however, is the volte-face by 
which he evades the real problem. The question had been what 
happens to the capitalist surplus, that surplus which is used not 
for the capitalist's own consumption but for the expansion of 
production. MacCulloch solves it on the one hand by ignoring 
the production of surplus value altogether, and on the other, by 
using all surplus value in the production of luxury goods. What 
buyers, then, does he advance for this new luxury production? 
The capitalists, evidently; the farmers and manufacturers, since, 
apart from these, there are only workers in MacCulloch's 
model. Thus the entire surplus value is consumed for the 
personal satisfaction of the capitalists, that is to say, simple re- 
production takes place. The answer to the problem of the 
capitalisation of surplus value is, according to MacCulloch, 
either to ignore surplus value altogether, or to assume simple 
reproduction instead of accumulation as soon as surplus value 
comes into being. He still pretends to speak of expanding repro- 
duction, but again, as before when he pretended to deal with 
the 'surplus', he uses a trick, viz. first setting out an impossible 
species of capitalist production without any surplus value, and 
then persuading the reader that the subsequent de'but of the 
surplus value constitutes an expansion of production. 

Sismondi is not quite up to these Scottish acrobatics. He had 
up to now succeeded in pinning his Mac down, proving him to 
be 'obviously absurd'. But now he himself becomes confused 
with regard to the crucial point at issue. On the above rantings 
of his opponent, he should have declared coldly: Sir, with all 
respect for the flexibility of your mind, you are dodging the 
issue. I keep on asking, who will buy the surplus product, if the 

197 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

capitalists use it for the purpose of accumulation, i.e. to expand 
production, instead of squandering it altogether? And you 
reply: Oh well, they will expand their production of luxury 
goods, which they will, of course, eat up themselves. But this is 
a conjuring trick, seeing that the capitalists consume the surplus 
value in so far as they spend it on their luxuries — they do not 
accumulate at all. My question is about the possibility of 
accumulation, not whether the personal luxuries of the capit- 
alists are possible. Answer this clearly, if you can, or else go 
play with your wine and tobacco, or go to blazes for all 
I care. 

But Sismondi, instead of putting the screws on the vulgariser, 
suddenly begins to moralise with pathos and social conscience. 
He exclaims: 'Whose demand? Whose satisfaction? The masters 
or the workers in town or country? On this new conception [of 
Mac's] there is a surplus of products, an advantage from labour 
— to whom will it accrue?'^ and gives his own answer in the 
following impassioned words: 'But we know full well, and the 
history of the commercial world teaches us all too thoroughly, 
that it is not the worker who profits from the increase in pro- 
ducts and labour; his pay is not in the least swelled by it. M. 
Ricardo himself said formerly that it ought not to be, unless you 
want the social wealth to stop growing. On the contrary, sorry 
experience teaches us that wages nearly always contract by very 
reason of this increase. Where, then, does the accumulation of 
wealth make itself felt as a public benefit? Our author assumes 
1,000 farmers who profit, while 100,000 workers toil; 1,000 
entrepreneurs who wax rich, while 100,000 artisans are kept 
under their orders. Whatever good may result from the accumu- 
lation of the frivolous enjoyment of luxuries is only felt by a 
1 00th part of the nation. And will this looth part, called upon 
to consume the entire surplus product of the whole working 
class, be adequate to a production that may grow without let or 
hindrance, owing to progress of machinery and capitals? In the 
assumption made by the author, every time the national pro- 
duct is doubled, the master of the farm or of the factory must 
increase his consumption a hundredfold; if the national wealth 
to-day, thanks to the invention of so many machines, is a 
hundred times what it was when it only covered the cost of pro- 
^ Sismondi, op. cit., vol. ii, pp. 394-5. 
198 



MacCULLOCH v. sismondi 

auction, every employer would to-day have to consume enough 
products to support 10,000 workers.'^ 

At this point Sismondi again believes himself to have a firm 
grasp on how crises begin to arise: 'We might imagine, if put to 
it, that a rich man can consume the goods manufactured by 
10,000 workers, this being the fate of the ribbons, lace and 
cambrics whose origin the author has shown us. But a single 
individual would not know how to consume agricultural pro- 
ducts to the same tune, the wines, sugar and spices which 
M. Ricardo [whom Sismondi evidently suspected of having 
written the article since he only got to know 'Anonymous' of the 
Edinburgh Review at a later date] conjures up in exchange, are 
too much for the table of one man. They will not sell, or else the 
strict proportion between agricultural and industrial products, 
apparently the basis of his whole system, cannot be maintained.' ^ 

Sismondi, we see, has thus fallen into MacCulloch's trap. 
Instead of waiving an answer to the problem of accumulation 
which refers to the production of luxuries, he pursues his oppo- 
nent into this field without noticing that the ground under his 
feet has shifted. Here he finds two causes for complaint. For one 
thing, he has moral objections to MacCulloch's allowing the 
capitalists instead of the workers to benefit by the surplus value, 
and is side-tracked into polemising against distribution under 
capitalism. From this digression, he unexpectedly reverts to the 
original problem which he now formulates as follows: the capit- 
alists, then, consume the entire surplus value in luxuries. Let it 
be so. But could anyone increase his consumption as rapidly 
and indefinitely as the progress of labour productivity makes the 
surplus value increase? And in this second instance, Sismondi 
himself abandons his own problem. Instead of perceiving that it 
is the lack of consumers other than workers and capitalists 
which accounts for the difficulty in capitalist accumulation, he 
discovers a snag in simple reproduction because the capitalists' 
capacity to consume has physical limits. Since the absorptive 
capacity of the capitalists for luxuries cannot keep up with 
labour productivity, that is to say with the increase in surplus 
value, there must be crises and over-production. We have 
encountered this line of thought once before in the Nouveaux 
Principes — so Sismondi himself was manifestly not quite clear 
1 Ibid., pp. 396-7. 2 ibjd^ pp 397-8. 

199 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

about the problem at all times. And that is hardly surprising, 
since one can really come to grips with the whole problem of 
accumulation only when one has fully grasped the problem of 
simple reproduction, and we have seen how much Sismondi was 
at fault in this respect. 

Yet in spite of all this, the first time that Sismondi crossed 
swords with the heirs of the classical school, he proved himself 
by no means the weaker party. On the contrary, in the end he 
routed his opponent. If Sismondi misunderstood the most 
elementary principles of social reproduction and ignored con- 
stant capital, quite in keeping with Adam Smith's dogma, he 
was in this respect no worse at any rate than his opponent. Con- 
stant capital does not exist for MacCulloch either, his farmers 
and manufacturers 'advance' merely food and clothing to their 
workers, and food and clothing between them make up the 
aggregate product of society. If there is, then, nothing to choose 
between the two as far as this elementary blunder is concerned, 
Sismondi towers heads above Mac because of his intuitive 
understanding of the contradictions in the capitalist mode of 
production. In the end, the Ricardian was at a loss to answer 
Sismondi's scepticism concerning the possibility of realising the 
surplus value. Sismondi also shows himself more penetrating in 
that he throws the Nottingham proletarians' cry of distress in 
the teeth of the apostles and apologists of harmony with their 
smug complacency, of those who deny 'any surplus of produc- 
tion over demand, any congestion of the market, any suffering', 
when he proves that the introduction of the machine must of 
necessity create a 'superabundant population', and particularly 
in the end, when he underlines the tendency of the capitalist 
world market in general with its inherent contradictions. Mac- 
Culloch denies outright that general over-production is possible. 
He has a specific for every partial over-production up his sleeve: 

'It may be objected, perhaps, that on the principle that the 
demand for commodities increases in the same ratio as their 
supply, there is no accounting for the gluts and stagnation pro- 
duced by overtrading. We answer very easily — A glut is an 
increase in the supply of a particular class of commodities, un- 
accompanied by a corresponding increase in the supply of those 
other commodities which should serve as their equivalents. 
While our 1,000 farmers and 1,000 master-manufacturers arc 

200 



MacCULLOCH v. sismondi 

exchanging their respective surplus products, and reciprocally 
affording a market to each other, if i,ooo new capitalists were 
to join their society, employing each loo labourers in tillage, 
there would be an immediate glut in agricultural jjroduce . . . 
because in this case there would be no contemporaneous in- 
crease in the supply of the manufactured articles which should 
purchase it. But let one half of the new capitalists become 
manufacturers, and equivalents in the form of wrought goods 
will be created for the new produce raised by the other half: 
the equilibrium will be restored, and the 1,500 farmers and 
1,500 master-manufacturers will exchange their respective 
surplus products with exactly the same facility with which the 
1,000 farmers and 1,000 manufacturers formerly exchanged 
theirs.'^ 

Sismondi answers this buffoonery which 'very easily' pokes 
about in a fog, by pointing to the real changes and revolutions 
which take place before his own eyes. 'It was possible to put 
barbarous countries under the plough, and political revolutions, 
changes in the financial system, and peace, at once brought 
cargoes to the ports of the old agricultural countries which 
almost equalled their entire harvest. The recent Russian con- 
quest of the vast provinces on the Black Sea, the change in the 
system of government in Egypt, and the outlawing of piracy 
in High Barbary, have suddenly poured the granaries of Odessa, 
Alexandria and Tunis into the Italian ports and have put such 
an abundance of corn on the markets that all along the coasts 
the farmer's trade is fighting a losing battle. Nor is the re- 
mainder of Europe safe from a similar revolution, caused by the 
simultaneous ploughing under of immense expanses of new land 
on the banks of the Mississippi, which export all their agricul- 
tural produce. Even the influence of New Holland may one 
day be the ruin of English industry, if not in the price of food- 
stuffs, which are too expensive to transport, at least in respect of 
wool and other agricultural products which are easier to 
transport.'^ 

What would MacCulloch have to advise in view of such an 
agrarian crisis in Southern Europe? That half the new farmers 
should turn manufacturer. Whereupon Sismondi counters: 

^ MacCulloch, loc. cit., pp. 471-2. 
^ Sismondi, op. cit., vol. ii, pp. 400-1. 
201 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

'Such counsel cannot seriously apply to the Tartars of the 
Crimea or to the fellaheen of Egypt.' And he adds: 'The time 
is not yet ripe to set up new industries in the regions overseas or 
in New Holland. '^ 

Sismondi's acuity recognised that industrialisation of the 
lands overseas was only a matter of time. He was equally aware 
of the fact that the expansion of the world market would not 
bring with it the solution to the difficulty but would only repro- 
duce it in a higher degree, in yet more potent crises. His pre- 
diction for the expansive tendency of capitalism is that it will 
reveal an aspect of fiercer and fiercer competition, of mounting 
anarchy within production itself. Indeed, he puts his finger on 
the fundamental causes of crises in a passage where he states the 
trend of capitalist production precisely as surpassing all limits of 
the market. At the end of his reply to MacCulloch he says: 
'Time and again it has been proclaimed that the equilibrium 
will re-establish itself, that work will start again, but a single 
demand each time provides an impetus in excess of the real 
needs of trade, and this new activity must soon be followed by a 
yet more painful glut.'^ 

To such a profound grasp of the real contradictions in the 
movements of capital, the vulgarus on the Chair of London 
University with his harmony cant and his country-dance of 
1,000 beribboned farmers and i,ooo bibulous manufacturers 
could find no effective answer. 

^ Sismondi, op. cit., vol. ii, p. 401. ^ Ibid., pp. 405-6. 



202 



CHAPTER XII 
RICARDO V. SISMONDI 

MacCulloch's reply to Sismondi's theoretical objec- 
tions evidently did not settle the matter to Ricardo's 
own satisfaction. Unlike that shrewd 'Scottish arch- 
humbug', as Marx calls him, Ricardo really wanted to discover 
the truth and throughout retained the genuine modesty of a 
great mind.^ That Sismondi's polemics against him and his 
pupil had made a deep impression is proved by Ricardo's re- 
vised approach to the question of the effects of the machine, 
that being the point on which Sismondi, to his eternal credit, 
had confronted the classical school of harmony with the sinister 
aspects of capitalism. Ricardo's followers had enlarged upon the 
doctrine that the machine can always create as many or even 
more opportunities for the wage labourers as it takes away by 
displacing living labour. This so-called theory of compensation 
was subjected to a stern attack by Sismondi in the chapter 'On 
the Division of Labour and Machinery ' ^ and in another chapter 
significantly entitled: 'Machinery Creates a Surplus Popula- 
tion',^ both published in the Nouveaux Principes of 1819, two 
years later than Ricardo's main work. In 1821, after the Mac- 
Culloch-Sismondi controversy, Ricardo inserted a new chapter 
in the third edition of his Principles, where he frankly confesses 
to his error and says in the strain of Sismondi: 'That the opinion 
entertained by the labouring classes, that the employment of 

^ It is typical that on his election to Parliament in 18 ig, when he already 
enjoyed the highest reputation on account of his economic writings, Ricardo 
wrote to a friend: 'You will have seen that I have taken my seat in the 
House of Commons. I fear I shall be of little use there. I have twice 
attempted to speak but I proceeded in the most embarrassed manner, and I 
have no hope of conquering the alarm with which I am assailed the moment 
I hear the sound of my own voice' {Letters of D. Ricardo to J. R. AiacCulloch, 
N.Y., 1895, pp. 23-4). Such diffidence was quite unknown to the gasbag 
MacCulloch. 2 Jsfouveanx Principes . . ., book iv, chap. vii. 

^ Ibid., book vii, chap. vii. 

203 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

machinery is frequently detrimental to their interests, is not 
founded on prejudice and error, but is conformable to the 
correct principles of political economy.'^ 

He, like Sismondi, had to defend himself against the suspicion 
that he is opposing technical progress, but, less ruthless, he com- 
promises with the evasion that the evil emerges only gradually. 
'To elucidate the principle, I have been supposing, that im- 
proved machinery is suddenly discovered, and extensively used; 
but the truth is, that these discoveries are gradual, and rather 
operate in determining the employment of the capital which is 
saved and accumulated, than in diverting capital from its actual 
employment. '2 

Yet the problem of crises and accumulation continued to 
worry Ricardo also. In 1823, the last year of his life, he spent 
some days in Geneva in order to talk the problem over face to 
face with Sismondi. The result of these talks is Sismondi's essay 
'On the Balance Between Consumption and Production', pub- 
lished in the Revue Encyclopedique of May 1824.^ 

In his Principles, Ricardo had at the crucial points completely 
accepted Say's trite doctrine of harmony in the relations be- 
tween production and consumption. In chapter xxi he had 
declared: 'M. Say has, however, most satisfactorily shown, that 
there is no amount of capital which may not be employed in a 
country, because demand is only limited by production. No 
man produces, but with a view to consume or sell, and he never 
sells, but with an intention to purchase some other commodity, 
which may be immediately useful to him, or which may con- 
tribute to future production. By producing, then, he necessarily 

^ D. Ricardo, On the Principles of Political Economy and Taxation (3rd 
edition, London, 182 1), p. 474. ^ Ibid., p. 478. 

^ This essay, Sur la Balance des Consommations avec les Productions, is re- 
printed in the second edition of Nouveaux Principes, vol. ii, pp. 408 ff. 
Sismondi tells us about this discussion: 'M. Ricardo, whose recent death 
has been a profound bereavement not only to his friends and family but 
to all those whom he enlightened by his brilliance, all those whom he 
inspired by his lofty sentiments, stayed for some days in Geneva in the last 
year of his life. We discussed in two or three sessions this fundamental 
question on which we disagreed. To this enquiry he brought the urbanity, 
the good faith, the love of truth which distinguished him, and a clarity 
which his disciples themselves had not heard, accustomed as they were to the 
efforts of abstract thought he demanded in the lecture room.' 

204 



RICARDO V. SISMONDI 

becomes either the consumer of his own goods, or the purchaser 
and consumer of the goods of some other person.'' 

To tliis conception of Ricardo's, Sismondi's Mouveaux Principes 
were a powerful challenge, and the dispute as a whole turned 
also on this point. Ricardo could not deny the fact of crises 
which had but recently passed over England and other coun- 
tries. What was at issue was the explanation for them. Right at 
the outset of their debate, Sismondi and Ricardo had agreed on 
a remarkably lucid and precise formulation of the problem, 
excluding the question of foreign commerce altogether. Sis- 
mondi grasped the significance and necessity of foreign trade for 
capitalist production, its need for expansion, well enough; in 
this line he was quite in step with Ricardo's Free Traders, 
whom he considerably excelled in his dialectical conception of 
the expansionist needs of capital. He fully admitted that in- 
dustry 'is increasingly led to look for its vents on foreign markets 
where it is threatened by greater revolutions'. ^ He forecast, as 
we have seen, the rise of a dangerous competition for European 
industry in the overseas countries. This was after all a creditable 
achievement in the year 1820, and one which reveals Sismondi's 
deep insight into the relations of capitalist world economy. But 
even so, Sismondi was in fact far from conceiving the problem 
of realising the surplus value, the problem of accumulation, to 
depend on foreign commerce as its only means of salvation, a 
view attributed to him by later critics. On the contrary, Sis- 
mondi was quite explicit in the sixth chapter of volume i:^ 'In 
order to make these calculations with greater certainty and to 
simplify these questions, we have hitherto made complete 
abstraction from foreign trade and supposed an isolated nation; 
this isolated nation is human society itself, and what is true for a 
nation without foreign commerce, is equally true for mankind.' 

In other words: in considering the entire world market as one 
society producing exclusively by capitalist methods, Sismondi 
grounds his problem in the same premises as Marx was to do 
after him. That was also the basis on which he came to terms 
with Ricardo. 'From the question that troubled us, we had each 
of us dismissed the instance of a nation that sold more abroad 

^ Ricardo, op. cit., p. 339. ^ Sismondi, op. cit., vol. ii, p. 361. 

^ Nouveaux Principes , , , , book iv, chap, iv; 'Comment la Richesse commer- 
ciale suit I'Accroissement du Revenu' (vol. i, p. 115). 

205 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

than it needed to buy there, that could command a growing 
external market for its growing internal production. In any case, 
it is not for us to decide whether fortunes of war or politics 
could perhaps bring forth new consumers for a nation — what is 
needed is proof that a nation can create these for itself simply by 
increasing its production.'^ 

This is how Sismondi formulated the problem of realising the 
surplus value in all precision, just as it confronts us throughout 
the ensuing era in economics, in contrast with Ricardo who 
actually maintains along with Say, as we are already aware and 
shall show in further detail, that production creates its own 
demand. 

Ricardo's thesis in the controversy with Sismondi takes the 
following form: 'Supposing that loo workers produce i,ooo 
sacks of corn, and loo weavers i,ooo yards woollen fabric. Let 
us disregard all other products useful to man and all inter- 
mediaries between them, and consider them alone in the world. 
They exchange their i,ooo yards against the i,ooo sacks. Sup- 
posing that the productive power of labour has increased by a 
tenth owing to a successive progress of industry, the same people 
will exchange i,ioo yards against i,ioo sacks, and each will 
be better clothed and fed; new progress will make them ex- 
change 1,200 yards for 1,200 sacks, and so on. The increase in 
products always only increases the enjoyment of those who 
produce. '- 

The great Ricardo's standards of reasoning, it must regret- 
fully be stated, are if anything even lower than those of the 
Scottish arch-humbug, MacCulloch. Once again we are invited 
to witness a harmonious and graceful country-dance of sacks 
and yards — the very proportion which is to be proved, is again 
taken for granted. What is more, all relevant premises for the 
problem are simply left out. The real problem — you will re- 
collect — the object of the controversy had been the question: 
who are the buyers and consumers of the surplus product that 
comes into being if the capitalists produce more goods than are 
needed for their own and their workers' consumption; if, that 
is to say, they capitalise part of their surplus value and use it 
to expand production, to increase their capital? Ricardo answers 
it by completely ignoring the capital increase. The picture he 
^ Sismondi, op. cit., vol. ii, p. 412. ^ Ibid., p. 41Ü. 

206 



RICARDO V. SISMONDI 

paints of the various stages of production is merely that of a 
gradually increasing productivity of labour. According to his 
assumptions, the same amount of labour first produces i,ooo 
sacks and i,ooo yards textiles, then i,ioo sacks and i,ioo yards, 
further 1,200 sacks and 1,200 yards, and so on, in a gracefully 
ascending curve. Not only that the image of a marshalled 
uniform progression on both sides, of conformity even in the 
number of objects brought to exchange, is wearisome, the 
expansion of capital is nowhere as much as mentioned in the 
model. Here we have no enlarged but simple reproduction with 
a greater bulk of use-values indeed, but without any increase 
in the value of the aggregate social product. Since only the 
amount of value, not the number of use-values is relevant to 
the exchange transaction, and this amount remains constant in 
the example, Ricardo makes no real advances, even though he 
seems to analyse the progressive expansion of production. 
Finally, he is quite oblivious of the relevant categories of repro- 
duction. MacCuUoch had begun by making the capitalists pro- 
duce without any surplus value and live on air, but at least he 
recognised the existence of the workers, making provision for 
their consumption. Ricardo, however, does not even mention 
the workers; for him the distinction between variable capital 
and surplus value does not exist at all. Besides this major 
omission, it is of small account that he, just like his disciple, 
takes no notice of constant capital. He wants to solve the prob- 
lem of realising the surplus value and expanding capital with- 
out positing more than the existence of a certain quantity of 
commodities which are mutually exchanged. 

Sismondi was blind to the fact that the venue has been 
changed altogether. Yet he tried faithfully to bring the fantasies 
of his famous guest and opponent down to earth and to analyse 
their invisible contradictions, plaintively saying that these 
assumptions, 'just like German metaphysics, abstract from time 
and space'. ^ He grafts Ricardo's hypothesis on to 'society in its 
real organisation, with unpropertied workers whose wage is 
fixed by competition and who can be dismissed the moment 
their master has no further need of their work . . . for' — remarks 
Sismondi, as acute as he is modest — 'it isjust this social organisa- 
tion to which our objection refers'. ^ 

^ Ibid., p. 424. 2 Ibid., p. 417. 

207 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

He lays bare the many difficulties and conflicts bound up 
with the progress of labour productivity under capitalism, and 
shows that Ricardo's postulated changes in the technique of 
labour, from the point of view of society, lead to the following 
alternative: Either a number of workers corresponding to the 
increase in labour productivity will have to be dismissed out- 
right — then there will be a surplus of products on the one hand, 
and on the other unemployment and misery — a faithful picture 
of present-day society. Or the surplus product will be used for 
the maintenance of the workers in a new field of production, 
the production of luxury goods. Here Sismondi undoubtedly 
proves himself superior: he suddenly remembers the existence 
of the constant capital, and now it is he who subjects the 
English classic to a frontal attack: 

'For setting up a new industry for manufacturing luxuries, 
new capital is also needed; machines will have to be built, raw 
materials procured, and distant commerce brought into activity; 
for the wealthy are rarely content with enjoying what is im- 
mediately in front of them. Where, then, could we find this new 
capital which may perhaps be much more considerable than 
that required by agriculture? . . . Our luxury workers are still a 
long way from eating our labourers' grain, from wearing the 
clothes from our common factories; they are not yet made into 
workers, they may not even have been bom yet, their trade does 
not exist, the materials on which they are to work have not 
arrived from India. All those among whom the former should 
distribute their bread, wait for it in vain.'^ 

Sismondi now takes constant capital into account, not only 
in the production of luxuries, but also in agriculture, and 
further raises the following objection against Ricardo: 'We must 
abstract from time, if we make the assumption that the culti- 
vator, whom a mechanical discovery or an invention of rural 
industry enables to treble the productive power of his workers, 
will also find sufficient capital to treble his exploitation, his 
agricultural implements, his equipment, his livestock, his gran- 
aries: to treble the circulating capital which must serve him 
while waiting for his harvest. '^ 

In this way Sismondi breaks with the superstition of the 
classical school that with capital expanding all additional 
1 Sismondi, op. cit., vol. ii, pp. 425-6. - Ibid., p. 429. 

208 



f 



RICARDO V. SISMONDI 

capital would be exclusively spent on wages, on the variable 
capital. He clearly dissents from Ricardo's doctrine — which did 
not, however, prevent his allowing all the errors arising out of 
this doctrine three years later again to creep into the second 
edition of his Nouveaux Principes. In opposition to Ricardo's facile 
doctrine of harmony, Sismondi underlines two decisive points: 
on the one hand, the objective difficulties of the process of 
enlarged reproduction which works by no means so smoothly in 
capitalist reality as it docs in Ricardo's absurd hypothesis; on 
the other hand, the fact that all technical progress in social 
labour productivity is always achieved under capitalism at the 
expense of the working class, bought with their suffering. Sis- 
mondi shows himself superior to Ricardo in yet a third point: 
he represents the broad horizon of the dialectical approach as 
against Ricardo's blunt narrow-mindedness with its incapacity 
to conceive of any forms of society other than those of bourgeois 
economics: 

'Our eyes,' he exclaims, 'arc so accustomed to this new 
organisation of society, this universal competition, degenerating 
into hostility between the rich and the working class, that we no 
longer conceive of any mode of existence other than that whose 
ruins surround us on all sides. They believe to prove me absurd 
by confronting me with the vices of preceding systems. Indeed, 
as regards the organisation of the lower classes, two or three 
systems have succeeded one another; yet, since they are not to 
be regretted, since, after first doing some good, they then im- 
posed terrible disasters on mankind, may we conclude from this 
that we have now entered the true one? May we conclude that 
we shall not discover the besetting vice of the system of wage 
labour as we have discovered that of slavery, of vassalage, and 
of the guilds? A time will come, no doubt, when our descend- 
ants will condemn us as barbarians because we have left the 
working classes without security, just as we already condemn, 
as they also will, as barbarian the nations who have reduced 
those same classes to slavery.'^ 

Sismondi's statement, putting in a nutshell the vital differ- 
ences between the parts played by the proletariat in a modern 
society and in the society of ancient Rome, shows his profound 
insight into historical connections. He shows no less discern- 

1 Ibid., pp. 434-5. 
2oq 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

ment, in his polemics against Ricardo, when analysing the 
specific economic character of the slave-system and of feudal 
economy as well as their relative historical significance, and 
finally when emphasising, as the dominant universal tendency 
of bourgeois economy, 'that it severs completely all kind of 
property from every kind of labour'. 

The second round, no more than the first, between Sismondi 
and the classical school, brought little glory for Sismondi's 
opponents.^ 

^ Thus, if Tugan Baranovski, championing Say-Ricardo's views, tells us 
about the controversy between Sismondi and Ricardo {Studies on the Theory 
and History of Commercial Crises in England, p. 176), that Sismondi was com- 
pelled 'to acknowledge as correct the doctrine he had attacked and to 
concede his opponent all that is necessary'; that Sismondi himself 'had 
abandoned his own theory which still finds so many adherents', and that 
'the victory in this controversy lies with Ricardo', this shows a lack of dis- 
crimination — to put it mildly — such as is practically unheard-of in a work 
of serious scientific pretensions. 



210 



CHAPTER XIII 
SAY V. SISMONDI 

SisMONDi's essay against Ricardo in the Revue Encyclopedique 
of May 1824, was the final challenge for J. B. Say, at that 
time the acknowledged 'prince of economic science' {prince 
de la science economique), the so-called representative, heir and 
populariser of the school of Adam Smith on the Continent. Say, 
who had already advanced some arguments against Sismondi in 
his letters to Malthus, countered the following July with an 
essay on 'The Balance Between Consumption and Production' 
in the Revue Encyclopedique, to which Sismondi in turn published 
a short reply. The chronology of Sismondi's polemical engage- 
ments was thus inverse to the sequence of the opposing theories, 
for it had been Say who first communicated his doctrine of a 
divinely established balance between production and consump- 
tion to Ricardo who had in turn handed it down to Mac- 
CuUoch. In fact, as early as 1803, Say, in his Traite d'£conomie 
Politique, book i, chapter xii, had coined the following per- 
emptory statement: 'Products are paid for with other products. 
It follows that if a nation has too many goods of one kind, the 
means of selling them would be to create goods of a different 
kind.'i 

Here we meet again the all too familiar conjuring recipe 
which was accepted alike by Ricardo's school and by the 'vulgar 
economists' as the corner-stone of the doctrine of harmony. - 

^ 'L'argent ne remplit qu'un office passager dans ce double echange. Les 
echanges termines, il se trouve qu'on a paye des produits avec des produits. 
En consequence, quand une nation a trop de produits dans un genre, le 
moyen de les ecouler est d'en creer d'un autre genre' (J. B. Say, Traite 
d'^conomie Politique, Paris, 1803, vol. i, p. 154). 

2 In fact, here again. Say's only achievement lies in having given a 
pompous and dogmatic form to an idea that others had expressed before 
him. As Bergmann points out, in his Theory of Crises (Stuttgart, 1895), the 
work of Josiah Tucker (1752), Turgot's annotations to the French pamph- 
lets, the writings of Quesnay, Dupont de Nemours, and of others contain 

211 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

Essentially, Sismondi's principal work constitutes a sustained 
polemic against this thesis. At this stage Say charges to the 
attack in the Revue Encyclopedique with a complete volte-face, as 
follows : 

'Objection may be made that, because of man's intelligence, 
because of the advantage he can draw from the means provided 
by nature and artifice, every human society can produce all the 
things fit to satisfy its needs and increase its enjoyment in far 
larger quantities than it can itself consume. But there I would 
ask how it is possible that we know of no nation that is supplied 
with everything. Even in what rank as prospering nations seven- 
eighths of the population are lacking in a multitude of things 
considered necessities in ... I will not say a wealthy family, but in 
a modest establishment. The village I live in at present lies in 
one of the richest parts of France; yet in 19 out of 20 houses I 
enter here, I see but the coarsest fare and nothing that makes 
for the well-being of the people, none of the things the English 
call comforts. '1 

There is something to admire about the effrontery of the 
excellent Say. It was he who had maintained that in a capitalist 
economy there could be no difficulties, no surplus, no crises and 
no misery; since goods can be bought one for the other, we need 
only go on producing more and more and everything in the 
garden will be lovely. It was in Say's hands that this postulate 
had become a tenet of the doctrine of harmony, that doctrine 
so typical of vulgar economics, which had evoked a sharp pro- 
test from Sismondi who proved this view untenable. The latter 
had shown that goods cannot be sold in any quantity you like, 
but that a limit is set to the realisation of goods by the income of 

quite similar observations on a natural balance, or even identity, between 
demand and supply. Yet the miserable Say, as Marx once called him, claims 
credit as the evangelist of harmony for the great discoveiy of the 'iheorie des 
debouches', modestly comparing his own work to the discovery of the principles 
of thermo-dynamics, of the lever, and of the inclined plane. In the preface 
and table of contents, e.g. to the 6th edition of his Traite (1841, pp. 51, 616) 
he says: 'The theory of exchange and of vents, such as it is developed in this 
work, will transform world politics.' The same point of view is also expounded 
by James Mill in his 'Commerce Defended' of 1B08, and it is he whom Marx 
calls the real father of the doctrine of a natural equilibrium between pro- 
duction and demand. 

^ Say in Revue Encyclopedique, vol. ^3, July 18^24, pp. 20 f. 

212 



SAY V. SISMONDI 

society in each case, by v-\rS', inasmuch as the wages of the 
workers are depressed to a mere subsistence level, and inasmuch 
as there is also a natural limit to the consumptive capacity of the 
capitalist class, an expansion of production, Sismondi says, must 
inevitably lead to slumps, crises and ever greater misery for the 
great masses. Say's come-back to this is masterly in its ingenuity: 
If you will insist that over-production is possible, how can it 
happen that there are so many people in our society who arc 
naked, hungry and in want? Pray, explain this contradiction if 
you can. Say, whose own position excels by contriving blithely 
to shrug off the circulation of money altogether by operating 
with a system of barter, now censures his critic for speaking of 
an over-abundance of products in relation not only to purchas- 
ing power but to the real needs of society, and that although 
Sismondi had left no doubt at all about this very salient point 
of his deductions. 'Even if there is a very great number of badly 
fed, badly clothed and badly housed people in a society, the 
society can only sell what it buys, and, as we have seen, it can 
only buy with its income.'^ 

A little further on, Say concedes this point but alleges that his 
opponent has made a new mistake: 'It is not consumers, then, 
in which the nation is lacking,' he says, 'but purchasing power. 
Sismondi believes that this will be more extensive, when the 
products are rare, when consequently they are dearer and their 
production procures ampler pay for the workers.' ^ 

That is how Say attempts to degrade, in his own trite method 
of thought, or better, method of canting, Sismondi's theory 
which attacked the very foundations of capitalist organisation 
and its mode of distribution. He burlesques the Nouveaux Prin- 
cipes, turning them into a plea for 'rare' goods and high prices, 
and holds up to them the mirror of an artfully flattered capitalist 
accumulation at its peak. If production becomes more vigorous, 
he argues, labour grows in numbers and the volume of produc- 
tion expands, the nations will be better and more universally 
provided for, and he extols the conditions in countries where 
industrial development is at its highest, as against the misery of 
the Middle Ages. Sismondi's maxims he declares subversive to 
capitalist society: 'Why does he call for an inquiry into the laws 
which might oblige the entrepreneur to guarantee a living for 
^ Noveaux Principes . . . , vol. i, p. 1 17. ^ Say, loc cit., p. 21. 

213 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

the worker he employs? Such an inquiry would paralyse the 
spirit of enterprise. Merely the fear that the authorities might 
interfere with private contracts is a scourge and harmful to the 
wealth of a nation.'^ 

Not to be diverted from his purpose by this indiscriminate 
apologia of Say's, Sismondi once more turns the discussion on 
the fundamental issue: 

'Surely I have never denied that since the time of Louis XIV 
France has been able to double her population and to quadruple 
her consumption, as he contends. I have only claimed that the 
increase of products is a good if it is desired, paid for and con- 
sumed; that, on the other hand, it is an evil if, there being no 
demand, the only hope of the producer is to entice the con- 
sumers of a rival industry's products. I have tried to show that 
the natural course of the nations is progressive increase of their 
property, an increase consequent upon their demand for new 
products and their means to pay for them, but that in con- 
sequence of our institutions, of our legislation having robbed the 
working class of all property and every security, they have also 
been spurred to a disorderly labour quite out of touch with the 
demand and with purchasing power, which accordingly only 
aggravates poverty. '^ 

And he winds up the debate by inviting the preacher of har- 
mony to reflect upon the circumstance that, though a nation 
may be rich, pubHc misery no less than material wealth is con- 
stantly on the increase, the class which produces everything 
being daily brought nearer to a position where it may consume 
nothing. On this shrill discordant note of capitalist contradic- 
tions closes the first clash about the problem of accumulation. 

Summing up the general direction of this first battle of wits, 
we must note two points: 

1 Say, loc. cit., p. 29. Say indicts Sismondi as the arch-enemy of bourgeois 
society in the following ranting peroration: 'It is against the modern organisa- 
tion of society, an organisation which, by despoiling the working man of 
all property save his hands, gives him no security in the face of a competition 
directed towards his detriment. What! Society despoils the working man 
because it ensures to every kind of entrepreneur free disposition over his 
capital, that is to say his property! I repeat: there is nothing more dangerous 
than views conducive to a regulation of the employment of property' for 
'hands and faculties . . . are also property' (ibid., p. 30). 

2 Sismondi, op. cit., pp. 462-3. 

214 



SAY V. SISMONDI 

( 1 ) In spite of all the confusion in Sismondi's analysis, his 
superiority to both Ricardo and his followers and to the self- 
styled heir to the mantle of Adam Smith is quite unmistakable. 
Sismondi, in taking things from the angle of reproducticm, looks 
for concepts of value (capital and income) and for factual 
elements (producer and consumer goods) as best he can, in 
order to grasp how they are interrelated within the total social 
process. In this he is nearest to Adam Smith, with the differ- 
ence only that the contradictions there appearing as merely 
subjective and speculative, are deliberately stressed as the 
keynote of Sismondi's analysis where the problem of capital 
accumulation is treated as the crucial point and principal 
difficulty. 

Sismondi has therefore made obvious advances on Adam 
Smith, while Ricardo and his followers as well as Say throughout 
the debate think solely in terms of simple commodity produc- 
tion. They only see the formula C — M — C, even reducing every- 
thing to barter, and believe that such barren wisdom can cover 
all the problems specific to the process of reproduction and 
accumulation. This is a regress even on Smith, and over such 
myopic vision, Sismondi scores most decisively. He, the social 
critic, evinces much more understanding for the categories of 
bourgeois economics than their staunchest champions — just as, 
at a later date, the socialist Marx was to grasp infinitely more 
keenly than all bourgeois economists together the differentia 
specifica of the mechanism of capitalist economy. If Sismondi 
exclaims in the face of Ricardo's doctrine: 'What, is wealth to 
be all, and man a mere nothing?'^ it is indicative not only of the 
vulnerable moral strain in his petty-bourgeois approach com- 
pared to the stern, classical impartiality of Ricardo, but also of 
a critical perception, sharpened by social sensibilities for the 
living social connections of economy; an eye, that is, for intrinsic 
contradictions and difficulties as against the rigid, hidebound 
and abstract views of Ricardo and his school. The controversy 
had only shown up the fact that Ricardo, just like the followers 
of Adam Smith, was not even able to grasp, let alone solve the 
puzzle of accumulation put by Sismondi. 

(2) The clue to the problem, however, was already impossible 
of discovery, because the whole argument had been side-tracked 

1 Ibid., p. 331. 
215 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

and concentrated upon the problem of crises. It is only natural 
that the outbreak of the first crisis should dominate the dis- 
cussion, but no less natural that this effectively prevented either 
side from recognising that crises are far from constituting the 
problem of accumulation, being no more than its characteristic 
phenomenon: one element in the cyclical form of capitalist re- 
production. Consequently, the debate could only result in a 
twofold quid pro quo: one party deducing from crises that accumu- 
lation is impossible, and the other from barter that crises are 
impossible. Subsequent developments of capitalism were to give 
the lie to both conclusions alike. 

And yet, Sismondi's criticism sounds the first alarm of eco- 
nomic theory at the domination of capital, and for this reason 
its historical importance is both great and lasting. It paves the 
way for the disintegration of a classical economics unable to cope 
with the problem of its own making. But for all Sismondi's terror 
of the consequences attendant upon capitalism triumphant, he 
was certainly no reactionary in the sense of yearning for pre- 
capitalistic conditions, even if on occasion he delights in extol- 
ling the patriarchal forms of production in agriculture and 
handicrafts in comparison with the domination of capital. He 
repeatedly and most vigorously protests against such an inter- 
pretation as e.g. in his polemic against Ricardo in the Revue 
Encyclopedique: 

'I can already hear the outcry that I jib at improvements in 
agriculture and craftsmanship and at every progress man could 
make; that I doubtless prefer a state of barbarism to a state of 
civilisation, since the plough is a tool, the spade an even older 
one, and that, according to my system, man ought no doubt to 
work the soil with his bare hands. 

'I never said anything of the kind, and I crave indulgence to 
protest once for all against all conclusions imputed to my system 
such as I myself have never drawn. Neither those who attack 
me nor those who defend me have really understood me, and 
more than once I have been put to shame by my allies as much 
as by my opponents.' — 'I beg you to realise that it is not the 
machine, new discoveries and inventions, not civilisation to 
which I object, but the modern organisation of society, an 
organisation which despoils the man who works of all property 
other than his arms, and denies him the least security in a reck- 

216 



SAY V. SISMONDI 

less over-bidding that makes for his harm and to which he is 
bound to fall a prey.'^ 

There can be no question that the interests of the proletariat 
were at the core of Sismondi's criticism, and he is making no 
false claims when he formulates his main tendency as follows: 

'I am only working for means to secure the fruits of labour 
to those who do the work, to make the machine benefit the man 
who puts it in motion.' ^ 

When pressed for a closer definition of the social organisation 
towards which he aspires, it is true he hedges and confesses him- 
self unable to do so: 

'But what remains to be done is of infinite difficulty, and I 
certainly do not intend to deal with it to-day. I should like to 
convince the economists as completely as I am convinced myself 
that their science is going off on a wrong tack. But I cannot trust 
myself to be able to show them the true course; it is a supreme 
effort — the most my mind will run to — to form a conception 
even of the actual organisation of society. Yet who would have 
the power to conceive of an organisation that does not even exist 
so far, to see the future, since we are already hard put to it to 
see the present?'^ 

Surely it was no disgrace to admit oneself frankly powerless to 
envisage a future beyond capitalism in the year 1820 — at a time 
when capitalism had only just begun to establish its domination 
over the big industries, and when the idea of socialism was only 
possible in a most Utopian form. But, as Sismondi could neither 
advance beyond capitalism nor go back to a previous stage, the 
only course open to his criticism was a petty-bourgeois com- 
promise. Sceptical of the possibility of developing fully both 
capitalism and the productive forces, he found himself under 
necessity to clamour for some moderation of accumulation, for 
some slowing down of the triumphant march of capitalism. 
That is the reactionary aspect of his criticism.* 

1 Sismondi, op. cit., p. 432-3. ^ Ibid., p. 44g. ^ Ibid., p. 448. 

* Marx, in his history of the opposition to Ricardo's school and its dis- 
solution, makes only brief mention of Sismondi, explaining: 'I leave 
Sismondi out of this historical account, because the criticism of his views 
belongs to a part with which I can deal only after this treatise, the actual 
movement of capital (competition and credit)' [Theorien über den Mehrwert, 
vol. iiij p. 52). Later on, however, in connection with Malthus, he also deals 
with Sismondi in a passage that, on the whole, is comprehensive; 'Sismondi 

217 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

is profoundly aware of the self-contradiction of capitalist production; he 
feels that its forms, its productive conditions, spur on an untrammelled 
development of the productive forces and of wealth on the one hand, yet 
that these conditions, on the other, are only relative; that their contradic- 
tions of value-in-use and value-in-exchange, of commodity and money, of 
sale and purchase, of production and consumption, of capital and wage- 
labour, and so on, take on ever larger dimensions, along with the forward 
strides of the productive forces. In particular, he feels the fundamental con- 
flict: here the untrammelled development of productive power and of a 
wealth which, at the same time, consists in commodities, must be mone- 
tised; and there the basis — restriction of the mass of producers to the 
necessary means of subsistence. He therefore does not, like Ricardo, con- 
ceive of the crises as merely incidental, but as essential, as eruptions of the 
immanent conflicts on ever grander scale and at determinate periods. Which 
faces him with the dilemma: is the state to put restrictions on the productive 
forces to adapt them to the productive conditions, or upon the productive 
conditions to adapt them to the productive forces? Frequently he has recourse 
to the past, becomes laudator temporis acti, and seeks to master the contradic- 
tions by a diff'erent regulation of income relative to capital, or of distribution 
relative to production, quite failing to grasp that the relations of distribution 
are nothing but the relations of production sub alia specie. He has a perfect 
picture of the contradictions immanent in bourgeois production, yet he does 
not understand them, and therefore fails also to understand the process of 
their disintegration. (And indeed, how could he, seeing this production was 
still in the making? — R.L.) And yet, his view is in fact grounded in the 
premonition that new forms of appropriating wealth must answer to the 
productive forces, developed in the womb of capitalist production, to the 
material and social conditions of creating this wealth; that the bourgeois 
forms of appropriation are but transitory and contradictory, wealth existing 
always with contrary aspects and presenting itself at once as its opposite. 
Wealth is ever based on the premises of poverty, and can develop only by 
developing poverty' (ibid., p. 55). 

In The Poverty of Philosophy, Marx opposes Sismondi to Proudhon in sundry 
passages, yet about the man himself he only remarks tersely: 'Those, who, 
like Sismondi, wish to return to the true proportions of production, while 
preserving the present basis of society, are reactionary, since, to be con- 
sistent, they must also wish to bring back all the other conditions of industry 
of former times' {The Poverty of Philosophy, London, 1936, p. 57). Two short 
references to Sismondi are in On the Critique of Political Economy: once he is 
ranked, as the last classic of bourgeois economics in France, with Ricardo in 
England; in another passage emphasis is laid on the fact that Sismondi, con- 
trary to Ricardo, underlined the specifically social character of labour that 
creates value. — In the Communist Manifesto, finally, Sismondi is mentioned as 
the head of the petty-bourgeois school. 



218 



CHAPTER XIV 
MALTHUS 



/% T the same time as Sismondi, Malthus also waged war 
/—% against some of the teachings of Ricardo. Sismondi, in 
A. JLthe second edition of his work as well as in his polemics, 
repeatedly referred to Malthus as an authority on his side. Thus 
he formulated the common aims of his campaign against 
Ricardo in the Revue Encyclopedique: 

'Mr. Malthus, on the other hand, has maintained in Eng- 
land, as I have tried to do on the Continent, that consumption 
is not the necessary consequence of production, that the needs 
and desires of man, though they are truly without limits, are 
only satisfied by consumption in so far as means of exchange 
go with them. We have affirmed that it is not enough to create 
these means of exchange, to make them circulate among those 
who have these desires and wants; that it can even happen fre- 
quently that the means of exchange increase in society together 
with a decrease in the demand for labour, or wages, so that the 
desires and wants of one part of the population cannot be satis- 
fied and consumption also decreases. Finally, we have claimed 
that the unmistakable sign of prosperity in a society is not an 
increasing production of wealth, but an increasing demand for 
labour, or the offer of more and more wages in compensation 
for this labour. Messrs. Ricardo and Say, though not denying 
that an increasing demand for labour is a symptom of pros- 
perity, maintained that it inevitably results from an increase of 
production. As for Mr. Malthus and myself, we regard these 
two increases as resulting from independent causes which may 
at times even be in opposition. According to our view, if the 
demand for labour has not preceded and determined produc- 
tion, the market will be flooded, and then new production 
becomes a cause of ruin, not of enjoyment.'^ 

These remarks suggest far-reaching agreement, a brotherhood 
^ Nouveaux Principes . . . , vol. ii, p. 409. 
219 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

in arms of Sismondi and Malthus, at least in their opposition 
against Ricardo and his school. Marx considers the Principles of 
Political Economy, which Malthus published in 1820, an outright 
plagiarism of the Mouveaux Principes which had been published 
the year before. Yet Sismondi and Malthus are frequently at 
odds regarding the problem with which we are here concerned. 

Sismondi is critical of capitalist production, he attacks it 
sharply, even denounces it, while Malthus stands for the defence. 
This does not mean that he denies its inherent contradictions, 
as Say or MacCulloch had done. On the contrary he raises 
them quite unmercifully to the status of a natural law and 
asserts their absolute sanctity. Sismondi's guiding principle is 
the interests of the workers. He aspires, though rather generally 
and vaguely, towards a thoroughgoing reform of distribution in 
favour of the proletariat. Malthus provides the ideology for 
those strata who are the parasites of capitalist exploitation, who 
live on ground rent and draw upon the common wealth, and 
advocates the allocation of the greatest possible portion of the 
surplus value to these 'unproductive consumers'. Sismondi's 
general approach is predominantly ethical, it is the approach of 
the social reformer. Improving upon the classics, he stresses, in 
opposition to them, that 'consumption is the only end of 
accumulation', and pleads for restricted accumulation. Malthus, 
on the contrary, bluntly declares that production has no other 
purpose than accumulation and advocates unlimited accumu- 
lation by the capitalists, to be supplemented and assured by the 
unlimited consumption of their parasites. Finally, Sismondi 
starts off with a critical analysis of the reproductive process, of 
the relation between capital and income from the point of view of 
society; while Malthus, opposing Ricardo, begins with an absurd 
theory of value from which he derives an equally absurd theory 
of surplus value, attempting to explain capitalist profits as an 
addition to the price over and above the value of commodities.^ 

Malthus opposes the postulate that supply and demand are 
identical with a detailed critique in chapter vi of his Definitions 
in Political Economy.'^ In his Elements of Political Economy, James 
Mill had declared: 

^ Cf. Marx, Theorien über den Mehrwert, vol. iii, pp. 1-29, which give a 
dctaih-'d analysis of Malthus' theory of value and profits. 
" Dedicated to James Mill and published in 1827. 

220 



MALTHUS 

'What is it that is necessarily meant, when we say that the 
supply and the demand are accommodated to one another? 
It is this: that goods which have been produced by a certain 
quantity of labour, exchange for goods which have been pro- 
duced by an equal quantity of labour. Let this proposition be 
duly attended tOj and all the rest is clear. — Thus, if a pair of 
shoes is produced with an equal quantity of labour as a hat, so 
long as a hat exchanges for a pair of shoes, so long the supply 
and demand are accommodated to one another. If it should so 
happen, that shoes fell in value, as compared with hats, which 
is the same thing as hats rising in value compared with shoes, 
this would simply imply that more shoes had been brought to 
market, as compared with hats. Shoes would then be in more 
than the due abundance. Why? Because in them the produce 
of a certain quantity of labour would not exchange for the pro- 
duce of an equal quantity. But for the very same reason hats 
would be in less than the due abundance, because the produce 
of a certain quantity of labour in them would exchange for the 
produce of more than an equal quantity in shoes. '^ 

Against such trite tautologies, Malthus marshals a twofold 
argument. He first draws Mill's attention to the fact that he is 
building without solid foundations. In fact, he argues, even 
without an alteration in the ratio of exchange between hats and 
shoes, there may yet be too great a quantity of both in relation 
to the demand. This will result in both being sold at less than 
the cost of production plus an appropriate profit. 

'But can it be said on this account', he asks, 'that the supply of 
hats is suited to the demand for hats, or the supply of shoes 
suited to the demand for shoes, when they are both so abun- 
dant that neither of them will exchange for what will fulfil the 
conditions of their continued supply? '^ 

In other words, Malthus confronts Mill with the possibility of 
general over-production: '. . . when they are compared with the 
costs of production ... it is evident that . . . they may all fall 
or rise at the same time'.^ 

Secondly, he protests against the way in which Mill, Ricardo 

^ James Mill, Elements of Political Economy (3rd edition, London, 1826), 
pp. 239-40. 

^ Malthus, Definitions in Political Economy (London, 1827), p. 51. 
^ Ibid., p. 64. 

221 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

and company are wont to model their postulates on a system of 
barter: 'The hop planter who takes a hundred bags of hops to 
Weyhill fair, thinks little more about the supply of hats and 
shoes than he does about the spots in the sun. What does he 
think about, then? and what does he want to exchange his hops 
for? Mr. Mill seems to be of opinion that it would show great 
ignorance of political economy, to say that what he wants is 
money; yet, notwithstanding the probable imputation of this 
great ignorance, I have no hesitation in distinctly asserting, that 
it really is money which he wants . . .'^ 

For the rest, Malthus is content to describe the machinery 
by which an excessive supply can depress prices below the cost 
of production and so automatically bring about a restriction of 
production, and vice versa. 

'But this tendency, in the natural course of things, to cure a glut 
or a scarcity, is no . . . proof that such evils have never existed. '^ 

It is clear that in spite of his contrary views on the question of 
crises, Malthus thinks along the same lines as Ricardo, Mill, 
Say, and MacCulloch. For him, too, everything can be reduced 
to barter. The social reproductive process with its large cate- 
gories and interrelations which claimed the whole of Sismondi's 
attention, is here completely ignored. 

In view of so many contradictions within the fundamental 
approach, the criticism of Sismondi and Malthus have only a 
few points in common: (i) Contrary to Say and the followers of 
Ricardo, they both deny the hypothesis of a pre-established 
balance of consumption and production. (2) They both main- 
tain that not only partial but also universal crises are possible. 

But here their agreement ends. If Sismondi seeks the cause of 
crises in the low level of wages and the capitalists' limited 
capacity for consumption, Malthus, on the other hand, trans- 
forms the fact of low wages into a natural law of population 
movements; for the capitalists' limited capacity for consump- 
tion, however, he finds a substitute in the consumption of the 
parasites on surplus value such as the landed gentry and the 
clergy with their unlimited capacity for wealth and luxury. 
'The church with a capacious maw is blest.' 

Both Malthus and Sismondi look for a category of consumers 

^ Malthus, Definitions in Political Economy (London, 1827), pp. 53-4. 
2 Ibid., pp. 62-3. 

222 



MALTHUS 

who buy without selHng, in order to redeem capitalist accumu- 
lation and save it from a precarious position. But Sismondi 
needs them to get rid of the surplus product of society over and 
above the consumption of the workers and capitalists, that is to 
say, to get rid of the capitalised part of the surplus value. 
Malthus wants them as 'producers' of profit in general. It re- 
mains entirely his secret, of course, how the rentiers and the 
incumbents of the state can assist the capitalists in appropriating 
their profits by buying commodities at an increased price, since 
they themselves obtain their purchasing power mainly from 
these capitalists. In view of these profound contrasts, the alli- 
ance between Malthus and Sismondi does not go very deep. 
And if Malthus, as Marx has it, distorts Sismondi's Nouveaux 
Principes into a Malthusian caricature, Sismondi in turn stresses 
only what is common to them both and quotes Malthus in 
support, giving the latter's critique of Ricardo a somewhat Sis- 
mondian cast. On occasion, no doubt, Sismondi actually suc- 
cumbs to the influence of Malthus; for instance, he takes over 
the latter's theory of reckless state expenditure as an emergency 
measure in aid of accumulation and so becomes involved in 
contradictions with his own initial assumptions. 

On the whole, Malthus neither rendered an original con- 
tribution to the problem of reproduction, nor even grasped it 
fully. In his controversy with the followers of Ricardo, he oper- 
ated with the concepts of simple commodity circulation, just as 
they did in their controversy with Sismondi. His quarrel with 
that school turns on the 'unproductive consumption' by the 
parasites of the surplus value; it is not a quarrel about the social 
foundations of capitalist reproduction. Malthus' edifice tumbles 
to the ground as soon as the absurd mistakes in his theory of 
profits are uncovered. Sismondi's criticism remains valid, and 
his problems remain unsolved even if we accept Ricardo's 
theory of value with all its consequences. 



223 



SECTION TWO 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION 
OF THE PROBLEM 



SECOND ROUND 

THE CONTROVERSY BETWEEN RODBERTUS 

AND VON KIRCHMANN 



A.C. H 



CHAPTER XV 

V. KIRCHMANN'S THEORY OF 
REPRODUCTION 

THE second theoretical polemics about the problem of 
accumulation was also started by current events. If the 
first English crisis and its attendant misery of the work- 
ing class had stimulated Sismondi's opposition against the classi- 
cal school, it was the revolutionary working-class movement 
arisen since which, almost twenty-five years later, provided the 
incentive for Rodbertus' critique of capitalist production. The 
risings of the Lyons silk weavers and the Chartist movement in 
England were vastly different from the shadowy spectres raised 
by the first crisis, and the ears of the bourgeoisie were made to 
ring with their criticism of the most wonderful of all forms of 
society. The first socio-economic work of Rodbertus, probably 
written for the Augsburger Allgemeine Leitung in the late thirties 
but not published by that paper, bears the significant title, The 
Demands of the Working Classes,^ and begins as follows: 

'What do the working classes want? Will the others be able to 
keep it from them? Will what they want be the grave of modern 
civilisation? Thoughtful people have long realised that a time 
must come when history would put this question with great 
urgency. Now, the man in the street has learned it too, from the 
Chartist meetings and the Birmingham scenes.' 

During the forties, the leaven of revolutionary ideas was most 
vigorously at work in France in the formation of the various 
secret societies and socialist schools of the followers of Proudhon, 
Blanqui, Cabet, Louis Blanc, etc. The February revolution and 
the June proclamation of the 'right to work' led to a first head- 
on clash between the two worlds of capitalist society — an epoch- 
making eruption of the contradictions latent in capitalism. As 
regards the other, visible form of those contradictions — the 

^ Die Forderungen der arbeitenden Klassen. 
227 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

crises — the available data for observation at the time of the 
second controversy were far more comprehensive than in the 
early twenties of the century. The dispute between Rodbertus 
and V. Kirchmann took place under the immediate impact of 
the crises in 1837, 1839, 1847, and even of the first world crisis 
in 1857 — Rodbertus writing his interesting pamphlet On Com- 
mercial Crises and the Mortgage Problem of the Landowners'^ in 1858. 
Thus the inherent contradictions of capitalist society meeting 
his eyes were in strident discord with the doctrine of harmony 
held by the English classics and their vulgarisers both in Eng- 
land and on the Continent, quite unlike any critique in the 
times when Sismondi had raised his voice in warning. 

Incidentally, a quotation from Sismondi in Rodbertus' first 
writing proves that the former's strictures immediately in- 
fluenced Rodbertus. He was thus familiar with contemporary 
French writings against the classical school, though perhaps 
less so with the far more numerous English literature. There is 
no more than this flimsy support for the myth of the German 
professors about the so-called 'priority' of Rodbertus over Marx 
in the 'foundation of socialism'. Accordingly, Professor Diehl 
writes in his article on Rodbertus in Handwörterbuch der Staats- 
wissenschaften: 'Rodbertus must be considered the real founder 
of scientific socialism in Germany, since in his writings between 
1839 and 1842, even before Marx and Lassalle, he provided a 
comprehensive socialist system, a critique of Adam Smith's 
doctrine, new theoretical foundations and proposals for social 
reform.' 

This piece of god-fearing, pious righteousness comes from the 
second edition of 1901, after all that had been written by 
Engels, Kautsky and Mehring to destroy this learned legend, 
and in spite of it. Quite inevitably, of course, and proof against 
any evidence to the contrary, however weight)^ it was only 
right in the eyes of all the learned German economists that the 
palm of 'priority' should be wrested from Marx, the revolu- 
tionary anarchist, by Rodbertus, the 'socialist' with monarchist, 
Prussian and nationalist leanings, the man who believed in 
communism five hundred years from now, but for the present 
supported a steady exploitation rate of 200 per cent. However, 
wc arc interested in another aspect of Rodbertus' analysis. The 
^ Die Handelskrisen und die Hypothekennot der Grundbesitzer. 
228 



V. KIRCHMANN'S THEORY OF REPRODUCTION 

same Professor Diehl continues his eulogy as follows: 'Rodbertus 
was not only a pioneer of socialism; political economy as a 
whole owes much stimulation and furtherance to him; economic 
theory in particular is indebted to him for the critique of 
classical economics, for the new theory of the distribution of 
income, for the distinction between the logical and historical 
categories of capital, and so on.' 

Here we shall deal with these latter achievements of Rod- 
bertus, especially with the 'and so on'. 

Rodbertus' decisive treatise, Towards the Understanding of Our 
Politico-Economic Conditions^ of 1842, set the ball rolling, v. Kirch- 
mann replied in Demokratische Blätter with two essays — On the 
Social Aspects of Ground Rent^ and The Society of Barter^ — and 
Rodbertus parried in 1850 with his Letters on Social Problems.*' 
Thus the discussion entered the same theoretical arena where 
Malthus-Sismondi and Say-Ricardo-MacCuUoch had fought 
out their differences thirty years earlier. In his earliest writings, 
Rodbertus had already expressed the thought that the wages of 
labour present an ever diminishing part of the national product 
in modern society where the productivity of labour is in- 
creasing. He claimed this to be an original idea, and from that 
moment until his death thirty years later he did nothing but 
reiterate it and formulate it in various ways. This 'declining 
wage rate' is for him the root of all evils to be found in modern 
society, in particular of pauperism and the crises, whose com- 
bination he calls 'the social problem of our times'. 

V. Kirchmann does not agree with this explanation. He traces 
pauperism back to the effects of a rising ground rent ; crises, on 
the other hand, to a lack of markets. About the latter especially 
he says: 'The greatest part of social ills is caused not by defects 
of production but by a lack of markets for the products . . . the 
more a country can produce, the more means it has for satis- 
fying every need, the more it is exposed to the danger of misery 
and want.' — The labour-problem is here included as well, for 
'the notorious right to work ultimately reduces to the question 
of markets'. 'We see', he concludes, 'that the social problem 
is almost identical with the problem of markets. Even the ills 

^ Zur Erkenntnis unserer staatswirtschaftlichen Zustände. 
^ Über die Grundrente in socialer Beziehung. 

^ Die Tauschgesellschaß. ' * Soziale Briefe. 

229 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

of much-abused competition will vanish, once markets are 
secure; its advantages alone will remain. There will remain a 
spirit of rivalry to supply good and cheap commodities, but the 
life-and-death struggle will disappear which is caused only by 
insufficient markets/^ 

The difference between the points of view of Rodbertus and 
V. Kirchmann is evident. Rodbertus sees the root of the evil in 
a faulty distribution of the national product, and v. Kirchmann 
in the limitations of the markets for capitalist production. Not- 
withstanding all the confusion in his expositions, especially in 
his idealist vision of a capitalist competition content with a 
laudable rivalry for better and cheaper commodities, and also 
in his conception of the 'notorious right to work' as a problem 
of markets, v. Kirchmann up to a point still shows more under- 
standing for the sore spot of capitalist production, i.e. the 
limitations of its market, than Rodbertus who clings to dis- 
tribution. Thus it is V. Kirchmann who now takes up the prob- 
lem which Sismondi had originally put on the agenda. Never- 
theless, he by no means agrees with Sismondi's elucidation and 
solution of the problem, siding rather with the opponents of 
the latter. Not only does he accept Ricardo's theory of ground 
rent, and Adam Smith's dogma that 'the price of the commodity 
is composed of two parts only, of the interests on capital and 
the wages of labour' (v. Kirchmann transforms the surplus 
value into 'interest on capital'); he also subscribes to the thesis 
of Say and Ricardo that products are only bought with other 
products and that production creates its own demand, so that if 
one side appears to have produced too much, it only means 
there was not enough [production on the other, v. Kirchmann, 
we see, faithfully follows the classics, if in a somewhat 'German 
edition'. He begins by arguing, e.g., that Say's law of a natural 
balance between production and demand 'still does not give a 
comprehensive picture of reality', and adds: 

'Commerce involves yet further hidden laws which prevent 
this postulated order from obtaining in complete purity. They 
must be discovered if we are to explain the present flooding of 
the market, and their discovery might perhaps also show us the 

^ Rodbertus quotes v. Kirchmann's arguments explicitly and in great 
detail. But according to his editors, no complete copy of Demokratische 
Blätter with the original essay is obtainable. 

230 



V. KIRCHMANN'S THEORY OF REPRODUCTION 

way to avoid this great evil. We believe that there are three 
relations in the modern system of society which cause these 
conflicts between Say's indubitable law and reality.' 

These relations are (i) 'too inequitable a distribution of the 
products' — here, as we see, v. Kirchmann somewhat approxi- 
mates to Sismondi's point of view; (2) the difficulties which 
nature puts in the way of human labour engaged in production; 
and (3) finally, the defects of commerce as a mediator be- 
tween production and consumption. Disregarding the last two 
obstacles to Say's law, we shall now consider v. Kirchmann's 
reasoning of his first point. 

'The first relation', he explains, 'can be put more briefly as 
too low a wage of labour, which is thus the cause of a slump. 
Those who know that the price of commodities is composed of 
two parts only, of the interest on capital and the wage of labour, 
might consider this a startling statement; if the wage of labour 
is low, prices are low as well, and if one is high, so is the other.' 

(We see v. Kirchmann accepts Smith's dogma even in its 
most misleading form: the price is not resolved into wage of 
labour and surplus value, but is composed of them as a mere sum 
— a view in which Adam Smith strayed furthest from his own 
theory of the value of labour.) 

'Wage and price thus are directly related, they balance each 
other. England only abolished her corn laws, her tariffs on 
meat and other victuals, in order to cause wages to fall and thus 
to enable her manufacturers to oust all other competitors from 
the world markets by means of still cheaper commodities. This, 
however, only holds good up to a point and does not affect the 
ratio in which the product is distributed among the workers 
and the capitalists. Too inequitable a distribution among these 
two is the primary and most important cause why Say's law is 
not fulfilled in real life, why the markets are flooded although 
there is production in all branches.' 

V. Kirchmann gives a detailed illustration of this statement. 
Using the classical method, he takes us, of course, to an 
imaginary isolated society which makes an unresisting, if thank- 
less, object for the experiments of political economy, v. Kirch- 
mann suggests we should imagine a place {Ort) which comprises 
903 inhabitants, no more, no less, viz- three entrepreneurs with 
300 workers each. Ort is to be able to satisfy all needs by its own 

231 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

production — in three establishments, that is to say, one for 
clothing, a second for food, lighting, fuel and raw materials, and 
a third for housing, furniture and tools. In each of these three 
departments, the 'capital together with the raw materials' is to 
be provided by the entrepreneur, and the remuneration of the 
workers is to be so arranged that the workers obtain as their 
wage one half of the annual produce, the entrepreneurs retain- 
ing the other half 'as interest on capital and profits of the enter- 
prise'. Every business is to produce just enough to satisfy all the 
needs of the 903 inhabitants. Ort accordingly has 'all the con- 
ditions necessary for general well-being', and everybody can 
therefore tackle his work with courage and vigour. After a few 
days, however, joy and delight turn into a universal misery and 
gnashing of teeth: something has happened on v. Kirchmann's 
Island of the Blessed which was no more to be expected than 
for the skies to fall: an industrial and commercial crisis accord- 
ing to all modern specifications has broken out! Only the most 
essential clothing, food and housing for the 900 workers has 
been produced, yet the warehouses of the three entrepreneurs 
are full of clothes and raw materials, and their houses stand 
empty: they complain of a lack of demand, while the workers 
in turn complain that their wants are not fully satisfied. What 
has gone wrong? Could it be that there is too much of one kind 
of produce and too little of another, as Say and Ricardo would 
have it? Not at all, answers v. Kirchmann. Everything is avail- 
able in Ort in well-balanced quantities, just enough to satisfy 
all the wants of the community. What, then, has thrown a 
spanner into the works, why the crisis? The obstruction is caused 
by distribution alone — but this must be savoured in v. Kirch- 
mann's own words: 

'The obstacle, why nevertheless no smooth exchange takes 
place, lies solely and exclusively in the distribution of these 
products. They are not distributed equitably among all, but the 
entrepreneurs retain half of them for themselves as interest and 
profit, and only give half to the workers. It is clear that the 
worker in the clothing department can exchange, against half 
of his product, only half of the food, lodging, etc., that has been 
produced, and it is clear that the entrepreneur cannot get rid 
of the other half since no worker has any more products to give 
in exchange. The entrepreneurs do not know what to do with 

232 



V. KIRCHMANN'S THEORY OF REPRODUCTION 

their stocks, the workers do not know what to do for hunger 
and nakedness.' 

Nor docs the reader, we might add, know what to d(j with 
V, Kirchmann's constructions. His model is so cliildish that 
every advance leads deeper into the maze. 

First of all, there seems to be no reason whatever why, and 
to what purpose, v. Kirchmann should devise this splitting-up 
of production into three parts. If analogous examples by 
Ricardo and MacCulloch usually confront tenant farmers and 
manufacturers, that is presumably only inspired by the anti- 
quated Physiocrat conception of social reproduction which 
Ricardo had adopted, although his own theory of value as 
against the Physiocrats deprived it of all meaning, and although 
Adam Smith had already made a good start in considering the 
real material foundations of the social reproductive process. 
Still, we have seen that the tradition of distinguishing between 
agriculture and industry as the foundation of reproduction was 
kept up in economic theory until Marx introduced his epoch- 
making distinction of the two productive departments in society 
for producer arid consumer goods, v. Kirchmann's three depart- 
ments, however, have no real significance at all. Obviously, no 
material consideration of reproduction can have been respon- 
sible for this supremely arbitrary division which jumbles up 
tools and furniture, raw materials and food, but makes clothing 
a department in its own right. One might as well postulate one 
department for food, clothing and housing, another for medi- 
cines and a third for tooth brushes, v. Kirchmann's primary 
concern, no doubt, is with the social division of labour; hence 
the assumption of as nearly equal quantities of products as 
possible in the transactions of exchange. Yet this exchange, on 
which the argument turns, plays no part at all in v. Kirch- 
mann's example since it is not the value which is distributed 
but the quantities of products, the bulk of use-values as such. 
In this intriguing Ort of v. Kirchmann's imagining, again, the 
products are distributed first, and only afterwards, when the 
distribution is accomplished, is there to be universal exchange, 
whereas on the solid ground of capitalist production it is, as we 
know, the exchange which inaugurates the distribution of the 
product and serves as its agent. Besides, the queerest things 
happen in v. Kirchmann's distributive system: 'As we all know', 

233 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

the prices of the products, i.e. the price of the aggregate product 
of society, consist oiv-rs, of wage and capital interest alone — 
so that the aggregate product must be distributed entirely 
among workers and entrepreneurs; but then unhappily v. Kirch- 
mann dimly remembers the fact that production needs things 
like raw materials and tools. So Ort is provided with raw 
materials furtively introduced among the food, and with tools 
among the furniture. But now the question arises: who is to get 
these indigestible items in the course of general distribution? 
the workers as wages, or the capitalists as profits of enterprise? 
They could hardly expect a warm welcome from either. And on 
such feeble premises the star turn of the performance is to take 
place: the exchange between workers and entrepreneurs. The 
fundamental transaction of exchange in capitalist production, 
the exchange between workers and capitalists, is transformed by 
V. Kirchmann from an exchange between living labour and 
capital into an exchange of products. Not the first act, that of 
exchanging labour power for variable capital, but the second, 
the realisation of the wage received from the variable capital is 
put at the centre of the whole machinery, the entire commodity 
exchange of capitalist society being in turn reduced to this 
realisation of the labour- wage. And the crowning glory is that 
this exchange between workers and entrepreneurs, the king-pin 
of all economic life, dissolves into nothing on a closer scrutiny 
— it does not take place at all. For as soon as all workers have 
received their natural wages in the form of half their product, 
an exchange will be possible only among the workers them- 
selves; every worker will only keep one- third of his wage con- 
sisting exclusively of either clothing, food or furniture, as the 
case may be, and realise the remainder to equal parts in the 
two other product-groups. The entrepreneurs no longer come 
into this at all; the three of them are left high and dry with their 
surplus value: half the clothing, furniture and food that has been 
produced by the society; and they have no idea what to do with 
the stuff. In this calamity of v. Kirchmann's creation, even the 
most generous distribution of the product would be of no use. 
On the contrary, if larger quantities of the social product were 
allotted to the workers, they would have even less to do with 
the entrepreneurs in this transaction: all that would happen is 
that the exchange of the workers among themselves would in- 

234 



V. KIRCHMANN'S THEORY OF REPRODUCTION 

crease in volume. The surplus product which the entrepreneurs 
have on their hands would then contract, it is true, though not 
indeed because the exchange of the surplus product would be 
facilitated, but merely because there would be less surplus value 
altogether. Now as before, an exchange of the social product 
between workers and entrepreneurs is out of the question. One 
must confess that the puerile and absurd economics here 
crammed into comparatively little space exceed the bounds 
even of what might be put up with from a Prussian Public 
Prosecutor — such having been v. Kirchmann's profession, 
though he must be credited with having incurred disciplinary 
censure on two occasions. Nevertheless, after these unpromising 
preliminaries, v. Kirchmann goes right to the root of the matter. 
He admits that his assuming the surplus product in a concrete 
use-form is the reason why the surplus value cannot be usefully 
employed. As a remedy he now allows the entrepreneurs to 
devote half of the social labour appropriated as surplus value to 
the production not of common goods but of luxuries. The 
'essence of luxury-goods being that they enable the consumer to 
use up more capital and labour power than in the case of 
ordinary goods', the three entrepreneurs manage to consume by 
themselves in the form of laces, fashionable carriages and the 
like, their entire half-share in all the labour performed by the 
society. Now nothing unsaleable is left, and the crisis is happily 
avoided; over-production is made impossible once and for all, 
capitalists and workers alike are safe; the name of v. Kirch- 
mann's magic cure which has brought all these benefits to pass, 
and which re-establishes the balance between production and 
consumption, being: luxury. In other words, the capitalists who 
do not know what to do with their surplus value which they 
cannot realise, are advised by the dear fellow — to eat it up! As 
it happens, luxury is in fact an old familiar invention of capit- 
alist society, and still there are recurrent crises. Why is this? 
V. Kirchmann enlightens us: 'The answer can only be that in 
real life sluggish markets are entirely due to the fact that there 
are still not enough luxuries, or, in other words, that the capit- 
alists, i.e. those who can afford to consume, still consume too 
little.' 

This misguided abstinence of the capitalists, however, results 
from a bad habit which political economists have been ill- 

235 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

advised to encourage: the desire to save for purposes of 'pro- 
ductive consumption'. In other words: crises are caused by 
accumulation. This is v. Kirchmann's principal thesis. He 
proves it again by means of a touchingly simple example: 'Let 
us assume conditions which economists praise as more favour- 
able,' he says, 'where the entrepreneurs say: we do not want to 
spend our income to the last penny in splendour and luxury, 
but will re-invest it productively. What does this mean? Nothing 
but the setting-up of all sorts of productive enterprises for 
delivering new goods of such a kind that their sale can yield 
interest (v. Kirchmann means profits) on a capital saved and 
invested by the three entrepreneurs from their unconsumed 
revenues. Accordingly, the three entrepreneurs decide to con- 
sume only the produce of a hundred workers, that is to say to 
restrict their luxury considerably, and to employ the labour 
power of the remaining 350 workers together with the capital 
they use for setting up new productive enterprises. The question 
now arises in what kind of productive enterprises these funds 
are to be used.' 

Since, according to v. Kirchmann's assumption, constant 
capital is not reproduced, and the entire social product consists 
entirely of consumer goods, 'the three entrepreneurs can only 
choose again between enterprises for the manufacture of ordinary 
goods or for that of luxuries'. 

In this way, however, the three entrepreneurs will be faced 
with the already familiar dilemma: if they turn out 'common 
goods', there will be a crisis, since the workers lack means to 
purchase these additional provisions, having been bought off 
with half the value of their produce. If they go in for luxuries, 
they will have to consume them alone. There is no other possi- 
bility. The dilemma is not even affected by foreign trade which 
would 'only increase the range of commodities on the home 
market' or increase productivity. 

'These foreign commodities are therefore either common 
goods — then the capitalist will not, and the worker, lacking the 
means, cannot buy them, or they are luxuries, in which case the 
worker, of course, is even less able to buy them, and the capit- 
alist will not want them either because of his efforts to save.' 

This argument, however primitive, yet shows quite nicely and 
clearly the fundamental conception of v. Kirchmann and the 

236 



V. KIRCHMANN'S THEORY OF REPRODUCTION 

nightmare of all economic theory: in a society consisting exclu- 
sively of workers and capitalists, accumulation will be impos- 
sible. V. Kirchmann is therefore frankly hostile to accumulation, 
'saving', 'productive consumption' of the surplus value, and 
strongly attacks these errors advocated by classical economics. 
His gospel is increasing luxury together with the productivity of 
labour as the specific against crises. Wc see that v. Kirchmann, 
if he grotesquely aped Ricardo and Say in his theoretical 
assumptions, is a caricature of Sismondi in his final conclusions. 
Yet it is imperative to get v. Kirchmann's approach to the 
problem perfectly clear, if we are to understand the import of 
Rodbertus' criticism and the outcome of the whole controversy. 



237 



CHAPTER XVI 

RODBERTUS' CRITICISM 
OF THE CLASSICAL SCHOOL 

RODBERTUS digs deeper than v. Kirchmann. He looks for 
the roots of evil in the very foundations of social organisa- 
Ltion and declares bitter war on the predominant Free 
Trade school — not against a system of unrestricted commodity 
circulation or the freedom of trade which he fully accepts, but 
against the Manchester doctrine of laissez-faire within the in- 
ternal social relations of economy. At that time, after the period 
of storm and stress of classical economics, a system of unscrupu- 
lous apologetics was already in full sway which found its most 
perfect expression in the 'doctrine of harmony' of M, Frederic 
Bastiat, the famous vulgarian and idol of all Philistines, and 
quite soon the various Schultzes were to flourish as common- 
place, German imitations of the French prophet of harmony. 
Rodbertus' strictures are aimed at these unscrupulous 'peddlers 
of free trade'. In his first Letter o?i Social Problems'^ he exclaims: 
'Because of their paltry incomes, five-sixths of the population 
are not only deprived of most of the benefits of civilisation, but 
are in constant danger of the most terrible outbreaks of real dis- 
tress to which they sometimes succumb. Yet they are the 
creators of all the wealth of the society. Their labours begin at 
dawn and end at dusk, continuing even after night has fallen — 
but no exertion can change this fate; they cannot raise their 
income, and only lose that little leisure which ought to remain 
nowadays for the improvement of their minds. Hitherto it might 
have seemed as if all this suffering were necessary to the progress 
of civilisation, but now that a series of the most wonderful dis- 
coveries and inventions have increased human labour power 
more than a hundredfold, new prospects of changing these grim 
conditions are suddenly revealed. As a result, the wealth and 
assets of a nation increase at a growing rate as compared with 
' To V. Kirchmann, in 1880. 
238 



RODBERTUS ON THE CLASSICAL SCHOOL 

the population. Gould anything be more natural, I ask, or more 
justly demanded, than that this increase should also somehow 
benefit the creators of this old and new wealth? that their 
incomes should be raised or their working-hours shortened, or 
that they might join in increasing numbers the ranks of the 
lucky ones, privileged to reap the fruits of labour? Yet state 
economy, or better, national economy has only achieved the 
opposite result. Increasing poverty of these classes goes together 
with increasing wealth of the nation, there is even need of 
special legislation, lest the working day become longer, and 
finally, the working classes swell in number out of proportion 
with the others. Even that is not enough! The hundredfold 
increase of labour efficiency which was powerless to relieve five- 
sixths of the population, even threatens periodically the remain- 
ing sixth of the nation and thus society as a whole.' 

'What contradictions in the economic sphere in particular! 
And what contradictions in the social sphere in general! The 
wealth of society is growing, and this growth is accompanied 
by a growth of poverty. — The creative eflSciency of the means 
of production is increasing, and the consequence is that they are 
scrapped. Social conditions demand that the material position 
of the working classes should be raised to the level of their 
political status, and economic conditions, by way of answer, 
depress them further. Society needs the unrestricted growth of 
wealth, and contemporary leaders of production must create 
restrictions, in order to discourage poverty. In a single respect 
alone is there harmony: just as wrong as the conditions is the 
authoritative section of the society with its inclination to look 
for the root of the evil everywhere except in the right place. 
This egotism, which only too often dons the scholar's gown, also 
accuses the vices of the workers of being the cause of poverty. 
The responsibility for the crimes committed against them by 
all-powerful facts is ascribed to their alleged discontent and 
shiftlessness, and where even such egotism cannot close its eyes 
to their innocence, it makes an elaborate dogma of the "neces- 
sity of poverty " . Unremittingly, it exhorts the workers only to 
work and to pray, impresses upon them the duty of abstinence 
and economy, and at best infringes upon their rights by the 
institution of compulsory saving, adding to the misery of the 
workers. It does not see that a blind force of commerce has 

239 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

transformed the prayer for work into the curse of enforced 
unemployment, that . . . abstinence is impossible or cruel, and 
that, lastly, morals always remain ineffective if commended by 
those of whom the poet says that they drink wine in secret but 
preach water in public.'^ 

Thirty years after Sismondi and Owen, twenty years after 
the indictment made by the English socialists, the followers 
of Ricardo, and last but not least, after the publication of the 
Communist Manifesto, such bold words alone cannot claim 
to break new ground. What matters above all now is the 
theoretical foundation of this indictment. Rodbertus here pro- 
posed a complete system which can be reduced to the following 
simple statements. 

Owing to the laws of an economy left to its own devices, the 
high level of labour productivity achieved by history, together 
with the institutions of positive law, that is to say the right of 
private ownership, a whole series of wrong and unethical 
phenomena had emerged: 

(i) In the place of 'normal', 'constituted' value we have 
exchange value, and accordingly coined money instead of a 
proper 'paper' or 'labour' currency which would genuinely 
correspond to the concept of money. The first principle is that 
all economic goods are products of labour, or, as we might put 
it, that labour alone is creative. This statement, however, does 
not imply that the value of the product must always equal the 
cost of labour, or that, in other words, value is even now 
measured in terms of labour. The truth is rather 'that this still 
has not become 3. fact, but is only an idea of political economy'. ^ 

'If the value could be constituted in accordance with the 
labour expended on the product, we might imagine a kind of 
money which would be, as it were, a leaf torn from the public 
account-book, a receipt written on the most rubbishy material, 
on rags, which everyone would receive for the value he has 
produced, and which he would realise as a voucher for an 
equivalent part of the national product subsequently under 
distribution. ... If, however, for some reason or another, it is 
impossible or not jet possible to establish this value, money as such 
must still retain the value it is designed to liquidate; made of 

^ Dr. Carl Rodbertus-Jagctzow, Schriften (Berlin, 1899), vol. iii, pp. 172-4, 
184. * Op. cit., vol. ii, pp. 104 f. 

240 



RODBERTUS ON THE CLASSICAL SCHOOL 

an intrinsically valuable commodity like gold or silver, it has 
to represent a pledge or pawn of the same value. '^ 'As soon as 
capitalist commodity production has come into existence, every- 
thing is turned upside down: there can no longer be a con- 
stituted value, since it can only be exchange valueV and, 'since 
the value cannot be constituted, money cannot ht purely money, 
it cannot fully conform to its concept'.^ In an equitable ex- 
change, the exchange value of the products would have to equal 
the quantity of labour needed for producing them, and an 
exchange of products would always mean an exchange of equal 
quantities of labour. Even assuming, however, that everybody 
produced just those use-values which another person requires, 
yet, 'since we arc here concerned with human discernment and 
human volition, there must always be for a start a correct 
calculation, adjustment and allocation of the labour quantities 
contained in the products for exchange, there must be a law 
to which the facts will conform'.^ 

It is well-known that Rodbertus, in his discovery of 'con- 
stituted value', laid great stress on his priority to Proudhon 
which we shall gladly concede him, Marx, in his Poverty of 
Philosophy, and Engels in his preface to it, have comprehensively 
shown that this 'concept' is a mere phantom, still used in theory 
but in practice buried already in England well before Rodbertus' 
time, that it is but a Utopian distortion of Ricardo's doctrine of 
value. We therefore need not deal further with this 'music of 
the future, performed on a toy trumpet', 

(2) The 'economy of exchange' resulted in the 'degradation' 
of labour to a commodity, the labour wage being determined 
as an item of expenditure {Kostenwert der Arbeit) instead of repre- 
senting a fixed rate of the national product. By a daring jump in 
history, Rodbertus derives his wages law indirectly from slavery 
and regards the specific traits which a capitalist production of 
commodities imposes on exploitation as no more than a lying 
deception against which he fulminates from a moral point of 
view. 

'So long as the producers themselves remained the property 
of those who were not producing, so long as slavery was in 
existence, it was the advantage of the "masters" alone which 

^ Op. Cit., vol. i, p. 99. 2 Ibid.^ p, lyg, 

^ Ibid., p. 176. •• Op. cit., vol. ii, p. 65. 

241 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

unilaterally determined the volume of this share (of the workers). 
With the producers attaining full liberty of person, if nothing 
more as yet, both parties agree on the wage in advance. The 
wage, in modern terminology, is the object of a "free contract", 
that is to say, an object of competition. Labour is therefore as a 
matter of course subjected to the same laws of exchange as its 
products: labour itself acquires exchange value; the size of the 
wage depends on the effects of supply and demand.' 

Rodbertus, after having thus turned everything upside down, 
after deriving the exchange value of labour from competition, 
now immediately derives its value from its exchange value. 

'Under the laws of exchange value, labour, like produced 
goods, comes to have a kind of "cost value" which exercises 
some magnetic effects upon its exchange value, the amount of 
the labour wage. It is that particular amount of payment which 
is necessary for the "maintenance" of labour, in other words, 
which enables labour to continue, if only in the persons of its 
progeny — it is the so-called "minimum of subsistence".' 

For Rodbertus, however, this is not a statement of objective 
economic laws, but merely an object for moral indignation. 
He calls the thesis of the classical school, that labour is worth 
no more than the wages it can command, a 'cynical' statement, 
and he is determined to expose the 'string of lies' leading to this 
'crude and unethical' conclusion. ^ 

'It was a degrading view to estimate the wages of labour in 
accordance with the "necessary subsistence", like so many 
machines to be kept in repair. Now that labour, the fountain- 
head of all commodities, has itself become a commodity of 
exchange, it is no less degrading to speak of its "natural price", 
of its "costs", just as we speak of the natural price and costs of 
its product, and to include this natural price, these costs, in the 
amount of goods that is necessary to call forth a continuous flow 
of labour on the market.' 

This commodity character of labour power, however, and the 
corresponding determination of its value, are nothing but a 
malicious misrepresentation of the Free Trade school. Like the 
good Prussian he was, Rodbertus put capitalist commodity pro- 
duction as a whole in the dock, as offending against the obtain- 
ing constitutional law, instead of pointing out its inherent con- 
* Schriften, vol. i, pp. 182-4. 
242 



RODBERTUS ON THE CLASSICAL SCHOOL 

tradiction, the conflict between determining the value o/labour 
and determining the value created by labour, as the English 
disciples of Ricardo had done. 

'Stupid beyond words', he exclaims, 'is the dualist con- 
ception of those economists who would have the workers, as far 
as their legal status is concerned, join in deciding the late of 
society, and would for all that, have these same workers from an 
economic point of view, always treated as mere commodities!'^ 

Now it only remains to find out why the workers put up with 
such stupid and blatant injustice — an objection which Hermann 
for instance raised against Ricardo's theory of value. Rodbertus 
is ready with this answer: 

'What were the workers to do after their emancipation other 
than to agree to these regulations? Imagine their position: when 
the workers were freed, they were naked or in rags, they had 
nothing but their labour power. The abolition of slavery or 
serfdom, moreover, rescinded the master's legal or moral obliga- 
tion to feed them and care for their needs. Yet these needs 
remained, they still had to live. How, then, could their labour 
power provide them with a living? Were they simply to grab 
some of the capital existing in the society for their maintenance? 
The capital of society was already in the hands of other people, 
and the organs of the "law" would not have tolerated such a 
step. What, then, could the workers have done? Only these 
alternatives were before them: either to overthrow the law of 
society or to return, under roughly the same conditions as 
before, to their former masters, the owners of the land and of 
capital, and to receive as wages what was formerly doled out to 
them to keep them fed.'^ 

It was fortunate for mankind and the Prussian state that the 
workers were 'wise' enough not to overthrow civilisation and 
preferred to submit to the 'base demands' of their 'former 
masters'. This, then, is the origin of the capitalist wage system, 
of the wages law as 'a kind of slavery' resulting from an abuse 
of power on the part of the capitalists, and from the precarious 
position and the meek acquiescence on the part of the pro- 
letariat — if we are to believe the highly original explanations of 
that very Rodbertus whose theories Marx is reputed to have 
'plagiarised'. Let Rodbertus claim 'priority' in this particular 
1 Ibid., pp. 182-4. ^ Ibid., p. 72. 

243 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

theory of value without challenge, seeing that English socialists 
and other social critics had already given far less crude and 
primitive analyses of the wage-system. The singular point about 
it all is that Rodbertus' display of moral indignation about the 
origin and the economic laws of the wages system does not lead 
up to the demand for doing away with this abominable injus- 
tice, the 'dualism stupid beyond words'. Far from it! He fre- 
quently reassures his fellow-men that he does not really mean 
anything very serious by roaring — he is no lion fell, only one 
Snug the joiner. Indeed, an ethical theory of the wages law is 
necessary only to achieve a further conclusion: 

(3) Since the 'laws of exchange value' determine the wage, an 
advance in labour productivity must bring about an ever declin- 
ing share in the product for the workers. Here we have arrived 
at the Archimedean fulcrum of Rodbertus' system. This 'declin- 
ing wage rate' is his most important 'original' discovery on 
which he harps from his first writings on social problems (prob- 
ably in 1839) until his death, and which he 'claims' as his very 
own. This conception, for all that, was but a simple corollary of 
Ricardo's theory of value and is contained implicit in the wages 
fund theory which dominated bourgeois economics up to the 
publication of Marx's Capital. Rodbertus nevertheless believed 
that this 'discovery' made him a kind of Galileo in economics, 
and he refers to his 'declining wage rate' as explaining every 
evil and contradiction in capitalist economy. Above all, he 
derives from the declining wage rate the phenomenon of 
pauperism which, together with the crises, in his opinion con- 
stitutes the social question. It would be as well to draw the 
attention of contemporaries, 'out for Marx's blood', to the fact 
that it was not Marx but Rodbertus, a man much nearer their 
own heart, who set up a whole theory of progressive poverty in 
a very crude form, and that he, unlike Marx, made it the very 
pivot, not just a symptom, of the entire social problem. Com- 
pare for instance his argument in his first Letter on Social Prob- 
lems to V. Kirchmann on the absolute impoverishment of the 
working class. The 'declining wage rate' must serve in addition 
to explain the other fundamental phenomena of the social 
problem — the crises. In this connection Rodbertus tackles the 
problem of balancing consumption with production, touching 
upon the whole lot of cognate controversial issues which had 

244 



RODBERTUS ON THE CLASSICAL SCHOOL 

already been fought out between the schools of Sismondi and 
Ricardo. 

Rodbcrtus' knowledge of crises was of course based upon far 
more material evidence than that of Sismondi. In his first Letter 
on Social Problems he already gives a detailed description of the 
four crises in 1818-19, 1825, 1837-9 and 1847. Since his observa- 
tions covered a much longer period, Rodbertus could by and 
large gain a much deeper insight into the essential character of 
crises than his predecessors. As early as 1850 he formulated 
the periodical character of the crises which recur at ever 
shorter intervals and at the same time with ever increasing 
severity: 

'Time after time, these crises have become more terrible in 
proportion with the increase in wealth, engulfing an ever greater 
number of victims. The crisis of 1818-19, although even this 
caused panic in commerce and inspired misgivings in economics, 
was of small importance compared to that of 1825-6. The first 
crisis had made such inroads on the capital assets of England 
that the most famous economists doubted whether complete 
recovery could ever be made. Yet it was eclipsed by the crisis of 
1836-7. The crises of 1839-40 and 1846-7 wrought even greater 
havoc than previous ones.' — 'According to recent experiences, 
however, the crises recur at ever shorter intervals. There was a 
lapse of 18 years between the first and the third crisis, of 
14 years between the second and the fourth, and of only 
12 years between the third and the fifth. Already the signs are 
multiplying that a new disaster is imminent, though no doubt 
the events of 1848 put oflfthe catastrophe.'^ 

Rodbertus remarks that an extraordinary boom in produc- 
tion and great progress in industrial technique always are the 
heralds of a crisis. 'Every one of them [of the crises] followed 
upon a period of outstanding industrial prosperity.'^ 

From the crises in history he demonstrates that 'they occur 
only after a considerable increase of productivity'.^ Rodbertus 
opposes what he terms the vulgar view which conceives of crises 
as mere disturbances in the monetary and credit system, and 
he criticises the whole of Peel's currency legislation as an error 
of judgment, arguing the point in detail in his essay On 

^ Schriften, vol. iii, pp. i lo-i i. 2 Ibid., p. 108. 

^ Op. cit., vol. i, p. 62. 

245 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

Commercial Crises and the Mortgage Problem. There he makes the 
following comment among others: 'We would therefore deceive 
ourselves if we were to regard commercial crises merely as crises 
of the monetary, banking, or credit system. This is only their 
outer semblance when they first emerge.'^ 

Rodbertus also shows a remarkably acute grasp of the part 
played by foreign trade in the problem of crises. Just like 
Sismondi, he states the necessity of expansion for capitalist pro- 
duction, but he simultaneously emphasises the fact that the 
periodical crises are bound to grow in volume. 

'Foreign trade', he says, 'is related to slumps only as charity is 
related to poverty. They ultimately only enhance one another.'^ 
And further: 'The only possible means of warding off further 
outbreaks of crises is the application of the two-edged knife of 
expanding foreign markets. The violent urge towards such ex- 
pansion is largely no more but a morbid irritation caused by a 
sickly organ. Since one factor on the home market, produc- 
tivity, is ever increasing, and the other factor, purchasing power, 
remains constant for the overwhelming majority of the popu- 
lation, commerce must endeavour to conjure up a similarly 
unlimited amount of purchasing power on the foreign market.'^ 
In this way, the irritation may be soothed to some extent so 
that at least there will not be a new outbreak of the calamity 
right away. Every foreign market opened defers the social prob- 
lem in a like manner. Colonisation of primitive countries would 
have similar effects: Europe rears a market for herself in places 
where none had been before. Yet such a medicine would essen- 
tially do no more than appease the ill. As soon as the new 
markets are supplied, the problem will revert to its former state 
— a conflict between the two factors: limited purchasing power 
versus unlimited productivity. The new attack would be warded 
off the small market only to re-appear, in even wider dimen- 
sions and with even more violent incidents, on a larger one. And 
since the earth is finite and the acquisition of new markets must 
some time come to an end, the time will come when the ques- 

^ Schriften, vol. iv, p. 226. 

^ In Towards the Understanding of Our Politico-Economic Conditions, part ii, 
n. I. 

' I n 0« Commercial Crises and the Mortgage Problem of the Landowners, quoted 
above (op. cit., vol. iii, p. 186). 

246 



RODBERTUS ON THE CLASSICAL SCHOOL 

tion can no longer be simply adjourned. Sooner or later, a 
definite solution will have to be found. '^ 

^ Op. cit., vol. iv, p. 233. It is interesting to note in this connection how 
Rodbcrtus appears in practice as an extremely sober and realistically- 
minded prophet of capitalist colonial policy, in the manner of the present- 
day 'Pan-Germans', his moral ranting about the unhappy fate of the work- 
ing classes notwithstanding. In a footnote to the above quotation, he writes: 
'We can go on to glance briefly at the importance of the opening up of Asia, 
in particular of China and Japan, the richest markets in the world, and also 
of the maintenance of English rule in India. It is to defer the solution of the 
social problem.' (The eloquent avenger of the exploited ingenuously dis- 
closes the means by which the profiteering exploiters can continue 'their 
stupid and criminal error', their 'flagrant injustice' for as long as possible.) 
'For the solution of this problem, the present lacks in unselfishness and 
moral resolution no less than in intelligence.' (Rodbertus' philosophical 
resignation is unparalleled!) 'Economic advantage cannot, admittedly, con- 
stitute a legal title to intervention by force, but on the other hand, a strict 
application of modern natural and international law to all the nations of the 
world, whatever their state of civilisation, is quite impracticable.' (A com- 
parison with Dorine's words in Moli^re's Tartiiffe is irresistible: 'Le ciel 
defend, de vraie, certains contentements, mais il y a avec lui des accommode- 
ments.') — 'Our international law has grown from a civilisation of Christian 
ethics, and since all law is based upon reciprocity, it can only provide the 
standard for relations between nations of the same civilisation. If it is applied 
beyond these limits, it is sentiment rather than natural and international 
law and the Indian atrocities should have cured us of it. Christian Europe 
should rather partake of the spirit which made the Greeks and the Romans 
regard all the other peoples of the world as barbarians. The younger Euro- 
pean nations might then regain the drive for making world history which 
impelled the Ancients to spread their native civilisation over the countries of 
the globe. They would reconquer Asia for world history hy joint action. Such 
common purpose and action would in turn stimulate the greatest social 
progress, a firm foundation of peace in Europe, a reduction of armies, a 
colonisation of Asia in the ancient Roman style — in other words, a genuine 
solidarity of interests in all walks of social life.' The vision of capitalist 
colonial expansion inspires the prophet of the exploited and oppressed to 
almost poetical flights, all the more remarkable for coming at a time when 
a civilisation of Christian ethics accomplished such glorious exploits as the 
Opium Wars against China and the Indian atrocities — that is to say, the 
atrocities committed by the British in their bloody suppression of the Indian 
Mutiny. — In his second Letter on Social Problems, in 1850, Rodbertus had 
expressed the conviction that if society lacks the 'moral resolution' necessary 
to solve the social question, in other words, to change the distribution of 
wealth, history would be forced to 'use the whip of revolution against it' 
(op. cit., vol. ii, p. 83). Eight years later, however, the stalwart Prussian 
prefers to crack the whip of a colonial policy of Christian ethics over the 
natives of the colonial countries. It is, of course, what one might expect of 

247 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

Rodbertus also recognises the anarchical character of capit- 
alist private enterprise to be conducive to crises, but only as one 
factor among many, seeing it as the source of a particular type 
of crises, not as the real cause of crises in general. About the 
crises at v. Kirchmann's Ort, e.g., he says: 'I maintain that a 
slump of this kind does not occur in real life. The market of 
to-day is large, there are countless wants and many branches of 
production, productivity is considerable and the data of com- 
merce are obscure and misleading. The individual entrepreneur 
does not know how much others are producing, and so it may 
easily happen that he over-estimates the demand for a certain 
commodity with which he will then overstock the market.' 

Rodbertus says outright that the only remedy for these crises 
is the 'complete reversal' of contemporary property-relations or 
a planned economy, concentrating all means of production 'in 
the hands of a single social authority'. To set troubled minds at 
rest, however, he is quick to add that he reserves judgment as 
to whether there can actually be such a state of affairs — 'yet 
this would be the only possible way to prevent slumps of this 
kind'. Thus he expressly regards anarchy in the modern mode 
of production as responsible for only a specific and partial 
manifestation of crises. 

Rodbertus scornfully rejects Say-Ricardo's axiom of a natural 
equilibrium between consumption and production; just like 
Sismondi, he emphasises that everything turns on the pur- 
chasing power of society, and also takes it to be dependent oipon 
the distribution of income. All the same, he does not endorse 

the 'original founder of scientific socialism in Germany' that he should also 
be a warm supporter of militarism, and his phrase about the 'reduction of 
armies' is but poetic licence in his verbal fireworks. In his essay On the 
Understanding of the Social Question he explains that the 'entire national tax 
burden is perpetually gravitating towards the bottom, sometimes in form 
of higher prices for wage goods, and sometimes in form of lower money 
wages'. In this connection, he considers conscription 'under the aspect of 
a charge on the state', explaining that 'as far as the working classes are 
concerned, it is nothing like a tax but rather a confiscation of their entire 
income for many years'. He adds immediately: 'To avoid misunderstanding 
I would point out that I am a staunch supporter of our present military 
constitution (i.e. the military constitution of counter-revolutionary Prussia) 
— although it may be oppressive to the working classes and deinand great 
financial sacrifices from the propertied classes' (op. cit., vol. iii, p. 34). That 
does not even sound like a lion's roar! 

248 



RODBERTUS ON THE CLASSICAL SCHOOL 

Sismondi's theory of crises and disagrees sharply with the con- 
clusions drawn from it. If Sismondi saw the source of all evil in 
the unlimited expansion of production without regard to the 
limitations of incomes, and advocated a restriction of produc- 
tion, Rodbertus, quite on the contrary, champions the most 
powerful and unrestricted expansion of production, of wealth 
and of the productive forces, believing this to be a social neces- 
sity. Whoever rejects the wealth of society, rejects at the same 
time its power, its progress, and, with its progress, its virtues. 
Whoever stands in the way of growing wealth, stands in the 
way of all social progress whatever. Every increase in know- 
ledge, resolve and capacity is conceived as bound up with an 
increase in wealth.^ From this point of view, Rodbertus is 
strongly in favour of issuing houses which he regards as the 
indispensable foundations for a rapid and unrestricted expan- 
sion of company promoting. Both his essay of 1859 on the 
mortgage problem and the treatise on the Financial Crisis in 
Prussia^ are devoted to this plea. He even polemises outright 
against the Sismondian type of caveat, as usual broaching the 
matter first from his peculiar Utopian ethics. 

'The entrepreneurs', he holds forth, 'are essentially civil ser- 
vants of economy. By the institution of property, they are once 
and for all entrusted with the nation's means of production. If 
they set them to work and strain all their energies in the pro- 
cess, they do but their duty, since capital — let me repeat — 
exists entirely for the sake of production.' And a further, factual 
argument: 'Or would you have them (the entrepreneurs) turn 
acute attacks of suffering into a chronic state by working per- 
sistently and from the first with fewer forces than are given by 
the means of production; are they to pay for a less severe form 
of the evil with its permanent duration? Even if we were silly 
enough to give them this advice, they would not be able to 
follow it. How could the entrepreneurs of the world recognise 
the limits beyond which the market would cease to be healthy? 
They engage in production without knowing the one of the 
other, they are producing in the most distant corners of the 
earth for a market hundreds of miles away, they produce with 
such vast forces that a month's production may already over- 
step the limit. How could production — so divided and yet so 
^ Schriften, vol. iii, p. 182. ^ Published already in 1845. 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

powerful — conceivably estimate in good time what will be 
enough? Where, for instance, are the organisations, the up-to- 
date statistical bureaux and the like to help them in this task? 
What is worse, the price alone, its rise and fall, indicates the 
position of the market, and this is not like a barometer which 
predicts the temperature of the market, but more like a ther- 
mometer which only registers it. If the price falls, the limit has 
been passed already, and the evil is with us.'^ 

These thrusts, obviously aimed at Sismondi, exhibit quite 
fundamental differences between the two opponents. If Engels 
then says in his Anti-Duehring that Sismondi first explained the 
crises as resulting from under-consumption, and that Rodbertus 
borrowed this view from him, he is not strictly accurate. All 
that Rodbertus and Sismondi have in common is their opposi- 
tion against the classical school and the general explanation of 
crises as the result of the distribution of incomes. Even in this 
connection Rodbertus mounts his own particular hobby horse: 
over-production is not caused by the low level of working class 
incomes, nor yet, as Sismondi maintains, by the capitalists' 
limited capacity for consumption, but solely by the fact that 
with a growing productivity of labour, the workers' income, in 
terms of value, represents an ever smaller share of the product. 
Rodbertus takes pains to convince the opposition that it is not 
the small volume of the workers' share which causes the crises. 

'Just imagine', he goes on to lecture v. Kirchmann, 'these 
shares to be so small as to ensure only a bare subsistence for 
those who are entitled to them. As long as you establish them as 
representing a proportion of the national product, you will have 
a constant "vessel for value" which can absorb ever increasing 
contents, and an ever increasing prosperity of the working 
classes as well. . . . And now imagine on the contrary as large a 
share for the working classes as you please, and let it become an 
ever smaller fraction of the national product that grows with 
increasing productivity. Then, provided it is not reduced to the 
present pittance, this share will still protect the workers from 
undue privations since the amount of products it represents will 
still be considerably greater than it is to-day. Once this share 
begins to decline, however, there will be spreading discontent, 
culminating in a commercial crisis for which the capitalists are 
^ Schriften, vol. iv, p. 231. 
250 



RODBERTUS ON THE CLASSICAL SCHOOL 

not to blame inasmuch as they did no more than their duty 
in laying down the volume of production according to the given 
magnitude of these shares.' 

That is why the 'declining wage rate' is the real cause of 
crises. It can only be counteracted by legal measures to ensure 
that the workers' share represents a stable and unchanging rate 
of the national product. This grotesque notion takes some under- 
standing if we are to do justice to its economic implications. 



251 



CHAPTER XVII 

RODBERTUS' ANALYSIS OF 
REPRODUCTION 

To begin with, what does it mean that a decrease in the 
workers' share is bound immediately to engender over- 
production and commercial crises? Such a view can only 
make sense provided Rodbertus takes the 'national product' to 
consist of two parts, vide the shares of the workers and of the 
capitalists, in short of y-j-j", one share being exchangeable for the 
other. And that is more or less what he actually seems to say on 
occasions, e.g. in his first Letter on Social Problems: 

'The poverty of the working classes precludes their income 
from giving scope to increasing production. The additional 
amount of products from the entrepreneurs' point of view lowers 
the value of the aggregate product so far as to bar production 
on the former scale, leaving the workers at best to their accus- 
tomed straits, though, if it could be made available to the 
workers, it would not only improve their lot but would further 
act as a counterweight by increasing the value of what is re- 
tained by the capitalists (and so enable the latter to keep their 
enterprises at the same level).' ^ 

The 'counterweight' which in the hand of the workers in- 
creases the 'value' of 'what is retained' by the entrepreneurs, 
can in this context only be the demand. Once again, we have 
landed happily at the familiar Ort of v. Kirchmann's where 
workers and capitalists exchange their incomes for the surplus 
product, and where the crises arise because variable capital is 
small and the surplus value large. This peculiar notion has 
already been dealt with above. There are other occasions, how- 
ever, when Rodbertus advances a somewhat different concep- 
tion. The interpretation of his theory in the fourth Letter on 
Social Problems is that the continual shifts in the relations of 
demand, evident in the share of the working class and caused 

^ Schriften, vol. iii, p. 176. 
252 



RODBERTUS' ANALYSIS OF REPRODUCTION 

by the share of the capitaHst class, must result in a chronic dis- 
proportion between production and consumption. 

'What if the entrepreneurs endeavour to keep always within 
the limits of those shares, yet the shares themselves are all the 
time on the decline for the great majority of the society, the 
workers, decreasing gradually, unnoticeably, but with relentless 
force? — What if the share of these classes is continually decreas- 
ing to the same extent as their productivity is increasing?' — 'Is it 
not really the fact that the capitalists of necessity organise pro- 
duction in accordance with the present volume of shares in 
order to make wealth universal, and that yet they always pro- 
duce over and above this volume (of previous shares), thereby 
perpetuating dissatisfaction which culminates in this stagnation 
of trade?'! 

On this showing, the explanation of crises should be as 
follows: the national product consists of a number of 'common 
goods', as V. Kirchmann puts it, for the workers, and of superior 
goods for the capitalists. The wages represent the quantity of 
the former, and aggregate surplus value that of the latter. If the 
capitalists organise their production on this footing, and if at the 
same time there is progressive productivity, a lack of proportion 
will immediately ensue. For the share of the workers to-day is 
no longer that of yesterday, but less. If the demand for 'common 
goods' had involved, say, six-sevenths of the national product 
yesterday, then to-day it involves only five-sevenths, and the 
entrepreneurs, having provided for six-sevenths of 'common 
goods', will find to their painful surprise that they over- 
produced by one-seventh. Now, wiser by this experience, they 
try to organise to-morrow's output of 'common goods' to a mere 
five-sevenths of the total value of the national product, but they 
have a new disappointment coming to them, since the share of 
the national product falling to wages to-morrow is bound to be 
only four-sevenths, and so on. 

In this ingenious theory there are quite a few points to make 
us wonder. If our commercial crises are entirely due to the fact 
that the workers' 'wage rate', the variable capital, represents a 
constantly diminishing portion of the total value of the national 
product, then this unfortunate law brings with it the cure for the 
evil it has caused, since it must be an ever smaller part of the 
1 Op. cit., vol. i, pp. 53, 57. 
253 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

aggregate product for which there is over-production. Although 
Rodbertus dehghts in such terms as 'an overwhelming majority', 
'the large popular masses' of consumers, it is not the number of 
heads that make up the demand, but the value they represent 
which is relevant. This value, if Rodbertus is to be believed, 
forms a more and more trifling part of the aggregate product. 
Crises are thus made to rest on an ever narrowing economic 
basis, and all that remains to discover is how in spite of it all it 
can still happen that the crises are universal and increasingly 
severe besides, as Rodbertus is fully aware. The purchasing 
power lost by the working classes should be gained by the 
capitalist class; if y decreases, s must grow larger to make up for 
it. On this crude scheme, the purchasing power of society as a 
whole cannot change, as Rodbertus says in so many words: 'I 
know very well that what is taken from the workers' share goes 
ultimately to swell that of the "rentiers" (rent and surplus value 
are used as synonyms, R.L.), and that purchasing power re- 
mains constant on the whole and in the long run. But as far as 
the product on the market is concerned, the crisis always sets in 
before this increase can make itself felt. '^ 

In short, the most it can amount to is that there is 'too much' 
of 'common goods' and 'too little' of superior goods for the 
capitalists. Quite unawares, and by devious ways, Rodbertus 
here falls in with the Say-Ricardian theory he so ardently con- 
tested, the theory that over-production on one side always 
corresponds to under-production on the other. Seeing that the 
ratio of the two shares is persistently shifting to the advantage of 
the capitalists, our commercial crises might be expected on the 
whole to take on increasingly the character of periodical under- 
instead of over-production! Enough of this exercise in logic. 
The upshot of it all is that Rodbertus conceives the national 
product in respect of its value as made up of two parts only, of 
s and V, thus wholly subscribing to the views and traditions of the 
classical school he is fighting tooth and nail, and even adding 
his own flourish that the capitalists consume the entire surplus 
value. That is why he repeatedly says without mincing his 
words, as in the fourth Letter on Social Problems: 

'Accordingly, we must abstract from the reasons which cause 
the division of rent in general into rent proper and capital rent, 
^ Schriften, vol. i, p. 2o6. 



RODBERTUS' ANALYSIS OF REPRODUCTION 

to find the basic principle underlying the division of rent (sur- 
plus value) in general, the principle underlying the division of the 
labour product into wage and rent.'' And, in the third Letter: 
'Ground rent, capital profit and the wage of labour arc, let me 
repeat, revenue. By this means landlords, capitalists and workers 
must live, must satisfy, that is to say, their immediate human 
necessities. They must therefore draw their income in the form 
of goods suitable for this purpose.'- 

The misrepresentation of capitalist economy has never been 
formulated more crudely, and there is no doubt that Rodbertus 
claims the palm of 'priority' — not so much over Marx as over 
all popular economists — with full justification. To leave the 
reader in no doubt about the utter muddle he has made, he 
goes on, in the same letter, to rank capitalist surplus value as an 
economic category on the same level as the revenue of the 
ancient slave-owner: 

'The first state (that of slavery) goes with the most primitive 
natural economy: that portion of the labour product which is 
withheld from the income of workers or slaves and forms the 
master's or owner's property, will undividedly accrue to the one 
man who owns the land, the capital, the worker and the labour 
product; there is not even a distinction of thought between rent 
and capital profits. — The second state entails the most com- 
plicated money economy: that portion of the labour product, 
withheld from the income of the now emancipated workers, and 
accruing to the respective owners of land, and capital, will be 
further divided among the owners of the raw material and the 
manufactured product respectively; the one rent of the former 
state will be split up into ground rent and capital profits, and 
will have to be diflferentiated accordingly. '^ 

Rodbertus regards the splitting-up of the surplus value 'with- 
held' from the workers' 'income' as the most striking difference 
between exploitation by slavery and modern capitalist exploita- 
tion. It is not the specific historical form of sharing out newly 
created value among labour and capital, but the distribution of 
the surplus value among the various people it benefits, which, 
irelevant to the productive process, is yet the decisive fact in the 
capitalist mode of production. In all other respects, capitalist 

^ Ibid, vol. i, p. 19. 2 Op, cit., vol. ii, p. 1 10. 

^ Ibid., p. 144. 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

surplus value remains just the same as the old 'single rent' 
of the slave-owner: a private fund for the exploiter's own con- 
sumption! 

Yet Rodbertus again contradicts himself in other places, re- 
membering all of a sudden the constant capital and the necessity 
for its renewal in the reproductive process. Thus, instead of 
bisecting the aggregate product into v and s, he posits a triple 
division: c, v, and s. In his third Letter on Social Problems he argues 
on the forms of reproduction in a slave-economy: 

'Since the master will see to it that part of the slave labour is 
employed in maintaining or even improving the fields, herds, 
agricultural and manufacturing tools, there will be "capital 
replacement", to use a modern term, in which part of the 
national economic product is immediately used for the upkeep 
of the estate, without any mediation by exchange or even by 
exchange value.'^ And, passing on to capitalist reproduction, 
he continues: 'Now, in terms of value, one portion of the labour 
product, is used or set aside for the maintenance of the estate, 
for "capital replacement", another, for the workers' subsistence 
as their money wage; and the owners of the land, of capital, 
and of the labour product retain the last as their revenue 
or rent.'2 

This, then, is an explicit expression of the triple division into 
constant capital, variable capital, and surplus value. Again, in 
this third Letter, he formulates the peculiarity of his 'new' theory 
with equal precision: 'On this theory, then, and under con- 
ditions of adequate labour productivity, the portion of the pro- 
duct which remains for wages after the replacement of capital, 
will be distributed among workers and owners as wages and 
rent, on the basis of the ownership in land and capital.'^ 

It does seem now as if Rodbertus' analysis of the value of the 
aggregate product represents a distinct advance over the classical 
school. Even Adam Smith's 'dogma' is openly criticised a little 
further on, and it is really surprising that Rodbertus' learned 
admirers, Messrs. Wagner, Dietzel, Diehl & Co. failed to claim 
their white-headed boy's 'priority' over Marx on such an im- 
portant point of economic theory. As a matter of fact, in this 
respect no less than in the general theory of value, Rodbertus' 
priority is of a somewhat dubious character. If he seems on 

* Schriften, vol. ii, p. 146. ^ Ibid., p. 155. ^ Ibid., p. '.223. 

256 



RODBERTUS' ANALYSIS OF REPRODUCTION 

occasion to gain true insight, it immediately turns out to be a 
misunderstanding, or at best a wrong approach. His criticism of 
Adam Smith's dogma afFords a supreme example of his failure 
to cope with the triple division of the national product towards 
which he had groped his way. He says literally: 

'You know that all economists since Adam Smith already 
divided the value of the product into wage of labour, rent, and 
capital profit, that it is therefore not a new idea to ground the 
incomes of the various classes, and especially the various items 
of the rent, in a division of the product. But the economists at 
once go off the track. All of them, not even excepting Ricardo's 
school, make the mistake, first, not to recognise that the aggre- 
gate product, the finished good, the national product as a whole, 
is an entity in which workers, landowners, and capitalists all 
share, but conceiving the division of the unfinished product to 
be of one kind shared among three partners, and that of the 
manufactured product as of another kind again, shared between 
only two partners. For these theories both the unfinished pro- 
duct and the manufactured product constitute as such separate 
items of revenue. Secondly, — though both Sismondi and Ricardo 
are free from this particular error — they regard the natural fact 
that labour cannot produce goods without material help, i.e. 
without the land, as an economic fact, and take the social fact 
for a primary datum that capital as understood to-day is re- 
quired by the division of labour. Thus they set up the fiction of 
a fundamental economic relationship on which they base also 
for the shares of the various owners, ground rent springing from 
the contribution of the land lent by the owner to production, 
capital profits from the contribution of capital employed by the 
capitalist to this end, and the wages finally from labour's con- 
tribution, seeing that there are separate owners of land, capital, 
and labour in the society. Say's school, elaborating on this 
mistake with much ingenuity, even invented the concept of pro- 
ductive service of land, capital, and labour in conformity with 
the shares in the product of their respective owners, so as to 
explain these shares as the result of productive service. — Thirdly, 
they are caught up in the ultimate folly of deriving the wage of 
labour and the items of rent from the value of the product, the 
value of the product in turn being derived from the wage of 
labour and the items of rent, so that the one is made to depend 

A.c. 257 I 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

on the other and vice versa. This absurdity is quite unmistak- 
able when some of these authors attempt to expound "The 
Influence of Rent Upon Production Prices" and "The Influence 
of Production Prices Upon Rent" in two consecutive chapters.'^ 

Yet for all these excellent critical comments — the last, parti- 
cularly acute, actually does to some extent anticipate Marx's 
criticism of this point in Capital, volume ii — Rodbertus calmly 
falls in with the fundamental blunder of the classical school and 
its vulgar followers : to ignore altogether that part of the value 
of the aggregate product which is needed to replace the constant 
capital of the society. This way it was easier for him to keep up 
the singular fight against the 'declining wage rate'. 

Under capitalist forms of production, the value of the aggre- 
gate social product is divided into three parts: one corresponding 
to the value of the constant capital, the second to the wage total, 
i.e. the variable capital, and the third to the aggregate surplus 
value of the capitalist class. In this composition, the portion 
corresponding to the variable capital is relatively on the decline, 
and this for two reasons. To begin with, the relation of c to 
{v-^-s) within c-\-v-\-s changes all the time in the direction of a 
relative increase of c and a relative decrease of y+j. This is the 
simple law for a progressive efficiency of human labour, valid 
for all societies of economic progress, independently of their 
historical forms, a formula which only states that living labour is 
increasingly able to convert more means of production into 
objects for use in an ever shorter time. And if (y+j) decreases as 
a whole, so must v, as its part, decrease in relation to the total 
value of the product. To kick against this, to try and stop the 
decrease, would be tantamount to contending against the 
general effects of a growing labour productivity. Further, there 
is within {v -j-s) as well a change in the direction of a relative 
decrease in v and a relative increase in s, that is to say, an ever 
smaller part of the newly created value is spent on wages and an 
ever greater part is appropriated as surplus value. This is the 
specifically capitalist formula of progressive labour productivity 
which, under capitalist conditions of production, is no less valid 
than the general law. To use the power of the state to prevent a 
decrease of v as against s would mean that the fundamental 
commodity of labour power is debarred from this progress which 
^ Schriften, vol. ii, p. 226. 
258 



RODBERTUS' ANALYSIS OF REPRODUCTION 

decreases production costs for all commodities; it would mean 
the exemption of this one commodity from the economic effects 
of technical progress. More than that: the 'declining wage rate' 
is only another expression of the rising rate of surplus value 
which forms the most powerful and effective means of checking 
a decline of the profit rate, and which therefore represents the 
prime incentive for capitalist production in general, and for 
technical progress within this system of production in particular. 
Doing away with the 'declining wage rate' by way of legislation 
would be as much as to do away with the raison d'etre of capitalist 
society, to deal a crippling blow to its entire system. Let us face 
the facts: the individual capitalist, just like capitalist society as 
a whole, has no glimmering that the value of the product is 
made up from the sum total of labour necessary in the society, 
and this is actually beyond his grasp. Value, as the capitalist 
understands it, is the derivative form, reversed by competition 
as production costs. While in truth the value of the product 
is broken down into the values of its component fragments c, v 
and J", the capitalist mind conceives of it as the summation of 
c, V and s. These, in addition, also appear to him from a dis- 
torted perspective and in a secondary form, as ( i ) the wear and 
tear of his fixed capital, (2) his advances on circulating capital, 
including workers' wages, and (3) the current profits, i.e. the 
average rate of profit on his entire capital. How, then, is the 
capitalist to be compelled by a law, say of the kind envisaged 
by Rodbertus, to maintain a 'fixed wage rate' in the face of the 
aggregate value of the product? It would be quite as brilliant to 
stipulate by law for exactly one-third, no more, no less, of the 
total price of the product to be payable for the raw materials 
employed in the manufacture of any commodity. Obviously, 
Rodbertus' supreme notion, of which he was so proud, on which 
he built as if it were a new Archimedean discovery, which was 
to be the specific for all the ills of capitalist production, is arrant 
nonsense from all aspects of the capitalist mode of production. 
It could only result from the muddle in the theory of value 
which is brought to a head in Rodbertus' inimitable phrase: 
that 'now, in a capitalist society, the product must have value- 
in-exchange just as it had to have value-in-use in ancient 
economy'. 1 People in ancient society had to eat bread and meat 

^ Ibid., p. 156. 
259 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

in order to live, but we of to-day are already satisfied with know- 
ing the price of bread and of meat. The most obvious inference 
from Rodbertus' monomania about a 'fixed wage rate' is that he 
is quite incapable of understanding capitalist accumulation. 

Previous quotations have already shown that Rodbertus 
thinks solely of simple commodity production, quite in keeping 
with his mistaken doctrine that the purpose of capitalist produc- 
tion is the manufacture of consumer goods for the satisfaction of 
'human wants'. For he always talks of 'capital replacements', of 
the need to enable the capitalists to 'continue their enterprise on 
the previous scale'. His principal argument, however, is directly 
opposed to the accumulation of capital. To fix the rate of the 
surplus value, to prevent its growth, is tantamount to paralysing 
the accumulation of capital. Both Sismondi and v. Kirchmann 
had recognised the problem of balancing production and con- 
sumption to be indeed a problem of accumulation, that is to 
say of enlarged capitalist reproduction. Both traced the dis- 
turbances in the equilibrium of reproduction to accumulative 
tendencies denying the possibility of accumulation, with the 
only difference that the one recommended a damper on the pro- 
ductive forces as a remedy, while the other favoured their in- 
creasing employment to produce luxuries, the entire surplus 
value to be consumed. In this field, too, Rodbertus follows his 
own solitary path. The others might try with more or less 
success to comprehend th^fact of capitalist accumulation, but 
Rodbertus prefers to fight the very concept. 'Economists since 
Adam Smith have one after the other echoed the principle, 
setting it up as a universal and absolute truth, that capital could 
only come about by saving and accumulating.' ^ 

Rodbertus is up in arms against this 'deluded judgment'. 
Over sixty pages of print he sets out in detail that {a) it is not 
saving which is the source of capital but labour, that {b) the 
economists' 'delusion' about 'saving' hails from the extravagant 
view that capital is itself productive, and that [c) this delusion is 
ultimately due to another: the error that capital is — capital. 

V. Kirchmann for his part understood quite well what is at the 

bottom of capitalist 'savings'. He had the pretty argument: 

'Everyone knows that the accumulation of capital is not a mere 

hoarding of reserves, an amassing of metal and monies to remain 

^ Schriften, vol. i, p. 40. 

260 



RODBERTUS' ANALYSIS OF REPRODUCTION 

idle in the owners' vaults. Those who want to save do it for the 
sake of re-employing their savings cither personally or through 
the agency of others as capital, in order to yield them revenue. 
That is only possible if these capitals are used in new enterprises 
which can produce so as to provide the required interest. One 
may build a ship, another a barn, a third may reclaim a desolate 
swamp, a fourth may order a new spinning frame, while a fifth, 
in order to enlarge his shoe-making business, would buy more 
leather and employ more hands — and so on. Only if the capital 
that has been saved is employed in this way, can it yield interest 
(meaning profit), and the latter is the ultimate object of all 
saving.'^ 

That is how v. Kirchmann described somewhat clumsily, 
but on the whole correctly, what is in fact the capitalisation 
of surplus value, the process of capitalist accumulation, which 
constitutes the whole significance of saving, advocated by 
classical economists 'since Adam Smith' with unerring instinct. 
Declaring war on saving and accumulation was quite in keep- 
ing with V. Kirchmann's premises, considering that he, like 
Sismondi, saw the immediate cause of the crises in accumu- 
lation. Here, too, Rodbertus is more 'thorough'. Having learned 
from Ricardo's theory of value that labour is the source of all 
value, and consequently of capital, too, he is completely blinded 
by this elementary piece of knowledge to the entire complexity 
of capitalist production and capital movements. Since capital is 
generated by labour, both the accumulation of capital, i.e. 'sav- 
ing', and the capitalisation of the surplus value are nothing but 
eyewash. 

In order to untangle this intricate network of errors by 
'economists since Adam Smith', he takes, as we might expect, 
the example of the 'isolated husbandman' and proves all that he 
needs by a long-drawn vivisection of the unhappy creature. 
Here already he discovers 'capital', that is to say, of course, that 
famous 'original stick' with which 'economists since Adam 
Smith' have hooked the fruits of a theory of capital from the tree 
of knowledge. 'Would saving be able to produce this stick?' is 
his query. And since every normal person will understand that 
'saving' cannot produce any stick, that Robinson [Crusoe] must 
have made it of wood, we have already proved that the 'savings' 
^ Op. cit., vol. ii, p. 25. 
261 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

theory is quite mistaken. Presently, the 'isolated husbandman' 
hooks a fruit from the tree with the stick, and this fruit is his 
'income'. 

'If capital were the source of income, already this most 
elementary and primitive event would have to give evidence of 
this relation. Would it be true to say, then, without doing 
violence to facts and concepts, that the stick is a source of income 
or of part of the income consisting in the fruit brought down? can 
we trace income, wholly or in part, back to the stick as its cause, 
may we consider it, wholly or in parts, as a. product of thestick?'^ 

Surely not. And since the fruit is the product, not of the stick 
which brought it down, but of the tree which grew it, Rodbertus 
has already proved that all 'economists since Adam Smith' are 
grossly mistaken if they maintain that income derives from 
capital. After a clear exposition of all fundamental concepts of 
economics on the example of Robinson [Crusoe] 's 'economy', 
Rodbertus transfers the knowledge thus acquired first to a 
fictitious society 'without ownership in capital or land', that is 
to say to a society with a communist mode of possession, and 
then to a society 'with ownership in capital and land', that is to 
say contemporary society, and, lo and behold — all the laws of 
Robinson [Crusoe] 's economy apply point for point to these two 
forms of society as well. Rodbertus contrives here a theory of 
capital and income which is the very crown of his Utopian 
imagination. Since he has discovered that Robinson [Crusoe] 's 
'capital' is the means of production pure and simple, he identifies 
capital with the means of production in capitalist economy as 
well. Thus reducing capital, with a wave of his hand, to constant 
capital, he protests in the name of justice and morality against 
the fact that the wages, the workers' means of subsistence, are 
also considered capital. He contends furiously against the con- 
cept of variable capital, seeing in it the cause of every disaster. 
'If only', he grieves, 'economists would pay attention to what I 
say, if only they would examine without prejudice whether they 
are right or I. This is the focal point of all errors about capital 
in the ruling system, this is the ultimate source of injustice 
against the working classes, in theory and practice alike. ''^ 

^ Schriften, vol. i, p. 250. 

2 Ibid., p. 295. Rodbertus reiterates during a lifetime the ideas he 
had evolved as early as 1842 in his Towards the Understanding of Our 

262 



RODBERTUS' ANALYSIS OF REPRODUCTION 

For 'justice' demands that the goods constituting the 'real 
wages' of the workers be counted, not as part of capital, but as 
belonging to the category of income. Though Rodbcrtus knows 
very well that the capitalist must regard the wages he has 
'advanced' as part of his capital, just like the other part laid 
out on immediate means of production, yet in his opinion this 
applies only to individual capitals. As soon as it is a question of 
the social aggregate product, of reproduction as a whole, he 
declares the capitalist categories of production an illusion, a 
malicious lie and a 'wrong'. 'Capital per se (properly so-called), 
the items which make up capital, capital from the nation's point 
of view, is something quite different from private capital, capital 
assets, capital property, all that "capital" in the modern use of the 
term usually stands for.'^ 

An individual capitalist produces by capitalist methods, but 
society as a whole must produce like Robinson [Crusoe], as a 
collective owner employing communist methods. 

'It makes no difference from this general and national point 
of view that greater or smaller parts of the aggregate national 
product are now owned in all the various phases of production 
by private persons who must not be numbered among the pro- 
ducers proper, and that the latter always manufacture this 
national aggregate product as servants — without sharing in the 
ownership of their own product — of these few owners.' 

Politico-Economic Conditions. 'Under present conditions, we have, however, 
gone so far as to consider not only the wage of labour part of the costs of the 
goods, but also rents and capital profits. We must therefore refute this 
opinion in detail. It has a twofold foundation: (a) a wrong conception of 
capital which counts the wage of labour as part of the capital just like 
materials and tools, while it is on the same level as rent and profit; {b) a 
confusion of the costs of the commodity and the advances of the entrepreneur 
or the costs of the enterprise' {Towards the Understanding of Our Politico- 
Economic Conditions, Neubrandenburg & Friedland, G. Barnovitz, 1842, p. 14). 
^ Schriften, vol. i, p. 304. Just so already in Towards the Understanding of Our 
Politico- Economic Conditions, 'We must distinguish between capital in its 
narrow or proper sense, and the fund of enteiprise, or capital in a wider 
sense. The former comprises the actual reserves in tools and materials, the 
latter the fund necessary for running an enterprise under present conditions 
of division of labour. The former is capital absolutely necessary to produc- 
tion, and the latter achieves such relative necessity only by force of present 
conditions. Hence only the former is capital in the strict and proper meaning 
of the term; this alone is completely congruent with the concept of national 
capital' (ibid., pp. 23-4). 

263 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

Certain peculiarities of the relations within the society as a 
whole no doubt result from this, namely (i) the institution of 
'exchange' as an intermediary, and (2) the inequality in the 
distribution of the product. 

'Yet all these consequences do not affect the movements of 
national production and the shaping of the national product 
which are always the same, now as ever (under the rule of com- 
munism), no more than they alter in any respect, as far as the 
national point of view is concerned, the contrast between capital 
and income so far established.' 

Sismondi had laboured in the sweat of his brow, as had Smith 
and many others, to disentangle the concepts of capital and 
income from the contradictions of capitalist production. Rod- 
bertus has a simpler method and abstracts from the specific 
forms determined by capitalist production for society as a whole; 
he simply calls the means of production 'capital' and the article 
of consumption 'revenue' and leaves it at that. 

'The essential influence of ownership in land and capital 
applies only to individuals having traffic with one another. If 
the nation is taken as a unit, the effects of such ownership upon 
the individuals completely disappear. '^ 

We see that as soon as Rodbertus comes up against the real 
problem, the capitalist aggregate product and its movements, 
he exhibits the Utopian's characteristic obtuseness in respect of 
the historical peculiarities of production. Marx's comment on 
Proudhon, that 'speaking of society as a whole, he pretends that 
this society is no longer capitalist' therefore fits him like a glove. 
The case of Rodbertus again exemplifies how every economist 
before Marx had been at a loss when it came to harmonising the 
concrete aspects of the labour process with the perspective of 
capitalist production which regards everything in terms of value, 
to mediating between the forms of movement performed by in- 
dividual capitals and the movement of social capital. Such 
efforts as a rule vacillate from one extreme to another: the 
shallow approach of Say and MacCulloch, recognising only the 
conceptions of individual capital, and the Utopian approach of 
Proudhon and Rodbertus who recognise only those of the process 
of labour. That is the context in which Marx's penetration 
appears in its true light. His diagram of simple reproduction 
' Schriften, vol. i, p. 292. 
264 



RODBERTUS' ANALYSIS OF REPRODUCTION 

illuminates the entire problem by gathering up all these per- 
spectives in their harmony and their contradictions, and so re- 
solves the hopeless obscurities of innumerable tomes into two 
rows of figures of striking simplicity. 

On the strength of such views on capital and income as these, 
capitalist appropriation is clearly quite impossible to under- 
stand. Indeed, Rodbertus simply brands it as 'robbery' and 
indicts it before the forum of the rights of property it so blatantly 
violates. 

'This personal freedom of the workers which ought legally to 
involve ownership in the value of the labour product, leads in 
practice to their renunciation of the proprietary claims extorted 
under pressure of ownership in land and capital; but the owners 
do not admit to this great and universal wrong, almost as 
though they were instinctively afraid that history might follow 
its own stern and inexorable logic' ^ 

Rodbertus' 'theory in all its details is therefore conclusive 
proof that those who praise present-day relations of ownership 
without being able at the same time to ground ownership in 
anything but labour, completely contradict their own principle. 
It proves that the property relations of to-day are in fact founded 
on a universal violation of this principle, that the great indivi- 
dual fortunes being amassed in society nowadays are the result 
of cumulative robbery mounting up in society with every new- 
born worker since time immemorial. '^ 

Since surplus value is thus branded as 'robbery', an increasing 
rate of surplus value must appear 'as a strange error of present- 
day economic organisation', Brissot's crude paradox with its 
revolutionary ring — 'property is theft' — had been the starting 
point for Proudhon's first pamphlet, but Rodbertus' thesis is 
quite another matter, arguing that capital is theft perpetrated 
on property. It need only be set side by side with Marx's chapter 
on the transformation of the laws of ownership into the laws of 
capitalist appropriation — this triumph of historical dialectics in 
vol. i of Marx's Capital — in order to show up Rodbertus' 
'priority'. By ranting against capitalist appropriation under the 
aspect of the 'right of property', Rodbertus closed his mind to 
capital as the source of surplus value just as effectively as he had 
previously been prevented by his tirades against 'saving' from 
^ Op. cit., vol. ii, p. 136. 2 Ibid., p. 225. 

265 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

seeing the surplus value as a source of capital. He is thus in an 
even worse position than v. Kirchmann, lacking all qualifica- 
tions for understanding capitalist accumulation. 

What it amounts to is that Rodbertus wants unrestricted 
expansion of production without saving, that is to say with- 
out capitalist accumulation! He wants an unlimited growth of 
the productive forces, and at the same time a rate of surplus 
value stabilised by an act of law. In short, he shows himself 
quite unable to grasp the real foundations of capitalist produc- 
tion he wishes to reform, and to understand the most important 
results of the classical economics he criticises so adversely. 

It is no more than to be expected, therefore, that Prof. Diehl 
should declare Rodbertus a pioneer of economic theory on the 
strength of his 'new theory of income' and of the distinction 
between the logical and the historical categories of capital 
(capital properly so-called in contrast to individual capital), 
that Prof Adolf Wagner should call him the 'Ricardo of 
economic socialism', proving himself ignorant at once of 
Ricardo, Rodbertus and socialism alike. Lexis even judges that 
Rodbertus is at least the equal of 'his British rival' in power 
of abstract thinking, and by far his superior in 'virtuosity to 
lay bare the phenomena in their ultimate connections', in 
'imaginative vitality', and above all in his 'ethical approach to 
economic life'. Rodbertus' real achievements in economic theory 
however, other than his critique of Ricardo's ground rent, his 
at times quite clear-cut distinction between surplus value and 
profit, his treatment of the surplus value as a whole in deliberate 
contrast with its partial manifestations, his critique of Smith's 
dogma concerning the analysis of commodities in terms of value, 
his precise formulation of the periodical character of the crises 
and his analysis of their manifestations — all these attempts to 
carry the investigation beyond Smith, Ricardo and Say, promis- 
ing as such, though doomed to failure because of the confused 
basic concepts, are rather above the heads of Rodbertus' official 
admirers. As Franz Mehring already pointed out, it was 
Rodbertus' strange fortune to be lauded to heaven for his 
alleged prowess in economics by the same people who called 
him to task for his real merits in politics. This contrast between 
economic and political achievements, however, does not con- 
cern us here: in the realm of economic theory, his admirers built 

266 



RODBERTUS' ANALYSIS OF REPRODUCTION 

him a grand memorial on the barren field he had dug with the 
hopeless zeal of the visionary, while the modest beds where he 
had sown a few fertile seeds, were allowed to be smothered with 
weeds and forgotten. '^ 

It cannot be said that the problem of accumulation had on 
the whole been much advanced beyond the first controversy 

^ A memorial of the worst kind, by the way, was that of the editors who 
published his works after his death. These learned gentlemen, Messrs. 
Wagner, Kozak, Moritz Wucrtz & Co., quarrelled in the prefaces to his 
posthumous writings like a rough crowd of ill-mannered servants in an 
antechamber, fighting out publicly their petty personal feuds and jealousies, 
and slanging one another. They did not even bother in common decency 
to establish the dates for the individual manuscripts they had found. To take 
an instance, it needed Mehring to observe that the oldest manuscript of 
Rodbertus that had been found was not published in 1837, as laid down 
autocratically by Prof. Wagner, but in 1839 at the earliest, since it refers 
in its opening paragraphs to historical events connected with the Chartist 
movement belonging, as a professor of economics really ought to know, in 
the year 183g. In Professor Wagner's introduction to Rodbertus we are 
constantly bored by his pomposity, his harping on the 'excessive demands 
on his time'; in any case Wagner addresses himself solely to his learned 
colleagues and talks above the heads of the common crowd; he passes over 
in silence, as befits a great man, Mehring's elegant correction before the 
assembled experts. Just as silently. Professor Diehl altered the date of 1837 
to 1839 in the Handwörterbuch der Staatswissenschaften, without a word to say 
when and by whom he had been thus enlightened. 

But the final touch is provided by the 'popular', 'new and inexpensive' 
edition of Puttkamer and Muehlbrecht (1899). Some of the quarrelling 
editors collaborated on it but still continue their disputes in the introduc- 
tions. Wagner's former vol. ii has become vol. i in this edition, yet Wagner 
still refers to vol. ii in the introduction to vol. i. The first Letter on Social 
Problems is placed in vol. iii, the second and third in vol. ii and the fourth in 
vol. i. The order of the Letters on Social Problems, of the Controversies, of the 
parts of Towards the Understanding . . ., chronological and logical sequence, 
the dates of publication and of writing are hopelessly mixed up, making a 
chaos more impenetrable than the stratification of the soil after repeated 
volcanic eruptions. 1837 is maintained as the date of Rodbertus' earliest 
MS., probably out of respect to Professor Wagner — and this in 1899, 
although Mehring's rectification had been made in 1894. If we compare this 
with Marx's literary heritage in Mehring's and Kautsky's edition, published 
by Dietz, we see how such apparently superficial matters but reflect deeper 
connections: one kind of care for the scientific heritage of the authority of the 
class-conscious proletariat, and quite another in which the official experts of 
the bourgeoisie squander the heritage of a man who, in their own self- 
interested legends, had been a first-rate genius. Suum cuique — had this not 
been the motto of Rodbertus ? 

267 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

by this Prusso-Pomeranian treatment. If in the interim the 
economic theory of harmony had dropped from the level of 
Ricardo to that of a Bastiat-Schultze, social criticism had corres- 
pondingly declined from Sismondi to Rodbertus. Sismondi's 
critique of 1819 had been an historical event, but Rodbertus' 
ideas of reform, even on their first appearance, were a miserable 
regression — still more so on their subsequent reiteration. 

In the controversy between Sismondi on the one hand and 
Say and Ricardo on the other, one party proved that accumu- 
lation was impossible because of the crises, and therefore warned 
against full development of the productive forces. The other 
party proved that crises were impossible and advocated an un- 
Hmited development of accumulation. Though all argued from 
wrong premises, each was logically consistent. 

V. Kirchmann and Rodbertus both started, were bound to 
start, from the fact of crises. Here the problem of enlarged repro- 
duction of aggregate capital, the problem of accumulation, was 
completely identified with the problem of crises and side-tracked 
in an attempt to find a remedy for the crises, although the 
historical experience of fifty years had shown all too clearly that 
crises, as witnessed by their periodical recurrence, are a neces- 
sary phase in capitalist reproduction. One side now sees the 
remedy in the complete consumption of the surplus value by the 
capitalist, that is to say in refraining from accumulation, the 
other in stabilisation of the rate of surplus value by legislative 
measures which comes to the same thing, i.e. renouncing 
accumulation altogether. This special fad of Rodbertus' sprang 
from his fervent and explicit belief in an unlimited capitalist 
expansion of the productive forces and of wealth, without 
accumulation of capital. At a time when capitalist production 
was developed to a degree which was soon to enable Marx to 
make his fundamental analysis, the last attempt of bourgeois 
economics to cope with the problem of reproduction degenerated 
into absurd and puerile Utopianism. 



268 



SECTION TWO 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION 
OF THE PROBLEM 



THIRD ROUND 

STRUVE-BULGAKOV-TUGAN BARANOVSKI 

V. VORONTSOV-NIKOLAYON 



I 



CHAPTER XVIII 
A NEW VERSION OF THE PROBLEM 

THE third controversy about capitalist accumulation takes 
place in an historical setting quite different from that of 
the two earlier ones. The time now is the period from the 
beginning of the eighties to the middle of the nineties, the scene 
Russia. In Western Europe, capitalism had already attained 
maturity. The rose-coloured classical view of Smith and Ricardo 
in a budding bourgeois economy had long since vanished . . . 
the self-interested optimism of the vulgarian Manchester doc- 
trine of harmony had been silenced by the devastating impact 
of the world collapse in the seventies, and under the heavy 
blows of a violent class struggle that blazed up in all capitalist 
countries after the sixties. Even that harmony patched up with 
social reformism which had its hey-day after the early eighties, 
especially in Germany, soon ended in a hangover. The trial of 
twelve years' special legislation against the Social Democratic 
Party had brought about bitter disillusionment, and ultimately 
destroyed all the veils of harmony, revealing the cruel capitalist 
contradictions in their naked reality. Since then, optimism had 
only been possible in the camp of the rising working class and its 
theorists. This was admittedly not optimism about a natural, or 
artificially established equilibrium of capitalist economy, or 
about the eternal duration of capitalism, but rather the convic- 
tion that capitalism, by mightily furthering the development of 
the productive forces, and in virtue of its inherent contradictions, 
would provide an excellent soil for the historical progress of 
society towards new economic and social forms. The negative, 
depressing tendency of the first stage of capitalism, at one time 
realised by Sismondi alone and still observed by Rodbertus as 
late as the forties and fifties, is compensated by a tendency 
towards elation: the hopeful and victorious striving of the 
workers for ascendancy in their trade-union movement and by 
political action. 

271 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

Such was the setting in Western Europe. In the Russia of that 
time, however, the picture was different indeed. Here, the 
seventies and eighties represent in every respect a period of 
transition, a period of internal crises with all its agonies. Big 
industry only now staged its real entry, fostered by the period of 
high protective tariffs. In particular, the introduction of a tariff 
on gold at the Western frontier in 1877 was a special landmark 
in the absolutist government's new policy of forcing the growth 
of capitalism. 'Primitive accumulation' of capital flourished 
splendidly in Russia, encouraged by all kinds of state subsidies, 
guarantees, premiums and government orders. It earned profits 
which would already seem legendary' to the West. Yet the 
picture of internal conditions in contemporary Russia was any- 
thing but attractive and auspicious. On the plains, the decline 
and disintegration of rural economy under the pressure of 
exploitation by the Exchequer and the monetary system caused 
terrible conditions, periodical famines and peasant risings. In 
the towns, again, the factory proletariat had not yet been con- 
solidated, either socially or mentally, into a modern working 
class. For the greater part, it was still closely connected with 
agriculture, and remained semi-rural, particularly in the large 
industrial parts of Moscow- Vladimir, the most important centre 
of the Russian textile industry. Accordingly, primitive forms of 
exploitation were countered by primitive measures of defence. 
Not until the early eighties did the spontaneous factory revolts 
in the Moscow district with their smashing up of machines pro- 
vide the impetus for the first rudiments of factory legislation in 
the Czarist Empire. 

If the economic aspect of Russian public life showed at every 
step the harsh discords of a period of transition, there was a 
corresponding crisis in intellectual life. 'Populism', the in- 
digenous brand of Russian socialism, theoretically grounded in 
the peculiarities of the Russian agrarian constitution, was politi- 
cally finished with the failure of the terrorist party of 'Narod- 
naya Volya', its extreme revolutionary exponent. The first 
writings of George Plekhanov, on the other hand, which were to 
pave the way in Russia for Marxist trains of thought, had only 
been published in 1883 and 1885, and for about a decade they 
seemed to have little influence. During the eighties and up to the 
nineties the mental life of the Russian, and in particular of the 

272 



A NEW VERSION OF THE PROBLEM 

socialist intelligentsia with their tendency towards opposition, 
was dominated by a peculiar mixture of 'indigenous' 'populist' 
remnants and random elements of theoretical Marxism. The 
most remarkable feature of this mixture was scepticism as to the 
possibility of capitalist development in Russia. 

At an early date, the Russian intelligentsia had been pre- 
occupied with the question whether Russia should follow the 
example of Western Europe and embark on capitalist develop- 
ment. At first, they noticed only the bleak aspects of capitalism 
in the West, its disintegrating effects upon the traditional patri- 
archal forms of production and upon the prosperity and assured 
livelihood for the broad masses of the population. As against 
that, the Russian rural communal ownership in land, the famous 
obshchina, seemed to offer a short-cut to the blessed land of 
socialism, a lead direct to a higher social development of Russia, 
without the capitalist phase and its attendant misery as experi- 
enced in Western Europe. Would it be right to fling away this 
fortunate and exceptional position, this unique historical oppor- 
tunity, and forcibly transplant capitalist production to Russia 
with the help of the state? Would it be right to destroy the system 
of rural holdings and production, and open the doors wide to 
proletarisation, to misery and insecurity of existence for the 
toiling masses? 

The Russian intelligentsia was preoccupied with this funda- 
mental problem ever since the Agrarian Reform, and even 
earlier, since Hertzen, and especially since Chernishevski. This 
was the wholly unique world view of 'populism' in a nutshell. 
An enormous literature was created in Russia by this intel- 
lectual tendency ranging from the avowedly reactionary doc- 
trines of the Slavophiles to the revolutionary theory of the 
terrorist party. On the one hand, it encouraged the collection of 
vast material by separate inquiries into the economic forms of 
Russian life, into 'national production' and its singular aspects, 
into agriculture as practised by the peasant communes, into the 
domestic industries of the peasants, the artel, and also into the 
mental life of the peasants, the sects and similar phenomena. 
On the other hand, a peculiar type of belles lettres sprang up as 
the artistic reflection of the contradictory social conditions, the 
struggle between old and new ways which beset the mind at 
every step with difficult problems. Finally, in the seventies and 

273 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

eighties, a peculiarly stuffy philosophy of history sprang up 
from the same root and found its champions in Peter Lavrov, 
Nicolai Mikhailovski, Professor Kareyev and V. Vorontsov. It 
was the 'subjective method in sociology' which declared 'critical 
thought' to be the decisive factor in social development, or 
which, more precisely, sought to make a down-at-heel intelli- 
gentsia the agent of historical progress. 

Here we are interested only in one aspect of this wide field 
with its many ramifications, viz'- the struggle of opinions regard- 
ing the chances of capitalist development, and even then only in 
so far as these were based upon general reflections on the social 
conditions of the capitalist mode of production, since these latter 
were also to play a big part in the Russian controversial litera- 
ture of the eighties and nineties. 

The point at issue was to begin with Russian capitalism and 
its prospects, but this, of course, led further afield to the whole 
problem of capitalist development. The example and the experi- 
ences of the West were adduced as vital evidence in this debate. 

One fact was of decisive importance for the theoretical con- 
tent of the discussion that followed: not only was Marx's analysis 
of capitalist production as laid down in the first volume of 
Capital already common property of educated Russia, but the 
second volume, too, with its analysis of the reproduction of 
capital as a whole had already been published in 1885. This 
gave a fundamentally new twist to the discussion. No more did 
the problem of crises obscure the real crux of the problem: for 
the first time, the argument centred purely in the reproduction 
of capital as a whole, in accumulation. Nor was the analysis 
bogged any longer by an aimless fumbling for the concepts of 
income and of individual and aggregate capital. Marx's diagram 
of social reproduction had provided a firm foothold. Finally, the 
issue was no longer between laissez-faire and social reform, but 
between two varieties of socialism. The petty-bourgeois and 
somewhat muddled 'populist' brand of Russian socialists stood 
for scepticism regarding the possibility of capitalist develop- 
ment, much in the spirit of Sismondi and, in part, of Rodbcrtus, 
though they themselves frequently cited Marx as their author- 
ity. Optimism, on the other hand, was represented by the 
Marxist school in Russia. Thus the setting of the stage had been 
shifted completely. 

274 



A NEW VERSION OF THE PROBLEM 

One of the two champions of the 'populist' movement. 
Vorontsov, known in Russia mainly under the mm deplume V. V, 
(his initials), was an odd customer. His economics were com- 
pletely muddled, and as an expert on the(iry he cannot be taken 
seriously at all. The other, Nikolayon (Danielson), however, 
was a man of wide education, and thoroughly conversant with 
Marxism. He had edited the Russian translation of the first 
volume of Capital and was a personal friend of Marx and 
Engels, with both of whom he kept up a lively correspondence 
(published in the Russian language in 1908). Nevertheless it was 
Vorontsov who influenced public opinion among the Russian 
intelligentsia in the eighties, and Marxists in Russia had to fight 
him above all. As for our problem: the general prospects of 
capitalist development, a new generation of Russian Marxists, 
who had learned from the historical experience and knowledge 
of Western Europe, joined forces with George Plekhanov in 
opposition to the above-mentioned two representatives of 
scepticism in the nineties. They were amongst others Professor 
Kablukov, Professor Manuilov, Professor Issayev, Professor 
Skvortsov, Vladimir Ilyin, Peter v. Struve, Bulgakov, and Pro- 
fessor Tugan Baranovski. In the further course of our investiga- 
tion we shall, however, confine ourselves to the last three of 
these, since every one of them furnished a more or less finished 
critique of this theory on the point with which we are here 
concerned. This battle of wits, brilliant in parts, which kept the 
socialist intelligentsia spellbound in the nineties and was only 
brought to an end by the walkover of the Marxist school, 
oflftcially inaugurated the infiltration into Russian thought of 
Marxism as an economico-historical theory. 'Legalist' Marxism 
at that time publicly took possession of the Universities, the 
Reviews and the economic book market in Russia — with all 
the disadvantages of such a position. Ten years later, when 
the revolutionary risings of the proletariat demonstrated in the 
streets the darker side of this optimism about capitalist develop- 
ment, none of this Pleiad of Marxist optimists, with but a single 
exception, was to be found in the camp of the proletariat. 



275 



CHAPTER XIX 
VORONTSOV AND HIS 'SURPLUS' 

THE representatives of Russian 'populism' were convinced 
that capitalism had no future in Russia, and this convic- 
tion brought them to the problem of capitalist reproduc- 
tion. V. V. laid down his theories on this point in a series of 
articles in the review Patriotic Memoirs and in other periodicals 
which were collected and published in 1882 under the title 
The Destiny of Capitalism in Russia. He further dealt with the 
problem in 'The Commodity Surplus in the Supply of the 
Market'/ 'Militarism and Capitalism', ^ Our Trends,^ and finally 
in Outlines of Economic Theory.'^ It is not easy to determine 
Vorontsov's attitude towards capitalist development in Russia. 
He sided neither with the purely Slavophil theory which 
deduced the perversity and pemiciousness of capitalism for 
Russia from the 'peculiarities' of the Russian economic structure 
and a specifically Russian 'national character', nor with the 
Marxists who saw in capitalist development an unavoidable 
historical stage which is needed to clear the way towards social 
progress for Russian society, too. Vorontsov for his part simply 
asserts that denunciation and acclamation of capitalism are 
equally futile because, having no roots in Russia, capitalism 
is just impossible there and can have no future. The essential 
conditions of capitalist development are lacking in Russia, and 
love's labour's lost if the state tries to promote it artificially — 
one might as well spare these eflforts together with the heavy 
sacrifices they entail. But if we look into the matter more closely, 
Vorontsov's thesis is not nearly so uncompromising. For if we 
pay attention to the fact that capitalism does not mean only the 
accumulation of capital wealth but also that the small producer 
is reduced to the proletarian level, that the labourer's livelihood 

^ An essay in Patriotic Memoirs, May 1883. 
2 An essay in the review Russian Thought, September 1889. 
^ A book published in 1893. ■* A book published in 1895. 

276 



VORONTSOV AND HIS 'SURPLUS' 

is not assured and that there are periodical crises, then Voront- 
sov would by no means deny that all these phenomena exist in 
Russia. On the contrary, he explicitly says in his preface to 
The Destiny of Capitalism in Russia: 'Whilst I dispute the possi- 
bility of capitalism as a form of production in Russia, I do not 
intend to commit myself in any way as to its future as a form or 
degree of exploiting the national resources.' 

Vorontsov consequently is of the opinion that capitalism in 
Russia merely cannot attain the same degree of maturity as in 
the West, whereas the severance of the immediate producer 
from the means of production might well be expected under 
Russian conditions. Vorontsov goes even further: he does not 
dispute at all that a development of the capitalist mode of pro- 
duction is quite possible in various branches of production, and 
even allows for capitalist exports from Russia to foreign markets. 
Indeed he says in his essay on 'The Commodity Surplus in the 
Supply of the Market' that 'in several branches of industry, 
capitalist production develops very quickly'^ [in the Russian 
meaning of the term, of course — R. L.]. 

'It is most probable that Russia, just like any other country, 
enjoys certain natural advantages which enable her to act as a 
supplier of certain kinds of commodities on foreign markets. It is 
extremely possible that capital can profit by this fact and lay 
hands upon the branches of production concerned — that is to 
say the (inter) national division of labour will make it easy for 
our capitalists to gain a foothold in certain branches. This, 
however, is not the point. We do not speak of a merely incidental 
participation of capital in the industrial organisation of the 
country, but ask whether it is likely that the entire production 
of Russia can be put on a capitalist basis. '^ 

Put in this form, Vorontsov's scepticism looks quite different 
from what might have been expected at first. He doubts whether 
the capitalist mode of production could ever gain possession of 
the entire production in Russia; but then, capitalism has not so 
far accomplished this feat in any country of the world, not even 
in England. Such a brand of scepticism as to the future of 
capitalism appears at a glance quite international in outlook. 
And indeed, Vorontsov's theory here amounts to a quite 

^ Patriotic Memoirs, vol. v: *A Contemporary Survey', p. 4. 
■^ Ibid., p. 10. 

277 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

general reflection on the nature and the essential conditions of 
capitalism; it is based upon a general theoretical approach to 
the reproductive process of social capital as a whole. Vorontsov 
gives the following very clear formulation of the specific relations 
between the capitalist mode of production and the problem of 
markets : 

'The (inter) national division of labour, the distribution of all 
branches of industry among the countries taking part in inter- 
national commerce, is quite independent of capitalism. 

'The market which thus comes into being, the demand for the 
products of different countries resulting from such a division of 
labour among the nations, has intrinsically nothing in common 
with the market required by the capitalist mode of production. 
. . . The products of capitalist industry come on the market for 
another purpose; the question whether all the needs of the 
country are satisfied is irrelevant to them, and the entrepreneur 
does not necessarily receive in their stead another material pro- 
duct which may be consumed. Their main purpose is to realise 
the surplus value they contain. What, then, is this surplus value 
that it should interest the capitalist for its own sake? From our 
point of view, it is the surplus of production over consumption 
inside the country. Ever)' worker produces more than he himself 
can consume, and all these surplus items accumulate in a few 
hands; their owners themselves consume them, exchanging 
them for the purpose against the most variegated kinds of 
necessities and luxuries. Yet eat, drink and dance as much as 
they like — they will not be able to squander the whole of the 
surplus value: a considerable remnant will be left over, of which 
they have to dispose somehow even though they cannot ex- 
change it for other products. They must convert it into money, 
since it would otherwise just go bad. Since there is no one inside 
the country on whom the capitalists could foist this remnant, it 
must be exported abroad, and that is why foreign markets are 
indispensable to countries embarking on the capitalist venture.'^ 

The above is a literal translation, showing all the peculiarities 
of Vorontsov's diction, so that the reader may have a taste of 
this brilliant Russian theorist with whom one can spend moments 
of sheer dehght. 

Later, in 1895, Vorontsov summarised the same views in his 
^ Patriotic Memoirs, vol. v: 'A Contemporary Survey', p. 14. 

278 



VORONTSOV AND HIS 'SURPLUS' 

book Outlines of Economic Theory now claiming our attention. 
Here he takes a stand against the views of Say and Ricardo, and 
in particular also against John Stuart Mill who denied the possi- 
bility of general over-production. In the course of his argument 
he discovers something no one had known before: he has laid 
bare the source of all errors the classical school made about the 
problem of crises. This mistake lies in a fallacious theory of the 
costs of production to which bourgeois economists are addicted. 
No doubt, from the aspect of the costs of production (which 
according to Vorontsov's equally unheard-of assumption do not 
comprise profits), both profit and crises are unthinkable and 
inexplicable. But we can only appreciate this original thought 
to the full in the author's own words: 

'According to the doctrine of bourgeois economists, the value 
of a product is determined by the labour employed in its manu- 
facture. Yet bourgeois economists, once they have given this 
determination of value, immediately forget it and base their 
subsequent explanation of the exchange phenomena upon a 
different theory which substitutes "costs of production" for 
labour. Thus two products are mutually exchanged in such 
quantities that the costs of production are equal on both sides. 
Such a view of the process of exchange indeed leaves no room 
for a commodity surplus inside the country. Any product of a 
worker's annual labour must, from this point of view, represent 
a certain quantity of material of which it is made, of tools which 
have been used in its manufacture, and of the products which 
served to maintain the workers during the period of production. 
It [presumably the product— R. L.] appears on the market in 
order to change its use-form, to reconvert itself into objects, into 
products for the workers and the value necessary for renewing 
the tools. As soon as it is split up into its component parts, the 
process of reassembling, the productive process, will begin, in 
the course of which all the values listed above will be consumed. 
In their stead, a new product will come into being which is the 
connecting link between past and future consumption.' 

From this perfectly unique attempt to demonstrate social re- 
production as a continuous process in the light of the costs of 
production, the following conclusion is promptly drawn: 'Con- 
sidering thus the aggregate bulk of a counti-y's products, we 
shall find no commodity surplus at all over and above the 

279 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

demand of society; an unmarketable surplus is therefore im- 
possible from the point of view of a bourgeois economic theory 
of value.' 

Yet, after having eliminated capitalist profit from the costs of 
production by an extremely autocratic manhandling of the 
bourgeois theory of value, Vorontsov immediately presents this 
deficiency as a great discovery: 'The above analysis, however, 
reveals yet another feature in the theory of value prevalent of 
late: it becomes evident that this theory leaves no room for 
capitalist profits.' 

The argument that follows is striking in its brevity and 
simplicity: 'Indeed, if I exchange my own product, represent- 
ing a cost of production of 5 roubles, for another product of 
equal value, I receive only so much as will be sufficient to cover 
my expense, but for my abstinence [literally so — R. L.] I shall 
get nothing.' 

And now Vorontsov really comes to grips with the root of the 
problem: 

'Thus it is proved on a strictly logical development of the 
ideas held by bourgeois economists that the destiny of the com- 
modity surplus on the market and that of capitalist profit is 
identical. This circumstance justifies the conclusion that both 
phenomena are interdependent, that the existence of one is a 
condition of the other, and indeed, so long as there is no profit, 
there is no commodity surplus. ... It is different if the profit 
comes into being inside the country. Such profit is not originally 
related to production; it is a phenomenon which is connected 
with the latter not by technical and natural conditions but by 
an extraneous social form. Production requires for its continua- 
tion . . . only material, tools, and means of subsistence for the 
workers, therefore as such it consumes only the corresponding 
part of the products: other consumers must be found for the 
surplus which makes up the profit, and for which there is no 
room in the permanent structure of industrial life, in production 
— consumers, namely, who are not organically connected with 
production, who are fortuitous to a certain extent. The neces- 
sary number of such consumers may or may not be forthcoming, 
and in the latter case there will be a commodity surplus on the 
market.'^ 

^ Outlines of Economic Theory (St. Petersburg, 1895), pp. 157 ff. 

280 



VORONTSOV AND HIS 'SURPLUS' 

Well content with the 'simple' enlightenment, by which he 
has turned the surplus product into an invention of capital and 
the capitalist into a 'fortuitous' consumer who is 'not organically 
connected with capitalist production', Vorontsov now turns to 
the crises. On the basis of Marx's 'logical' theory of the value of 
labour which he claims to 'employ ' in his later works, he 
expounds them as an immediate result of the surplus value, as 
follows : 

'If the working part of the population consumes what enters 
into the costs of production in form of the wages for labour, the 
capitaHsts themselves must destroy [literally so— R. L.] the 
surplus value, excepting that part of it which the market 
requires for expansion. If the capitalists are in a position to do 
so and act accordingly, there can be no commodity surplus; if 
not, over-production, industrial crises, displacement of the 
workers from the factories and other evils will result.' 

According to Vorontsov, however, it is Hhe inadequate elasticity 
of the human organism which cannot enlarge its capacity to con- 
sume as rapidly as the surplus value is increasing', which is in 
the end responsible for these evils. He repeatedly expresses this 
ingenious thought as follows: 'The Achilles heel of capitalist 
industrial organisation thus lies in the incapacity of the entre- 
preneurs to consume the whole of their income.' 

Having thus 'employed' Marx's 'logical' version of Ricardo's 
theory of value, Vorontsov arrives at Sismondi's theory of crises 
which he adopts in as crude and simplified a form as possible. 
He believes, of course, that he is adopting the views of Rod- 
bertus in reproducing those of Sismondi. 'The inductive method 
of research', he declares triumphantly, 'has resulted in the very 
same theory of crises and of pauperism which had been objec- 
tively stated by Rodbertus.'^ 

It is not quite clear what Vorontsov means by an 'inductive 
method of research' which he contrasts with the objective 
method — since all things are possible to Vorontsov, he may con- 
ceivably mean Marx's theory. Yet Rodbertus, too, was not to 
emerge unimproved from the hands of the original Russian 
thinker. Vorontsov corrects Rodbertus' theory merely in so far 
as he eliminates the stabilisation of the wage rate in accordance 
with the value of the aggregate product which, to Rodbertus, 

^ 'Militarism and Capitalism' in Russian Thought (1889), vol. ix, p. 78. 

281 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

had been the pivot of his whole system. According to Vorontsov, 
this measure against crises is a mere palliative, since 'the im- 
mediate cause of the above phenomena (over-production, un- 
employment, etc.) is not that the working classes receive too 
small a share of the national income, but that the capitalist class 
cannot possibly consume all the products which every year fall 
to their share. '^ 

Yet, as soon as he has refuted Rodbertus' reform of the dis- 
tribution of incomes, Vorontsov, with that 'strictly logical' 
consistency so peculiar to him, ultimately arrives at the following 
forecast for the future destiny of capitalism: 'If industrial 
organisation which prevails in W. Europe is to prosper and 
flourish further still, it can only do so provided that some means 
will be found to destroy [verbatim — R. L.] that portion of the 
national income which falls to the capitalists' share over and 
above their capacity to consume. The simplest solution of this 
problem will be an appropriate change in the distribution of the 
aggregate income among those who take part in production. If 
the entrepreneurs would retain for themselves only so much of 
all increase of the national income as they need to satisfy all 
their whims and fancies, leaving the remainder to the working 
class, the mass of the people, then the regime of capitalism would 
be assured for a long time to come.'^ 

The hash of Ricardo, Marx, Sismondi and Rodbertus thus is 
topped with the discovery that capitalist production could be 
radically cured of over-production, that it could 'prosper and 
flourish' in all eternity, if the capitalists would refrain from 
capitalising their surplus value and would make a free gift to 
the working class of the corresponding part of the surplus value. 
Meanwhile the capitalists, until they have become sensible 
enough to accept Vorontsov's good advice, employ other means 
for the annual destruction of a part of their surplus value. 
Modern militarism, amongst others, is one of these appropriate 
measures — and this precisely to the extent to which the bills of 
militarism are footed by the capitalists' income — for Vorontsov 
can be counted upon to turn things upside down — and not by 
the working masses. A primary remedy for capitalism, however, 
is foreign trade which again is a sore spot in Russian capitalism. 

^ 'Militarism and Capitalism' in Russian Thought (1889), vol. ix, p. 80. 
2 Ibid., p. 83. Cf. Outlines, p. 196. 

282 



VORONTSOV AND HIS 'SURPLUS' 

As the last to arrive at the table of the world market, Russian 
capitalism fares worst in the competition with older capitalist 
countries and thus lacks both prospects as to foreign markets 
and the most vital conditions of existence. Russia remains the 
'country of peasants', a country of 'populist' production. 

'If all this is correct,' Vorontsov concludes his essay on 'The 
Commodity Surplus in the Supply of the Market', 'then capit- 
alism can play only a limited part in Russia. It must resign from 
the direction of agriculture, and its development in the industrial 
sphere must not inflict too many injuries upon the domestic 
industries which under our economic conditions are indispens- 
able to the welfare of the majority of the population. If the 
reader would comment that capitalism might not accept such 
a compromise, our answer will be: so much the worse for 
capitalism.' 

Thus Vorontsov ultimately washes his hands of the whole 
thing, declining for his part all responsibility for the further 
fortunes of economic development in Russia. 



283 



CHAPTER XX 
NIKOLAYON 



THE second theorist of populist criticism, Nikolayon, 
brings quite a different economic training and know- 
ledge to his work. One of the best-informed experts on 
Russian economic relations, he had already in 1880 attracted 
attention by his treatise on the capitalisation of agricultural in- 
comes, which was published in the review Slovo. Thirteen years 
later, spurred on by the great Russian famine of 1891, he 
pursued his inquiries further in a book entitled Outlines of Our 
Social Economy Since the Reform. Here he gives a detailed exposi- 
tion, fully documented by facts and figures, of how capitalism 
developed in Russia, and on this evidence proceeds to show that 
this development is the source of all evil, and so of the famine, 
also, so far as the Russian people are concerned. His views about 
the destiny of capitalism in Russia are grounded in a definite 
theory about the conditions of the development of capitalist pro- 
duction in general, and it is this with which we must now deal. 
Since the market is of decisive importance for the capitahst 
mode of economy, every capitalist nation tries to make sure of as 
large a market as possible. In the first place, of course, it relies 
on its home market. But at a certain level of development, the 
home market is no longer sufficient for a capitalist nation, and 
this for the following reasons: all that social labour newly pro- 
duces in one year can be divided into two parts — the share 
received by the workers in the form of wages, and that which is 
appropriated by the capitalists. Of the first part, only so many 
means of subsistence as correspond, in value, to the sum total of 
the wages paid within the country can be withdrawn from cir- 
culation. Yet capitalist economy decidedly tends to depress this 
part more and more. Its methods are a longer working day, 
stepping up the intensity of labour, and increasing output by 
technical improvements which enable the substitution of female 
and juvenile for male labour and in some cases displace adult 

284 



NIKOLAYON 

labour altogether. Even if the wages of the workers still employed 
are rising, such increase can never equal the savings of the 
capitalists resulting from these changes. The result of all this is 
that the working class must play an ever smaller part as buyers 
on the home market. At the same time, there is a further change: 
capitalist production gradually takes over even the trades which 
provided additional employment to an agricultural people; 
thus it deprives the peasants of their resources by degrees, so 
that the rural population can afford to buy fewer and fewer 
industrial products. This is a further reason for the continual 
contraction of the home market. As for the capitalist class, we 
see that this latter is also unable to realise the entire newly 
created product, though for the opposite reason. However large 
the requirements of this class, the capitaHsts will not be able to 
consume the entire surplus product in person. First, because 
part of it is needed to enlarge production, for technical improve- 
ments which, to the individual entrepreneur, will be a neces- 
sary condition of existence in a competitive society. Secondly, 
because an expanding capitalist production implies an expan- 
sion in those branches of industry which produce means of 
production (e.g. the mining industry, the machine industry and 
so forth) and whose products from the very beginning take a 
use-form that is incapable of personal consumption and can 
only function as capital. Thirdly and lastly, the higher labour 
productivity and capital savings that can be achieved by mass 
production of cheap commodities increasingly impel society 
towards mass production of commodities which cannot all be 
consumed by a mere handful of capitalists. 

Although one capitalist can realise his surplus value in the 
surplus product of another capitalist and vice versa, this is only 
true for products of a certain branch, for consumer goods. How- 
ever, the incentive of capitalist production is not the satisfaction 
of personal wants, and this is further shown by the progressive 
decline in the production of consumer as compared to that of 
producer goods. 

'Thus we see that the aggregate product of a capitalist nation 
must greatly exceed the requirements of the whole industrial 
population employed, in the same way as each individual fac- 
tory produces vastly in excess of the requirements of both its 
workers and the entrepreneur, and this is entirely due to the 

285 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

fact that the nation is a capitaUst nation, because the distribu- 
tion of resources within the society does not aim to satisfy the 
real wants of the population but only the effective demand. Just 
as an individual factory-owner could not maintain himself as a 
capitalist even for a day if his market were confined to the 
requirements of his workers and his own, so the home market of 
a developed capitalist nation must also be insufficient.' 

At a certain level, capitalist development thus has the ten- 
dency to impede its own progress. These obstacles are ultimately 
due to the fact that progressive labour productivity, involving 
the severance of the immediate producer from the means of 
production, does not benefit society as a whole, but only the 
individual entrepreneur; and the mass of labour power and men- 
hours which has been 'set free' by this process becomes redun- 
dant and thus is not only lost to society but will become a 
burden to it. The real wants of the masses can only be satisfied 
more fully in so far as there can be an ascendancy of a 'populist' 
mode of production based upon the union between the producer 
and his means of production. It is the aim of capitalism, how- 
ever, to gain possession of just these spheres of production, and 
to destroy in the process the main factor which makes for its 
own prosperity. The periodical famines in India, for instance, 
recurring at intervals of ten or eleven years, were thus among 
the causes of periodical industrial crises in England. Any nation 
that sets out on capitalist development will sooner or later come 
up against these contradictions inherent in this mode of produc- 
tion. And the later a nation embarks on the capitalist venture, 
the more strongly will these contradictions make themselves 
felt, since, once the home market has been saturated, no sub- 
stitute can be found, the outside market having already been 
conquered by the older competing countries. 

The upshot of it all is that the limits of capitalism are set by 
the increasing poverty born of its own development, by the in- 
creasing number of redundant workers deficient in all pur- 
chasing power. Increasing labour productivity which can rapidly 
satisfy every effective demand of society corresponds to the in- 
creasing incapacity of ever broader masses of the population to 
satisfy their most vital needs; on the one hand, a glut of goods 
that cannot be sold — and on the other, large masses who lack 
the bare necessities. 

286 



NIKOLAYON 

These are Nikolayon's general views. ^ He knows his Marx, we 
see, and has turned the two first volumes (Ä Capital to excellent 
use. And still, the whole trend of his argument is genuinely Sis- 
mondian. It is capitalism itself which brings about a shrinking 
home market since it impoverishes the masses; every calamity c>f 
modern society is due to the destruction of the 'populist' mode 
of production, that is to say the destruction of small-scale enter- 
prise. That is his main theme. More openly even than Sismondi, 
Nikolayon sets the tenor of his critique by an apotheosis of 
small-scale enterprise, this sole approach to grace. '^ The aggre- 
gate capitalist product cannot, in the end, be realised within 
the society, this can only be done with recourse to outside 
markets. Nikolayon here comes to the same conclusion as 
Vorontsov, in spite of a quite different theoretical point of 
departure. Applied to Russia, it is the economic scientific 
ground for. a sceptical attitude towards capitalism. Capitalist 
development in Russia has been without access to foreign 
markets from the first, it could only show its worst aspects — it 
has impoverished the masses of the people. In consequence, it 
was a Tatal mistake' to promote capitalism in Russia, 

On this point, Nikolayon fulminates like a prophet of the Old 
Testament: 'Instead of keeping to the tradition of centuries, 
instead of developing our old inherited principle of a close con- 
nection between the immediate producer and his means of 
production, instead of usefully applying the scientific achieve- 
ments of W. Europe to their forms of production based on the 
peasants' ownership of their means of production, instead of in- 
creasing their productivity by concentrating the means of pro- 
duction in their hands, instead of benefiting, not by the forms 
of production in W. Europe, but by its organisation, its powerful 
co-operation, its division of labour, its machinery, etc., etc. — 
instead of developing the fundamental principle of a landown- 
ing peasantry and applying it to the cultivation of the land by 
the peasants, instead of making science and its application 
widely accessible to the peasants — instead of all this, we have 
taken the opposite turning. We have failed to prevent the 

^ Cf. Outlines of Our Social Economy, in particular pp. 202-5, 338-41. 

2 Vladimir Ilyich [Lenin] has given detailed proof of the striking 
similarity between the position of the Russian 'populists' and the views of 
Sismondi in his essay On the Characteristics of Economic Romanticism (1897). 

287 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

development of capitalist forms of production, although they 
are based on the expropriation of the peasants; on the con- 
trary, \ve have promoted with all our might the upsetting of our 
entire economic life which resulted in the famine of 189 1.' 

Though the evil is much advanced, it is not too late even now 
to retrace our steps. On the contrary, a complete reform of 
economic policy is just as urgently needed for Russia in view of 
the threatening proletarisation and collapse, as Alexander's 
reforms after the Crimean war were necessary in their time. 

Now a social reform as advocated by Nikolayon is com- 
pletely Utopian. His attitude exhibits an even more blatant 
petty-bourgeois and reactionary bias than Sismondi's ever did, 
considering that the Russian 'populist' writes after a lapse of 
seventy years. For in his opinion, the old obshchina, the rural 
community founded on the communal ownership of the soil, is 
the raft to deliver Russia from the flood of capitalism. On it, 
the discoveries of modern big industry and scientific technique 
are to be grafted by measures which remain his own secret — so 
that it can serve as the basis of a 'socialised' higher form of pro- 
duction. Russia can choose no other alternative: either she turns 
her back upon capitalist development, or she must resign herself 
to death and decay.^ 

^ Outlines of Our Social Economy, p. 322. Friedrich Engels appraises the 
Russian situation differently. He repeatedly tries to convince Nikolayon that 
Russia cannot avoid a high industrial development, and that her sufferings 
are nothing but the typical capitalist contradictions. Thus he writes on 
September 22, 1892: 'I therefore hold that at present industrial production 
necessarily implies big industry, making use of steam power, electiicity, 
mechanical looms and frames, and lastly the manufacture of the machines 
themselves by mechanical means. From the moment that railways are intro- 
duced in Russia, recourse to all these extremely modern means of production 
becomes inevitable. It is necessary that you should be able to mend and 
repair your engines, coaches, railways and the like, but to do this cheaply, 
you must also be in a position to make at home the things needing repair. 
As soon as the technique of war has become a branch of industry (armour- 
plated cruisers, modern artillery, machine guns, steel bullets, smokeless gun 
powder, etc.) a big industry that is indispensable for the production of such 
items has become a political necessity for you as well. All these items cannot 
be made without a higlily developed metal industry which on its part cannot 
develop unless there is a corresponding development of all other branches of 
production, textiles in particular' (Marx-Engcls to Nikolayon, St. Peters- 
burg, 1908, p. 75). And further in the same letter: 'So long as Russian 
industry depends on the home market alone, it can only satisfy the uitcrnal 

288 



NIKOLAYON 

After a crushing criticism of capitalism Nikolayon thus ends 
up with the same old 'populist' panacea which had as early as 
the fifties, though at that time with greater justification, been 
hailed as the 'peculiarly Russian' guarantee of a higher social 
development, although its reactionary character as a lifeless 
relic of ancient institutions had been exposed in Engels' Fluecht- 
lingsliteratur in Volksstaat (1875). Engels wrote at the time: 

'A further development of Russia on bourgeois lines would 
gradually destroy communal property there too, quite apart 
from any interference of the Russian government "with the 
knout and with bayonets" (as the revolutionary populists 
imagined). Under the pressure of taxes and usury, communal 
landownership is no longer a privilege, it becomes an irksome 
chain. The peasants frequently run away from it, either with or 
without their families, to seek their living as itinerant labourers, 
and leave the land behind. We see that communal ownership in 
Russia has long since passed its flower and there is every indica- 
tion that its decay is approaching.' 

demand. The latter, however, can grow but slowly, and it seems to me that 
under present conditions of life in Russia it is even bound to decrease, since 
it is one of the unavoidable consequences of high industrial development that 
it destroys its own home market by the same process which served to create 
it: by destroying the bases of the peasants' domestic industry. Yet peasants 
cannot live without such a domestic industry. They are ruined as peasants, 
their purchasing power is reduced to a minimum, and unless they grow 
new roots in new conditions of life, unless they become proletarians, they 
will only represent a very small market for the newly arising plants and 
factories. 

'Capitalist production is a phase of economic transition, full of inherent 
contradictions which only develop and become visible to the extent that 
capitalist production develops. The tendency of simultaneously creating and 
destroying a market is just one of these contradictions. Another is the hope- 
less situation that will ensue, all the sooner in a country like Russia which 
lacks external markets than in countries more or less fit to compete in the 
open world market. These latter can find some means of relief in this seem- 
ingly hopeless situation by heroic measures of commercial policy, that is to 
say by forcibly opening up new markets. China is the most recent market to 
be opened up for English commerce, and it proved adequate for a temporary 
revival of prosperity. That is why English capital is so insistent on railroad 
building in China. Yet railways in China mean the destruction of the entire 
foundation of China's small lural enterprises and her domestic industry. In 
this case, there is not even a native big industry developed to compensate 
for this evil to some extent, and hundreds of millions will consequently find 
it impossible to make a living at all. The result will be mass emigration, 

A.C. 289 K 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

With these words, Engels hits right on the target of the 
obshchina problem — eighteen years before the publication of 
Nikolayon's principal work. If Nikolayon subsequently with re- 
newed courage again conjured up the ghost of the obshchina, it 
was a bad historical anachronism inasmuch as about a decade 
later the obshchina was given an official burial by the state. The 
absolutist government which had for financial reasons tried 
during half a century artificially to keep the machinCTy of the 
rural community going was compelled to give up this thankless 
task on its own accord. The agrarian problem soon made it 
clear how far the old 'populist' delusion was lagging behind the 
actual course of economic events, and conversely, how power- 
fully capitalist development in Russia, mourned and cursed as 
still-born, could demonstrate with lightning and thunder its 
capacity to live and to multiply. Once again, and for the last 
time, this turn of events demonstrates in quite a different his- 
torical setting how a social critique of capitalism, which begins 

such as the world has never yet seen, and America, Asia and Europe will be 
flooded with the detested Chinese. This new competitor on the labour 
market will compete with American, Australian and European labour at the 
level of what the Chinese consider a satisfactory standard of living, which is 
well known to be the lowest in the whole world. Well then, if the whole 
system of production in Europe has not been revolutionised by then, that 
will be the time to start this revolution' (ibid., p. 79). 

Engels, though he followed Russian developments with attention and 
keen interest, persistently refused to take an active part in the Russian dis- 
pute. In his letter of November 24, 1894, i.e. shortly before his death, he 
expressed himself as follows: 'My Russian friends almost daily and weekly 
bombard me with requests to come forward with my objections to Russian 
books and reviews which not only misinterpret but even misquote the say- 
ings of our author (Marx). My friends assure me that my intervention 
would suffice to put matters right. Yet I invariably and firmly refuse all 
such proposals because I cannot afford to become involved with a dispute 
held in a foreign country, in a tongue which I, at least, cannot read as easily 
and freely as the more familiar W. European languages, and in a literature 
which is at best accessible to me only in fortuitous glimpses of some frag- 
ments, and which I cannot pursue anything like systematically enough in 
all its stages and details without neglecting my real and serious work. There 
are people everywhere who, once they have taken up a certain stand, are not 
ashamed to have recourse to misinterpreting the thoughts of others and to all 
kinds of dishonest manipulations for their own ends, and if that is what has 
happened to our author, I am afraid they will not deal more kindly with 
me, so that in the end I shall be compelled to interfere in the dispute, first 
to defend others, and then in my own defence' (ibid., p. 90). 

290 



NIKOLAYON 

by doubting its capacity for development, must by a deadly 
logic lead to a reactionary Utopianism — both in the France of 
1819 and in the Russia of 1893.^ 

^ Wc might mention that tlic surviving champions of 'populist' pessi- 
mism, and Vorontsov in particular, to the last remained loyal to their views, 
in spite of all that happened in Russia — a fact that does more credit to their 
character than to their intelligence. Referring to the 1900 and 1902 crises, 
Vorontsov wrote in 1902: 'The doctrinaire dogma of the Neo- Marxists 
rapidly loses its power over people's minds. That the newest successes of the 
individualists are ephemeral has obviously dawned even on their official 
advocates. ... In the first decade of the twentieth century, we come back 
to the same views about economic development in Russia that had been the 
legacy of the 1870's' (Cf. the review Political Economics, October 1902, 
quoted by A. Finn Yenotayevski in The Contemporary Economy of Russia 
i8go-igio, St. Petersburg, 191 1, p. 2.) Even to-day, then, this last of the 
'populist' Mohicans deduces the 'ephemeral character', not of his own 
theory, but of economic reality. What of the saying of Barrfere: 'II n'y a que 
les morts qui ne reviennent pas'. 



291 



CHAPTER XXI 

STRUVE'S 'THIRD PERSONS' 
AND 'THREE WORLD EMPIRES' 

WE now turn to the criticism of the above opinions as 
given by the Russian Marxists. 
In 1894, Peter v. Struve who had already given a 
detailed appraisal of Nikolayon's book in an essay 'On Capitalist 
Development in Russia',^ published a book in Russian, ^ criti- 
cising the theories of 'populism' from various aspects. In respect 
of our present problem, however, he mainly confines himself to 
proving, against both Vorontsov and Nikolayon, that capitalism 
does not cause a contraction of tlie home market but, on the 
contrary, an expansion. There can be no doubt that Nikolayon 
has made a blunder — the same that Sismondi had made. They 
each describe only a single aspect of the destructive process, per- 
formed by capitalism on the traditional forms of production by 
small enterprise. They saw only the resulting depression of 
general welfare, the impoverishment of broad strata of the popu- 
lation, and failed to notice that economic aspect of the process 
which entails the abolition of natural economy and the sub- 
stitution of a commodity economy in rural districts. And this is 
as much as to say that, by absorbing further and further sections 
of formerly independent and self-sufficient producers into its 
own sphere, capitalism continuously transforms into commodity 
buyers ever new strata of people who had not before bought its 
commodities. In fact, the course of capitalist development is 
just the opposite ofthat pictured by the 'populists' on the model 
of Sismondi. Capitalism, far from ruining the home market, 
really sets about creating it, precisely by means of a spreading 
money economy. 

Struve in particular refutes the theory that the surplus value 
cannot possibly be realised on the home market. He argues as 

^ Published in Sozialdemokratisches ^entralblatt, vol. iii, No. i. 
* Critical Comments on the Problem of Economic Development in Russia. 

292 



STRUVE 

follows: The conviction that a mature capitalist society consists 
exclusively of entrepreneurs and workers forms the basis of 
Vorontsov's theory, and Nikolayon himself operates with this 
concept throughout. From this point of view, of course, the 
realisation of the capitalist aggregate product seems incompre- 
hensible. And Vorontsov's theory is correct in so far as it states 
the fact that neither the capitalists' nor the workers' consump- 
tion can realise the surplus value, so that the existence of 'third 
persons' must be presumed.^ But then, is it not beyond any 
doubt that some such 'third persons' exist in every capitalist 
society? The idea of Vorontsov and Nikolayon is pure fiction 
'which cannot advance our understanding of any historical pro- 
cess whatever by a hair's breadth'. ^ There is no actual capitalist 
society, however highly developed, composed exclusively of 
capitalists and workers. 

'Even in England and Wales, out of a thousand self-support- 
ing inhabitants, 543 are engaged in industry, 172 in commerce, 
140 in agriculture, 81 in casual wage labour, and 62 in the Civil 
Service, the liberal professions and the like.' 

Even in England, then, there are large numbers of 'third 
persons', and it is they who, by their consumption, help to 
realise the surplus value in so far as it is not consumed by the 
capitalists. Struve leaves it open whether these 'third persons 
consume enough to realise all surplus value — however that may 
be, 'the contrary would have to be proved'.^ This cannot be 
done, he claims, for Russia, that vast country with an immense 
population. She, in fact, is in the fortunate position to be able 
to dispense with foreign markets. In this — and here Struve dips 
into the intellectual treasures of Professors Wagner, Schaeffle, 
and Schmoller — she enjoys the same privileges as the United 
States of America. 'If the example of the N. American Union 
stands for anything, it is proof of the fact that under certain cir- 
cumstances capitalist industry can attain a very high level of 
development almost entirely on the basis of the home market."^ 

^ Op. cit., p. 251. 2 ibid.^ p. 255. 3 Ibid., p. 252. 

* Ibid., p. 260. 'There can be no doubt that Struve's attempt to refute 
what he calls the pessimist outlook on the analogy of the U.S.A. is fallacious. 
He says that Russia can overcome the evil consequences of the most recent 
capitalism just as easily as the U.S.A. But what he forgets is that the U.S.A. 
from the first represent a new bourgeois state, that they were founded by a 
petty bourgeoisie and by peasants who had fled from European feudalism 

293 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

The negligible amount of industrial exports from the U.S.A. 
in 1882 is mentioned in support of this statement which Struve 
formulates as a general doctrine: 'The vaster the territory, and 
the larger the population of a country, the less does that country 
require foreign markets for its capitalist development.' He infers 
from this, in direct opposition to the 'populists', 'a more brilliant 
future (for Russia) than for the other countries'. 

On the basis of commodity production, the progressive 
development of agriculture is bound to create a market wide 
enough to support the development of Russian industrial capit- 
alism. This market would be capable of unlimited expansion, in 
step with the economic and cultural progress of the country, and 
together with the substitution of a monetary for a natural 
economy. 'In this respect, capitalism enjoys more favourable 
conditions in Russia than in other countries.'^ 

Struve paints a detailed and highly coloured picture of the 
new markets which, thanks to the Trans-Siberian Railway, are 
opening up in Siberia, Central Asia, Asia Minor, Persia and the 
Balkans. But his prophetic zeal blinds him to the fact that he 
is no longer talking about the 'indefinitely expanding' home 
market but about specific foreign markets. In later years, he 
was to throw in his lot, in politics too, with this optimistic 
Russian capitalism and its liberal programme of imperialist 
expansion, for which he had laid the theoretical foundations 
when still a 'Marxist'. 

Indeed, the tenor of Struve's argument is a fervent belief in 
the unlimited capacity for expansion of capitalist production, 
but the economic foundation of this optimism is rather weak. 
He is somewhat reticent as to what he means by the 'third 
persons' whom he considers the mainstay of accumulation, but 

to set up a purely bourgeois society. In Russia, on the other hand, we have 
a primitive communist foundation, a society of gentes, as it were, in the pre- 
civilised stage which, though it is aheady disintegrating, still serves as a 
material basis upon which the capitalist revolution (for it is in fact a social 
revolution) can take place and become effective. In America, a monetary 
economy had been stabilised more than a centuiy ago, whereas a natural 
economy had until recently prevailed in Russia. It should be obvious there- 
fore that this revolution in Russia is bound to be much more ruthless and 
violent, and accompanied by immensely more suffering than in America' 
(Enge's to Nikolayon, October 17, 1893, Letters . . ., p. 85). 
^ Critical Comments . . ., p. 284. 



STRUVE 

his references to English occupational statistics indicate that he 
has in mind the various private and public servants, the liberal 
professions, in short the notorious grand public so dear to bour- 
geois economists when they are completely at a loss. It is this 
'great public' of which Marx said that it serves as the explana- 
tion for things which the economist cannot explain. It is obvious 
that, if we categorically refer to consumption by the capitalists 
and the workers, we do not speak of the entrepreneur as an 
individual, but of the capitalist class as a whole, including their 
hangers-on — employees. Civil Servants, liberal professions, and 
the like. All such 'third persons' who are certainly not lacking in 
any capitalist society are, as far as economics is concerned, joint 
consumers of the surplus value for the greater part, in so far, 
namely, as they are not also joint consumers of the wages of 
labour. These groups can only derive their purchasing power 
either from the wage of the proletariat or from the surplus 
value, if not from both; but on the whole, they are to be re- 
garded as joint consumers of the surplus value. It follows that 
their consumption is already included in the consumption of 
the capitalist class, and if Struve tries to reintroduce them to the 
capitalists by sleight-of-hand as 'third persons' to save the situa- 
tion and help to realise the surplus value, the shrewd profiteer 
will not be taken in. He will see at once that this great public is 
nothing but his old familiar retinue of parasites who buy his 
commodities with money of his own providing. No, no, indeed! 
Struve's 'third persons' will not do at all. 

Struve's theory of foreign markets and their significance for 
capitalist production is equally untenable. In this, he defers to 
the mechanist approach of the 'populists' who, along with the 
professors' textbooks, hold that a capitalist (European) country 
will first exploit the home market to the limit, and will only 
look to foreign markets when this is almost or completely ex- 
hausted. Then, following in the footsteps of Wagner, Schaeffle 
and Schmoller, Struve arrives at the absurd conclusion that a 
country with vast territories and a large population can make 
its capitalist production a 'self-contained whole' and rely in- 
definitely on the home market alone.^ In actual fact, capitalist 

^ Professor Schmoller, amongst others, clearly reveals the reactionary 
aspect of the 'Three Empire Theory' (viz. Great Britain, Russia and the 
U.S.A.) evolved by the German professors. In his handbook of commercial 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

production is by nature production on a universal scale. Quite 
contrary to the bookish decrees issued by German scholars, it 
is producing for a world market already from the word go. The 
various pioneering branches of capitalist production in Eng- 
land, such as the textile, iron and coal industries, cast about for 
markets in all countries and continents, long before the process 
of destroying peasants' property, the decline of handicraft and 
of the old domestic industries within the country had come to 
an end. And again, is it likely that the German chemical or 
electrotechnical industries would be grateful for the sober 
advice not to work for five continents, as they have done from 
the beginning, but to confine themselves to the German home 
market which, being largely supplied from abroad, is evidently 
far from exhausted in respect of a whole lot of other German 
industries? Or that one should explain to the German machine 
industry, it should not venture yet upon foreign markets, since 
German import statistics are visible proof that a good deal of 

policy (Handelspolitische Säkidarbetrachtung) , the venerable scholar dolefully 
frowns upon 'neo-mercantilism', that is to say upon the imperialist designs 
of the three arch-villains. 'In the interests of a higher intellectual, moral and 
aesthetic civilisation and social progress' he demands a strong German navy 
and a European Customs Union. 'Out of the economic tension of the world 
there arises the prime duty for Germany to create for herself a strong na\y, 
so as to be prepared for battle in the case of need, and to be desirable as an 
ally to the World Powers' — which latter, however, Professor Schmoller says 
elsewhere, he does not wish to blame for again taking the path of large-scale 
colonial expansion. 'She neither can nor ought to pursue a policy of conquest 
like the Three World Powers, but she must be able, if necessaiy, to break 
a foreign blockade of the North Sea in order to protect her own colonics and 
her vast commerce, and she must be able to offer the same security to the 
states with whom she forms an alliance. It is the task of the Three-Partite 
Union (Germany, Austro-Hungary, and Italy) to co-operate with France 
towards imposing some restraint, desirable for the preservation of all other 
states, on the over-aggressive policy of the Three World Powers which con- 
stitutes a threat to all smaller states, and to ensure moderation in conquests, 
in colonial acquisitions, in the immoderate and unilateral policy of protec- 
tive tariffs, in the exploitation and maltreatment of all weaker elements. 
The objectives of all higher intellectual, moral and aesthetic civilisation and 
of social progress depend on the fact that the globe should not be divided 
up among Three World Empires in the twentieth century, that these Three 
Empires should not establish a brutal nco-mercantilism' [Die Wandlungen der 
Europäischen Handelspolitik des ig. Jahrhunderts, 'Changes in the European 
Commercial Policy During the 19th Century', in Jahrb. ßir Gesetzgebung, 
Verwaltung und Volkswirtschaft, vol. xxiv, p. 381). 

296 



STRUVE 

the demand in Germany for products of this branch is satisfied 

by foreign supplies? No, this schematic conception of 'foreign 
trade' does not help us at all to grasp the complexity of the 
world market with its uncounted ramifications and different 
shades in the division of labour. The industrial development of 
the U.S.A. who have already at the time of writing become a 
dangerous rival to Britain both on the world market and even 
in England herself, just as they have beaten German com- 
petition, e.g. in the sphere of electrotechnics, both in the world 
market and in Germany herself, has given the lie to Struve's 
inferences, already out-of-date when they were put on paper. 
Struve also shares the crude view of the Russian 'populists' 
who saw hardly more than a merchant's sordid concern for his 
market in the international connections of capitalist economy, 
and its historical tendency to create a homogeneous living 
organism based on social division of labour as well as the count- 
less variety of natural wealth and productive conditions of the 
globe. Moreover he accepts the Three Empire fiction of Wagner 
and Schmoller (the self-contained Empires of Great Britain, 
Russia and the U.S.A.) which completely ignores or artificially 
minimises the vital part played by an unlimited supply of means 
of subsistence, of raw and auxiliary materials and of labour 
power which is just as necessary for a capitalist industry com- 
puted in terms of a world market as the demand for finished pro- 
ducts. Alone the history of the English cotton industry, a reflec- 
tion in miniature of the history of capitalism in general, spread- 
ing over five continents throughout the nineteenth century, 
makes a mockery of the professors' childish pretensions which 
have only one real significance: to provide the theoretical 
justification for the system of protective tariffs. 



297 



CHAPTER XXII 

BULGAKOV AND HIS COMPLETION 
OF MARX'S ANALYSIS 

THE second critic of 'populist' scepticism, S. Bulgakov, is 
no respecter of Struve's 'third persons' and at once 
denies that they form the sheet-anchor for capitalist 
accumulation. 

'The majority of economists before Marx', he declares, 'solved 
the problem by saying that some sort of "third person" is 
needed, as a deus ex machina^ to cut the Gordian knot, i.e. to 
consume the surplus value. This part is played by luxury-loving 
landowners (as with Malthus), or by indulgent capitalists, or 
yet by militarism and the like. There can be no demand for the 
surplus value without some such extraordinary mediators; a 
deadlock will be reached on the markets and the result will be 
over-production and crises.'^ 

'Struve thus assumes that capitalist production in its develop- 
ment, too, may find its ultimate mainstay in the consumption of 
some fantastic sort of "third person". But if this great public is 
essentially characterised as consuming the surplus value, whence 
does it obtain the means to buy?'^ 

For his part, Bulgakov centres the whole problem from the 
first in the analysis of the social aggregate product and its re- 
production as given by Marx in the second volume of Capital. 
He has a thorough grasp of the fact that he must start with 
simple reproduction and must fully understand its working in 
order to solve the question of accumulation. In this context, he 
says, it is of particular importance to obtain a clear picture of 
the consumption of surplus value and wages in such branches 
of production as do not turn out goods for consumption, and 
further, to understand fully the circulation ofthat portion of the 
social aggregate product which represents used-up constant 

^ S. Bulgakov On the Markets of Capitalist Production. A Study in Theory 
(Moscow, 1897), p. 15. ^ Ibid., p. 32, footnote. 

298 



BULGAKOV 

capital. This, he argues, is a completely new problem of which 
economists had not even been aware before Marx brought it 
up. 'In order to solve this problem, Marx divides all capitalistic- 
ally produced commodities into two great and fundamentally 
different categories: the production of producer and consumer 
goods. There is more theoretical importance in this division 
than in all previous squabbles on the theory of markets.'^ 

Bulgakov, we see, is an outspoken and enthusiastic supporter 
of Marx's theory. The object of his study, as he puts it, is thus 
a critique of the doctrine that capitalism cannot exist without 
external markets. 'For this purpose, the author has made use of 
the most valuable analysis of social reproduction given by Marx 
in volume ii of Capital which for reasons unknown has scarcely 
been utilised in economic theory. Though this analysis cannot 
be taken as fully completed, we are yet of opinion that even in 
its present fragmentary shape it offers an adequate foundation 
for a solution of the market problem that differs from that 
adopted by Messrs. Nikolayon, V. V. and others, and which 
they claim to have found in Marx.'^ 

Bulgakov gives the following formulation of his solution 
which he has deduced from Marx himself: 'In certain condi- 
tions, capitalism may exist solely by virtue of an internal market. 
It is not an inherent necessity peculiar to the capitalist mode of 
production that the outside market be able to absorb the surplus 
of capitalist production. The author has arrived at this con- 
clusion in consequence of his study of the above-mentioned 
analysis of social reproduction.' 

And now we are eager to hear the arguments Bulgakov has 
based on the above thesis. 

At first sight, they prove surprisingly simple: Bulgakov faith- 
fully reproduces Marx's well-known diagram of simple repro- 
duction, adding comments which do credit to his insight. He 
further cites Marx's equally familiar diagram of enlarged repro- 
duction — and this indeed is the proof we have been so anxious 
to find. 

'Consequent upon what we have said, it will not be difficult 

now to determine the very essence of accumulation. The means- 

of-production department I must produce additional means 

of production necessary for enlarging both its own production 

^ Ibid., p. 27. 2 Ibid., pp. 2-3. 

299 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

and that of Department IL II, in its turn, will have to supply 
additional consumption goods to enlarge the variable capital in 
both departments. Disregarding the circulation of money, the 
expansion of production is reduced to an exchange of additional 
products of I needed by II against additional products of II 
needed by I.' 

Loyally following Marx's deductions, Bulgakov does not 
notice that so far his entire thesis is nothing but words. He 
believes that these mathematical /o/mw/ö^ solve the problem of 
accumulation. No doubt we can easily imagine proportions such 
as those he has copied from Marx, and if there is expanding pro- 
duction, xhtsG. formulae will apply. Yet Bulgakov overlooks the 
principal problem: who exactly is to profit by an expansion such 
as that whose mechanism he examines? Is it explained just be- 
cause we can put the mathematical proportions of accumulation 
on paper? Hardly, because just as soon as Bulgakov has declared 
the matter settled and goes on to introduce the circulation of 
money into the analysis, he right away comes up against the 
question: where are I and II to get the money for the purchase 
of additional products? When we dealt with Marx, time and 
again the weak point in his analysis, the question really of con- 
sumers in enlarged reproduction, cropped up in a perverted 
form as the question of additional money sources. Here Bulgakov 
quite slavishly follows Marx's approach, accepting his mislead- 
ing formulation of the problem without noticing that it is not 
straightforward, although he knows perfectly well that 'Marx 
himself did not answer this question in the drafts which were 
used to compile the second volume of Capital'. It should be all 
the more interesting to see what answer Marx's Russian pupil 
attempted to work out on his own. 

'The following solution', Bulgakov says, 'seems to us to corre- 
spond best to Marx's doctrine as a whole: The new variable 
capital in money-form supplied by II for both departments has 
its commodity equivalent in surplus value II. With reference to 
simple reproduction, we have already seen that the capitalists 
themselves must throw money into circulation to realise their 
surplus value, money which ultimately reverts to the pocket of 
the very capitalist it came from. The quantity of money re- 
quired for the circulation of the surplus value is determined in 
accordance with the general law of commodity circulation by 

300 



BULGAKOV 

the value of the commodities that contained it, divided by the 
average amount of money turnover. This same law must apply 
here; the capitalists of Department II must dispose of a certain 
amount of money for the circulation of their surplus value, and 
must consequently possess certain money reserves. These re- 
serves must be ample enough for the circulation both of that 
portion of the surplus value which represents the consumption 
fund and ofthat which is to be accumulated as capital.' 

Bulgakov further argues that it is immaterial to the question 
how much money is required to circulate a certain amount of 
commodities inside a country, whether or not some of these 
commodities contain any surplus value. 'In answer to the general 
question as to money sources inside the country, however, 
our solution is that the money is supplied by the producer of 
gold.'i 

If a country requires more money consequent upon an 'ex- 
pansion of production', the production of gold will have to be 
increased accordingly. So here we are again: the producer of 
gold is again the deus ex machina, just as he had been for Marx. 
In fact, Bulgakov has sadly disappointed us in the high hopes 
we had of his new solution. His 'solution' of the problem does 
not go a step beyond Marx's own analysis. It can be reduced to 
three extremely simple statements as follows: (i) Question: How 
much money do we need for the realisation of capitalised sur- 
plus value? Answer: Just as much as is required in accordance 
with the general law of commodity circulation. (2) Q^.: Where 
do the capitalists get the money for the realisation of capitalised 
surplus value? A.: They are supposed to have it. (3) Q^.: How 
did the money come into the country in the first place? A. : It is 
provided by the producer of gold. The extreme simplicity of 
this method of explanation is suspicious rather than attractive. 

We need not trouble, however, to refute this theory which 
makes the gold producer the deus ex machina of capitalist accumu- 
lation. Bulgakov has done it himself quite adequately. Eighty 
pages on, he returns to the gold producer in quite a different 
context, in the course of a lengthy argument against the 
theory of the wages fund in which he got involved for some 
mysterious reason. Here he suddenly displays a keen grasp of 
the problem: 

^ On the Markets of Capitalist Production, pp. 50, 55. 
301 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

'We know already that there is a gold producer amongst 
other producers. Even under conditions of simple reproduction, 
he increases, on the one hand, the absolute quantity of money 
circulating inside the country, and on the other, he buys pro- 
ducer and consumer goods without, in his turn, selling com- 
modities, paying with his own product, i.e. with the general 
exchange equivalent, for the goods he buys. The gold producer 
now might perhaps render the service of buying the whole 
accumulated surplus value from II and pay for it in gold which 
II can then use to buy means of production from I and to 
increase its variable capital needed to pay for additional labour 
power so that the gold producer now appears as the real 
external market. 

'This assumption, however, is quite absurd. To accept it 
would mean to make the expansion of social production depen- 
dent upon the expansion of gold production. (Hear, hear!) This 
in turn presupposes an increase in gold production which is 
quite unreal. If the gold producer were obliged to buy all the 
accumulated surplus value from II for his own workers, his own 
variable capital would have to grow by the day and indeed by 
the hour. Yet his constant capital as well as his surplus value 
should also grow in proportion, and gold production as a whole 
would consequently have to take on immense dimensions. 
(Hear, hear!) Instead of submitting this sophistical presumption 
to statistical tests — which in any case would hardly be possible 
— a single fact can be adduced which would alone refute this 
presupposition: it is the development of the institution of credit 
which accompanies the development of capitalist economy. 
(Hear, hear!) Credit has the tendency to diminish the amount 
of money in circulation (this decrease being, of course, only 
relative, not absolute); it is the necessary complement of a 
developing economy of exchange which would otherwise soon 
find itself hampered by a lack of coined money. I think we need 
not give figures in this context to prove that the role of money 
in exchange-transactions is now very small. The hypothesis is 
thus proved in immediate and evident disagreement with the 
facts and must be confuted.'^ 

Bravo! Bravissimo! This is really excellent! Bulgakov, how- 
ever, thus 'confutes' also his former explanation of the question, 
^ On the Markets of Capitalist Production, p. 132 ff. 
302 



BULGAKOV 

in what way and by whom capitalised surplus value is realised. 
Moreover, in refuting his own statements, Bulgakov has only 
explained in somewhat greater detail what Marx expressed in a 
single word when he called the hypothesis of a gold producer 
swallowing up the entire surplus value of society — 'absurd'. 

Admittedly, Bulgakov's real solution and that of Russian 
Marxists in general who deal extensively with the problem 
must be sought elsewhere. Just like Tugan Baranovski and 
Ilyin [Lenin], Bulgakov underlines the fact that the opposing 
sceptics made a capital error with respect to the possibility of 
accumulation in analysing the value of the aggregate product. 
They, especially Vorontsov, assumed that the aggregate social 
product consists in consumer goods, and they all started from 
the false premise that consumption is indeed the object of capit- 
alist production. This, as the Marxists now explain, is the source 
of the entire misunderstanding — of all the imaginary difficulties 
connected with the realisation of the surplus value, with which 
the sceptics racked their brains. 

'This school created non-existent difficulties because of this 
mistaken conception. Since the normal conditions of capitalist 
production presuppose that the capitalists' consumption fund 
is only a part of the surplus value, and the smaller part at that, 
the larger being set aside for the expansion of production, it is 
obvious that the difficulties imagined by this (the populist) 
school do not really exist.'^ 

The unconcern with which Bulgakov here ignores the real 
problem is striking. Apparently it has not dawned on him that 
the question as to the ultimate beneficiaries, quite irrelevant so 
long as personal consumption of the entire surplus value is 
assumed, only becomes acute on the assumption of enlarged 
reproduction. 

All these 'imaginary difficulties' vanish, thanks to two dis- 
coveries of Marx's which his Russian pupils untiringly quote 
against their opponents. The first is the fact that, in terms of 
value, the social product is composed, notofr;+-5", h\iioic-\-v+s. 
Secondly, the ratio oi c to v in this sum continually increases 
with the progress of capitalist production, and at the same time, 
the capitalised part of the surplus value as against that part of 
it that is consumed, is ever growing. On this basis, Bulgakov 

^ Ibid., p. 20. 
303 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

establishes a complete theory of the relations between produc- 
tion and consumption in a capitalist society. As this theory plays 
such an important part for the Russian Marxists in general, 
and Bulgakov in particular, it will be necessary to get better 
acquainted with it. 

'Consumption,' Bulgakov says, 'the satisfaction of social 
needs, is but an incidental moment in the circulation of capital. 
The volume of production is determined by the volume of 
capital, and not by the amount of social requirements. Not 
alone that the development of production is unaccompanied 
by a growth in consumption — the two are mutually antagon- 
istic. Capitalist production knows no other than effective con- 
sumption, but only such persons who draw either surplus value 
or labour wages can be effective consumers, and their pur- 
chasing power strictly corresponds to the amount of those 
revenues. Yet we have seen that the fundamental evolutionary 
laws of capitalist production tend, despite the absolute increase, 
to diminish the relative size of variable capital as well as of the 
capitalists' consumption fund. We can say, then, that the develop- 
ment of production diminishes consumption.'^ The conditions of pro- 
duction and of consumption are thus in conflict. Production 
cannot and does not expand to further consumption. Expansion, 
however, is an inherent fundamental law of capitahst produc- 
tion and confronts every individual capitahst in the form of a 
stern command to compete. This contradiction is negligible in 
view of the fact that expanding production as such represents a 
market for additional products. "Inherent contradictions are 
resolved by an extension of the outlying fields of production." '^ 
(Bulgakov here quotes a saying of Marx which he has thoroughly 
misunderstood; we shall later have occasion to deal with it once 
more.) 'It has just been shown how this is possible.' (A reference 
to the analysis of the diagram of enlarged reproduction.) 'Evi- 
dently, the greater share of the expansion is apportioned to 
Department I, to the production, that is to say, of constant 
capital, and only a (relatively) smaller part to Department II 
which produces commodities for immediate consumption. This 
change in the relations of the two departments shows well 
enough what part is played by consumption in a capitalist 
society, and it indicates where we should expect to find the most 
^ Bulgakov's italics. ^ Capital, vol. iii, p. 387. 

304 



BULGAKOV 

important demand for capitalist commodities.'^ 'Even within 
the narrow Hmits of the profit motive and the crises, even on 
this strait and narrow path, capitahst production is capable 
of unlimited expansion, irrespective of, and even despite, a 
decrease in consumption. The Russian literature frequently 
points out that in view of diminishing consumption a consider- 
able increase of capitalist production is impossible without ex- 
ternal markets, but this is due to a wrong evaluation of the part 
played by consumption in a capitalist society, the failure to 
appreciate that consumption is not the ultimate end of capitalist 
production. Capitalist production does not exist by the grace of 
an increase in consumption but because of an extension of the 
outlying fields of production which in fact constitute the market 
for capitalist products. A whole progression of Malthusian in- 
vestigators, discontented with the superficial harmony doctrine 
of the school of Say and Ricardo, have slaved away at a solu- 
tion of the hopeless undertaking: to find means of increasing 
consumption which the capitalist mode of production is bound 
to decrease. Marx was the only one to analyse the real connec- 
tions: he has shown that the growth of consumption is fatally 
lagging behind that of production, and must do so whatever 
"third persons" one might invent. Consumption and its volume 
then should by no means be considered as establishing the 
immediate limits to the expansion of production. Capitalist pro- 
duction atones by the crises for deviating from the true purpose 
of production, but it is independent of consumption. The expan- 
sion of production is alone limited by, and dependent upon, the 
volume of capital.' 2 

The theory of Bulgakov and Tugan Baranovski is here directly 
attributed to Marx. In the eyes of the Russian Marxists, it is on 
the whole the direct consequence of Marx's doctrine, of which 
it forms an organic part. On another occasion Bulgakov says 
even more clearly that it is a faithful interpretation of Marx's 
diagram of enlarged reproduction. Once a country has embraced 
capitalist production, its internal movement develops along the 
following lines: 

'The production of constant capital makes up the Depart- 
ment I of social reproduction, thereby instituting an indepen- 
dent demand for consumption goods to the extent of both its 
^ Bulgakov, op. cit., p. i6i. ~ Ibid., p. 167. 

305 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

own variable capital and the consumption fund of its capitalists. 
Department II in its turn starts the demand for the products of 
Department I. Thus a closed circle is already formed at the initial 
stage of capitalist production, in which it depends on no external market 
but is self-sufficient and can grow, of itself, as it were, by means of 
accumulation.''^ 

In the hands of the Russian Marxists this theory becomes the 
favourite stick with which to beat their opponents, the 'populist' 
sceptics, in the question of markets. We can only appreciate 
its daring to the full when we look at its amazing discrepancy 
with everyday practice, with all the known facts of capitalist 
economy. A thesis pronounced so triumphantly as the purest 
Marxist gospel is even more deserving of our admiration when 
we consider that it is grounded in an extremely simple con- 
fusion. We shall have further occasion to deal with this con- 
fusion when we come to the doctrine of Tugan Baranovski. 

Bulgakov further develops a completely erroneous theory 
of foreign commerce, based upon his misapprehension of the 
relations between consumption and production in capitalist 
economy. A picture of reproduction like the above in fact has 
no room for foreign commerce. If capitalism forms a 'closed 
circle' in every country from the very beginning, if, chasing its 
tail like a puppy and in complete 'self-sufficiency', it is able of 
itself to create an unlimited market for its products and can 
spur itself on to ever greater expansion, then every capitalist 
country as such must also be a closed and self-sufficient eco- 
nomic whole. In but a single respect would foreign commerce 
appear reasonable: to compensate, by imports from abroad, for 
certain deficiencies due to the soil and the climate, i.e. the 
import of raw materials or foodstuffs from sheer necessity. Com- 
pletely upsetting the thesis of the 'populists', Bulgakov in fact 
advances a theory of international commerce among capitalist 
states which gives pride of place to the import of agricultural 
products, with industrial exports merely providing the requisite 
funds. 

International traffic in commodities does not here seem to 

flow from the character of the mode of production but from the 

natural conditions of the countries concerned. This theory at 

any rate has not been borrowed from Marx but from the 

^ Bulgakov, op. cit., p. 210 (our italics). 

306 



BULGAKOV 

economic experts of the German bourgeoisie. Just as Struve 
took over from Wagner and SchacfTlc his Three Empire Theory, 
so Bulgakov adopts from the late List {R.I. P.) the division of 
states on the basis of 'agriculture' and 'mixed agriculture and 
manufacture', or rather adapts it, in deference to the times, to 
the categories of 'manufacture' and 'mixed manufacture and 
agriculture'. Nature has afflicted the first category with a 
deficiency in raw materials and foodstuffs, making it thus depen- 
dent upon foreign commerce. The second category has been 
liberally endowed with all it needs; here foreign trade is of no 
account. The prototype of the first category is England, of the 
second — the U.S.A. The stoppage of foreign commerce would 
mean the economic death-blow to England, but only a tem- 
porary crisis in the U.S.A. with a guarantee of full recovery. 

'Production there is capable of unlimited expansion on the 
basis of the internal market.'^ 

This theory, a hoary relic of German economics even now, 
has obviously not the least grasp of the interrelations obtaining 
in an international capitalist economy. It conceives of modern 
international trade in terms that may have been appropriate 
to the times of the Phoenicians. Just listen to the lecture of 
Professor Buecher: 

'Although the liberalist era has greatly facilitated inter- 
national traffic, it would be a mistake to infer from this that the 
period of a national economy is nearing its end, to be replaced 
by a period of international economy . . . Granted that we see 
in Europe to-day a number of small countries that are not inde- 
pendent nations in respect of their commodity supply, being 
compelled to import substantial amounts of their foodstuffs and 
luxuries, while their industrial productivity is in excess of the 
national needs and creates a permanent surplus for which 
employment must be found in alien spheres of consumption. 
Yet although countries of industrial production and those pro- 
ducing raw materials exist side by side and depend upon one 
another, such "international division of labour" should not 
be regarded as a sign that mankind is about to attain to a 
higher stage of development which it would be proper to con- 
trast, under the label of world economy, with the . . . previous 
stages. No stage of economic development has ever permanently 

1 Ibid., p. 199. 
307 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

guaranteed full autonomy in the satisfaction of wants. Every 
one of them has left certain gaps which had to be filled in by 
some means or other. So-called "international economy", on 
the other hand, has not, at any rate so far, engendered any 
phenomena which are essentially different from those of national 
economy, and we very much doubt that such phenomena will 
appear in the near future.'^ 

As far as Bulgakov is concerned, this conception at any rate 
results in an unexpected conclusion: his theory of the un- 
limited capacity for development of capitalism is confined to 
certain countries with favourable natural conditions. Capitalism 
in England is foredoomed because the world market will be 
exhausted before long. In the U.S.A., India and Russia it can 

^ K. Buecher; The Rise of National Economy {Die Entskhung der Volks- 
wirtschaft), 5th edition, p. 147. Professor Sombart's theory is the most recent 
contribution in this field. He argues that we are not moving towards an 
international economy but rather farther and farther away from it. 'I main- 
tain, on the contrary, that commercial relations to-day do not form a 
stronger but rather a weaker link between the civilised nations, in relation 
to their economy as a whole. Individual economy takes not more but rather 
less account of the world market than it did a hundred or fifty years ago. 
At least ... it would be wrong to assume that the relative importance of 
international relations with regard to modern political economy is increas- 
ing. The opposite is the case.' Sombart scornfully rejects the assumption of 
a progressive international division of labour, of a growing need for outside 
markets owing to an inelastic home demand. He in his turn is convinced 
that 'the individual national economies will develop into ever more perfect 
microcosms and that the importance of the home market will increasingly 
surpass that of the world market for all branches of industry' {Die Deutsche 
Volkswirtschaft im ig. Jahrhundert, 2nd edition, 1909, pp. 399-420). This 
devastating discovery admittedly hinges on a full acceptance of the Pro- 
fessor's peculiar conception which, for some reasons, only considers those as 
'exporting countries' who pay for their imports with a surplus of agricultural 
products over and above their own needs, who pay 'with the soil'. In this 
scheme Russia, Rumania, the U.S.A. and the Argentine are, but Germany, 
England and Belgium arc not, 'exporting countries'. Since capitalist 
development will sooner or later also claim the surplus of agricultural pro- 
ducts for the home demand in Russia and the U.S.A., it is evident that there 
will be fewer and fewer 'exporting countries' in the world — international 
economy will vanish. — Another of Sombart's discoveries is that great 
capitalist 'non-exporting' countries increasingly obtain 'free' imports in 
form of interest on exported capital — but the capital exports as well as 
exports of industrial commodities arc of absolutely no account to Professor 
Sombart. 'In the course of time we shall probably get to a point where we 
import without exporting' (p. 422). Modern, sensational, and precious! 

308 



BULGAKOV 

look forward to an unlimited development because these coun- 
tries are 'self-sufficient'. 

Apart from these obvious peculiarities, Bulgakov's arguments 
about foreign commerce again imply a fundamental miscon- 
ception. Against the sceptics, from Sismondi to Nikolayon, who 
believed that they had to take recourse to outside markets for 
the realisation of capitalist surplus value, he chiefly argues as 
follows: 

'These experts obviously consider external commerce as a 
"bottomless pit" to swallow up in all eternity the surplus value 
which cannot be got rid of inside the country.' 

Bulgakov for his part triumphantly points out that foreign 
commerce is indeed not a pit and certainly not a bottomless one, 
but rather appears as a double-edged sword, that exports always 
belong with imports, and that the two usually counterbalance 
one another. Thus, whatever is pushed out over one border, will 
be brought back, in a changed use-form, over another. 'We 
must find room for the commodities that have been imported 
as an equivalent of those exported, within the bounds of the 
given market, and as this is impossible, ex hypothesis it would 
only generate new difficulties to have recourse to an external 
demand.'^ 

On another occasion he says that the way to realise the 
surplus value found by the Russian 'populists', viz. external 
markets, 'is much less favourable than that discovered by 
Malthus, V. Kirchmann and Vorontsov himself when he wrote 
the essay On Militarism and Capitalism' .^ 

Although Bulgakov fervently copies Marx's diagram of re- 
production, he here exhibits no grasp whatever of the real prob- 
lem towards which the sceptics from Sismondi to Nikolayon 
were groping their way. He denies that foreign commerce solves 

^ Bulgakov, op. cit., p. 132. 

2 Ibid., p. 236. A quite uncompromising version of the same view is 
given by V. Ilyin [Lenin] : 'The romanticists (as he calls the sceptics) argue 
as follows: the capitalists cannot consume the surplus value; therefore they 
must dispose of it abroad. I ask: Do the capitalists perhaps give away their 
products to foreigners for nothing, throw it into the sea, maybe? If they sell 
it, it means that they obtain an equivalent. If they export certain goods, it 
means that they import others' [Economic Studies and Essays, p. 2). As a 
matter of fact, his explanation of the part played by external commerce 
in capitalist production is far more correct than that of Struve and Bulgakov. 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

the difficulty as pretended, since it again brings the surplus 
value that has been disposed of into the country, although in a 
'changed form'. In conformity with the crude picture of 
V. Kirchmann and Vorontsov, he thus believes the problem to 
be that of destroying a certain quantity of the surplus value, of 
wiping it from the face of the earth. It simply does not occur to 
him that the real problem is the realisation of the surplus value, 
the metamorphosis of commodities, in fact the 'changed form' 
of the surplus value. 

Bulgakov thus finally arrives at the same goal as Struve, 
though by a different route. He preaches the self-sufficiency of 
capitahst accumulation which swallows up its own product as 
Kronos swallows up his children, and breeds ever more vigor- 
ously without help from outside. Now only one further step is 
needed for Marxism to revert to bourgeois economics, and this, 
as luck would have it, was taken by Tugan Baranovski. 



31Q 



CHAPTER XXIII 

TUGAN BARANOVSKI 
AND HIS 'LACK OF PROPORTION' 

WE have left this theorist to the end, although he 
already developed his views in Russian in 1894, i.e. 
before Struve and Bulgakov, partly because he only 
gave his theories their mature form in German at a later 
date,^ and also because the conclusions he draws from the 
premises of the Marxist critics are the most far-reaching in their 
implications. 

Like Bulgakov, Tugan Baranovski starts from Marx's analysis 
of social reproduction which gave him the clue to this bewilder- 
ing maze of problems. But while Bulgakov, the enthusiastic dis- 
ciple of Marx, only sought to follow him faithfully and simply 
attributed his own conclusions to the master, Tugan Baranovski, 
on the other hand, lays down the law to Marx who, in his 
opinion, did not know how to turn his brilliant exposition of the 
reproductive process to good account. Tugan Baranovski's most 
important general conclusion from Marx's principles, the pivot 
of his whole theory, is that, contrary to the assumptions of the 
sceptics, capitalist accumulation is not only possible under the 
capitalist forms of revenue and consumption, but is, in fact, 
completely independent of both. It is not consumption, he says, 
but production itself which makes for the best market. Produc- 
tion and the market are therefore the same, and since the 
expansion of production is unlimited in itself, the market, the 
capacity to absorb its products, has no limits either. 

'The diagram quoted', he says, 'was to prove conclusively a 
postulate which, though simple enough, might easily give rise 
to objections, unless the process be adequately understood — the 
postulate, namely, that capitalist production creates a market 
for itself. So long as it is possible to expand social production, if 

1 Studies on the Theory and History of Commercial Crises in England (Jena, 
1 901) and Theoretical Foundations of Marxism (1905). 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

the productive forces are adequate for this purpose, the propor- 
tionate division of social production must also bring about a 
corresponding expansion of the demand inasmuch as under 
such conditions all newly produced goods represent a newly 
created purchasing power for the acquisition of other goods. 
Comparing simple reproduction of the social capital \vith its 
reproduction on a rising scale, we arrive at the most important 
conclusion that in capitalist economy the demand for commo- 
dities is in a sense independent of the total volume of social 
consumption. Absurd as it may seem to "common-sense", it is 
yet possible that the volume of social consumption as a whole 
goes down while at the same time the aggregate social demand 
for commodities grows. '^ 

And again further on: 'Arising from the abstract analysis of 
the reproductive process of social capital we have formed the 
conclusion that nothing will be left over of the social product in 
view of the proportionate division of the social capital.' - 

Accordingly Tugan Baranovski subjects Marx's theory of 
crises to a revision which he claims to have developed from 
Sismondi's 'over-consumption'. 'Marx is in substantial agree- 
ment with the general view that the poverty of the workers, i.e. 
of the great majority of the population, makes it impossible to 
realise the products of an ever expanding capitalist production, 
since it causes a decline in demand. This opinion is definitely 
mistaken. We have seen that capitalist production creates its 
own market — consumption being only one of the moments of 
capitalist production. In a planned social production if the 
leaders of production were equipped with all information about 
the demand and with the power to transfer labour and capital 
freely from one branch of production to another, then, how- 
ever low the level of social consumption, the supply of com- 
modities would not exceed the demand.'^ 

The only circumstance which periodically causes the market 
to be flooded is a lack of proportion in the enlargement of pro- 
duction. On this assumption, therefore, Tugan Baranovski 
describes the course of capitalist accumulation as follows: 'What 
would the workers . . . produce if production were organised on 
proportionate lines? Obviously their own means of subsistence 

* Studies on the Theory and History . . ., p. 23. 

' Ibid., p. 34. 3 Ibid., p. 333. 

312 



TUGAN BARANOVSKI 

and production. With what object? To expand production in 
the second year. The production of what products? Again of 
means of production and subsistence for the workers — and so on 
ad infinitum.'^ 

This game of question and answer, mind you, is not a fr)rm 
of self-mockery, it is meant in all seriousness. Tf the expansion 
of production has no practical limits, then we must assume that 
the expansion of markets is equally unlimited, for if social pro- 
duction is proportionately organised, there is no limit to the expansion of 
the market other than the productive forces available. ^^ 

Since production thus creates its own demand, foreign com- 
merce of capitalist states is also assigned that peculiar mechan- 
istic function we have already met in Bulgakov. A foreign 
market, for instance, is an absolute necessity for England. 'Does 
not this prove that capitalist production creates a surplus pro- 
duct for which there is no room on the internal market? Why, 
come to that, does England require an external market? The 
answer is not difficult: because a considerable part of England's 
purchasing power is expended on obtaining foreign commo- 
dities. The import of foreign commodities for the English home 
market also makes it essential to export English commodities 
abroad. Since England cannot manage without importing from 
abroad, exports are a vital condition for that country, since 
without them she would not be able to pay for her imports.'^ 

Here again agricultural imports are described as a stimu- 
lating and decisive factor, quite in accordance with the scheme 
of the German professors. 

What, then, is the general line of reasoning on which Tugan 
Baranovski supports his daring solution of the problem of 
accumulation, the new revelation on the problem of crises and 
a whole lot of others? Hard to believe, but quite incontrovertible 
for all that, Tugan Baranovski's proof consists exclusively and 
entirely — in Marx's diagram of enlarged reproduction, no more 
no less. Although he repeatedly refers rather pompously to his 
'abstract analysis of the reproductive process of social capital', 
to the 'conclusive logic' of his analysis, this entire analysis is 
nothing but a copy of Marx's diagram of enlarged reproduction, 
with a different set of figures. Nowhere in the entire works of 

^ Ibid., p. igi. 2 ibid.^ p. 231, italics in the original. 

3 Ibid., p. 305. 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

Tugan Baranovski shall we find a trace of any other argument. 
In Marx's diagram, admittedly, accumulation, production, 
realisation and exchange run smoothly with clockwork pre- 
cision, and no doubt this kind of 'accumulation' can continue 
ad infinitum, just as long, that is to say, as ink and paper do not 
run out. And it is this harmless written exercise with mathe- 
matical equations which Tugan Baranovski quite seriously con- 
siders a demonstration of such a course in real events. 

'The diagrams we have adduced are bound to prove con- 
clusively that . . .' 

On another occasion he counters Hobson, who is convinced 
that accumulation is impossible, with the following words: 
'Diagram No. 2 of the reproduction of social capital on a rising 
scale corresponds to the case of capital accumulation Hobson 
has in mind. But does this diagram show a surplus product to 
come into being? Far from it.'^ 

Hobson is refuted and the matter settled because 'in the 
diagram' no surplus product comes into being. 

Admittedly, Tugan Baranovski knows quite well that in hard 
fact things do not work out so smoothly. There are continual 
fluctuations in the exchange relations and periodical crises. But 
these crises happen only because in the expansion of production 
the proper proportions are not maintained, because, that is to 
say, the proportions of 'diagram No. 2' are not observed in the 
first place. If they were, there would be no crisis, and capitalist 
production could get along as nicely as it does on paper, in 
every detail. Tugan Baranovski is committed to the view that 
we can ignore the crises if we consider the reproductive process 
as a continuous process. Although the 'proportion' may be upset 
at any moment, yet on average it will always be re-established 
by different deviations, by price-fluctuations from day to day, 
and in the long run by periodical crises. That on the whole this 
'proportion' is more or less maintained is proved by the fact that 
capitalist economy is still going strong — otherwise it would long 
ago have ended in chaos and collapse. In the long run, then, 
Tugan Baranovski's 'proportion' is observed by and large, and 
we must conclude that reality obeys 'diagram No. 2'. And since 
this diagram can be indefinitely extended, it follows that capit- 
alist accumulation can also proceed ad infinitum. 

^ Studies on the Tlieory and History . . ., p. 191. 



TUGAN BARANOVSKI 

What is striking in all this is not Tugan Baranovski's con- 
clusion that the diagram corresponds to the actual course of 
events — as we have seen, Bulgakov also shared this belief; the 
really startling fact is that Tugan Baranovski sees no necessity 
for as much as inquiring whether the diagram is correct, 
that, instead of proving the diagram, he considers this, the 
arithmetical exercise on paper, as proof of the actual state of 
affairs. Bulgakov honestly tried to project Marx's diagram on 
the real concrete relations of capitalist economy and of capitalist 
exchange; he endeavoured to overcome the difficulties resulting 
from it, though without success, it is true, remaining to the last 
involved with Marx's analysis, which he himself recognised to 
be incomplete and fragmentary. But Tugan Baranovski does not 
need any proof, he does not greatly exercise his brains: since the 
arithmetical sums come out satisfactorily, and may be con- 
tinued ad lib., this is to him proof that capitalist accumulation 
can also proceed without let or hindrance — provided the said 
'proportion' obtains, which it will have to do by hook or by 
crook, as he himself would not dream of denying. 

Tugan Baranovski, however, has one indirect proof that the 
diagram with its strange results corresponds to, and truly re- 
flects, reality. This is the fact that capitalist production, quite in 
accordance with Marx's diagram, puts human consumption 
second to production, that it conceives of the former as a 
means and of the latter as an end in itself, just as it puts human 
labour, the 'worker', on a par with the machine. 

'Technical progress is expressed by the fact that the means of 
labour, the machine, increases more and more in importance as 
compared to living labour, to the worker himself. Means of pro- 
duction play an ever growing part in the productive process and 
on the commodity market. Compared to the machine, the 
worker recedes further into the background and the demand re- 
sulting from the consumption of the workers is also put into the 
shade by that which results from productive consumption by the 
means of production. The entire workings of capitalist economy 
take on the character of a mechanism existing on its own, as it 
were, in which human consumption appears as a simple moment 
of the reproductive process and the circulation of capitals.'^ 

Tugan Baranovski considers this discovery as a fundamental 

^ Ibid., p. 27. 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

law of the capitalist mode of production, which is confirmed by 
a quite tangible phenomenon: with the progress of capitalist 
development Department I goes on growing relatively to, and 
at the expense of. Department II. It was Marx himself who, as 
we all know, set up this law in which he grounded the schematic 
exposition of reproduction, though in the further development 
of his diagram he ignored subsequent alterations for simplicity's 
sake. This, the automatic growth of the producer goods as com- 
pared with the consumer goods department affords Tugan 
Baranovski the only objective proof of his theory: that in capit- 
alist society human consumption becomes increasingly unim- 
portant, and production more and more an end in itself This 
thesis forms the corner-stone of his entire theoretical edifice. 

Tn all the industrial countries', he proclaims, 'we are con- 
fronted with the same type of development — the development 
of national economy everywhere follows the same fundamental 
law. The mining industry which creates the means of produc- 
tion for modern industry comes more and more to the fore. 
The relative decrease in the export of immediately consumable 
manufactured goods from Britain is thus also an expression of 
the fundamental law governing capitalist development. The 
further technical progress advances, the more do consumer 
goods recede as compared with producer goods. Human con- 
sumption plays an ever decreasing part as against the productive 
consumption of the means of production.' ^ 

Although this Tundamental law' like all his other Tunda- 
mental' laws, in so far as they mean anything at all, is borrowed 
ready-made from Marx, Baranovski does not rest content with 
this and immediately proceeds to preach the Marxist gospel to 
Marx himself Scrabbling about like a blind hen, Marx has 
turned up another pearl— Tugan will give him that — only he 
does not know what to do with it. It needed a Tugan Baranovski 
to know how to make it useful to science, and in his hand the 
newly discovered law suddenly throws a new light on the whole 
workings of capitalist economy. This law of the expansion in 
the department of producer goods at the cost of that of con- 
sumer goods reveals clearly, concisely, exactly, and in measur- 
able terms, that capitalist society attaches progressively less 
importance to human consumption, putting man on the same 
^ Studies on the Theory and History . . ., p. 58. 
316 



TUGAN BARANOVSKI 

level as the means of production, and that Marx was therefore 
completely wrong both in assuming that man alone, not the 
machine, too, can be the creator of surplus value, and in saying, 
further, that human consumption represents a limit for capit- 
alist production which is bound to cause periodical crises in the 
present, and the collapse and terrible end of capitalist economy 
in the near future. In short, the 'fundamental law' governing 
the increase of producer as compared to consumer goods reflects 
the singular nature of capitalist society as a whole which Marx 
had not understood and which to interpret happily fell to the 
lot of Tugan Baranovski. 

We have seen above the decisive part played by the 'funda- 
mental law' of capital in the controversy between the Russian 
Marxists and the sceptics. Bulgakov's remarks we already know; 
another Marxist already referred to, Vladimir Ilyin, expresses 
himself in similar terms in his polemics against the 'populists': 

'It is well known that the law of capitalist production consists 
in the fact that the constant capital grows more rapidly than 
the variable capital, that is to say an ever increasing part of the 
newly formed capital falls to the department of social produc- 
tion which creates producer goods. In consequence, this depart- 
ment is absolutely bound to grow more rapidly than the 
department creating consumer goods, that is to say, the very 
thing happens which Sismondi declared to be "impossible", 
"dangerous", etc. In consequence, consumer goods make up a 
smaller and smaller share of the total bulk of capitalist produc- 
tion, and this is entirely in accordance with the historical 
"mission" of capitalism and its specific social structure: the 
former in fact consists in the development of the productive 
forces of society (production as an end in itself), and the latter 
prevents that the mass of the population should turn them to 
use.'^ 

In this respect, of course, Tugan Baranovski goes even 
farther. With his love of paradox he actually permits himself 

^ V. Ilyin [Lenin] 'Studies and Essays in Economics' {Oekonomische 
Studien und Artikel. !^ur Charakterisierung des ökonomischen Romantizismus , St. 
Petersburg, 1899), p. 20. — Incidentally, the same author is responsible for 
the statement that enlarged reproduction begins only with capitalism. It 
quite escapes him that under conditions of simple reproduction, which he 
takes to be the rule for all pre-capitalist modes of production, we should 
probably never have advanced beyond the stage of the paleolithic scraper. 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

the joke of submitting a mathematical proof that accumulation 
of capital and expansion of production are possible even if the 
absolute volume of production decreases. In this connection, 
Karl Kautsky has pointed out, he had recourse to a somewhat 
dubious scientific subterfuge, namely that he shaped his daring 
deductions exclusively for a specific moment: the transition 
from simple to enlarged reproduction — a moment which is 
exceptional even in theory, but certainly of no practical signifi- 
cance whatever. 1 

^ Die Neue ^eit, vol. xx, part 2, Krisentheorien, p. ii6. Kautsky's mathe- 
matical demonstration to Tugan Baranovski that consumption is bound to 
grow, and 'in the precise ratio as the bulk of producer goods in terms of 
value', calls for two comments: first, like Marx, Kautsky paid no attention 
to the progress in the productivity of labour so that consumption appears to 
have a relatively larger volume than it would in fact have. Secondly, the 
increase in consumption to which Kautsky here refers is only a con- 
sequence, a result of enlarged reproduction, it is neither its basis nor its aim; 
it is mainly due to the growth of the variable capital, the continual employ- 
ment of additional workers. The upkeep of these workers, however, neither is 
nor ought to be the object of the expansion of reproduction — no more, for 
that matter, than the increasing personal consumption of the capitalist class. 
Kautsky's argument no doubt refutes Tugan Baranovski's pet notion: the 
whimsy to construe enlarged reproduction with an absolute decrease in 
consumption. But for all that, he does not get anywhere near the funda- 
mental problem, the relations between production and consumption under 
the aspect of the reproductive process, though we are told in another passage 
of the same work: 'With the capitalists growing richer, and the workers they 
exploit increasing in numbers, they constitute between them a market for 
the consumer goods produced by capitalist big industry which expands con- 
tinually, yet it does not grow as rapidly as the accumulation of capital and 
the productivity of labour, and must therefore remain inadequate.' An 
additional market is required for these consumer goods, a market outside 
their own province, among those occupational groups and nations whose 
mode of production is not yet capitalistic. This market is found and also 
widens increasingly, but the expansion is again too slow, since the additional 
market is not nearly so elastic and capable of expansion as the capitalist 
productive process. As soon as capitalist production has developed to the big 
industry stage, as in England already in the first quarter of the nineteenth 
century, it is capable of expanding by leaps and bounds so as soon to out- 
distance all expansions of the market. Every period of prosperity subsequent 
to a considerable extension of the market is thus from the outset doomed to 
an early end — the inevitable crisis. This, in brief, is the theory of crises 
established by Marx, and, as far as we can see, generally accepted by the 
"orthodox" Marxists' (ibid., p. 80). Kautsky, however, is not interested in 
harmonising this conception of the realisation of the aggregate product with 
Marx's diagram of enlarged reproduction, perhaps because, as our quotation 

318 



TUGAN BARANOVSKI 

As to Tugan Baranovski's 'fundamental law', Kautsky 
declares it to be a mere illusion due to the fact that Tugan 
Baranovski considered the organisation of production only in 
the old countries of capitalist big industry. 

'It is correct', Kautsky says, 'that with a progressive division 
of labour, there will be comparatively fewer and fewer fac- 
tories etc. for the production of goods direct for personal con- 
sumption, together with a relative increase in the number of 
those which supply both the former and one another with tools, 
machines, raw materials, transport facilities and so on. While in 
original peasant economy an enterprise that cultivated the flax 
also made the linen with its own tools and got it ready for 
human consumption, nowadays hundreds of enterprises may 
share in the manufacture of a single shirt, by producing raw 
cotton, iron rails, steam engines and railway trucks that bring it 
to port, and so on. With international division of labour it will 
happen that some countries— the old industrial countries — can 
only slowly expand their production for personal consumption, 
while making large strides in their production of producer 

also shows, he deals with the problem solely from the aspect of crises, regard- 
ing, in other words, the social product as a more or less homogeneous bulk 
of goods and ignoring the fact that it is differentiated in the reproductive 
process. 

L. Bouding seems to come closer to the crucial point. In his brilliant 
review on Tugan Baranovski he gives the following formulation: 'With a 
single exception to be considered below, the existence of a surplus product 
in capitalist countries does not put a spoke in the wheel of production, not 
because production will be distributed more efficiently among the various 
spheres, or because the manufacture of machinery will replace that of cotton 
goods. The reason is rather that, capitalist development having begun 
sooner in some countries than in others, and because even to-day there are 
still some countries that have no developed capitalism, the capitalist coun- 
tries in truth have at their disposal an outside market in which they can get 
rid of their products which they cannot consume themselves, no matter 
whether these are cotton or iron goods. We would by no means deny that it 
is significant if iron goods replace cotton goods as the main products of the 
principal capitalist countries. On the contrary, this change is of paramount 
importance, but its implications are rather different from those ascribed to 
it by Tugan Baranovski. It indicates the beginning of the end of capitalism. 
So long as the capitalist countries exported commodities for the purpose of 
consumption, there was still a hope for capitalism in these countries, and the 
question did not arise how much and how long the non-capitalist outside 
world would be able to absorb capitalist commodities. The growing share of 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

goods which is much more decisive for the heartbeat of eco- 
nomic hfe than the production of consumer goods. From the 
point of view of the nation concerned, we might easily form the 
opinion that producer goods can be turned out on a constantly 
rising scale with a more rapid rate of increase than in the pro- 
duction of consumer goods, and that their production is not 
bound up with that of the latter.' 

The opinion, that producer goods can be produced indepen- 
dent of consumption, is of course a mirage of Tugan Baranov- 
ski's, typical of vulgar economics. Not so the fact cited in sup- 
port of this fallacy: the quicker growth of Department I as com- 
pared with Department II is beyond dispute, not only in old 
industrial countries but wherever technical progress plays a 
decisive part in production. It is the foundation also of Marx's 
fundamental law that the rate of profit tends to fall. Yet in spite 
of it all, or rather precisely for this reason, it is a howler if 
Bulgakov, Ilyin and Tugan Baranovski imagine to have dis- 
covered in this law the essential nature of capitalist economy as 
an economic system in which production is an end in itself and 
human consumption merely incidental. 

machinery at the cost of consumer goods in what is exported from the main 
capitahst countries shows that areas which were formerly free of capitahsm, 
and therefore served as a dumping-ground for its surplus products, are now 
drawn into the whirlpool of capitalism. It shows that, since they are develop- 
ing a capitalism of their own, they can by themselves produce the con- 
sumer goods they need. At present they still require machinery produced by 
capitalist methods since they are only in the initial stages of capitalist 
development. But all too soon they will need them no longer. Just as they 
now make their own cotton and other consumer goods, they will in future 
produce their own iron ware. Then they will not only cease to absorb the 
surplus produce of the essentially capitalist countries, but they will them- 
selves produce surplus products which they can place only with difficulty' 
{Die Neue Z^it, vol. xxv, part i. Mathematische Formeln gegen Karl Marx, 
p. 604). Bouding here broaches an important aspect of the general relations 
pertaining to the development of internaaonal capitalism. Further, as a 
logical consequence, he comes to the question of imperialism but unfortun- 
ately he finally puts the wrong kind of edge on his acute analysis by consider- 
ing the whole of militarist production together with the system of exporting 
international capital to non-capitalist countries under the heading of 'reck- 
less expenditure'. — We must say in parenthesis that Bouding, jusi like 
Kautsky, holds that the law of a quicker growth in the mcans-of-production 
department relative to the means-of-subsistence department is a delusion of 
Tugan Baranovski's. 

320 



TUGAN BARANOVSKI 

The growth of the constant at the expense of the variable 
capital is only the capitalist expression of the general effects of 
increasing labour productivity. 'I'hc formula c greater than v 
{c>v), translated from the language of capitalism into that of 
the social labour process, means only that the higher the pro- 
ductivity of human labour, the shorter the time needed to 
change a given quantity of means of production into finished 
products.^ 

^ 'Apart from natural conditions, such as fertility of the soil, etc., and 
from the skill of independent and isolated producers (shown rather qualita- 
tively in the genus than quantitatively in the mass of their products), the 
degree of productivity of labour, in a capitalist society, is expressed in the 
relative extent of the means of production that one labourer, during a given 
time, with the same tension of labour-power, turns into products. The mass 
of means of production which he thus transforms, increases with the produc- 
tiveness of his labour. But those means of production play a double part. 
The increase of some is a consequence, that of the others a condition of the 
increasing productivity of labour. E.g., with the division of labour in manu- 
facture, and with the use of machinery, more raw material is worked up in 
the same time and, therefore, a greater mass of raw material and auxiliary 
substances enter into the labour-process. That is the consequence of the 
increasing productivity of labour. On the other hand, the mass of machinery, 
beasts of burden, mineral manures, drainpipes, etc., is a condition of the 
increasing productivity of labour. So also is it with the means of production 
concentrated in buildings, furnaces, means of transport, etc. But whether 
condition or consequence, the growing extent of the means of production, as 
compared with the labour-power incorporated with them, is an expression 
of the growing productiveness of labour. The increase of the latter appears, 
therefore, in the diminution of the mass of labour in proportion to the mass 
of means of production moved by it, or in the diminution of the subjective 
factor of the labour-process as compared with the objective factor' {Capital, 
vol. i, pp. 635-6). And yet another passage: 'We have seen previously, that 
with the development of the productivity of labour, and therefore with the 
development of the capitalist mode of production, which develops the 
socially productive power of labour more than all previous modes of produc- 
tion, there is a steady increase of the mass of means of production, which are 
permanently embodied in the productive process as instruments of labour 
and perform their function in it for a longer or shorter time at repeated 
intervals (buildings, machineiy, etc.); also, that this increase is at the same 
time the premise and result of the development of the productivity of social 
labour. It is especially capitalist production, which is characterised by 
relative as well as absolute growth of this sort of wealth' {Capital, vol. i, 
chap, xxiii, 2). 'The material forms of existence of constant capital, the 
means of production, do not consist merely of such instruments of labour, 
but also of raw material in various stages of finished and of auxiliary sub- 
stances. With the enlargement of the scale of production and the increase in 

A.C. 321 L 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

This is a universal law of human labour. It has been valid 
in all pre-capitalist forms of production and will also be valid in 
the future in a socialist order of society. In terms of the material 
use-form of society's aggregate product, this law must manifest 
itself by more and more social labour time being employed in 
the manufacture of producer than of consumer goods. In a 
planned and controlled social economy, organised on socialist 
lines, this transformation would in fact be more rapid even 
than it is in contemporary capitalist economy. In the first 
place, rational scientific techniques can only be applied on the 
largest scale when the barriers of private ownership in land are 
abolished. This will result in an immense revolution in vast 
provinces of production which will ultimately amount to a re- 
placement of living labour by machine labour, and which will 
enable us to tackle technical jobs on a scale quite impossible 
under present day conditions. Secondly, the general use of 
machinery in the productive process will be put on a new 
economic basis. At present the machine does not compete with 
living labour but only with that part of it that is paid. The cost 
of the labour power which is replaced by the machine represents 
the lowest limit of the applicability of the machine. Which 
means that the capitalist becomes interested in a machine only 
when the costs of its production — assuming the same level of 
performance — amount to less than the wages of the workers it 
replaces. From the point of view of the social labour process 
which is the only one to matter in a socialist society, the machine 
competes not with the labour that is necessary to maintain the 
worker but with the labour he actually performs. In other 
words, in a society that is not governed by the profit motive but 
aims at saving human labour, the use of machinery is economic- 
ally indicated just as soon as it can save more human labour 
than is necessary for making it, not to mention the many cases 
where the use of machinery is desirable even if it does not 
answer this economic minimum — for reasons of health and 
similar considerations, in the interest of the workers themselves. 
However that may be, the tension between the respective 
economic usefulness of the machine in {a) a capitalist, and (b) a 

the productivity of labour by co-operation, division of labour, machinery, 
etc., the mass of raw materials and auxiliary substances used in the daily 
process of reproduction, grows likewise' {Capital, vol. ii, p. i6o). 

322 



TUGAN BARANOVSKI 

socialist society is at least equal to the dilTcrence between labour 
and that part of it that is paid; it is, in other words, the precise 
equivalent of the whole capitalist surplus value. Consequently, 
if the capitalist profit motive is abolished and a social organisa- 
tion of labour introduced, the marginal use of the machine will 
suddenly be increased by the whole extent of the capitalist sur- 
plus value, so that an enormous field, not to be gauged as yet, 
will be open to the triumphal march of the machine. This would 
be tangible proof that the capitalist mode of production, alleged 
to spur on to the optimum technical development, in fact sets 
large social limits to technical progress, in form of the profit 
motive on which it is based. It would show that as soon as these 
limits are abolished, technical progress will develop such a 
powerful drive that the technical marvels of capitalist produc- 
tion will be child's play in comparison. 

In terms of the composition of the social product, this tech- 
nical transformation can only mean that, compared to the pro- 
duction of consumer goods, the production of producer goods — 
measured in units of labour time — must increase more rapidly 
in a socialist society than it does even to-day. Thus the relation 
between the two departments of social production which the 
Russian Marxists took to reveal typical capitalist baseness, the 
neglect of man's need to consume, rather proves to be the pre- 
cise manifestation of the progressive subjection of nature to 
social labour, which will become even more striking when pro- 
duction is organised solely with a view to human needs. The 
only objective proof for Tugan Baranovski's 'fundamental law' 
thus collapses as a 'fundamental' confusion. His whole construc- 
tion, including his 'new theory of crises', together with the 'lack 
of proportion', is reduced to its foundations on paper: a slavish 
copy of Marx's diagram of enlarged reproduction. 



323 



CHAPTER XXIV 

THE END OF RUSSIAN 'LEGALIST' 
MARXISM 

THE Russian 'legalist' Marxists, and Tugan Baranovski 
above all, can claim the credit, in their struggle 
against the doubters of capitalist accumulation, of 
having enriched economic theory by an application of Marx's 
analysis of the social reproductive process and its schematic 
representation in the second volume of Capital. But in view of 
the fact that this same Tugan Baranovski quite wrongly re- 
garded said diagram as the solution to the problem instead 
of its formulation, his conclusions were bound to reverse the 
basic order of Marx's doctrine. 

Tugan Baranovski's approach, according to which capitalist 
production can create unlimited markets and is independent of 
consumption, leads him straight on to the thesis of Say-Ricardo, 
i.e. a natural balance between production and consumption, 
between supply and demand. The difference is simply that those 
two only thought in terms of simple commodity circulation, 
whilst Tugan Baranovski applies the same doctrine to the circu- 
lation of capital. His theory of crises being caused by a 'lack of 
proportion' is in effect just a paraphrase of Say's old trite 
absurdity: the over-production of any one commodity only goes 
to show under-production of another; and Tugan Baranovski 
simply translates this nonsense into the terminology used in 
Marx's analysis of the reproductive process. Even though he 
declares that. Say notwithstanding, general over-production is 
quite possible in the light of the circulation of money which the 
former had entirely neglected, yet it is in fact this very same 
neglect, the besetting sin of Say and Ricardo in their dealings 
with the problem of crises which is the condition for his delight- 
ful manipulations with Marx's diagram. As soon as it is applied 
to the circulation of money, 'diagram No. 2' begins to bristle 
with spikes and barbs. Bulgakov was caught in these spikes when 
he attempted to follow up Marx's interrupted analysis to a 

324 



END OF RUSSIAN 'LEGALIST' MARXISM 

logical conclusion. This compound of forms of thought bor- 
rowed from Marx with c(mtents derived from Say and Ricardo 
is what Tugan Baranovski modestly calls his 'attempt at a syn- 
thesis between Marx's theory and classical economies'. 

After almost a century, the theory of optimism which holds, 
in the face of petty-bourgeois doubts, that capitalist production 
is capable of development, returns, by way of Marx's doctrine 
and its 'legalist' champions, to its point of departure, to Say and 
Ricardo. The three 'Marxists' join forces with the bourgeois 
'harmonists' of the Golden Age shortly before the Fall when 
bourgeois economics was expelled from the Garden of Innocence 
— the circle is closed. 

There can be no doubt that the 'legalist' Russian Marxists 
achieved a victory over their opponents, the 'populists', but that 
victory was rather too thorough. In the heat of battle, all three 
— Struve, Bulgakov and Tugan Baranovski — overstated their 
case. The question was whether capitalism in general, and 
Russian capitalism in particular, is capable of development; 
these Marxists, however, proved this capacity to the extent of 
even offering theoretical proof that capitalism can go on for 
ever. Assuming the accumulation of capital to be without limits, 
one has obviously proved the unlimited capacity of capitalism 
to survive! Accumulation is the specifically capitalist method of 
expanding production, of furthering labour productivity, of 
developing the productive forces, of economic progress. If the 
capitalist mode of production can ensure boundless expansion 
of the productive forces, of economic progress, it is invincible 
indeed. The most important objective argument in support of 
socialist theory breaks down; socialist political action and the 
ideological import of the proletarian class struggle cease to 
reflect economic events, and socialism no longer appears an 
historical necessity. Setting out to show that capitalism is 
possible, this trend of reasoning ends up by showing that 
socialism is impossible. 

The three Russian Marxists were fully aware that in the 
course of the dispute they had made an about-turn, though 
Struve, in his enthusiasm for the cultural mission of capitalism, 
does not worry about giving up a useful warrant.^ Bulgakov 

^ Struve says in the preface to the collection of his Russian essays (pub- 
lished in 1901): 'In 1894, when the author published his "Critical Comments 



HISTORICAL EXPOSITION OF THE PROBLEM 

tried to stop the gaps now made in socialist theory with another 
fragment of the same theory as best he could: he hoped that 
capitalist society might yet perish, in spite of the immanent 
balance between production and consumption, because of the 
declining profit rate. But it was he himself who finally cut away 
the ground from under this somewhat precarious comfort. For- 
getting the straw he had offered for the salvation of socialism, 
he turned on Tugan Baranovski with the teaching that, in the 
case of large capitals, the relative decline in the profit rate is 
compensated by the absolute growth of capital.^ More consistent 
than the others, Tugan Baranovski finally with the crude joy 
of a barbarian destroys all objective economic arguments in 
support of socialism, thus building in his own spirit 'a more 
beautiful world' on an ethical foundation. 'The individual pro- 
tests against an economic order which transforms the end (man) 
into a means (production) and the means (production) into an 
end.' 2 

Our three Marxists demonstrated in person that the new 
foundations of socialism had been frail and jerry-built. They 
had hardly laid down the new basis for socialism before they 
turned their backs on it. When the masses of Russia were staking 
their lives in the fight for the ideals of a social order to come, 
which would put the end (man) before the means (production), 
the 'individual' went into retreat, to find philosophical and 
ethical solace with Kant. In actual fact, the 'legalist' bourgeois 
Marxists ended up just where we should expect them to from 
their theoretical position — in the camp of bourgeois harmonies. 

on the Problem of Economic Development in Russia", he inclined in philo- 
sophy towards positivism, in sociology and economics towards outspoken, 
though by no means orthodox, Marxism. Since then, the author no longer 
sees the whole truth in positivism and Marxism which is grounded in it (!), 
they no longer fully determine his view of the world. Malignant dogmatism 
which not only browbeats those who think differently, but spies upon their 
morals and psychology, regards such work as a mere "Epicurean instability 
of mind". It cannot understand that criticism in its own right is to the living 
and thinking individual one of the most valuable rights. The author does not 
intend to renounce this right, though he might constantly be in danger of 
being indicted for "instability" ' {Miscellany, St. Petersburg, 1901). 

^ Bulgakov, op. cit., p. 252. 

^ Tugan Baranovski, Studies on the Theory and History . . ., p. 229. 



326 



SECTION THREE 



THE HISTORICAL 
CONDITIONS OF 
ACCUMULATION 



CHAPTER XXV 

CONTRADICTIONS WITHIN THE 

DIAGRAM OF ENLARGED 

REPRODUCTION 

IN the first section, we ascertained that Marx's diagram of 
accumulation does not solve the question of who is to benefit 
in the end by enlarged reproduction. If we take the diagram 
literally as it is set out at the end of volume ii, it appears that 
capitalist production would itself realise its entire surplus value, 
and that it would use the capitalised surplus value exclusively 
for its own needs. This impression is confirmed by Marx's 
analysis of the diagram where he attempts to reduce the circu- 
lation within the diagram altogether to terms of money, that is 
to say to the effective demand of capitalists and workers — an 
attempt which in the end leads him to introduce the 'producer 
of money' as a deus ex machina. In addition, there is that most 
important passage in Capital, volume i, which must be inter- 
preted to mean the same. 

'The annual production must in the first place furnish all 
those objects (use-values) from which the material components 
of capital, used up in the course of the year, have to be replaced. 
Deducting these there remains the net or surplus-product, in 
which the surplus-value lies. And of what does this surplus- 
value consist? Only of things destined to satisfy the wants and 
desires of the capitalist class, things which, consequently, enter 
into the consumption fund of the capitalists? Were that the 
case, the cup of surplus-value would be drained to the very dregs, 
and nothing but simple reproduction would ever take place. 

'To accumulate it is necessary to convert a portion of the 
surplus-product into capital. But we cannot, except by a miracle, 
convert into capital anything but such articles as can be em- 
ployed in the labour-process (i.e. means of production), and 
such further articles as are suitable for the sustenance of the 

329 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

labourer (i.e. means of subsistence). Consequently, a part of the 
annual surplus-labour must have been applied to the production 
of additional means of production and subsistence, over and 
above the quantity of these things required to replace the capital 
advanced. In one word, surplus-value is convertible into capital 
solely because the surplus-product, whose value it is, already 
comprises the material elements of new capital.'^ 

The following conditions of accumulation are here laid down: 
(i) The surplus value to be capitalised first comes into being in 
the natural form of capital (as additional means of production 
and additional means of subsistence for the workers). (2) The 
expansion of capitalist production is achieved exclusively by 
means of capitalist products, i.e. its own means of production 
and subsistence. (3) The limits of this expansion are each time 
determined in advance by the amount of surplus value which is 
to be capitalised in any given case;, they cannot be extended, 
since they depend on the amount of the means of production 
and subsistence which make up the surplus product; neither can 
they be reduced, since a part of the surplus value could not then 
be employed in its natural form. Deviations in either direction 
(above and below) may give rise to periodical fluctuations and 
crises — in this context, however, these may be ignored, because 
in general the surplus product to be capitalised must be equal 
to actual accumulation. (4) Since capitalist production buys up 
its entire surplus product, there is no limit to the accumulation 
of capital. 

Marx's diagram of enlarged reproduction adheres to these 
conditions. Accumulation here takes its course, but it is not in 
the least indicated who is to benefit by it, who are the new 
consumers for whose sake production is ever more enlarged. 
The diagram assumes, say, the following course of events: the 
coal industry is expanded in order to expand the iron industry 
in order to expand the machine industry in order to expand the 
production of consumer goods. This last, in turn, is expanded 
to maintain both its own workers and the growing army of coal, 
iron and machine operatives. And so on ad infinitum. We are 
running in circles, quite in accordance with the theory of Tugan 
Baranovski. Considered in isolation, Marx's diagram does in- 
deed permit of such an interpretation since he himself explicitly 
1 Capital, vol. i, pp. 593-4. 



ENLARGED REPRODUCTION: CONTRADICTIONS 

states time and again that he aims at presenting the process of 
accumulation of the aggregate capital in a society consisting 
solely of capitalists and workers. Passages to this effect can be 
found in every volume of Capital. 

In volume i, in the very chapter on 'The Conversion of 
Surplus-Value into Capital', he says: • 

'In order to examine the object of our investigation in its 
integrity, free from all disturbing subsidiary circumstances, we 
must treat the whole world as one nation, and assume that 
capitalist production is everywhere established and has possessed 
itself of every branch of industry.'^ 

In volume ii, the assumption repeatedly returns; thus in 
chapter 17 on 'The Circulation of Surplus-Value': 'Now, there 
are only two points of departure: The capitalist and the 
labourer. All third classes of persons must either receive money 
for their services from these two classes, or, to the extent that 
they receive it without any equivalent services, they are joint 
owners of the surplus-value in the form of rent, interest, etc. . . . 
The capitalist class, then, remains the sole point of departure 
of the circulation of money.' ^ 

Further, in the same chapter 'On the Circulation of Money 
in Particular under Assumption of Accumulation': 'But the 
difficulty arises when we assume, not a partial, but a general 
accumulation of money-capital on the part of the capitalist 
class. Apart from this class, there is, according to our assumption 
— the general and exclusive domination of capitalist production 
— no other class but the working class.' ^ 

And again in chapter 20: ' . . . there are only two classes in 
this case, the working class disposing of their labour-power, and 
the capitalist class owning the social means of production and 
the money. '^ 

In volume iii, Marx says quite explicitly, when demonstrating 
the process of capitalist production as a whole: 'Let us suppose 
that the whole society is composed only of industrial capitalists 
and wage workers. Let us furthermore make exceptions of 
fluctuations of prices which prevent large portions of the total 
capital from reproducing themselves under average conditions 
and which, owing to the general interrelations of the entire 

^ Ibid., p. 594, note i. - Op. cit., vol. ii, p. 384. 

3 Ibid., pp. 400-1. * Ibid., p. 488. 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

process of reproduction, such as are developed particularly by 
credit, must always call forth general stoppages of a transient 
nature. Let us also make abstraction of the bogus transactions 
and speculations, which the credit system favours. In that case, 
a crisis could be explained only by a disproportion of production 
in various branches, and by a disproportion of the consumption 
of the capitalists and the accumulation of their capitals. But as 
matters stand, the reproduction of the capitals invested in pro- 
duction depends largely upon the consuming power of the non- 
producing classes; while the consuming power of the labourers 
is handicapped partly by the laws of wages, partly by the fact 
that it can be exerted only so long as the labourers can be 
employed at a profit for the capitalist class. '^ 

This last quotation refers to the question of crises with which 
we are not here concerned. It can leave no doubt, however, 
that the movement of the total capital, 'as matters stand', 
depends in Marx's view on three categories of consumers only: 
the capitalists, the workers and the 'non-productive classes', i.e. 
the hangers-on of the capitalist class (king, parson, professor, 
prostitute, mercenary), of whom he quite rightly disposes in 
volume ii as the mere representatives of a derivative purchasing 
power, and thus the parasitic joint consumers of the surplus 
value or of the wage of labour. 

Finally, in Theories of Surplus Value, ^ Marx formulates his 
general presuppositions with regard to accumulation as follows: 
'Here we have only to consider the forms through which capital 
passes during the various stages of its development. Thus we do 
not set out the actual conditions of the real process of produc- 
tion, but always assume that the commodity is sold for what it is 
worth. We ignore the competition of capitalists and the credit 
system; we also leave out of account the actual constitution of 
society which never consists exclusively of the classes of workers 
and industrial capitalists, and where there is accordingly no 
strict division between producers and consumers. The first cate- 
gory (of consumers, whose revenues are partly of a secondary, 
not a primitive nature, derived from profits and the wage of 
labour) is much wider than the second category (of producers). 

^ Capital, vol. iii, p. 568. 

2 Theorien . . ., vol. ii, part 2, 'The Accumulation of Capital and Crises', 
p. 263. 



ENLARGED REPRODUCTION: CONTRADICTIONS 

Therefore the manner in which it spends its income, and the 
extent of such income, effects very large modifications in the 
economic household, and especially so in the process of circu- 
lation and reproduction of capital.' 

Speaking of the 'actual constitution of society', Marx here 
also considers merely the parasitic joint consumers of surplus 
value and of the wage of labour, i.e. only the hangers-on of the 
principal categories of capitalist production. 

There can be no doubt, therefore, that Marx wanted to 
demonstrate the process of accumulation in a society consisting 
exclusively of workers and capitalists, under the universal and 
exclusive domination of the capitalist mode of production. On 
this assumption, however, his diagram does not permit of any 
other interpretation than that of production for production's 
sake. 

Let us recall the second example of Marx's diagram of 
enlarged reproduction: 

ist year: 

I, 5,oooc4-i,oooy+ij00o^=7,ooo means of production 
II. i,430c+ 285^+ 285^=2,000 means of subsistence 



9,000 



2nd year: 

I. 5,417^4-15083^+1,0835^=7,583 means of production 
II. 1,583^+ 3i6z;-f- 316^=2,215 means of subsistence 



9.798 



3rd year: 

I. 5,869^+1,173^+1,1735=8,215 means of production 
II. i,7i5c+ 342y+ 3425=2,399 means of subsistence 



10,614 



4th year: 

I. 6,358^+ 1, 271^'+ 1,2715=8,900 means of production 
II. 1,858^+ 3712:'+ 3715=2,600 means of subsistence 



11,500 



Here accumulation continues year after year without inter- 
ruption, the capitalists in each case consuming half of the 

333 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

surplus value they have gained and capitalising the other half. 
In the process of capitalisation, the same technical foundation, 
that is to say the same organic composition or division into con- 
stant and variable capital and also the same rate of exploitation 
(always amounting to loo per cent) is consecutively maintained 
for the additional capital as it was for the original capital. In 
accordance with Marx's assumption in volume i of Capital, the 
capitalised part of the surplus value first comes into being as 
additional means of production and as means of subsistence for 
the workers, both serving the purpose of an ever expanding 
production in the two departments. It cannot be discovered 
from the assumptions of Marx's diagram for whose sake produc- 
tion is progressively expanded. Admittedly, production and con- 
sumption increase simultaneously in a society. The consumption 
of the capitalists increases (in terms of value, in the first year it 
amounts to 500 + 142, in the second year. to 542 + 158, in the 
third year to 586 + 171, and in the fourth year to 635 + 185); 
the consumption of the workers increases as well; the variable 
capital increasing year after year in both departments precisely 
indicates this growth in terms of value. And yet, the growing 
consumption of the capitalists can certainly not be regarded as 
the ultimate purpose of accumulation; on the contrary, there 
is no accumulation inasmuch as this consumption takes place 
and increases; personal consumption of the capitalists must be 
regarded as simple reproduction. Rather, the question is: if, 
and in so far as, the capitalists do not themselves consume their 
products but 'practise abstinence', i.e. accumulate, for whose 
sake do they produce? Even less can the maintenance of an ever 
larger army of workers be the ultimate purpose of continuous 
accumulation of capital. From the capitalist's point of view, the 
consumption of the workers is a consequence of accumulation, 
it is never its object or its condition, unless the principles 
(foundations) of capitalist production are to be turned upside 
down. And in any case, the workers can only consume that part 
of the product which corresponds to the variable capital, not a 
jot more. Who, then, realises the permanently increasing surplus 
value? The diagram answers: the capitalists themselves and they 
alone. — And what do they do with this increasing surplus value? 
— The diagram replies: They use it for an ever greater expan- 
sion of their production. These capitalists are thus fanatical 

334 



ENLARGED REPRODUCTION: CONTRADICTIONS 

supporters of an expansion of production for production's sake. 
They see to it that ever more machines are built for the sake of 
building — with their help — ever more new machines. Yet the 
upshot of all this is not accumulation of capital but an increasing 
production of producer goods to no purpose whatever. Indeed, 
one must be as reckless as Tugan Baranovski, and rejoice as 
much in paradoxical statements, to assume that this untiring 
merry-go-round in thin air could be a faithful reflection in 
theory of capitalist reality, a true deduction from Marx's 
doctrine.^ 

Besides the analysis of enlarged reproduction roughed out in 
Capital, volume ii, the whole of Marx's work, volume ii in parti- 
cular, contains a most elaborate and lucid exposition of his 
general views regarding the typical course of capitalist accumu- 
lation. If we once fully understand this interpretation, the 
deficiencies of the diagram at the end of volume ii are imme- 
diately evident. 

If we examine critically the diagram of enlarged reproduction 
in the light of Marx's theory, we find various contradictions 
between the two. 

To begin with, the diagram completely disregards the in- 
creasing productivity of labour. For it assumes that the com- 
position of capital is the same in every year, that is to say, the 
technical basis of the productive process is not affected by 
accumulation. This procedure would be quite permissible in 
itself in order to simplify the analysis, but when we come to 
examine the concrete conditions for the realisation of the aggre- 
gate product, and for reproduction, then at least we must take 
into account, and make allowance for, changes in technique 
which are bound up with the process of capital accumulation. 
Yet if we allow for improved productivity of labour, the material 
aggregate of the social product— both producer and consumer 
goods — will in consequence show a much more rapid increase 
in volume than is set forth in the diagram. This increase in the 
aggregate of use-values, moreover, indicates also a change in 
the value relationships. As Marx argues so convincingly, basing 
his whole theory on this axiom, the progressive development of 

^ 'It is never the original thinkers who draw the absurd conclusions. 
They leave that to the Says and MacCuUochs' [Capital, vol. ii, p. 451). — 
And — we might add — to the Tugan Baranovskis. 

335 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

labour productivity reacts on both the composition of accumu- 
lating capital and the rate of surplus value so that they cannot 
remain constant under conditions of increasing accumulation 
of capital, as was assumed by the diagram. Rather, if accumu- 
lation continues, c, the constant capital of both departments, 
must increase not only absolutely but also relatively to v -\-c or 
the total new value (the social aspect of labour productivity) ; 
at the same time, constant capital and similarly the surplus 
value must increase relatively to the variable capital — in short, 
the rate of surplus value, i.e. the ratio between surplus value 
and variable capital, must similarly increase (the capitalist 
aspect of labour productivity). These changes need not, of 
course, occur annually, just as the terms of first, second and third 
year in Marx's diagram do not necessarily refer to calendar 
years but may stand for any given period. Finally, we may 
choose to assume that these alterations, both in the composition 
of capital and in the rate of surplus value, take place either in 
the first, third, fifth, seventh year, etc., or in the second, sixth 
and ninth year, etc. The important thing is only that they are 
allowed for somewhere and taken into account as periodical 
phenomena. If the diagram is amended accordingly, the result 
of this method of accumulation will be an increasing annual 
surplus in the consumer at the expense of producer goods. It is 
true that Tugan Baranovski conquers all difficulties on paper: 
he simply constructs a diagram with different proportions where 
year by year the variable capital decreases by 25 per cent. And 
since this arithmetical exercise is successful enough on paper, 
Tugan triumphantly claims to have 'proved' that accumulation 
runs smoothly like clockwork, even if the absolute volume of 
consumption decreases. Even he must admit in the end, how- 
ever, that his assumption of such an absolute decrease of the 
variable capital is in striking contrast to reality. Variable capital 
is in point of fact a growing quantity in all capitalist countries; 
only in relation to the even more rapid growth of constant 
capital can it be said to decrease. On the basis of what is actually 
happening, namely a greater yearly increase of constant capital 
as against that of variable capital, as well as a growing rate of 
surplus value, discrepancies must arise between the material 
composition of the social product and the composition of capital 
in terms of value. If, instead of the unchanging proportion of 

336 



ENLARGED REPRODUCTION: CONTRADICTIONS 

5 to I between constant and variable capital, proposed by 
Marx's diagram, we assume for instance that this increase of 
capital is accompanied by a progressive readjustment of its com- 
position, the proportion between constant and variable in the 
second year being 6 to i, in the third year 7 to i, and in the 
fourth year 8 to i — if we further assume that the rate of surplus 
value also increases progressively in accordance with the higher 
productivity of labour so that, in each case, we have the same 
amounts as those of the diagram, although, because of the re- 
latively decreasing variable capital, the rate of surplus value does 
not remain constant at the original 100 per cent — and if finally 
we assume that one-half of the appropriated surplus value is 
capitalised in each case (excepting Department II where capital- 
isation exceeds 50 per cent, 184 out of 285 being capitalised 
during the first year), the result will be as follows: 

ist year: 

I. 5,oooc-f I, oooy-)- 1,000^=7,000 means of production 
II. 1,430^4- 285^+ 285^ = 2,000 means of subsistence 

2nd year: 

I. 5,428|c4-i,o7if y+i5o83J'=7,583 means of production 
II. 1,587!^+ 311?^+ 316^ = 2,215 means of subsistence 

3rd year: 

I. 5,903c-|-i,i39y+i>i73-^=8,2i5 means of production 

II. 1,726^+ 331^+ 342^=2,399 means of subsistence 

4th year: 

I. 6,424<:+ 1, 205^4-1527 iJ'=8,900 means of production 
II. i,8'jgc-{- 350^+ 37 ii'= 2,600 means of subsistence 

If this were a true picture of the accumulative process, the 
means of production (constant capital) would show a deficit of 
16 in the second year, of 45 in the third year and of 88 in the 
fourth year; similarly, the means of subsistence would show a 
surplus of 16 in the second year, of 45 in the third year and of 
88 in the fourth year. 

This negative balance for the means of production may be 
only imaginary in part. The increasing productivity of labour 
ensures that the means of production grow faster in bulk than 
in value, in other words: means of production become cheaper. * 
As it is use value, i.e. the material elements of capital, which is 
relevant for technical improvements of production, we may 

337 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

assume that the quantity of means of production, in spite of 
their lower value, will suffice for progressive accumulation up 
to a certain point. This phenomenon amongst others also checks 
the actual decline of the rate of profit and modifies it to a mere 
tendency, though our example shows that the decline of the 
profit rate would not only be retarded but rather completely 
arrested. On the other hand, the same fact indicates a much 
larger surplus of unsaleable means of subsistence than is sug- 
gested by the amount of this surplus in terms of value. In that 
case, we should have to compel the capitalists of Department II 
to consume this surplus themselves, which Marx makes them 
do on other occasions; in which case, and in so far as those 
capitalists are concerned, there would again be no accumulation 
but rather simple reproduction. Alternatively, we should have 
to pronounce this whole surplus unsaleable. 

Yet would it not be very easy to make good this loss in means 
of production which results from our example? We need only 
assume that the capitalists of Department I capitalise their 
surplus value to a greater extent. Indeed, there is no valid 
reason to suppose, as Marx did, that the capitalists in each case 
add only half their surplus value to their capital. Advances in 
labour productivity may well lead to progressively increasing 
capitalisation of surplus value. This assumption is the more per- 
missible in that the cheapening of consumer goods for the capit- 
alist class, too, is one of the consequences of technological 
progress. The relative decrease in the value of consumable 
income (as compared with the capitalised part) may then per- 
mit of the same or even a higher standard of living for this class. 
We might for instance make good the deficit in producer goods 
by transferring a corresponding part of surplus value I to the 
constant capital of this department, a part which would other- 
wise be consumed, since this surplus value, like all other pro- 
ducts of the department, originally takes the form of producer 
goods; I ly would then be transferred in the second year, 34 in 
the third year and 66 in the fourth year.^ The solution of one 
difficulty, however, only adds to another. It goes without saying 
that if the capitalists of Department I relatively restrict their 

^ The figures result fi-om the difference between the amounts of constant 
capital in Department I under conditions of technical progress, and under 
Marx's stable conditions. 



ENLARGED REPRODUCTION: CONTRADICTIONS 

consumption for purposes of accumulation, there will be a pro- 
portionately greater unsaleable residue of consumer goods in 
Department II; and thus it becomes more and more impossible 
to enlarge the constant capital even on its previous technological 
basis. If the capitalists in Department I relatively restrict their 
consumption, the capitalists of Department II must relatively 
expand their personal consumption in proportion. The assump- 
tion of accelerated accumulation in Department I would then 
have to be supplemented by that of retarded accumulation in 
Department II, technical progress in one department by regres- 
sion in the other. 

These results are not due to mere chance. The adjustments we 
have tried out on Marx's diagram are merely meant to illustrate 
that technical progress, as he himself admits, must be accom- 
panied by a relative growth of constant as against variable 
capital. Hence the necessity for a continuous revision of the ratio 
in which capitalised surplus value should be allotted to c and v 
respectively. In Marx's diagram, however, the capitalists are in 
no position to make these allocations at will, since the material 
form of their surplus value predetermines the forms of capitalisa- 
tion. Since, according to Marx's assumption, all expansion of 
production proceeds exclusively by means of its own, capitalisti- 
cally produced means of production and subsistence, — since 
there are here no other places and forms of production and 
equally no other consumers than the two departments with 
their capitalists and workers, — and since, on the other hand, the 
smooth working of the accumulative process depends on that 
circulation should wholly absorb the aggregate product of both 
departments, the technological shape of enlarged reproduction 
is in consequence strictly prescribed by the material form of the 
surplus product. In other words: according to Marx's diagram, 
the technical organisation of expanded production can and must 
be such as to make use of the aggregate surplus value produced 
in Departments I and II. In this connection we must bear in 
mind also that both departments can obtain their respective 
elements of production only by means of mutual exchange. 
Thus the allocation to constant or variable capital of the surplus 
value earmarked for capitalisation, as well as the allotment of 
the additional means of production and subsistence (for the 
workers) to Departments I and II is given in advance and 

339 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

determined by the relations betweenthe two departments of 
the diagram — both in material and in terms of value. These 
relations themselves, however, reflect a quite determinate 
technical organisation of production. This implies that, on the 
assumptions of Marx's diagram, the techniques of production 
given in each case predetermine the techniques of the sub- 
sequent periods of enlarged reproduction, if accumulation con- 
tinues. Assuming, that is to say, in accordance with Marx's 
diagram, that the expansion of capitalist production is always 
performed by means of the surplus value originally produced 
in form of capital, and further — or rather, conversely — that 
accumulation in one department is strictly dependent on accu- 
mulation in the other, then no change in the technical organisa- 
tion of production can be possible in so far as the relation of c to 
V is concerned. 

We may put our point in yet another way: it is clear that a 
quicker growth of constant as compared with variable capital, 
i.e. the progressive metamorphosis of the organic composition of 
capital, must take the material form of faster expansion of pro- 
duction in Department I as against production in Depart- 
ment II. Yet Marx's diagram, where strict conformity of the 
two departments is axiomatic, precludes any such fluctuations 
in the rate of accumulation in either department. It is quite 
legitimate to suppose that under the technical conditions of 
progressive accumulation, society would invest ever increasing 
portions of the surplus value earmarked for accumulation in 
Department I rather than in Department II. Both departments 
being only branches of the same social production — supple- 
mentary enterprises, if you like, of the 'aggregate capitalist', — 
such a progressive transfer, for technical reasons, from one 
department to the other of a part of the accumulated surplus 
value would be wholly feasible, especially as it corresponds to 
the actual practice of capital. Yet this assumption is possible 
only so long as we envisage the surplus value earmarked for 
capitalisation purely in terms of value. The diagram, how- 
ever, implies that this part of the surplus value appears in a 
definite material form which prescribes its capitalisation. Thus 
the surplus value of Department II exists as means of subsist- 
ence, and since it is as such to be only realised by Department I, 
this intended transfer of part of the capitalised surplus value 

340 



t 



ENLARGED REPRODUCTION: CONTRADICTIONS 

from Department II to Department I is ruled out, first because 
the material form of this surplus value is obviously useless to 
Department I, and secondly because of the relations of exchange 
between the two departments which would in turn necessitate 
an equivalent transfer of the products of Department I into 
Department II. It is therefore downright impossible to achieve 
a faster expansion of Department I as against Department II 
within the limits of Marx's diagram. 

However we may regard the technological alterations of the 
mode of production in the course of accumulation, they cannot 
be accomplished without upsetting the fundamental relations of 
Marx's diagram. 

And further: according to Marx's diagram, the capitalised 
surplus value is in each case immediately and completely 
absorbed by the productive process of the following period, for, 
apart from the portion earmarked for consumption, it has a 
natural form which allows of only one particular kind of em- 
ployment. The diagram precludes the cashing and hoarding of 
surplus value in monetary form, as capital waiting to be in- 
vested. The free monetary forms of private capital, in Marx's 
view, are first the money deposited gradually against the wear 
and tear of the fixed capital, for its eventual renewal; and 
secondly those amounts of money which represent realised 
surplus value but are still too small for investment. From the 
point of view of the aggregate capital, both these sources of free 
money capital are negligible. For if we assume that even a 
portion of the social surplus value is realised in monetary form 
for purposes of future investment, then at once the question 
arises: who has bought the material items of this surplus value, 
and who has provided the money? If the answer is: other capit- 
alists, of course,— then, seeing that the capitalist class is repre- 
sented in the diagram by the two departments, this portion of 
the surplus value must also be regarded as invested de facto, as 
employed in the productive process. And so we are back at 
immediate and complete investment of the surplus value. 

Or does the freezing of one part of the surplus value in mone- 
tary form in the hands of certain capitalists mean that other 
capitalists will be left with a corresponding part of that surplus 
product in its material form? does the hoarding of realised 
surplus value by some imply that others are no longer able to 

341 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

realise their surplus value, since the capitalists are the only 
buyers of surplus value? This would mean, however, that the 
smooth course of reproduction and similarly of accumulation 
as described in the diagram would be interrupted. The result 
would be a crisis, due not to over-production but to a 
mere intention to accumulate, the kind of crisis envisaged by 
Sismondi. 

In one passage of his Theories, ^ Marx explains in so many 
words that he 'is not at all concerned in this connection with an 
accumulation of capital greater than can be used in the produc- 
tive process and might lie idle in the banks in monetary form, 
with the consequence of lending abroad'. Marx refers these 
phenomena to the section on competition. Yet it is important to 
establish that his diagram veritably precludes the formation of 
such additional capital. Competition, however wide we may 
make the concept, obviously cannot create values, nor can it 
create capitals which are not themselves the result of the repro- 
ductive process. 

The diagram thus precludes the expansion of production by 
leaps and bounds. It only allows of a gradual expansion which 
keeps strictly in step with the formation of the surplus value and 
is based upon the identity between realisation and capitalisa- 
tion of the surplus value. 

For the same reason, the diagram presumes an accumula- 
tion which affects both departments equally and therefore all 
branches of capitalist production. It precludes expansion of the 
demand by leaps and bounds just as much as it prevents a one- 
sided or precocious development of individual branches of 
capitalist production. 

Thus the diagram assumes a movement of the aggregate 
capital which flies in the face of the actual course of capitalist 
development. At first sight, two facts are typical for the history 
of the capitalist mode of production: on the one hand the 
periodical expansion of the whole field of production by leaps 
and bounds, and on the other an extremely unequal develop- 
ment of the different branches of production. The history of the 
English cotton industry from the first quarter of the eighteenth 
to the seventies of the nineteenth century, the most characteristic 
chapter in the history of the capitalist mode of production, 
^ Theorien über den Mehrwert, vol. ii, part 2, p. 252. 



ENLARGED REPRODUCTION: CONTRADICTIONS 

appears quite inexplicable from the point of" view of" Marx's 
diagram. 

Finally, the diagram contradicts the conception of the capit- 
alist total process and its course as laid down by Marx in 
Capital, volume iii. This conception is based on the inherent 
contradiction between the unlimited expansive capacity of the 
productive forces and the limited expansive capacity of social 
consumption under conditions of capitalist distribution. Let us 
see how Marx describes this contradiction in detail in chapter 15 
on 'Unravelling the Internal Contradictions of the Law' (of the 
declining profit rate) : 

'The creation of surplus- value, assuming the necessary means 
of production, or sufficient accumulation of capital, to be exist- 
ing, fiinds no other limit but the labouring population, when the 
rate of surplus-value, that is, the intensity of exploitation, is 
given; and no other limit but the intensity of exploitation, when 
the labouring population is given. And the capitalist process of 
production consists essentially of the production of surplus-value, 
materialised in the surplus-product, which is that aliquot portion 
of the produced commodities, in which unpaid labour is materi- 
alised. It must never be forgotten, that the production of this 
surplus-value — and the re-conversion of a portion of it into 
capital, or accumulation, forms an indispensable part of this 
production of surplus-value — is the immediate purpose and the 
compelling motive of capitalist production. It will not do to 
represent capitalist production as something which it is not, that 
is to say, as a production having for its immediate purpose the 
consumption of goods, or the production of means of enjoyment 
for the capitalists. (And, of course, even less for the worker. 
R. L.) This would be overlooking the specific character of 
capitalist production, which reveals itself in its innermost 
essence. The creation of this surplus- value is the object of the 
direct process of production, and this process has no other limits 
than those mentioned above. As soon as the available quantity 
of surplus-value has been materialised in commodities, surplus- 
value has been produced. But this production of surplus- value 
is but the first act of the capitalist process of production, it 
merely terminates the act of direct production. Capital has 
absorbed so much unpaid labour. With the development of the 
process, which expresses itself through a falling tendency of the 

343 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

rate of profit, the mass of surplus-value thus produced is swelled 
to immense dimensions. Now comes the second act of the 
process. The entire mass of commodities, the total product, 
which contains a portion which is to reproduce the constant and 
variable capital as well as a portion representing surplus-value, 
must be sold. If this is not done, or only partly accomplished, or 
only at prices which are below the prices of production, the 
labourer has been none the less exploited, but his exploitation 
does not realise as much for the capitalist. It may yield no 
surplus-value at all for him, or only realise a portion of the pro- 
duced surplus-value, or it may even mean a partial or complete 
loss of his capital. The conditions of direct exploitation and 
those of the realisation of surplus-value are not identical. They 
are separated logically as well as by time and space. The first 
are only limited by the productive power of society, the last by 
the proportional relations of the various lines of production and 
by the consuming power of society. This last-named power is not 
determined either by the absolute productive power or by the 
absolute consuming power, but by the consuming power based 
on antagonistic conditions of distribution, which reduces the 
consumption of the great mass of the population to a variable 
minimum within more or less narrow limits. The consuming 
power is furthermore restricted by the tendency to accumulate, 
the greed for an expansion of capital and a production of surplus- 
value on an enlarged scale. This is a law of capitalist production 
imposed by incessant revolutions in the methods of production 
themselves, the resulting depreciation of existing capital, the 
general competitive struggle and the necessity of improving the 
product and expanding the scale of production, for the sake of 
self-preservation and on penalty of failure. The market must, 
therefore, be continually extended, so that its interrelations and 
the conditions regulating them assume more and more the form 
of a natural law independent of the producers and become ever 
more uncontrollable. This eternal contradiction seeks to balance 
itself by an expansion of the outlying fields of production. But 
to the extent that the productive power develops, it finds itself 
at variance with the narrow basis on which the conditions of 
consumption rest. On this self-contradictory basis it is no contra- 
diction at all that there should be an excess of capital simultane- 
ously with an excess of population. For while a combination of 

344 



ENLARGED REPRODUCTION: CONTRADICTIONS 

these two would indeed increase the mass of the produced 
surplus-value, it would at the same time intensify the contradic- 
tion between the conditions under which this surplus-value is 
produced and those under which it is realised.'^ 

If we compare this description with the diagram of enlarged 
reproduction, the two are by no means in conformity. Accord- 
ing to the diagram, there is no inherent contradiction between 
the production of the surplus value and its realisation, rather, 
the two arc identical. The surplus value here from the very 
beginning comes into being in a natural form exclusively 
designed for the requirements of accumulation. In fact it leaves 
the place of production in the very form of additional capital, 
that is to say it is capable of realisation in the capitalist process 
of accumulation. The capitalists, as a class, see to it in advance 
that the surplus value they appropriate is produced entirely in 
that material form which will permit and ensure its employment 
for purposes of further accumulation. Realisation and accumu- 
lation of the surplus value here are both aspects of the same 
process, they are logically identical. Therefore according to the 
presentation of the reproductive process in the diagram, society's 
capacity to consume does not put a limit to production. Here 
production automatically expands year by year, although the 
capacity of society for consumption has not gone beyond its 
'antagonistic conditions of distribution'. This automatic con- 
tinuation of expansion, of accumulation, truly is the 'law of 
capitalist production ... on penalty of failure'. Yet according 
to the analysis in volume iii, 'the market must, therefore, be 
continually extended', 'the market' obviously transcending the 
consumption of capitalists and workers. And if Tugan Baranov- 
ski interprets the following passage 'this eternal contradiction 
seeks to balance itself by an expansion of the outlying fields of 
production' as if Marx had meant production itself by 'outlying 
fields of production', he violates not only the spirit of the 
language but also Marx's clear train of thought. The 'outlying 
fields of production' are clearly and unequivocally not produc- 
tion itself but consumption which 'must be continually ex- 
tended'. The following passage in Theorien über den Mehrwert, 
amongst others, sufficiently shows that Marx had this in mind 
and nothing else: 'Ricardo therefore consistently denies the 
^ Capital, vol. iii, p. 285 ff. 

345 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

necessity for an expansion of the market to accompany the expan- 
sion of production and the growth of capital. The entire capital 
existing within a country can also be profitably used in that 
country. He therefore argues against Adam Smith who had set 
up his (Ricardo's) opinion on the one hand but also contradicted 
it with his usual sure instinct.'^ 

In yet another passage, Marx clearly shows that Tugan 
Baranovski's notion of production for production's sake is wholly 
alien to him: 'Besides, we have seen in volume ii part iii that 
a continuous circulation takes place between constant capital 
and constant capital (even without considering any accelerated 
accumulation), which is in so far independent of individual 
consumption, as it never enters into such consumption, but 
which is nevertheless definitely limited by it, because the pro- 
duction of constant capital never takes place for its own sake, 
but solely because more of this capital is needed in those 
spheres of production whose products pass into individual 
consumption. '2 

Admittedly, in the diagram in volume ii, Tugan Baranovski's 
sole support, market and production coincide — they are one 
and the same. Expansion of the market here means extended 
production, since production is said to be its own exclusive 
market — the consumption of the workers being an element of 
production, i.e. the reproduction of variable capital. Therefore 
the limit for both the expansion of production and the extension 
of the market is one and the same: it is given by the volume of 
the social capital, or the stage of accumulation already attained. 
The greater the quantity of surplus value that has been ex- 
tracted in the natural form of capital, the more can be accumu- 
lated; and the greater the volume of accumulation, the more 
surplus value can be invested in its material form of capital, i.e. 
the more can be realised. Thus the diagram does not admit the 
contradiction outlined in the analysis of volume iii. In the 
process described by the diagram there is no need for a continual 
extension of the market beyond the consumption of capitalists 
and workers, nor is the limited social capacity for consumption 
an obstacle to the smooth course of production and its unlimited 
capacity for expansion. The diagram does indeed permit of 
crises but only because of a lack of proportion within produc- 

^ Theorien . . ., vol. ii, part 2, p. 305. ^ Capital, vol. iii, p. 359. 



ENLARGED REPRODUCTION: CONTRADICTIONS 

tion, because of a defective social control over the productive 
process. It precludes, however, the deep and fundamental 
antagonism between the capacity to consume and the capacity to 
produce in a capitalist society, a conflict resulting from the very 
accumulation of capital which periodically bursts out in crises 
and spurs capital on to a continual extension of the market. 



347 



CHAPTER XXVI 

THE REPRODUCTION OF CAPITAL 
AND ITS SOCIAL SETTING 

Marx's diagram of enlarged reproduction cannot ex- 
plain the actual and historical process of accumulation. 
And why? Because of the very premises of the diagram. 
The diagram sets out to describe the accumulative process on 
the assumption that the capitalists and workers are the sole 
agents of capitalist consumption. We have seen that Marx con- 
sistently and deliberately assumes the universal and exclusive 
domination of the capitalist mode of production as a theoreticaT 
premise of his analysis in all three volumes of Capital. Under 
these conditions, there can admittedly be no other classes of 
society than capitalists and workers; as the diagram has it, all 
'third persons' of capitalist society — civil servants, the liberal 
professions, the clergy, etc. — must, as consumers, be counted in 
with these two classes, and preferably with the capitalist class. 
This axiom, however, is a theoretical contrivance — real life has 
never known a self-sufficient capitalist society under the ex- 
clusive domination of the capitalist mode of production. This 
theoretical device is perfectly admissible so long as it merely 
helps to demonstrate the problem in its integrity and does not 
interfere with its very conditions. A case in point is the analysis 
of simple reproduction of the aggregate social capital, where the 
problem itself rests upon a fiction: in a society producing by 
capitalist methods, i.e. a society which creates surplus value, the 
whole of the latter is taken to be consumed by the capitalists 
who appropriate it. The object is to present the forms of social 
production and reproduction under these given conditions. Here 
the very formulation of the problem implies that production 
knows no other consumers than capitalists and workers and thus 
strictly conforms to Marx's premise: universal and exclusive 
domination of the capitalist mode of production. The implica- 
tions of both fictions are the same. Similarly, it is quite legitimate 

348 



REPRODUCTION AND ITS SOCIAL SETTING 

to postulate absolute dominance of capital in an analysis of the 
accumulation of individual capitals, such as is given in Capital, 
volume i. The reproduction of individual capitals is an element 
in total social reproduction but one which follows an independ- 
ent course, contrary to the movements of the other elements. 
In consequence it will not do simply to take together the indivi- 
dual movements of the respective capitals in order to arrive at 
the total movement of social capital, since the latter is essentially 
different. The natural conditions of reproducing individual 
capitals therefore neither conform with one another, nor do they 
conform to the relations of the total capital. Under normal 
conditions of circulation, every individual capital engages in 
the process of circulation and of accumulation entirely on its 
own account, depending upon others only in so far, of course, 
as it is compelled to find a market for its product and must 
find available the means of production it requires for its specific 
activities. Whether the strata who afford this market and pro- 
vide the necessary means of production are themselves capitalist 
producers or not is completely immaterial for the individual 
capital, although, in theory, the most favourable premise for 
analysing the accumulation of individual capital is the assump- 
tion that capitalist production has attained universal and ex- 
clusive domination and is the sole setting of this process.^ 

Now, however, the question arises whether the assumptions 
which were decisive in the case of individual capital, are also 
legitimate for the consideration of aggregate capital, 

'We must now put the problem in this form: given universal 
accumulation, that is to say provided that in all branches of pro- 
duction there is greater or less accumulation of capital — which 
in fact is a condition of capitalist production, and which is just 
as natural to the capitalist qua capitalist as it is natural to the 
miser to amass money (but which is also necessary for the per- 
petuation of capitalist production) — what are the conditions of 
this universal accumulation, to what elements can it be reduced?' 

^ 'If capital and the productivity of labour advance and the standard of 
capitalist production in general is on a higher level of development, then 
there is a correspondingly greater mass of commodities passing through the 
market from production to individual and industrial consumption, greater 
certainty that each particular capital will find the conditions for its repro- 
duction available in the market' {Theorien . . ., vol. ii, part 2, p. 251). 

349 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

And the answer: 'The conditions for the accumulation of capital are 
precisely those which rule its original production and reproduction in 
general: these conditions being that one part of the money buys 
labour and the other commodities (raw materials, machinery, 
etc.) . . . Accumulation of new capital can only proceed there- 
fore under the same conditions under which already existing 
capital is reproduced. '^ 

In real life the actual conditions for the accumulation of the 
aggregate capital are quite different from those prevailing for 
individual capitals and for simple reproduction. The problem 
amounts to this: If an increasing part of the surplus value is not 
consumed by the capitalists but employed in the expansion of 
production, what, then, are the forms of social reproduction? 
What is left of the social product after deductions for the re- 
placement of the constant capital cannot, ex hypothesi, be absorbed 
by the consumption of the workers and capitalists — this being 
the main aspect of the problem — nor can the workers and 
capitalists themselves realise the aggregate product. They can 
always only realise the variable capital, that part of the constant 
capital which will be used up, and the part of the surplus value 
which will be consumed, but in this way they merely ensure that 
production can be renewed on its previous scale. The workers 
and capitalists themselves cannot possibly realise that part of 
the surplus value which is to be capitalised. Therefore, the 
realisation of the surplus value for the purposes of accumulation 
is an impossible task for a society which consists solely of workers 
and capitalists. Strangely enough, all theorists who analysed 
the problem of accumulation, from Ricardo and Sismondi to 
Marx, started with the very assumption which makes their 
problem insoluble. A sure instinct that realisation of the surplus 
value requires 'third persons', that is to say consumers other 
than the immediate agents of capitalist production (i.e. workers 
and capitalists) led to all kinds of subterfuges: 'unproductive 
consumption' as presented by Malthus in the person of the 
feudal landowner, by Vorontsov in militarism, by Struve in the 
'liberal professions' and other hangers-on of the capitalist class; 
or else foreign trade is brought into play which proved a useful 
safety valve to all those who regarded accumulation with 

^ Theorien . . ., vol. ii, part 2, p. 250: Akkumulation von Kapital und Krisen. 
(The Accumulation of Capital and the Crises.) Marx's italics. 



REPRODUCTION AND ITS SOCIAL SETTING 

scepticism, from Sismondi to Nicolayon. Because of these in- 
soluble difliculties, others like v. Kirchmann and Rodbcrtus 
tried to do without accumulation altogether, or, like Sismondi 
and his Russian 'populist' followers, stressed the need for 
at least putting the dampers on accumulation as much as 
possible. 

The salient feature of the problem of accumulation, and the 
vulnerable point of earlier attempts to solve it, has only been 
shown up by Marx's more profound analysis, his precise dia- 
grammatic demonstration of the total reproductive process, and 
especially his inspired exposition of the problem of simple repro- 
duction. Yet he could not supply immediately a finished solution 
either, partly because he broke off his analysis almost as soon as 
he had begun it, and partly because he was then preoccupied, 
as we have shown, with denouncing the analysis of Adam Smith 
and thus rather lost sight of the main problem. In fact, he made 
the solution even more difficult by assuming the capitalist mode 
of production to prevail universally. Nevertheless, a solution of 
the problem of accumulation, in harmony both with other parts 
of Marx's doctrine and with the historical experience and daily 
practice of capitalism, is implied in Marx's complete analysis of 
simple reproduction and his characterisation of the capitalist 
process as a whole which shows up its immanent contradictions 
and their development (in Capital, vol. iii). In the light of this, 
the deficiencies of the diagram can be corrected. All the re- 
lations being, as it were, incomplete, a closer study of the 
diagram of enlarged reproduction will reveal that it points to 
some sort of organisation more advanced than purely capitalist 
production and accumulation. 

Up to now we have only considered one aspect of enlarged 
reproduction, the problem of realising the surplus value, whose 
difficulties hitherto had claimed the sceptics' whole attention. 
Realisation of the surplus value is doubtless a vital question of 
capitalist accumulation. It requires as its prime condition — 
ignoring, for simplicity's sake, the capitalists' fund of consump- 
tion altogether — that there should be strata of buyers outside 
capitalist society. Buyers, it should be noted, not consumers, 
since the material form of the surplus value is quite irrelevant to 
its realisation. The decisive fact is that the surplus value cannot 
be realised by sale either to workers or to capitalists, but only 

351 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

if it is sold to such social organisations or strata whose own 
mode of production is not capitalistic. Here we can conceive 
of two different cases: 

(i) Capitalist production supplies consumer goods over and 
above its own requirements, the demand of its workers- and 
capitalists, which are bought by non-capitalist strata and 
countries. The English cotton industry, for instance, during the 
first two-thirds of the nineteenth century, and to some extent 
even now, has been supplying cotton textiles to the peasants 
and petty-bourgeois townspeople of the European continent, 
and to the peasants of India, America, Africa and so on. The 
enormous expansion of the English cotton industry was thus 
founded on consumption by non-capitalist strata and countries.^ 
In England herself, this flourishing cotton industry called forth 
large-scale development in the production of industrial mach- 
inery (bobbins and weaving-looms), and further in the metal 
and coal industries and so on. In this instance, Department II 
realised its products to an increasing extent by sale to non- 
capitalist social strata, and by its own accumulation it created 
on its part an increasing demand for the home produce of 
Department I, thus helping the latter to realise its surplus value 
and to increase its own accumulation. 

(2) Conversely, capitalist production supplies means of pro- 
duction in excess of its own demand and finds buyers in non- 
capitalist countries. English industry, for instance, in the first 
half of the nineteenth century supplied materials for the con- 

^ The following figures plainly show the importance of the cotton industry 
for English exports: 

In 1893, cotton exports to the amount of /^64,ooo,ooo made up 23 per 
cent, and iron and other metal exports not quite 1 7 per cent, of the total 
export of manufactured goods, amounting to ^^277,000, 000 in all. 

In 1898, cotton exports to the amount of ^(^65, 000,000 made up 28 per 
cent, and metal exports 22 per cent, of the total export of manufactured 
goods, amounting to ;£"233,400,ooo in all. 

In comparison, the figures for the German Empire show the following 
result: In 1898, cotton exports to the amount of ;^i 1,595,000 made up 
5-75 per cent of the total exports, amounting to ^^200,500,000. 5,250,000,000 
yards of cotton bales were exported in 1898, 2,250,000,000 of them to India 
(E. Jaffe: Die englische Baumwollindustrie und die Organisation des Exporthandels. 
Schmoller's Jahrbücher, vol. xxiv, p. 1033). 

In 1908, British exports of cotton yarn alone amounted to /^I3, 100,000 
{Statist. Jahrb. für das Deutsche Reich, 19 10). 



REPRODUCTION AND ITS SOCIAL SETTING 

struction of railroads in the American and Australian states. 
(The building of railways cannot in itself be taken as evidence 
for the domination of capitalist production in a country. As a 
matter of fact, the railways in this case provided only one of the 
first' conditions for the inauguration of capitalist production.) 
Another example would be the German chemical industry 
which supplies means of production such as dyes in great 
quantities to Asiatic, African and other countries whose own 
production is not capitalistic.^ Here Department I realises its 
products in extra-capitalist circles. The resulting progressive 
expansion of Department I gives rise to a corresponding expan- 
sion of Department II in the same (capitalistically producing) 
country in order to supply the means of subsistence for the 
growing army of workers in Department I. 

Each of these cases differs from Marx's diagram. In one case, 
the product of Department II exceeds the needs of both depart- 
ments, measured by the variable capital and the consumed part 
of the surplus value. In the second case, the product of Depart- 
ment I exceeds the volume of constant capital in both depart- 
ments, enlarged though it is for the purpose of expanding 
production. In both cases, the surplus value does not come into 
being in that natural form which would make its capitalisation 
in either department possible and necessary. These two proto- 
types continually overlap in real life, supplement each other and 
merge. 

In this contest, one point seems still obscure. The surplus 
of consumer goods, say cotton fabrics, which is sold to non- 
capitalist countries, does not exclusively represent surplus value, 
but, as a capitalist commodity, it embodies also constant and 
variable capital. It seems quite arbitrary to assume that just 
those commodities which are sold outside the capitalist strata 
of society should represent nothing but surplus value. On the 
other hand. Department I clearly can in this case not only 
realise its surplus value but also accumulate, and that without 
requiring another market for its product than the two depart- 
ments of capitalist production. Yet both these objections are 
only apparent. All we need remember is that each component 

* One-fifth of German aniline dyes, and one-half of her indigo, goes to 
countries such as China, Japan, British India, Egypt, Asiatic Turkey, Brazil, 
and Mexico. 

A.C. 353 M 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

of the aggregate product represents a proportion of the total 
value, that under conditions of capitalist production not only the 
aggregate product but every single commodity contains surplus 
value; which consideration does not prevent the individual 
capitalist, however, from computing that the sale of his specific 
commodities must first reimburse him for his outlay on constant 
capital and secondly replace his variable capital (or, rather 
loosely, but in accordance with actual practice: it must first 
replace his fixed, and then his circulating capital); what then 
remains will go down as profit. Similarly, we can divide the 
aggregate social product into three proportionate parts which, 
in terms of value, correspond to ( i ) the constant capital that has 
been used up in society, (2) the variable capital, and (3) the 
extracted surplus value. In the case of simple reproduction these 
proportions are also reflected in the material shape of the 
aggregate product: the constant capital materialises as means 
of production, the variable capital as means of subsistence for 
the workers, and the surplus value as means of subsistence for. 
the capitalist. Yet as we know, the concept of simple reproduc- 
tion with consumption of the entire surplus value by the 
capitalists is a mere fiction. As for enlarged reproduction or 
accumulation, in Marx's diagram the composition of the social 
product in terms of value is also strictly in proportion to its 
material form: the surplus value, or rather that part of it which 
is earmarked for capitalisation, has from the very beginning the 
form of material means of production and means of subsistence 
for the workers in a ratio appropriate to the expansion of pro- 
duction on a given technical basis. As we have seen, this concep- 
tion, which is based upon the self-sufficiency and isolation of 
capitalist production, falls down as soon as we consider the 
realisation of the surplus value. If we assume, however, that the 
surplus value is realised outside the sphere of capitalist produc- 
duction, then its material form is independent of the require- 
ments of capitalist production itself Its material form conforms 
to the requirements of those non-capitalist circles who help to 
realise it, that is to say, capitalist surplus value can take the 
form of consumer goods, e.g. cotton fabrics, or of means of 
production, e.g. materials for railway construction, as the case 
may be. If one department realises its surplus value by export- 
ing its products, and with the ensuing expansion of production 

354 



REPRODUCTION AND ITS SOCIAL SETTING 

helps the other department to realise its surplus value on the 
home market, then the fact still remains that the social surplus 
value must yet be taken as realised outside the two departments, 
either mediately or immediately. Similar considerations enable 
the individual capitalist to realise his surplus value, even if the 
whole of his commodities can only replace either the variable or 
the constant capital of another capitalist. 

Nor is the realisation of the surplus value the only vital aspect 
of reproduction. Given that Department I has disposed of its 
surplus value outside, thereby starting the process of accumu- 
lation, and further, that it can expect a new increase in the 
demand in non-capitalist circles, these two conditions add up to 
only half of what is required for accumulation. There is many 
a sup 'twixt the cup and the lip. The second requirement of 
accumulation is access to material elements necessary for ex- 
panding reproduction. Seeing that we have just turned the 
surplus product of Department I into money by getting rid of 
the surplus means of production to non-capitalist circles, from 
where are these material elements then to come? The trans- 
action which is the portal for realising the surplus value is also, 
as it were, a backdoor out of which flies all possibility of convert- 
ing this realised surplus value into productive capital — one 
leads to the nether regions and the other to the deep sea. Let us 
take a closer look. 

Here we use c in both Departments I and II as if it were the 
entire constant capital in production. Yet this we know is 
wrong. Only for the sake of simplifying the diagram have we 
disregarded that the c which figures in Departments I and II 
of the diagram is only part of the aggregate constant capital of 
society, that is to say that part which, circulating during one 
year, is used up and embodied in the products of one period of 
production. Yet it would be perfectly absurd if capitalist pro- 
duction — or any other — would use up its entire constant capital 
and create it anew in every period of production. On the con- 
trary, we assume that the whole mass of means of production, 
for the periodical total renewal of which the diagram provides 
in annual instalments — renewal of the used-up part — lies at 
the back of production as presented in the diagram. With pro- 
gressing labour productivity and an expanding volume of 
production, this mass increases not only absolutely but also 

355 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

relatively to the part which is consumed in production in every 
case, together with a corresponding increase in the efficiency 
of the constant capital. It is the more intensive exploitation of 
this part of the constant capital, irrespective of its increase in 
value, which is of paramount importance for the expansion of 
production. 

'In the extractive industries, mines, etc., the raw materials 
form no part of the capital advanced. The subject of labour is 
in this case not a product of previous labour, but is furnished 
by Nature gratis, as in the case of metals, minerals, coal, stone, 
etc. In these cases the constant capital consists almost exclu- 
sively of instruments of labour, which can very well absorb an 
increased quantity of labour (day and night shifts of labourers, 
e.g.). All other things being equal, the mass and value of the 
product will rise in direct proportion to the labour expended. 
As on the first day of production, the original produce-formers, 
now turned into the creators of the material elements of capital 
— man and Nature — still work together. Thanks to the elasticity 
of labour-power, the domain of accumulation has extended 
without any previous enlargement of constant capital. — In 
agriculture the land under cultivation cannot be increased 
without the advance of more seed and manure. But this advance 
once made, the purely mechanical working of the soil itself 
produces a marvellous effect on the amount of the product. A 
greater quantity of labour, done by the same number of 
labourers as before, thus increases the fertility, without requiring 
any new advance in the instruments of labour. It is once again 
the direct action of man on Nature which becomes an im- 
mediate source of greater accumulation, without the interven- 
tion of any new capital. Finally, in what is called manufacturing 
industry, every additional expenditure of labour presupposes a 
corresponding additional expenditure of raw materials, but not 
necessarily of instruments of labour. And as extractive industry 
and agriculture supply manufacturing industry with its raw 
materials and those of its instruments of labour, the additional 
product the former have created without additional advance of 
capital, tells also in favour of the latter. — General result: by 
incorporating with itself the two primary creators of wealth, 
labour-power and the land, capital acquires a power of expan- 
sion that permits it to augment the elements of its accumulation 

356 



REPRODUCTION AND ITS SOCIAL SETTING 

beyond the limits apparently fixed by its own magnitude, or 
by the value and the mass of the means of production, already 
produced, in which it has its bcing.'^ 

In addition, there is no obvious reason why means of pro- 
duction and consumer goods should be produced by capitaHst 
methods alone. This assumption, for all Marx used it as the 
corner-stone of his thesis, is in conformity neither with the daily 
practice, and the history, of capital, nor with the specific char- 
acter of this mode of production. In the first half of the nine- 
teenth century, a great part of the surplus value in England was 
produced in form of cotton fabrics. Yet the material elements 
for the capitalisation of this surplus value, although they cer- 
tainly represented a surplus product, still were by no means all 
capitalist surplus value, to mention only raw cotton from the 
slave states of the American Union, or grain (a means of sub- 
sistence for the English workers) from the fields of serf-owning 
Russia. How much capitalist accumulation depends upon means 
of production which are not produced by capitalist methods is 
shown for example by the cotton crisis in England during the 
American War of Secession, when the cultivation of the planta- 
tions came to a standstill, or by the crisis of European linen- 
weaving during the war in the East, when flax could not be 
imported from serf-owning Russia. We need only recall that 
imports of corn raised by peasants — i.e. not produced by capit- 
alist methods — ^played a vital part in the feeding of industrial 
labour, as an element, that is to say, of variable capital, for a 
further illustration of the close ties between non-capitalist strata 
and the material elements necessary to the accumulation of 
capital. 

Moreover, capitalist production, by its very nature, cannot 
be restricted to such means of production as are produced 
by capitalist methods. Cheap elements of constant capital are 
essential to the individual capitalist who strives to increase his 
rate of profit. In addition, the very condition of continuous im- 
provements in labour productivity as the most important 
method of increasing the rate of surplus value, is unrestricted 
utilisation of all substances and facilities afforded by nature and 
soil. To tolerate any restriction in this respect would be contrary 
to the very essence of capital, its whole mode of existence. After 

^ Capital, vol. i, pp. 615-16. 

357 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

many centuries of development, the capitalist mode of produc- 
tion still constitutes only a fragment of total world production. 
Even in the small Continent of Europe, where it now chiefly 
prevails, it has not yet succeeded in dominating entire branches 
of production, such as peasant agriculture and the independent 
handicrafts; the same holds true, further, for large parts of 
North America and for a number of regions in the other con- 
tinents. In general, capitalist production has hitherto been con- 
fined mainly to the countries in the temperate zone, whilst it 
made comparatively little progress in the East, for instance, and 
the South. Thus, if it were dependent exclusively on elements 
of production obtainable within such narrow limits, its present 
level and indeed its development in general would have been 
impossible. From the very beginning, the forms and laws of 
capitalist production aim to comprise the entire globe as a store 
of productive forces. Capital, impelled to appropriate produc- 
tive forces for purposes of exploitation, ransacks the whole 
world, it procures its means of production from all corners of 
the earth, seizing them, if necessary by force, from all levels of 
civilisation and from all forms of society. The problem of the 
material elements of capitalist accumulation, far from being 
solved by the material form of the surplus value that has been 
produced, takes on quite a different aspect. It becomes neces- 
sary for capital progressively to dispose ever more fully of the 
whole globe, to acquire an unlimited choice of means of produc- 
tion, with regard to both quality and quantity, so as to find 
productive employment for the surplus value it has realised. 

The process of accumulation, elastic and spasmodic as it is, 
requires inevitably free access to ever new areas of raw materials 
in case of need, both when imports from old sources fail or when 
social demand suddenly increases. When the War of Secession 
interfered with the import of American cotton, causing the 
notorious 'cotton famine' in the Lancashire district, new and 
immense cotton plantations sprang up in Egypt almost at once, 
as if by magic. Here it was Oriental despotism, combined with 
an ancient system of bondage, which had created a sphere of 
activity for European capital. Only capital with its technical 
resources can effect such a miraculous change in so short a time 
— but only on the pre-capitalist soil of more primitive social 
conditions can it develop the ascendancy necessary to achieve 

358 



REPRODUCTION AND ITS SOCIAL SETTING 

such miracles. Another example of the same kind is the enormous 
increase in the world consumption of rubber which at present 
(1912) necessitates a supply of latex to the value of ^^50,000,000 
per annum. The economic basis for the production of raw 
materials is a primitive system of exploitation practised by 
European capital in the African colonies and in America, where 
the institutions of slavery and bondage are combined in various 
forms. ^ 

Between the production of surplus value, then, and the sub- 
sequent period of accumulation, two separate transactions take 
place — that of realising the surplus value, i.e. of converting it 
into pure value, and that of transforming this pure value into 
productive capital. They are both dealings between capitalist 
production and the surrounding non-capitalist world. From the 
aspect both of realising the surplus value and of procuring the 
material elements of constant capital, international trade is a 
prime necessity for the historical existence of capitalism — an 
international trade which under actual conditions is essentially 
an exchange between capitalistic and non-capitalistic modes of 
production. 

Hitherto we have considered accumulation solely with regard 
to surplus value and constant capital. The third element of 
accumulation is variable capital which increases with progres- 
sive accumulation. In Marx's diagram, the social product con- 
tains ever more means of subsistence for the workers as the 
material form proper to this variable capital. The variable 
capital, however, is not really the means of subsistence for the 
workers but is in fact living labour for whose reproduction these 
means of subsistence are necessary. One of the fundamental 
conditions of accumulation is therefore a supply of living labour 
which can be mobilised by capital to meet its demands. This 
supply can be increased under favourable conditions — but only 

^ The English Blue Book on the practices of the Peruvian Amazon Com- 
pany, Ltd., in Putumayo, has recently revealed that in the free republic of 
Peru and without the political form of colonial supremacy, international 
capital can, to all intents and purposes, enslave the natives, so that it may 
appropriate the means of production of the primitive countries by exploita- 
tion on the greatest scale. Since 1900, this company, financed by English 
and foreign capitalists, has thrown upon the London market approximately 
4,000 tons of Putumayo rubber. During this time, 30,000 natives were killed 
and most of the 10,000 survivors were crippled by beatings. 

359 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

up to a certain point — by longer hours and more intensive 
work. Both these methods of increasing the supply, however, do 
not enlarge the variable capital, or do so only to a small extent 
(e.g. payment for overtime). Moreover, they are confined to 
definite and rather narrow limits which they cannot exceed 
owing to both natural and social causes. The increasing growth 
of variable capital which accompanies accumulation must 
therefore become manifest in ever greater numbers of employed 
labour. Where can this additional labour be found? 

In his analysis of the accumulation of individual capital, 
Marx gives the following answer: 'Now in order to allow of 
these elements actually functioning as capital, the capitalist 
class requires additional labour. If the exploitation of the 
labourers already employed does not increase, either extensively 
or intensively, then additional labour-power must be found. For 
this the mechanism of capitalist production provides before- 
hand, by converting the working class into a class dependent on 
wages, a class whose ordinary wages suffice, not only for its 
maintenance, but for its increase. It is only necessary for capital 
to incorporate this additional labour-power, annually supplied 
by the working class in the shape of labourers of all ages, with 
the surplus means of production comprised in the annual 
produce, and the conversion of surplus-value into capital is 
complete.'^ 

^ Capital, vol. i, p. 594. Similarly in another passage: 'One part of the 
surplus value, of the surplus means of subsistence produced, must then be 
converted into variable capital for the purpose of purchasing new labour. 
This can only be done if the number of workers grows or if their working 
time is prolonged. . . . This, however, cannot be considered a ready measure 
for accumulation. The working population can increase if formerly un- 
productive workers are transformed into productive ones, or if parts of the 
population who previously performed no work, such as women, children 
and paupers, are drawn into the process of production. Here, however, we 
shall ignore this aspect. Lastly, the working population can increase through 
an absolute increase in population. If accumulation is to proceed steadily 
and continuously, it must be grounded in an absolute growth of the popula- 
tion, though this may decline in comparison with the capital employed. An 
expanding population appears as the basis of accumulation conceived as a 
steady process. An indispensable condition for this is an average wage which 
is adequate not only to the reproduction of the working population but 
permits its continual increase' {Theorien über den Mehrwert, vol. ii, part 2, in 
the chapter on 'Transformation of Revenue Into Capital' {Verwandlung von 
Revenue in Kapital), p. 243). 

360 



REPRODUCTION AND ITS SOCIAL SETTING 

Thus the increase in the variable capital is directly and 
exclusively attributed to the natural physical increase of a work- 
ing class already dominated by capital. This is in strict con- 
formity with the diagram of enlarged reproduction which recog- 
nises only the social classes of capitalists and workers, and 
regards the capitalist mode of production as exclusive and 
absolute. On these assumptions, the natural increase of the 
working class is the only source of extending the labour supply 
commanded by capital. This view, however, is contrary to the 
laws governing the process of accumulation. The natural pro- 
pagation of the workers and the requirements of accumulating 
capital are not correlative in respect of time or quantity, Marx 
himself has most brilliantly shown that natural propagation 
cannot keep up with the sudden expansive needs of capital. If 
natural propagation were the only foundation for the develop- 
ment of capital, accumulation, in its periodical swings from 
overstrain to exhaustion, could not continue, nor could the pro- 
ductive sphere expand by leaps and bounds, and accumulation 
itself would become impossible. The latter requires an unlimited 
freedom of movement in respect of the growth of variable 
capital equal to that which it enjoys with regard to the elements 
of constant capital — that is to say it must needs dispose over the 
supply of labour power without restriction. Marx considers that 
this can be achieved by an 'industrial reserve army of workers'. 
His diagram of simple reproduction admittedly does not recog- 
nise such an army, nor could it have room for it, since the 
natural propagation of the capitalist wage proletariat cannot 
provide an industrial reserve army. Labour for this army is 
recruited from social reservoirs outside the dominion of capital 
— it is drawn into the wage proletariat only if need arises. Only 
the existence of non-capitalist groups and countries can guar- 
antee such a supply of additional labour power for capitalist 
production. Yet in his analysis of the industrial reserve army ^ 
Marx only allows for (a) the displacement of older workers by 
machinery, (b) an influx of rural workers into the towns in 
consequence of the ascendancy of capitalist production in agri- 
culture, (c) occasional labour that has dropped out of industry, 
and (d) finally the lowest residue of relative over-population, 
the paupers. All these categories are cast oflf by the capitalist 

^ Capital, vol. i, pp. 642 ff. 
361 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

system of production in some form or other, they constitute a 
wage proletariat that is worn out and made redundant one way 
or another. Marx, obviously influenced by English conditions 
involving a high level of capitalist development, held that the 
rural workers who continually migrate to the towns belong to 
the wage proletariat, since they were formerly dominated by 
agricultural capital and now become subject to industrial 
capital. He ignores, however, the problem which is of par- 
amount importance for conditions on the continent of Europe, 
namely the sources from which this urban and rural proletariat 
is recruited: the continual process by which the rural and urban 
middle strata become proletarian with the decay of peasant 
economy and of small artisan enterprises, the very process, that 
is to say, of incessant transition from non-capitalist to capitalist 
conditions of a labour power that is cast off by pre-capitalist, 
not capitalist, modes of production in their progressive break- 
down and disintegration. Besides the decay of European peasants 
and artisans we must here also mention the disintegration of 
the most varied primitive forms of production and of social 
organisation in non-European countries. 

Since capitalist production can develop fully only with com- 
plete access to all territories and climes, it can no more confine 
itself to the natural resources and productive forces of the 
temperate zone than it can manage with white labour alone. 
Capital needs other races to exploit territories where the white 
man cannot work. It must be able to mobilise world labour 
power without restriction in order to utilise all productive forces 
of the globe — up to the limits imposed by a system of producing 
surplus value. This labour power, however, is in most cases 
rigidly bound by the traditional pre-capitalist organisation of 
production. It must first be 'set free' in order to be enrolled in 
the active army of capital. The emancipation of labour power 
from primitive social conditions and its absorption by the capit- 
alist wage system is one of the indispensable historical bases of 
capitalism. For the first genuinely capitalist branch of produc- 
tion, the English cotton industry, not only the cotton of the 
Southern states of the American Union was essential, but also 
the millions of African Negroes who were shipped to America to 
provide the labour power for the plantations, and who later, 
as a free proletariat, were incorporated in the class of wage 

362 



REPRODUCTION AND ITS SOCIAL SETTING 

labourers in a capitalist system.^ Obtaining the necessary labour 
power from non-capitalist societies, the so-called 'labour-prob- 
lem', is ever more important for capital in the colonies. All 
possible methods of 'gentle compulsion' are applied to solving 
this problem, to transfer labour from former social systems to the 
command of capital. This endeavour leads to the most peculiar 
combinations between the modern wage system and primitive 
authority in the colonial countries. ^ This is a concrete example 

^ A table published in the United States shortly before the War of 
Secession contained the following data about the value of the annual produc- 
tion of the Slave States and the number of slaves employed — for the greatest 
part on cotton plantations: 



Tear 


Cotton: 
Dollars 


Slaves 


1800 


5,200,000 


893,041 


1810 


15,000,000 


1,191,364 


1820 


26,300,000 


1,543,688 


1830 


34,100,000 


2.009,053 


1840 


74,600,000 


2,487,255 


1850 


101,800,000 


3,197,509 


1851 


137,300,000 


3,200,000 



(Simons, 'Class Struggles in American History'. Supplement to J^eue y^eit 
(Klassenkämpfe in der Geschichte Amerikas. Ergänzungsheß der 'Neuen Z^it'), 
Nr. 7, p. 39.) 

2 Biyce, a former English Minister, describes a model pattern of such 
hybrid forms in the South African diamond mines: 'The most striking sight 
at Kimberley, and one unique in the world, is furnished by the two so-called 
"compounds" in which the natives who work in the mines are housed and 
confined. They are huge inclosures, unroofed, but covered with a wire 
netting to prevent anything from being thrown out of them over the walls, 
and with a subterranean entrance to the adjoining mine. The mine is 
worked on the system of three eight-hour shifts, so that the workman is never 
more than eight hours together underground. Round the interior of the wall 
are built sheds or huts in which the natives live and sleep when not working. 
A hospital is also provided within the inclosure, as well as a school where 
the work-people can spend their leisure in learning to read and write. No 
spirits are sold. . . . Every entrance is strictly guarded, and no visitors, white 
or native, are permitted, all supplies being obtained from the store within, 
kept by the company. The De Beers mine compound contained at the time 
of my visit 2,600 natives, belonging to a great variety of tribes, so that here 
one could see specimens of the different native types from Natal and Pondo- 
land, in the south, to the shores of Lake Tanganyika in the far north. They 
come from every quarter, attracted by the high wages, usually eighteen to 
thirty shillings a week, and remain for three months or more, and occasion- 
ally even for longer periods ... In the vast oblong compound one sees Zulus 

363 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

of the fact that capitalist production cannot manage without 
labour power from other social organisations. 

Admittedly, Marx dealt in detail with the process of 
appropriating non-capitalist means of production as well as 
with the transformation of the peasants into a capitalist pro- 
letariat. Chapter xxiv of Capital, vol. i, is devoted to describing 
the origin of the English proletariat, of the capitalistic agricul- 
tural tenant class and of industrial capital, with particular 
emphasis on the looting of colonial countries by European 
capital. Yet we must bear in mind that all this is treated solely 
with a view to so-called primitive accumulation. For Marx, 
these processes are incidental, illustrating merely the genesis of 
capital, its first appearance in the world; they are, as it were, 
travails by which the capitalist mode of production emerges 

from Natal, Fingos, Pondos, Tembus, Basutos, Bechuanas, Gungunhana's 
subjects from the Portuguese territories, some few Matabili and Makalaka; 
and plenty of Zambesi boys from the tribes on both sides ofthat great river, 
a living ethnological collection such as can be examined nowhere else in 
South Africa. Even Bushmen, or at least natives with some Bushman blood 
in them, are not wanting. They live peaceably together, and amuse them- 
selves in their several ways during their leisure hours. Besides games of 
chance, we saw a game resembling "fox and geese" played with pebbles on a 
board; and music was being discoursed on two i-ude native instruments, the 
so-called "Kaffir piano" made of pieces of iron of unequal length fastened 
side by side in a frame, and a still ruder contrivance of hard bits of wood, 
also of unequal size, which when struck by a stick emit different notes, the 
first beginning of a tune. A very few were reading or writing letters, the rest 
busy with their cooking or talking to one another. Some tribes are incessant 
talkers, and in this strange mixing-pot of black men one may hear a dozen 
languages spoken as one passes from group to group' (James Bryce, Im- 
pressions of South Africa, London, 1897, pp. 242 ff.). 

After several months of work, the negro as a rule leaves the mine with the 
wages he has saved up. He returns to his tribe, buying a wife with his money, 
and lives again his traditional life. Cf. also in the same book the most lively 
description of the methods used in South Africa to solve the 'labour- 
problem'. Here we are told that the negroes are compelled to work in the 
mines and plantations of Kimberley, Witwatersrand, Natal, Matabcleland, 
by stripping them of all land and cattle, i.e. depriving them of their means of 
existence, by making them into proletarians and also demoralising them 
with alcohol. (Later, when they are already within the 'enclosure' of capital, 
spirits, to which they have just been accustomed, are strictly prohibited — 
the object of exploitation must be kept fit for use.) Finally, they are simply 
pressed into the wage system of capital by force, by imprisonment, and 
flogging. 



REPRODUCTION AND ITS SOCIAL SETTING 

from a feudal society. As soon as he comes to analyse the capit- 
alist process of production and circulation, he reaffirms the 
universal and exclusive domination of capitalist production. 

Yet, as we have seen, capitalism in its full maturity also 
depends in all respects on non-capitalist strata and social organis- 
ations existing side by side with it. It is not merely a question of 
a market for the additional product, as Sismondi and the later 
critics and doubters of capitalist accumulation would have it. 
The interrelations of accumulating capital and non-capitalist 
forms of production extend over values as well as over material 
conditions, for constant capital, variable capital and surplus 
value alike. The non-capitalist mode of production is the given 
historical setting for this process. Since the accumulation of 
capital becomes impossible in all points without non-capitalist 
surroundings, we cannot gain a true picture of it by assuming 
the exclusive and absolute domination of the capitalist mode of 
production. Sismondi and his school, when they attributed their 
difficulties entirely to the problem of realising the surplus value, 
indeed revealed a proper sense for the conditions vital to 
accumulation. Yet the conditions for augmenting the material 
elements of constant and variable capital are quite a diffisrent 
matter from those which govern the realisation of surplus value. 
Capital needs the means of production and the labour power 
of the whole globe for untrammelled accumulation; it cannot 
manage without the natural resources and the labour power of 
all territories. Seeing that the overwhelming majority of re- 
sources and labour power is in fact still in the orbit of pre- 
capitalist production — this being the historical milieu of accumu- 
lation — capital must go all out to obtain ascendancy over these 
territories and social organisations. There is no a priori reason 
why rubber plantations, say, run on capitalist lines, such as 
have been laid out in India, might not serve the ends of capit- 
alist production just as well. Yet if the countries of those 
branches of production are predominantly non-capitalist, capital 
will endeavour to establish domination over these countries and 
societies. And in fact, primitive conditions allow of a greater 
drive and of far more ruthless measures than could be tolerated 
under purely capitalist social conditions. 

It is quite different with the realisation of the surplus value. 
Here outside consumers qua other-than-capitalist are really 

365 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

essential. Thus the immediate and vital conditions for capital 
and its accumulation is the existence of non-capitalist buyers of 
the surplus value, which is decisive to this extent for the problem 
of capitalist accumulation. 

Whatever the theoretical aspects, the accumulation of capital, 
as an historical process, depends in every respect upon non- 
capitalist social strata and forms of social organisation. 

The solution to this problem which for almost a century has 
been the bone of contention in economic theory thus lies be- 
tween the two extremes of the petty-bourgeois scepticism 
preached by Sismondi, v. Kirchmann, Vorontsov and Nico- 
layon, who flatly denied accumulation, and the crude 
optimism advocated by Ricardo, Say and Tugan Baranovski 
who believed in capital's unlimited capacity for partheno- 
genesis, with the logical corollary of capitalism-in-perpetuity. 
The solution envisaged by Marx lies in the dialectical conflict 
that capitalism needs non-capitalist social organisations as the 
setting for its development, that it proceeds by assimilating the 
very conditions which alone can ensure its own existence. 

At this point we should revise the conceptions of internal and 
external markets which were so important in the controversy 
about accumulation. They are both vital to capitalist develop- 
ment and yet fundamentally diflferent, tliough they must be 
conceived in terms of social economy rather than of political 
geography. In this light, the internal market is the capitalist 
market, production itself buying its own products and supplying 
its own elements of production. The external market is the 
non-capitalist social environment which absorbs the products of 
capitalism and supplies producer goods and labour power for 
capitalist production. Thus, from the point ofview of economics, 
Germany and England traffic in commodities chiefly on an 
internal, capitalist market, whilst the give and take between 
German industry and German peasants is transacted on an 
external market as far as German capital is concerned. These 
concepts are strict and precise, as can be seen from the diagram 
of reproduction. Internal capitalist trade can at best realise only 
certain quantities of value contained in the social product: the 
constant capital that has been used up, the variable capital, and 
the consumed part of the surplus value. That part of the surplus 
value, however, which is earmarked for capitalisation, must be 

366 



REPRODUCTION AND ITS SOCIAL SETTING 

realised elsewhere. If capitalisation of surplus value is the real 
motive force and aim of production, it must yet proceed within 
the limits given by the renewal of constant and variable capital 
(and also of the consumed part of the surplus value) . Further, 
with the international development of capitalism the capitalisa- 
tion of surplus value becomes ever more urgent and precarious, 
and the substratum of constant and variable capital becomes 
an ever-growing mass — both absolutely and in relation to the 
surplus value. Hence the contradictory phenomena that the old 
capitalist countries provide ever larger markets for, and become 
increasingly dependent upon, one another, yet on the other 
hand compete ever more ruthlessly for trade relations with non- 
capitalist countries.^ The conditions for the capitalisation of 
surplus value clash increasingly with the conditions for the 
renewal of the aggregate capital — a conflict which, incidentally, 
is merely a counterpart of the contradictions implied in the law 
of a declining profit rate. 

^ The relations between Germany and England provide a typical 
example. 



367 



CHAPTER XXVII 

THE STRUGGLE AGAINST NATURAL 
ECONOMY 

CAPITALISM arises and develops historically amidst a non- 
capitalist society. In Western Europe it is found at first 
in a feudal environment from which it in fact sprang — 
the system of bondage in rural areas and the guild system in the 
towns — and later, after having swallowed up the feudal system, 
it exists mainly in an environment of peasants and artisans, that 
is to say in a system of simple commodity production both 
in agriculture and trade. European capitalism is further sur- 
rounded by vast territories of non-European civilisation ranging 
over all levels of development, from the primitive communist 
hordes of nomad herdsmen, hunters and gatherers to com- 
modity production by peasants and artisans. This is the setting 
for the accumulation of capital. 

We must distinguish three phases: the struggle of capital 
against natural economy, the struggle against commodity eco- 
nomy, and the competitive struggle of capital on the inter- 
national stage for the remaining conditions of accumulation. 

The existence and development of capitalism requires an 
environment of non-capitalist forms of production, but not 
every one of these forms will serve its ends. Capitalism needs 
non-capitalist social strata as a market for its surplus value, as a 
source of supply for its means of production and as a reservoir 
of labour power for its wage system. For all these purposes, 
forms of production based upon a natural economy are of no 
use to capital. In all social organisations where natural economy 
prevails, where there are primitive peasant communities with 
common ownership of the land, a feudal system of bondage or 
anything of this nature, economic organisation is essentially in 
response to the internal demand; and therefore there is no 
demand, or very little, for foreign goods, and also, as a rule, no 
surplus production, or at least no urgent need to dispose of 

368 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST NATURAL ECONOMY 

surplus products. What is most important, however, is that, in 
any natural economy, production only goes on because both 
means of production and labour power are bound in one form 
or another. The communist peasant community no less than the 
feudal corvee farm and similar institutions maintain their eco- 
nomic organisation by subjecting the labour power, and the 
most important means of production, the land, to the rule of 
law and custom. A natural economy thus confronts the require- 
ments of capitalism at every turn with rigid barriers. Capitalism 
must therefore always and everywhere fight a battle of annihila- 
tion against every historical form of natural economy that it 
encounters, whether this is slave economy, feudalism, primitive 
communism, or patriarchal peasant economy. The principal 
methods in this struggle are political force (revolution, war), 
oppressive taxation by the state, and cheap goods; they are 
partly applied simultaneously, and partly they succeed and 
complement one another. In Europe, force assumed revolu- 
tionary forms in the fight against feudalism (this is the ultimate 
explanation of the bourgeois revolutions in the seventeenth, 
eighteenth and nineteenth centuries); in the non-European 
countries, where it fights more primitive social organisations, it 
assumes the forms of colonial policy. These methods, together 
with the systems of taxation applied in such cases, and com- 
mercial relations also, particularly with primitive communities, 
form an alliance in which political power and economic factors 
go hand in hand. 

In detail, capital in its struggle against societies with a natural 
economy pursues the following ends: 

(i) To gain immediate possession of important sources of pro- 
ductive forces such as land, game in primeval forests, minerals, 
precious stones and ores, products of exotic flora such as rubber, 
etc. 

(2) To 'liberate' labour power and to coerce it into service. 

(3) To introduce a commodity economy. 

(4) To separate trade and agriculture. 

At the time of primitive accumulation, i.e. at the end of the 
Middle Ages, when the history of capitalism in Europe began, 
and right into the nineteenth century, dispossessing the peasants 
in England and on the Continent was the most striking weapon 
in the large-scale transformation of means of production and 

369 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

labour power into capital. Yet capital in power performs the 
same task even to-day, and on an even more important scale — 
by modern colonial policy. It is an illusion to hope that capit- 
alism will ever be content with the means of production which 
it can acquire by way of commodity exchange. In this respect 
already, capital is faced with difficulties because vast tracts of 
the globe's surface are in the possession of social organisations 
that have no desire for commodity exchange or cannot, because 
of the entire social structure and the forms of ownership, offer 
for sale the productive forces in which capital is primarily in- 
terested. The most important of these productive forces is of 
course the land, its hidden mineral treasure, and its meadows, 
woods and water, and further the flocks of the primitive shep- 
herd tribes. If capital were here to rely on the process of slow 
internal disintegration, it might take centuries. To wait patiently 
until the most important means of production could be alien- 
ated by trading in consequence of this process were tantamount 
to renouncing the productive forces of those territories alto- 
gether. Hence derives the vital necessity for capitalism in its 
relations with colonial countries to appropriate the most impor- 
tant means of production. Since the primitive associations of the 
natives are the strongest protection for their social organisations 
and for their material bases of existence, capital must begin by 
planning for the systematic destruction and annihilation of all 
the non-capitalist social units which obstruct its development. 
With that we have passed beyond the stage of primitive accumu- 
lation; this process is still going on. Each new colonial expansion 
is accompanied, as a matter of course, by a relentless battle of 
capital against the social and economic ties of the natives, who 
are also forcibly robbed of their means of production and labour 
power. Any hope to restrict the accumulation of capital ex- 
clusively to 'peaceful competition', i.e. to regular commodity 
exchange such as takes place between capitalist producer-coun- 
tries, rests on the pious belief that capital can accumulate with- 
out mediation of the productive forces and without the demand 
of more primitive organisations, and that it can rely upon the 
slow internal process of a disintegrating natural economy. 
Accumulation, with its spasmodic expansion, can no more wait 
for, and be content with, a natural internal disintegration of 
non-capitalist formations and their transition to commodity 

370 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST NATURAL ECONOMY 

economy, than it can wait for, and be content with, the natural 
increase of the working population. Force is the only solution 
open to capital; the accumulation of capital, seen as an his- 
torical process, employs force as a permanent weapon, not only 
at its genesis, but further on down to the present day. From the 
point of view of the primitive societies involved, it is a matter of 
life or death; for them there can be no other attitude than 
opposition and fight to the finish — complete exhaustion and ex- 
tinction. Hence permanent occupation of the colonies by the 
military, native risings and punitive expeditions are the order of 
the day for any colonial regime. The method of violence, then, 
is the immediate consequence of the clash between capitalism 
and the organisations of a natural economy which would restrict 
accumulation. Their means of production and their labour 
power no less than their demand for surplus products is neces- 
sary to capitalism. Yet the latter is fully determined to under- 
mine their independence as social units, in order to gain pos- 
session of their means of production and labour power and to 
convert them into commodity buyers. This method is the most 
profitable and gets the quickest results, and so it is also the most 
expedient for capital. In fact, it is invariably accompanied by 
a growing militarism whose importance for accumulation will 
be demonstrated below in another connection. British policy in 
India and French policy in Algeria are the classical examples of 
the application of these methods by capitalism. 

The ancient economic organisations of the Indians — the com- 
munist village community — had been preserved in their various 
forms throughout thousands of years, in spite of all the political 
disturbances during their long history. In the sixth century 
B.c. the Persians invaded the Indus basin and subjected part of 
the country. Two centuries later the Greeks entered and left 
behind them colonies, founded by Alexander on the pattern 
of a completely alien civilisation. Then the savage Scythians 
invaded the country, and for centuries India remained under 
Arab rule. Later, the Afghans swooped down from the Iran 
mountains, until they, too, were expelled by the ruthless on- 
slaught of Tartar hordes. The Mongols' path was marked by 
terror and destruction, by the massacre of entire villages — the 
peaceful countryside with the tender shoots of rice made crim- 
son with blood. And still the Indian village community sur- 

371 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

vived. For none of the successive Mahometan conquerors had 
ultimately violated the internal social life of the peasant masses 
and its traditional structure. They only set up their own gover- 
nors in the provinces to supervise military organisation and to 
collect taxes from the population. All conquerors pursued the 
aim of dominating and exploiting the country, but none was in- 
terested in robbing the people of their productive forces and in 
destroying their social organisation. In the Moghul Empire, the 
peasant had to pay his annual tribute in kind to the foreign 
ruler, but he could live undisturbed in his village and could 
cultivate his rice on his sholgura as his father had done before 
him. Then came the British — and the blight of capitalist civilisa- 
tion succeeded in disrupting the entire social organisation of the 
people; it achieved in a short time what thousands of years, 
what the sword of the Nogaians, had failed to accomplish. The 
ultimate purpose of British capital was to possess itself of the 
very basis of existence of the Indian community: the land. 

This end was served above all by the fiction, always popular 
with European colonisers, that all the land of a colony belongs 
to the political ruler. In retrospect, the British endowed the 
Moghul and his governors with private ownership of the whole 
of India, in order to 'legalise' their succession. Economic experts 
of the highest repute, such as James Mill, duly supported this 
fiction with 'scientific' arguments, so in particular with the 
famous conclusion given below. ^ 

^ Mill, in his History of British India, substantiates the thesis that under 
primitive conditions the land belongs always and everywhere to the sove- 
reign, on evidence collected at random and quite indiscriminately from the 
most varied sources (Mungo Park, Herodotus, Volney, Acosta, Garcilasso 
de la Vega, Abbe Grosier, Barrow, Diodorus, Strabo and others). Applying 
this thesis to India, he goes on to say: 'From these facts only one conclusion 
can be drawn, that the property of the soil resided in the sovereign; for if it 
did not reside in him, it will be impossible to show to whom it belonged' 
(James Mill, History of British India (4th edition, 1840), vol. i, p. 311). Mill's 
editor, H. H. Wilson who, as Professor of Sanskrit at Oxford University, 
was thoroughly versed in the legal relations of Ancient India, gives an 
interesting commentary to this classical deduction. Already in his preface he 
characterises the author as a partisan who has juggled with the whole history 
of British India in order to justify the theories of Mr. Bentham and who, 
with this end, has used the most dubious means for his portrait of the Hindus 
which in no way resembles the original and almost outrages humanity. He 
appends the following footnote to our quotation: 'The greater part of the 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST NATURAL ECONOMY 

As early as 1 793, the British in Bengal gave landed property 
to all the zemindars (Mahometan tax collectors) or hereditary 
market superintendents they had found in their district so as to 
win native support for the campaign against the peasant masses. 
Later they adopted the same policy for their new conquests in 
the Agram province, in Oudh, and in the Central Provinces. 
Turbulent peasant risings followed in their wake, in the course 
of which tax collectors were frequently driven out. In the result- 
ing confusion and anarchy British capitalists successfully appro- 
priated a considerable portion of the land. 

The burden of taxation, moreover, was so ruthlessly in- 
creased that it swallowed up nearly all the fruits of the people's 
labour. This went to such an extreme in the Delhi and Alla- 
habad districts that, according to the official evidence of the 
British tax authorities in 1854, the peasants found it convenient 
to lease or pledge their shares in land for the bare amount of 
the tax levied. Under the auspices of this taxation, usury came 
to the Indian village, to stay and eat up the social organisation 

text and of the notes here is wholly irrelevant. The illustrations drawn from 
the Mahometan practice, supposing them to be correct, have nothing to do 
with the laws and rights of the Hindus. They are not, however, even accurate 
and Mr. Mill's guides have misled him.' Wilson then contests outright the 
theory of the sovereign's right of ownership in land, especially with reference 
to India. (Ibid., p. 305, footnote.) Henry Maine, too, is of the opinion that 
the British attempted to derive their claim to Indian land from the Mahome- 
tans in the first place, and he recognises this claim to be completely un- 
justified. 'The assumption which the English first made was one which they 
inherited from their Mahometan predecessors. It was that all the soil 
belonged in absolute property to the sovereign, — and that all private pro- 
perty in land existed by his sufferance. The Mahometan theory and the 
corresponding Mahometan practice had put out of sight the ancient view 
of the sovereign's rights which, though it assigned to him a far larger share 
of the produce of the land than any Western ruler has ever claimed, yet in 
nowise denied the existence of private property in land' {Village Communities 
in the East and West (5th edition, vol. 2, 1890), p. 104). Maxim Kovalevski, 
on the other hand, has proved thoroughly that this alleged 'Mahometan 
theory and practice' is an exclusively British legend. (Cf. his excellent study, 
written in Russian, On the Causes, the Development and the Consequences of the 
Disintegration of Communal Ownership of Land (Moscow, 1879), part i.) In- 
cidentally, British experts and their French colleagues at the time of writing 
maintain an analogous legend about China, for example, asserting that all 
the land there had been the Emperor's property. (Cf. the refutation of this 
legend by Dr. O. Franke, Die Rechtsverhältnisse am Grundeigentum in China, 
1903-) 

373 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

from within like a canker.^ In order to accelerate this process, 
the British passed a law that flew in the face of every tradition 
and justice known to the village community: compulsory aliena- 
tion of village land for tax arrears. In vain did the old family 
associations try to protect themselves by options on their here- 
ditary land and that of their kindred. There was no stopping the 
rot. Every day another plot of land fell under the hammer; 
individual members withdrew from the family unit, and the 
peasants got into debt and lost their land. 

The British, with their wonted colonial stratagems, tried to 
make it appear as if their power policy, which had in fact 
undermined the traditional forms of landownership and brought 
about the collapse of the Hindu peasant economy, had been 
dictated by the need to protect the peasants against native 
oppression and exploitation and served to safeguard their own 
interests.^ Britain artificially created a landed aristocracy at the 
expense of the ancient property- rights of the peasant communi- 
ties, and then proceeded to 'protect' the peasants against these 

1 'The partitions of inheritances and execution for debt levied on land are 
destroying the communities — this is the formula heard nowadays every- 
where in India' (Henry Maine, op. cit., p. 113). 

2 This view of British colonial policy, expounded e.g. by Lord Roberts of 
Kandahar (for many years a representative of British power in India) is 
typical. He can give no other explanation for the Sepoy Mutiny than mere 
'misunderstandings' of the paternal intentions of the British rulers. ' . . . the 
alleged unfairness of what was known in India as the land settlement, under 
which system the right and title of each landholder to his property was 
examined, and the amount of revenue to be paid by him to the paramount 
Power, as owner of the soil, was regulated ... as peace and order were 
established, the system of land revenue, which had been enforced in an 
extremely oppressive and corrupt manner under successive Native Rulers 
and dynasties, had to be investigated and revised. With this object in view, 
surveys were made, and inquiries instituted into the rights of ownership and 
occupancy, the result being that in many cases it was found that families 
of position and influence had either appropriated the property of their 
humbler neighbours, or evaded an assessment proportionate to the value of 
their estates. Although these inquiries were carried out with the best inten- 
tions, they were extremely distasteful to the higher classes, while they failed 
to conciliate the masses. The ruling families deeply resented our endeavours 
to introduce an equitable determination of rights and assessment of land 
revenue. . . . On the other hand, although the agricultural population 
greatly benefited by our rule, they could not realise the benevolent intentions 
of a Government which tried to elevate their position and improve their 
prospects' {Forty One Years in India, London, 1901, p. 233). 

374 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST NATURAL ECONOMY 

alleged oppressors, and to bring this illegally usurped land into 
the possession of British capitalists. 

Thus large estates developed in India in a short time, while 
over large areas the peasants in their masses were turned into 
impoverished small tenants with a short-term lease. 

Lastly, one more striking fact shows the typically capitalist 
method of colonisation. The British were the first conquerors of 
India who showed gross indifference to public utilities. Arabs, 
Afghans and Mongols had organised and maintained magnifi- 
cent works of canalisation in India, they had given the country 
a network of roads, spanned the rivers with bridges and seen to 
the sinking of wells. Timur or Tamerlane, the founder of the 
Mongol dynasty in India, had a care for the cultivation of the 
soil, for irrigation, for the safety of the roads and the provision 
of food for travellers.^ The primitive Indian Rajahs, the Afghan 
or Mongol conquerors, at any rate, in spite of occasional cruelty 
against individuals, made their mark with the marvellous con- 
structions we can find to-day at every step and which seem to 
be the work of a giant race. 'The (East India) Company which 
ruled India until 1858 did not make one spring accessible, did 
not sink a single well, nor build a bridge for the benefit of the 
Indians. '2 

^ In his Maxims on Government (translated from the Persian into English in 
1783), Timur says: 'And I commanded that they should build places of 
worship, and monasteries in every city; and that they should erect structures 
for the reception of travellers on the high roads, and that they should make 
bridges across the rivers. 

'And I commanded that the ruined bridges should be repaired; and that 
bridges should be constructed over the rivulets, and over the rivers; and that 
on the roads, at the distance of one stage from each other, Kauruwansarai 
should be erected; and that guards and watchmen should be stationed on the 
road, and that in every Kauruwansarai people should be appointed to 
reside . . . 

'And I ordained, whoever undertook the cultivation of waste lands, or 
built an aqueduct, or made a canal, or planted a grove, or restored to 
culture a deserted district, that in the first year nothing should be taken from 
him, and that in the second year, whatever the subject voluntarily offered 
should be received, and that in the third year, duties should be col- 
lected according to the regulation' (James Mill, op. cit., vol. ii, pp. 493, 
498). 

2 Count Warren, De VEtat moral de la population indigene. Quoted by Kova- 
levski, op. cit., p. 164. 

375 



REPRODUCTION AND ITS SOCIAL SETTING 

Another witness, the Enghshman James Wilson, says: 'In the 
Madras Province, no-one can help being impressed by the mag- 
nificent ancient irrigation systems, traces of which have been 
preserved until our time. Locks and weirs dam the rivers into 
great lakes, from which canals distribute the water for an area 
of 60 or 70 miles around. On the large rivers, there are 30 to 
40 of such weirs . . . The rain water from the mountains was 
collected in artificial ponds, many of which still remain and 
boast circumferences of between 15 and 25 miles. Nearly all 
these gigantic constructions were completed before the year 
1750. During the war between the Company and the Mongol 
rulers — and, be it said, during the entire period of our rule in India — 
they have sadly decayed.'^ 

No wonder! British capital had no object in giving the Indian 
communities economic support or helping them to survive. 
Quite the reverse, it aimed to destroy them and to deprive them 
of their productive forces. The unbridled greed, the acquisitive 
instinct of accumulation must by its very nature take every 
advantage of the 'conditions of the market' and can have no 
thought for the morrow. It is incapable of seeing far enough 
to recognise the value of the economic monuments of an older 
civilisation. (Recently British engineers in Eg}'pt feverishly tried 
to discover traces of an ancient irrigation system rather like the 
one a stupid lack of vision had allowed to decay in India, when 
they were charged with damming the Nile on a grand scale in 
furtherance of capitalist enterprise.) Not until 1867 was Eng- 
land able to appreciate the results of her noble efforts in this 
respect. In the terrible famine ofthat year a million people were 
killed in the Orissa district alone; and Parliament was shocked 
into investigating the causes of the emergency. The British 
government has now introduced administrative measures in an 
attempt to save the peasant from usury. The Punjab Alienation 
Act of 1900 made it illegal to sell or mortgage peasant lands 
to persons other than of the peasant caste, though exceptions 
can be made in individual cases, subject to the tax collector's 

^ Historical and Descriptive Account of British India from the most remote 
period to the conclusion of the Afghan war by Hugh Murray, James Wilson, 
Greville, Professor Jameson, William Wallace and Captain Dalrymple 
(Edinburgh, 4th edition, 1843), vol. ii, p. 427. Quoted by Kovalevski, 
op. cit. 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST NATURAL ECONOMY 

approval. 1 Having deliberately disrupted the protecting ties of 
the ancient Hindu social associations, after having nurtured a 
system of usury where nothing is thought of a 15 per cent charge 
of interest, the British now entrust the ruined Indian peasant 
to the tender care of the Exchequer and its officials, under the 
'protection', that is to say, of those draining him of his livelihood. 

Next to tormented British India, Algeria under French rule 
claims pride of place in the annals of capitalist colonisation. 
When the French conquered Algeria, ancient social and eco- 
nomic institutions prevailed among the Arab-Kabyle popula- 
tion. These had been preserved until the nineteenth century, 
and in spite of the long and turbulent history of the country 
they survive in part even to the present day. 

Private property may have existed no doubt in the towns, 
among the Moors and Jews, among merchants, artisans and 
usurers. Large rural areas may have been seized by the State 
under Turkish suzerainty — yet nearly half of the productive 
land is jointly held by Arab and Kabyle tribes who still keep up 
the ancient patriarchal customs. Many Arab families led the 
same kind of nomad life in the nineteenth century as they had 
done since time immemorial, an existence that appears restless 
and irregular only to the superficial observer, but one that is in 
fact strictly regulated and extremely monotonous. In summer 
they were wont, man, woman and child, to take their herds and 
tents and migrate to the sea-swept shores of the Tell district; 
and in the winter they would move back again to the protective 
warmth of the desert. They travelled along definite routes, and 
the summer and winter stations were fixed for every tribe and 
family. The fields of those Arabs who had settled on the land 
were in most cases the joint property of the clans, and the great 
Kabyle family associations also lived according to old tradi- 
tional rules under the patriarchal guidance of their elected 
heads. 

The women would take turns for household duties; a matri- 
arch, again elected by the family, being in complete charge of the 
clan's domestic affairs, or else the women taking turns of duty. 
This organisation of the Kabyle clans on the fringe of the 
African desert bears a startling resemblance to that of the 

^ Victor V. Leyden, Agrarverfassung und Grundsteuer in Britisch Ostindien. 
Jahrb. f. Ges., Verw. u. Volksw., vol. xxxvi, no. 4, p. 1855. 

377 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

famous Southern Slavonic ^adruga — not only the fields but all 
the tools, weapons and monies, all that the members acquire or 
need for their work, are communal property of the clan. Per- 
sonal property is confined to one suit of clothing, and in the case 
of a woman to the dresses and ornaments of her dowry. More 
valuable attire and jewels, however, are considered common 
property, and individuals were allowed to use them only if the 
whole family approved. If the clan was not too numerous, meals 
were taken at a common table; the women took it in turns to 
cook, but the eldest were entrusted with the dishing out. If a 
family circle was too large, the head of the family would each 
month ration out strictly proportionate quantities of uncooked 
food to the individual families who then prepared them. These 
communities were bound together by close ties of kinship, 
mutual assistance and equality, and a patriarch would implore 
his sons on his deathbed to remain faithful to the family.^ 

These social relations were already seriously impaired by the 
rule of the Turks, established in Algeria in the sixteenth cen- 
tury. Yet the Turkish exchequer had by no means confiscated 
all the land. That is a legend invented by the French at a much 
later date. Indeed, only a European mind is capable of such a 
flight of fancy which is contrary to the entire economic founda- 
tion of Islam both in theory and practice. In truth, the facts 
were quite diflferent. The Turks did not touch the communal 
fields of the village communities. They merely confiscated a 
great part of uncultivated land from the clans and converted it 
into crownland under Turkish local administrators [Beyliks). 
The state worked these lands in part with native labour, and 
in part they were leased out on rent or against payment in 
kind. Further the Turks took advantage of every revolt of the 
subjected families and of every disturbance in the country to 

^ 'When dying, the father of the family nearly ahvays advises his children 
to live in unity, according to the example of their elders. This is his last 
exhortation, his dearest wish' (A. Hanotaux et A. Letournaux, La Kabylie 
et les Coütumes Kabyles, vol. ii, 1873, 'Droit Civil', pp. 468-73). The authors, 
by the way, appraised this impressive description of communism in the clan 
with this peculiar sentence: 'Within the industrious fold of the family 
association, all are united in a common purpose, all \vork for the general 
interest — but no one gives up his freedom or renounces his hereditary rights. 
In no other nation does the organisation approach so closely to equality, 
being yet so far removed from communism.' 



I 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST NATURAL ECONOMY 

add to their possessions by large-scale confiscation of land, either 
for military establishments or for public auction, when most of 
it went to Turkish or other usurers. To escape from the burden 
of taxation and confiscation, many peasants placed themselves 
under the protection of the Church, just as they had done in 
medieval Germany. Hence considerable areas became Church- 
property. All these changes finally resulted in the following dis- 
tribution of Algerian land at the time of the French conquest: 
crownlands occupied nearly 3,750,000 acres, and a further 
7,500,000 acres of uncultivated land as common property of 
All the Faithful [Bled-el-Islam) . 7,500,000 acres had been 
privately owned by the Berbers since Roman times, and under 
Turkish rule a further 3,750,000 acres had come into private 
ownership, a mere 12,500,000 acres remaining communal pro- 
perty of individual Arab clans. In the Sahara, some of the 
7,500,000 acres fertile land near the Sahara Oases was com- 
munally owned by the clans and some belonged to private 
owners. The remaining 57,500,000,000 acres were mainly waste 
land. 

With their conquest of Algeria, the French made a great ado 
about their work of civilisation, since the country, having 
shaken off the Turkish yoke at the beginning of the eighteenth 
century, was harbouring the pirates who infested the Medi- 
terranean and traflficked in Christian slaves. Spain and the 
North American Union in particular, themselves at that time 
slave traders on no mean scale, declared relentless war on this 
Moslem iniquity. France, in the very throes of the Great Revo- 
lution, proclaimed a crusade against Algerian anarchy. Her 
subjection ofthat country was carried through under the slogans 
of 'combating slavery' and 'instituting orderly and civilised con- 
ditions'. Yet practice was soon to show what was at the bottom 
of it all. It is common knowledge that in the forty years follow- 
ing the subjection of Algeria, no European state suffered so 
many changes in its political system as France: the restoration 
of the monarchy was followed by the July Revolution and the 
reign of the 'Citizen King', and this was succeeded by the 
February Revolution, the Second Republic, the Second Empire, 
and finally, after the disaster of 1870, by the Third Republic. 
In turn, the aristocracy, high finance, petty bourgeoisie and the 
large middle classes in general gained political ascendancy. 

379 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

Yet French policy in Algeria remained undeflected by this suc- 
cession of events; it pursued a single aim from beginning to end; 
at the fringe of the African desert, it demonstrated plainly that 
all the political revolutions in nineteenth- century France cen- 
tred in a single basic interest: the rule of a capitalist bourgeoisie 
and its institutions of ownership. 

'The bill submitted for your consideration', said Deputy 
Humbert on June 30, 1873, in the Session of the French 
National Assembly as spokesman for the Commission for Regu- 
lating Agrarian Conditions in Algeria, 'is but the crowning 
touch to an edifice well-founded on a whole series of ordinances, 
edicts, laws and decrees of the Senate which together and 
severally have as the same object: the establishment of private 
property among the Arabs.' 

In spite of the ups and downs of internal French politics, 
French colonial policy persevered for fifty years in its systematic 
and deliberate efforts to destroy and disrupt communal pro- 
perty. It served two distinct purposes: The break-up of com- 
munal property was primarily intended to smash the social 
power of the Arab family associations and to quell their stub- 
born resistance against the French yoke, in the course of which 
there were innumerable risings so that, in spite of France's 
military superiority, the country was in a continual state of 
war.^ Secondly, communal property had to be disrupted in 
order to gain the economic assets of the conquered country; the 
Arabs, that is to say, had to be deprived of the land they had 
owned for a thousand years, so that French capitalists could get 
it. Once again the fiction we know so well, that under Moslem 
law all land belongs to the ruler, was brought into play. Just 
as the English had done in British India, so Louis Philippe's 
governors in Algeria declared the existence of communal pro- 
perty owned by the clan to be 'impossible'. This fiction served 
as an excuse to claim for the state most of the uncultivated areas, 
and especially the commons, woods and meadows, and to use 
them for purposes of colonisation. A complete system of settle- 
ment developed, the so-called cantonments which settled French 
colonists on the clan land and herded the tribes into a small 

^ ' Wc must lose no time in dissolving the family associations, since they are 
the lever of all opposition against our rule' (Deputy Didier in the National 
Assembly of 1851). 

380 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST NATURAL ECONOMY 

area. Under the decrees of 1830, 1831, 1840, 1844, 1845 '^^^ 
1846 these thefts of Arab family land were legalised. Yet this 
system of settlement did not actually further colonisation; it 
only bred wild speculation and usury. In most instances the 
Arabs managed to buy back the land that had been taken from 
them, although they were thus incurring heavy debts. French 
methods of oppressive taxation had the same tendency, in parti- 
cular the law of June 16, 1851, proclaiming all forests to be state 
property, which robbed the natives of 6,000,000 acres of pas- 
ture and brushwood, and took away the prime essential for 
animal husbandry. This spate of laws, ordinances and regula- 
tions wrought havoc with the ownership of land in the country. 
Under the prevailing condition of feverish speculation in land, 
many natives sold their estates to the French in the hope of ulti- 
mately recovering them. Quite often they sold the same plot to 
two or three buyers at a time, and what is more, it was quite 
often inalienable family land and did not even belong to them. 
A company of speculators from Rouen, e.g., believed that they 
had bought 50,000 acres, but in fact they had only acquired a 
disputed title to 3,425 acres. There followed an infinite number 
of lawsuits in which the French courts supported on principle 
all partitions and claims of the buyers. In these uncertain con- 
ditions, speculation, usury and anarchy were rife. But although 
the introduction of French colonists in large numbers among 
the Arab population had aimed at securing support for the 
French government, this scheme failed miserably. Thus, under 
the Second Empire, French policy tried another tack. The 
government, with its European lack of vision, had stubbornly 
denied the existence of communal property for thirty years, but 
it had learned better at last. By a single stroke of the pen, joint 
family property was officially recognised and condemned to be 
broken up. This is the double significance of the decree of the 
Senate dated April 22, 1864. General Allard declared in the 
Senate: 

'The government does not lose sight of the fact that the 
general aim of its policy is to weaken the influence of the tribal 
chieftains and to dissolve the family associations. By this means, 
it will sweep away the last remnants of feudalism [sici] defended 
by the opponents of the government bill . . . The surest method 
of accelerating the process of dissolving the family assocations 

381 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

will be to institute private property and to settle European 
colonists among the Arab families.'^ 

The law of 1863 created special Commissions for cutting 
up the landed estates, consisting of the Chairman, either a 
Brigadier-General or Colonel, one sous-prefet, one representative 
of the Arab military authorities and an official bailiff. These 
natural experts on African economics and social conditions were 
faced \vdth the threefold task, first of determining the precise 
boundaries of the great family estates, secondly to distribute the 
estates of each clan among its various branches, and finally to 
break up this family land into separate private allotments. This 
expedition of the Brigadiers into the interior of Africa duly took 
place. The Commissions proceeded to their destinations. They 
were to combine the office of judge in all land disputes with 
that of surveyor and land distributor, the final decision rest- 
ing with the Governor-General of Algeria. Ten years' valiant 
efforts by the Commissions yielded the following result: between 
1863 and 1873, of 700 hereditary estates, 400 were shared out 
among the branches of each clan, and the foundations for future 
inequalities between great landed estates and small allotments 
were thus laid. One family, in fact, might receive between 2*5 
and 10 acres, while another might get as much as 250 or even 
450 acres, depending on the size of the estate and the number 
of collaterals within the clan. Partition, however, stopped at 
that point. Arab customs presented unsurmountable difficulties 
to a further division of family land. In spite of Colonels and 
Brigadiers, French policy had again failed in its object to create 
private property for transfer to the French. 

But the Third Republic, an undisguised regime of the bour- 
geoisie, had the courage and the cynicism to go straight for its 
goal and to attack the problem from the other end, disdaining 
the preliminaries of the Second Empire. In 1873, the National 
Assembly worked out a law with the avowed intention imme- 
diately to split up the entire estates of all the 700 Arab clans, 
and forcibly to institute private property in the shortest possible 
time. Desperate conditions in the colony were the pretext for 
this measure. It had taken the great Indian famine of 1866 to 

^ Quoted by Kovalevski, op. cit., p. 217. Since the Great Revolution, of 
course, it had become the fashion in France to dub all opposition to the 
government an open or covert defence of feudalism. 

382 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST NATURAL ECONOMY 

awaken the British public to the marvellous exploits of British 
colonial policy and to call for a parliamentary investigation; 
and similarly, Europe was alarmed at the end of the sixties by 
the crying needs of Algeria where more than forty years of 
French rule culminated in wide-spread famine and a disastrous 
mortality rate among the Arabs. A commission of inquiry was 
set up to recommend new legislation with which to bless the 
Arabs: it was unanimously resolved that there was only one life- 
buoy for them — the institution of private property; that alone 
could save the Arab from destitution, since he would then 
always be able to sell or mortgage his land. It was decided there- 
fore, that the only means of alleviating the distress of the Arabs, 
deeply involved in debts as they were because of the French 
land robberies and oppressive taxation, was to deliver them 
completely into the hands of the usurers. This farce was ex- 
pounded in all seriousness before the National Assembly and 
was accepted with equal gravity by that worthy body. The 
'victors' of the Paris Commune flaunted their brazenness. 

In the National Assembly, two arguments in particular served 
to support the new law: those in favour of the bill emphasised 
over and over again that the Arabs themselves urgently desired 
the introduction of private property. And so they did, or rather 
the Algerian land speculators and usurers did, since they were 
vitally interested in 'liberating' their victims from the protection 
of the family ties. As long as Moslem law prevailed in Algeria, 
hereditary clan and family lands were inalienable, which laid 
insuperable difficulties in the way of anyone who wished to 
mortgage his land. The law of 1863 had merely made a breach 
in these obstacles, and the issue now at stake was their complete 
abolition so as to give a free hand to the usurers. The second 
argument was 'scientific', part of the same intellectual equip- 
ment from which that worthy, James Mill, had drawn for his 
abstruse conclusions regarding Indian relations of ownership: 
English classical economics. Thoroughly versed in their masters' 
teachings, the disciples of Smith and Ricardo impressively 
declaimed that private property is indispensable for the preven- 
tion of famines in Algeria, for more intensive and better cultiva- 
tion of the land, since obviously no one would be prepared to 
invest capital or intensive labour in a piece of land which does 
not belong to him and whose produce is not his own to enjoy. 

383 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

But the facts spoke a different language. They proved that the 
French speculators employed the private property they had 
created in Algeria for anything but the more intensive and 
improved cultivation of the soil. In 1873, 1,000,000 acres were 
French property. But the capitalist companies, the Algerian and 
Setif Company which owned 300,000 acres, did not cultivate 
the land at all but leased it to the natives who tilled it in the 
traditional manner, nor were 25 per cent of the other French 
owners engaged in agriculture. It was simply impossible to con- 
jure up capitalist investments and intensive agriculture over- 
night, just as capitalist conditions in general could not be 
created out of nothing. They existed only in the imagination of 
profit-seeking French speculators, and in the benighted doc- 
trinaire visions of their scientific economists. The essential point, 
shorn of all pretexts and flourishes which seem to justify the law 
of 1873, was simply the desire to deprive the Arabs of their 
land, their livelihood. And although these arguments had worn 
threadbare and were evidently insincere, this law which was to 
put paid to the Algerian population and their material pros- 
perity, was passed unanimously on July 26, 1873. 

But even this master-stroke soon proved a failure. The policy 
of the Third Republic miscarried because of the difficulties in 
substituting at one stroke bourgeois private property for the 
ancient clan communism, just as the policy of the Second Empire 
had come to grief over the same issue. In 1890, when the law 
of July 26, 1873, supplemented by a second law on April 28, 
1887, had been in force for seventeen years, 14,000,000 francs 
had been spent on dealing v^th 40,000,000 acres. It was esti- 
mated that the process would not be completed before 1 950 and 
would require a further 60,000,000 francs. And still abolition of 
clan communism, the ultimate purpose, had not been accom- 
plished. What had really been attained was all too evident: 
reckless speculation in land, thriving usury and the economic 
ruin of the natives. 

Since it had been impossible to institute private property by 
force, a new experiment was undertaken. The laws of 1873 and 
1887 had been condemned by a commission appointed for their 
revision by the Algerian government in 1890. It was another 
seven years before the legislators on the Seine made the effort 
to consider reforms for the ruined country. The new decree of 

384 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST NATURAL ECONOMY 

the Senate refrained in principle from instituting private pro- 
perty by compulsion or administrative measures. The laws of 
February 2, 1897, and the edict of the Governor-General of 
Algeria (March 3, 1898) both provided chiefly for the intro- 
duction of private property following a voluntary application by 
the prospective purchaser or owner. ^ But there were clauses to 
permit a single owner, without the consent of the others, to 
claim private property; further, such a 'voluntary' application 
can be extorted at any convenient moment if the owner is in 
debt and the usurer exerts pressure. And so the new law left the 
doors wide open for French and native capitalists further to 
disrupt and exploit the hereditary and clan lands. 

Of recent years, this mutilation of Algeria which had been 
going on for eight decades meets with even less opposition, 
since the Arabs, surrounded as they are by French capital fol- 
lowing the subjection of Tunisia (1881) and the recent conquest 
of Morocco, have been rendered more and more helpless. The 
latest result of the French regime in Algeria is an Arab exodus 
into Turkey.^ 

^ G. Anton, Neuere Agrarpolitik in Algerien und Tunesien. Jahrb. f. Gesetzge- 
bung, Verwaltung und Volkswirtschaft (1900), pp. 1341 fF. 

2 On June 20, 1912, M. Albin Rozet, on behalf of the Commission for the 
Reform of the 'Indigenat' (Administrative Justice) in Algeria, stated in his 
speech to the French Chamber of Deputies that thousands of Algerians were 
migrating from the Setif district, and that 1,200 natives had emigrated from 
Tlemcen during the last year, their destination being Syria. One immigrant 
wrote from his new home: 'I have now settled in Damascus and am perfectly 
happy. There are many Algerians here in Syria who, like me, have 
emigrated. The government has given us land and facilities to cultivate it.' 
The Algerian government combats this exodus — by denying passports to 
prospective emigrants. (Cf. Journal Officiel, June 21, 19 12, pp. 1594 ff.) 



A.C. 385 N 



CHAPTER XXVIII 

THE INTRODUCTION OF COMMODITY 
ECONOMY 

THE second condition of importance for acquiring means 
of production and realising the surplus value is that com- 
modity exchange and commodity economy should be 
introduced in societies based on natural economy as soon as 
their independence has been abrogated, or rather in the course 
of this disruptive process. Capital requires to buy the products 
of, and sell its commodities to, all non-capitalist strata and 
societies. Here at last we seem to find the beginnings of that 
'peace' and 'equality', the do ut des, mutual interest, 'peaceful 
competition' and the 'influences of civilisation'. For capital can 
indeed deprive alien social associations of their means of produc- 
tion by force, it can compel the workers to submit to capitalist 
exploitation, but it cannot force them to buy its commodities or 
to realise its surplus value. In districts where natural economy 
formerly prevailed, the introduction of means of transport — rail- 
ways, navigation, canals — is vital for the spreading of commodity 
economy, a further hopeful sign. The triumphant march of 
commodity economy thus begins in most cases with magnificent 
constructions of modern transport, such as railway lines which 
cross primeval forests and tunnel through the mountains, tele- 
graph wires which bridge the deserts, and ocean liners which call 
at the most outlying ports. But it is a mere illusion that these 
are peaceful changes. Under the standard of commerce, the 
relations between the East India Company and the spice-pro- 
ducing countries were quite as piratical, extortionate and blat- 
antly fraudulent as present-day relations between American 
capitalists and the Red Indians of Canada whose furs they buy, 
or between German merchants and the Negroes of Africa. 
Modern China pvresents a classical example of the 'gentle', 
'peace-loving' practices of commodity exchange with backward 
countries. Throughout the nineteenth century, beginning with 

386 



THE INTRODUCTION OF COMMODITY ECONOMY 

the early forties, her history has been punctuated by wars with 
the object of opening her up to trade by brute force. Mission- 
aries provoked persecutions of Christians, Europeans instigated 
risings, and in periodical massacres a completely helpless and 
peaceful agrarian population was forced to match arms with the 
most modern capitalist military technique of all the Great 
Powers of Europe. Heavy war contributions necessitated a 
public debt, China taking up European loans, resulting in 
European control over her finances and occupation of her forti- 
fications; the opening of free ports was enforced, railway con- 
cessions to European capitalists extorted. By all these measures 
commodity exchange was fostered in China, from the early 
thirties of the last century until the beginning of the Chinese 
revolution. 

European civilisation, that is to say commodity exchange 
with European capital, made its first impact on China with the 
Opium Wars when she was compelled to buy the drug from 
Indian plantations in order to make money for British capit- 
alists. In the seventeenth century, the East India Company had 
introduced the cultivation of poppies in Bengal; the use of the 
drug was disseminated in China by its Canton branch. At the 
beginning of the nineteenth century, opium fell so considerably 
in price that it rapidly became the 'luxury of the people'. In 
1 82 1, 4,628 chests of opium were imported to China at an 
average price of ^(^265; then the price fell by 50 per cent, and 
Chinese imports rose to 9,621 chests in 1825, and to 26,670 
chests in 1830.^ The deadly effects of the drug, especially of the 
cheaper kinds used by the poorer population, became a public 
calamity and made it necessary for China to lay an embargo 
on imports, as an emergency measure. Already in 1828, the 
viceroy of Canton had prohibited imports of opium, only to 
deflect the trade to other ports. One of the Peking censors com- 
manded to investigate the question gave the following report: 

'I have learnt that people who smoke opium have developed 

^ 77)379 chests were imported in 1854. Later, the imports somewhat 
decHned, owing to increased home production. Nevertheless, China re- 
mained the chief buyer. India produced just under 6,400,000 tons of opium 
in 1873/4, of which 6,100,000 tons were sold to the Chinese. To-day [19 12] 
India still exports 4,800,000 tons, value ;^7,500,ooo,ooo, almost exclusively 
to China and the Malay Archipelago. 

387 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

such a craving for this noxious drug that they make every effort 
to obtain this gratification. If they do not get their opium at 
the usual hour, their hmbs begin to tremble, they break out in 
sweat, and they cannot perform the slightest tasks. But as soon 
as they are given the pipe, they inhale a few puffs and are cured 
immediately. 

'Opium has therefore become a necessity for all who smoke it, 
and it is not surprising that under cross-examination by the 
local authorities they will submit to every punishment rather 
than reveal the names of their suppliers. Local authorities are 
also in some cases given presents to tolerate the evil or to delay 
any investigation already under way. Most merchants who 
bring goods for sale into Canton also deal in smuggled opium, 

'I am of the opinion that opium is by far a greater evil than 
gambling, and that opium smokers should therefore be punished 
no less than gamblers.' 

The censor suggested that every convicted opium smoker 
should be sentenced to eighty strokes of the bamboo, and any- 
body refusing to give the name of his supplier to a hundred 
strokes and three years of exile. The pigtailed Cato of Peking 
concludes his report with a frankness staggering to any Euro- 
pean official: 'Apparently opium is mostly introduced from 
abroad by dishonest officials in connivance with profit-seeking 
merchants who transport it into the interior of the country. 
Then the first to indulge are people of good family, wealthy 
private persons and merchants, but ultimately the drug habit 
spreads among the common people. I have learnt that in all 
provinces opium is smoked not only in the civil service but also 
in the army. The officials of the various districts indeed enjoin 
the legal prohibition of sale by special edicts. But at the same 
time, their parents, families, dependants and servants simply go 
on smoking opium, and the merchants profit from the ban by 
increased prices. Even the police have been won over; they buy 
the stuff instead of helping to suppress it, and this is an addi- 
tional reason for the disregard in which all prohibitions and 
ordinances are held.'^ 

Consequently, a stricter law was passed in 1833 which made 
every opium smoker liable to a hundred strokes and two months 
in the stocks, and provincial governors were ordered to report 
^ Quoted by J. Scheibert, Der Krieg in China (1903), vol. 2, p. 179. 

388 



THE INTRODUCTION OF COMMODITY ECONOMY 

annually on their progress in the battle against opium. But there 
were two sequels to this campaign: on the one hand large-scale 
poppy plantations sprang up in the interior, particularly in the 
Honan, Setchuan, and Kucitchan provinces, and on the other, 
England declared war on China to get her to lift the embargo. 
These were the splendid beginnings of 'opening China' to 
European civilisation — by the opium pipe. 

Canton was the first objective. The fortifications of the town 
at the main arm of the Perl estuary could not have been more 
primitive. Every day at sunset a barrier of iron chains was 
attached to wooden rafts anchored at various distances, and 
this was the main defence. Moreover, the Chinese guns could 
only fire at a certain angle and were therefore completely in- 
effectual. With such primitive defences, just adequate to pre- 
vent a few merchant ships from landing, did the Chinese meet 
the British attack. A couple of British cruisers, then, sufficed to 
effect an entry. on September 7, 1839. The sixteen battle-junks 
and thirteen fire-ships which the Chinese put up for resistance 
were shot up or dispersed in a matter of forty-five minutes. After 
this initial victory, the British renewed the attack in the begin- 
ning of 1 84 1 with a considerably reinforced fleet. This time the 
fleet, consisting in a number of battle-junks, and the forts were 
attacked simultaneously. The first incendiary rocket that was 
fired penetrated through the armour casing of a junk into the 
powder chamber and blew the ship with the entire crew sky- 
high. In a short time eleven junks, including the flag-ship, were 
destroyed, and the remainder precipitately made for safety. 
The action on land took a little longer. Since the Chinese guns 
were quite useless, the British walked right through the fortifi- 
cations, climbed to a strategic position — which was not even 
guarded — and proceeded to slaughter the helpless Chinese from 
above. The casualty list of the battle was: for the Chinese 
600 dead, and for the British, i dead and 30 wounded, more 
than half of the latter having been injured by the accidental 
explosion of a powder magazine. A few weeks later, there 
followed another British exploit. The forts of Anung-Hoy and 
North Wantong were to be taken. No less than twelve fully 
equipped cruisers were available for this task. What is more, 
the Chinese, once again forgetful of the most important thing, 
had omitted to fortify the island of South Wantong. Thus the 

389 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

British calmly landed a battery of howitzers to bombard the 
fort from one side, the cruisers shelling it from the other. After 
that, the Chinese were driven from the forts in a matter of 
minutes, and the landing met with no resistance. The ensuing 
display of inhumanity — an English report says— will be for ever 
deeply deplored by the British staff. The Chinese, trying to 
escape from the barricades, had fallen into a moat which was 
soon literally filled to the brim with helpless soldiers begging for 
mercy. Into this mass of prostrate human bodies, the sepoys — 
acting against orders, it is claimed — fired again and again. This 
is the way in which Canton was made receptive to commodity 
exchange. 

Nor did the other ports fare better. On July 4, 1841, three 
British cruisers with 1 20 cannon appeared off the islands in the 
entrance to the town of Ningpo. More cruisers arrived the fol- 
lowing day. In the evening the British admiral sent a message 
to the Chinese governor, demanding the capitulation of the 
island. The governor explained that he had no power to resist 
but could not surrender without orders from Peking. He there- 
fore asked for a delay. This was refused, and at half-past two in 
the morning the British stormed the defenceless island. Within 
eight minutes, the fort and the houses on the shore were reduced 
to smouldering rubble. Having landed on the deserted coast 
littered with broken spears, sabres, shields, rifles and a few dead 
bodies, the troops advanced on the walls of the island town of 
Tinghai. With daybreak, reinforced by the crews of other ships 
which had meanwhile arrived, they proceeded to put scaling- 
ladders to the scarcely defended ramparts. A few more minutes 
gave them mastery of the town. This splendid victory was 
announced with becoming modesty in an Orderof theDay: 'Fate 
has decreed that the morning of July 5, 1841, should be the his- 
toric date on which Her Majesty'sflag was first raised over the 
most beautiful island of the Celestial Empire, the first European 
flag to fly triumphantly above this lovely countryside.'^ 

On August 25, 1 84 1, the British approached the town of 
Amoy, whose forts were armed with a hundred of the heaviest 
Chinese guns. These guns being almost useless, and the com- 
manders lacking in resource, the capture of the harbour was 
child's play. Under cover of a heavy barrage, British ships drew 
^ Scheibert, op. cit., p. 207. 



THE INTRODUCTION OF COMMODITY ECONOMY 

near the walls of Kulangau, landed their marines, and after a 
short stand the Chinese troops were driven out. The twenty-six 
battle-junks with 128 guns in the harbour were also captured, 
their crews having fled. One battery, manned by Tartars, heroic- 
ally held out against the combined fire of three British ships, but 
a British landing was effected in their rear and the post wiped 
out. 

This was the finale of the notorious Opium War. By the peace 
treaty of August 27, 1842, the island of Hongkong was ceded to 
Britain. In addition, the towns of Canton, Amoy, Futchou, 
Ningpo and Shanghai were to open their ports to foreign com- 
merce. But within fifteen years, there was a further war against 
China. This time, Britain had joined forces with the French. 
In 1857, the allied navies captured Canton with a heroism equal 
to that of the first war. By the peace of Tientsin (1858), the 
opium traffic, European commerce and Christian missions were 
admitted into the interior. Already in 1859, however, the 
British resumed hostilities and attempted to destroy the Chinese 
fortifications on the Peiho river, but were driven off after a fierce 
battle in which 464 people were wounded or killed.^ 

^ An Imperial Edict issued on the third day of the eighth moon in the 
tenth year of Hsien-Feng (6/9/1860) said amongst other things: 'We have 
never forbidden England and France to trade with China, and for long 
years there has been peace between them and us. But three years ago the 
English, for no good cause, invaded our city of Canton, and carried off our 
officials into captivity. We refrained at that time from taking any retaliatory 
measures, because we were compelled to recognise that the obstinacy of the 
Viceroy Yeh had been in some measure a cause of the hostilities. Two years 
ago, the barbarian Commander Elgin came north and we then commanded 
the Viceroy of Chihli, T'an Ting-hsiang, to look into matters preparatory 
to negotiations. But the barbarian took advantage of our unreadiness, 
attacking the Taku forts and pressing on to Tientsin. Being anxious to spare 
our people the horrors of war, we again refrained from retaliation and 
ordered Kuei Liang to discuss terms of peace. Notwithstanding the out- 
rageous nature of the barbarians' demands we subsequently ordered Kuei 
Liang to proceed to Shanghai in connection with the proposed Treaty of 
Commerce and even permitted its ratification as earnest of our good faith. 

'In spite of all this, the barbarian leader Bruce again displayed intract- 
ability of the most unreasonable kind, and once more appeared off Taku 
with a squadron of warships in the eighth Moon. Seng Ko Lin Ch'in there- 
upon attacked him fiercely and compelled him to make a rapid retreat. 
From all these facts it is clear that China has committed no breach of faith 
and that the barbarians have been in the wrong. During the present year 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

After that, Britain and France again joined forces. At the end 
of August i860, 12,600 English and 7,500 French troops under 
General Cousin-Montauban first captured the Taku forts with- 
out a single shot having been fired. Then they proceeded to- 
wards Tientsin and on towards Peking. A bloody battle was 
joined at Palikao, and Peking fell to the European Powers. 
Entering the almost depopulated and completely undefended 
city, the victors began by pillaging the Imperial Palace, man- 
fully helped by General Cousin himself, who was later to become 
field marshal and Count of Palikao. Then the Palace went up 
in flames, fired on Lord Elgin's order as an imposed penance.^ 

The European Powers now obtained concessions to set up 
embassies in Peking, and to start trading with Tientsin and 
other towns. The Tchi-fu Convention of 1876 guaranteed full 
facilities for importing opium into China — at a time when the 
Anti-Opium League in England agitated against the spreading 
of the drug habit in London, Manchester and other industrial 
districts, when a parliamentary commission declared the con- 

the barbarian leaders Elgin and Gros have again appeared off our coasts, 
but China, unwilling to resort to extreme measures, agreed to their landing 
and permitted them to come to Peking for the ratification of the Treaty. 

'Who could have believed that all this time the barbarians have been 
darkly plotting, and that they had brought with them an army of soldiers 
and artillery with which they attacked the Taku forts from the rear, and, 
having driven out our forces, advanced upon Tientsin!' (I. O. Bland and 
E. T. Blackhouse, China under the Empress Dowager (London, 1910), pp. 24-5. 
Cf also in this work the entire chapter, 'The Flight to Yehol'.) 

^ These European exploits to make China receptive to commodity ex- 
change, provide the setting for a charming episode of China's internal 
history: Straight from looting the Manchu Emperor's Summer Palace, the 
'Gordon of China' went on a campaign against the rebels of Taiping. In 
1863 he even took over command of the Imperial fighting forces. In fact, 
the suppression of the revolt was the work of the British army. But while a 
considerable number of Europeans, among them a French admiral, gave 
their lives to preserve China for the Manchu dynasty, the representatives of 
European commerce were eagerly grasping this opportunity to make capital 
out of these fights, supplying arms both to their own champions and to the 
rebels who went to war against them. 'Moreover, the worthy merchant was 
tempted, by the opportunity for making some money, to supply both armies 
with arms and munitions, and since the rebels had greater difficulties in 
obtaining supplies than the Emperor's men and were therefore compelled 
and prepared to pay higher prices, they were given priority and could thus 
resist not only the troops of their own government, but also those of England 
and France' (M. v. Brandt, 33 Jahre in Ostasien, 1911, vol. Hi, China, p. 1 1). 



I 



THE INTRODUCTION OF COMMODITY ECONOMY 

sumption of opium to be harmful in the extreme. By all treaties 
made at that time between China and the Great Powers any 
European, whether merchant or missionary, was guaranteed the 
right to acquire land, to which end the legitimate arguments 
were ably supported by deliberate fraud. 

First and foremost the ambiguity of the treaty texts made a 
convenient excuse for European capital to encroach beyond 
the Treaty Ports. It used every loophole in the wording of the 
treaties to begin with, and subsequently blackmailed the Chinese 
government into permitting the missions to acquire land not 
alone in the Treaty Ports but in all the provinces of the realm. 
Their claim was based upon the notorious bare-faced distortion 
of the Chinese original in Abbe Delamarre's official translation 
of the supplementary convention with France. French diplo- 
macy, and the Protestant missions in particular, unanimously 
condemned the crafty swindle of the Catholic padre, but never- 
theless they were firm that the rights of French missions obtained 
by this fraud should be explicitly extended to the Protestant 
missions as well.^ 

China's entry into commodity exchange, having begun with 
the Opium Wars, was finally accomplished with a series of 
'leases' and the China campaign of 1900, when the commercial 
interests of European capital sank to a brazen international 
dogfight over Chinese land. The description of the Dowager 
Empress, who wrote to Queen Victoria after the capture of the 
Taku forts, subtly underlines this contrast between the initial 
theory and the ultimate practice of the 'agents of European 
civilisation' : 

'To your Majesty, greeting! — In all the dealings of England 
with the Empire of China, since first relations were established 
between us, there has never been any idea of territorial aggran- 
disement on the part of Great Britain, but only a keen desire to 
promote the interests of her trade. Reflecting upon the fact that 
our country is now plunged into a dreadful condition of war- 
fare, we bear in mind that a large proportion of China's trade, 
seventy or eighty per cent, is done with England; moreover, 
your Customs duties are the lightest in the world, and few re- 
strictions are made at your sea-ports in the matter of foreign 

^ Dr. O. Franke, Die Rechtsverhältnisse am Grundeigentum in China (Leipzig, 
1903), p. 82. 

393 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

importations; for these reasons our amiable relations with 
British merchants at our Treaty Ports have continued unbroken 
for the last half century, to our mutual benefit. — But a sudden 
change has now occurred and general suspicion has been 
created against us. We would therefore ask you now to con- 
sider that if, by any conceivable combination of circumstances, 
the independence of our Empire should be lost, and the Powers 
unite to carry out their long-plotted schemes to possess them- 
selves of our territory' — (in a simultaneous message to the 
Emperor of Japan, the impulsive Tzu Hsi openly refers to 'The 
earth-hungry Powers of the West, whose tigerish eyes of greed 
are fixed in our direction'^) — 'the results to your country's 
interests would be disastrous and fatal to your trade. At this 
moment our Empire is striving to the utmost to raise an army 
and funds sufficient for its protection; in the meanwhile we rely 
on your good services to act as mediator, and now anxiously 
await your decision. '^ 

Both during the wars and in the interim periods, European 
civilisation was busy looting and thieving on a grand scale in 
the Chinese Imperial Palaces, in the public buildings and in 
the monuments of ancient civilisation, not only in i860, when 
the French pillaged the Emperor's Palace with its legendary 
treasures, or in 1900, 'when all the nations vied with each other 
to steal public and private property'. Every European advance 
was marked not only with the progress of commodity exchange, 
but by the smouldering ruins of the largest and most venerable 
towns, by the decay of agriculture over large rural areas, and 
by intolerably oppressive taxation for war contributions. There 
are more than 40 Chinese Treaty Ports — and every one of them 
has been paid for with streams of blood, with massacre and 
ruin. 

1 Bland and Blackhouse, op. cit., p. 338. - Ibid., p. 337. 



394 



CHAPTER XXIX 

THE STRUGGLE AGAINST PEASANT 
ECONOMY 

/%N important final phase in the campaign against natural 
/—^economy is to separate industry from agriculture, 
A. JL to eradicate rural industries altogether from peasant 
economy. Handicraft in its historical beginnings was a sub- 
sidiary occupation, a mere appendage to agriculture in civilised 
and settled societies. In medieval Europe it became gradually 
independent of the corvee farm and agriculture, it developed 
into specialised occupations, i.e. production of commodities by 
urban guilds. In industrial districts, production had progressed 
from home craft by way of primitive manufacture to the capit- 
alist factory of the staple industries, but in the rural areas, under 
peasant economy, home crafts persisted as an intrinsic part of 
agriculture. Every hour that could be spared from cultivating 
the soil was devoted to handicrafts which, as an auxiliary 
domestic industry, played an important part in providing for 
personal needs. ^ 

It is a recurrent phenomenon in the development of capitalist 
production that one branch of industry after the other is singled 
out, isolated from agriculture and concentrated in factories for 
mass production. The textile industry provides the textbook 
example, but the same thing has happened, though less 
obviously, in the case of other rural industries. Capital must get 
the peasants to buy its commodities and will therefore begin by 
restricting peasant economy to a single sphere — that of agricul- 

^ Until recently, in China the domestic industries were widely practised 
even by the bourgeoisie and in such large and ancient towns as Ningpo with 
its 300,000 inhabitants. 'Only a generation ago, the family's shoes, hats, 
shirts, etc., were made by the women themselves. At that time, it was practi- 
cally unheard-of for a young woman to buy from a merchant what she could 
have made with the labour of her own hands' (Dr. Nyok-Ching Tsur, 'Forms 
of Industry in the Town of Ningpo' {Die gewerblichen Betriebsformen der Stadt 
Ningpo), Tuebingen, 1909, p. 51). 

395 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

ture — which will not immediately and, under European con- 
ditions of ownership, only with great difficulty submit to capit- 
alist domination.^ To all outward appearance, this process is 
quite peaceful. It is scarcely noticeable and seemingly caused 
by purely economic factors. There can be no doubt that mass 
production in the factories is technically superior to primitive 
peasant industry, owing to a higher degree of specialisation, 
scientific analysis and management of the productive process, 
improved machinery and access to international resources of 
raw materials. In reality, however, the process of separating 
agriculture and industry is determined by factors such as 
oppressive taxation, war, or squandering and monopolisation of 
the nation's land, and thus belongs to the spheres of political 
power and criminal law no less than with economics. 

Nowhere has this process been brought to such perfection as 
in the United States. In the wake of the railways, financed by 
European and in particular British capital, the American farmer 
crossed the Union from East to West and in his progress over 
vast areas killed off the Red Indians with fire-arms and blood- 
hounds, liquor and venereal disease, pushing the survivors to 
the West, in order to appropriate the land they had 'vacated', 
to clear it and bring it under the plough. The American farmer, 
the 'backwoodsman' of the good old times before the War of 
Secession, was very different indeed from his modern counter- 
part. There was hardly anything he could not do, and he led 
a practically self-sufficient life on his isolated farm. 

In the beginning of the nineties, one of the leaders of the 
Farmers' Alliance, Senator Peffer, wrote as follows: 'The Ameri- 
can farmer of to-day is altogether a different sort of man from 
his ancestor of fifty or a hundred years ago. A great many men 
and women now living remember when farmers were largely 
manufacturers; that is to say, they made a great many imple- 
ments for their own use. Every farmer had an assortment of 
tools with which he made wooden implements, as forks and 

^ Admittedly, this relation is reversed in the last stages of the history of 
peasant economy when capitalist production has made its full impact. Once 
the small peasants are ruined, the entire work of farming frequently devolves 
on the women, old people and children, while the men are made to work for 
their living for capitalist entrepreneurs in the domestic industries or as 
wage-slaves in the factories. A typical instance is the small peasant in 
Wucrttcmbcrg. 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST PEASANT ECONOMY 

rakes, handles for his hoes and ploughs, spokes for his wagon, 
and various other implements made wholly out of wood. Then 
the farmer produced flax and hemp and wool and cotton. These 
fibres were prepared upon the farm; they were spun into yarn, 
woven into cloth, made into garments, and worn at home. 
Every farm had upon it a little shop for wood and iron work, 
and in the dwelling were cards and looms; carpets were woven, 
bed-clothing of different sorts was prepared; upon every farm 
geese were kept, their feathers used for supplying the home 
demand with beds and pillows, the surplus being disposed of at 
the nearest market town. During the winter season wheat and 
flour and corn meal were carried in large wagons drawn by 
teams of six to eight horses a hundred or two hundred miles to 
market, and traded for farm supplies for the next year — 
groceries and dry goods. Besides this, mechanics were scattered 
among the farmers. The farm wagon was in process of building 
a year or two; the material was found near the shop; the char- 
acter of the timber to be used was stated in the contract; it had 
to be procured in a certain season and kept in the drying process 
a length of time specified, so that when the material was brought 
together in proper form and the wagon made, both parties to 
the contract knew where every stick of it came from, and how 
long it had been in seasoning. During winter time the neigh- 
bourhood carpenter prepared sashes and blinds and doors and 
moulding and cornices for the next season's building. When the 
frosts of autumn came the shoemaker repaired to the dwellings 
of the farmers and there, in a corner set apart to him, he made 
up shoes for the family during the winter. All these things were 
done among the farmers, and a large part of the expense was 
paid with products of the farm. When winter approached, the 
butchering season was at hand; meat for family use during the 
next year was prepared and preserved in the smoke house. The 
orchards supplied fruit for cider, for apple butter, and for pre- 
serves of different kinds, amply sufficient to supply the wants of 
the family during the year, with some to spare. Wheat was 
threshed, a little at a time, just enough to supply the needs of the 
family for ready money, and not enough to make it necessary 
to waste one stalk of straw. Everything was saved and put to use. 
One of the results of that sort of economy was that compara- 
tively a very small amount of money was required to conduct 

397 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

the business of farming. A hundred dollars average probably 
was as much as the largest farmers of that day needed in the 
way of cash to meet the demands of their farm work, paying for 
hired help, repairs of tools, and all other incidental expenses.'^ 

This Arcadian life was to come to a sudden end after the 
War of Secession. The war had burdened the Union with an 
enormous National Debt, amounting to ^1,200,000, and in 
consequence the taxes were considerably increased. On the 
other hand, a feverish development of modern traffic and in- 
dustry, machine-building in particular, was encouraged by the 
imposition of higher protective tariffs. The railway companies 
were endowed with public lands on an imposing scale, in order 
to promote railroad construction and farm-settlements: in 1867 
alone, they were given more than 192,500,000 acres, and so the 
permanent way grew at an unprecedented rate. In i860 it 
amounted to less than 31,000 miles, in 1870 it had grown to 
more than 53,000 miles and in 1880 to more than 93,000 miles. 
(During the same period — 1870- 1880 — the permanent way in 
Europe had grown from 80,000 miles to 100,000 miles.) The rail- 
ways and speculations in land made for mass emigration from 
Europe to the United States, and more than 4! million people 
immigrated in the twenty- three years from 1869 to 1892. In this 
way, the Union gradually became emancipated from European, 
and in particular from British, industry; factories were set up 
in the States and home industries developed for the production 
of textiles, iron, steel and machinery. The process of revolu- 
tionary transformation was most rapid in agriculture. The 
emancipation of the slaves had compelled the Southern planters 
to introduce the steam plough shortly after the Civil War, and 
new farms had sprung up in the West in the wake of the rail- 
ways, which from the very beginning employed the most 
modern machinery and technique. 

'The improvements are rapidly revolutionising the agricul- 
ture of the West, and reducing to the lowest minimum ever 
attained, the proportion of manual labour employed in its 
operations. . . . Coincident with this application of mechanics 

^ W. A. Peffer, The Farmer's Side. His Troubles and Their Remedy (New 
York, 1 891), Part ii, 'How We Got Here', chap, i, 'Changed Conditions of 
the Farmer', pp. 56-7. Cf. also A. M. Simmons, 77?^ American Farmer (2nd 
edition, Chicago, 1906), pp. 74 ff. 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST PEASANT ECONOMY 

to agriculture, systematic and enlarged business aptitudes have 
also sought alliance with this noble art. Farms of thousands of 
acres have been managed with greater skill, a more economical 
adaptation of means to ends, and with a larger margin of real 
profit than many others of 80 acres. '^ 

During this time, direct and indirect taxation had increased 
enormously. On June 30, 1864, during the Civil War, a new 
finance bill was passed which is the basis of the present system 
of taxation, and which raised taxes on consumption and income 
to a staggering degree. This heavy war levy served as a pretext 
for a real orgy of protective tariffs in order to offset the tax on 
home production by customs duties. ^ Messrs. Morrill, Stevens 
and the other gentlemen who advanced the war as a lever for 
enforcing their protectionist programme, initiated the practice 
of wielding the implement of a customs policy quite openly and 
cynically to further private profiteering interests of all descrip- 
tions. Any home producer who appeared before the legislative 
assembly with a request for any kind of special tariff to fill his 
own pocket saw his demands readily granted, and the tariff 
rates were made as high as any interested party might wish. 

'The war', writes the American Taussig, 'had in many ways a 
bracing and ennobling influence on our national life; but its 
immediate effect on business affairs, and on all legislation 
affecting moneyed interests, was demoralising. The line between 
public duty and private interests was often lost sight of by 
legislators. Great fortunes were made by changes in legislation 
urged and brought about by those who were benefited by 
them, and the country has seen with sorrow that the honour and 
honesty of public men did not remain undefiled.'^ 

^ Report of the U.S.A. Commissioner of Agriculture for the year 1867 
(Washington, 1868). Quoted by Lafargue: Getreidebau und Getreidehandel in 
den Vereinigten Staaten in Die Neue Zeit (1885), p. 344. This essay on grain 
cuhivation and the grain trade in the U.S.A. was first pubhshed in a 
Russian periodical in 1883. 

2 'The three Revenue Acts of June 30, 1864, practically formed one 
measure, and that probably the greatest measure of taxation which the 
world has seen. . . . The Internal Revenue Act was arranged, as Mr. 
David A. Wells has said, on the principle of the Irishman at Donnybrook 
Fair: "whenever you see a head, hit it, whenever you see a commodity, tax 
it" ' (F. W. Taussig, The Tariff History of the United States (New York- 
London, 1888), pp. 163-4). 

^ Ibid., pp. 166-7. 

399 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

This customs bill which completely revolutionised the coun- 
try's economic life, and remained in force unchanged for twenty 
years, was literally pushed through Congress in three days, and 
through the Senate in two, without criticism, without debate, 
without any opposition whatever.^ Down to the present day it 
forms the basis of U.S. customs legislation. 

This shift in U.S. fiscal policy ushered in an era of the most 
brazen parliamentary log-rolling and of undisguised and un- 
restrained corruption of elections, of the legislature and the 
press to satisfy the greed of Big Business. 'Enrichissez-vous' became 
the catchword of public life after the 'noble war' to liberate 
mankind from the 'blot of slavery'. On the stock exchange, the 
Yankee negro-liberator sought his fortunes in orgies of specu- 
lation; in Congress, he endowed himself with public lands, 
enriched himself by customs and taxes, by monopolies, fraudu- 
lent shares and theft of public funds. Industry prospered. Gone 
were the times when the small or medium farmer required 
hardly any money, when he could thresh and turn into cash his 
wheat reserves as the need arose. Now he was chronically in need 
of money, a lot of money, to pay his taxes. Soon he was forced to 
sell all his produce and to buy his requirements from the manu- 
facturers in the form of ready-made goods. As Peffer puts it: 

'Coming from that time to the present, we find that every- 
thing nearly has been changed. All over the West particularly 
the farmer threshes his wheat all at one time, he disposes of 
it all at one time, and in a great many instances the straw is 
wasted. He sells his hogs, and buys bacon and pork; he sells 
his cattle, and buys fresh beef and canned beef or corned beef, 
as the case may be; he sells his fruit, and buys it back in cans. 
If he raises flax at all, instead of putting it into yarn and making 
gowns for his children, as he did fifty years or more ago, he 
threshes his flax, sells the seed, and burns the straw. Not more 
than one farmer in fifty now keeps sheep at all; he relies upon 
the large sheep farmer for the wool, which is put into cloth or 
clothing ready for his use. Instead of having clothing made up 
on the farm in his own house or by a neighbour woman or 
country tailor a mile away, he cither purchases his clothing 

^ 'The necessity of the situation, the critical state of the country, the 
urgent need of revenue, may have justified this haste, which, it is safe to say, 
is unexampled in the history of civilised countries' (Taussig, op. cit., p. i68). 

400 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST PEASANT ECONOMY 

ready made at the nearest town, or he buys the cloth and has a 
city tailor make it up for him. Instead of making implements 
which he uses about the farm — forks, rakes, etc, — he goes to 
town to purchase even a handle for his axe or his mallet; he 
purchases twine and rope and all sorts of needed material made 
of fibres; he buys his cloth and his clothing; he buys his canned 
fruit and preserved fruit; he buys hams and shoulders and mess 
pork and mess beef; indeed, he buys nearly everything now that 
he produced at one time himself, and these things all cost 
money. Besides all this, and what seems stranger than anything 
else, whereas in the earlier time the American home was a free 
home, unencumbered, not one case in a thousand where a 
home was mortgaged to secure the payment of borrowed money, 
and whereas but a small amount of money was then needed for 
actual use in conducting the business of farming, there was 
always enough of it among the farmers to supply the demand. 
Now, when at least ten times as much is needed, there is little or 
none to be obtained, nearly half the farms are mortgaged for as 
much as they are worth, and interest rates are exorbitant. As to 
the cause of such wonderful changes . . . the manufacturer came 
with his woollen mill, his carding mill, his broom factory, his 
rope factory, his wooden-ware factory, his cotton factory, his 
pork-packing establishment, his canning factory and fruit pre- 
serving houses; the little shop on the farm has given place to the 
large shop in town; the wagon-maker's shop in the neighbour- 
hood has given way to the large establishment in the city where 
... a hundred or two hundred wagons are made in a week; 
the shoemaker's shop has given way to large establishments in 
the cities where most of the work is done by machines.'^ 

Finally, the agricultural labour of the farmer himself has 
become machine work: 'He ploughs and sows and reaps with 
machines. A machine cuts his wheat and puts it in a sheaf, and 
steam drives his threshers. He may read the morning paper 
while he ploughs and sit under an awning while he reaps. '^ 

Sering estimated in the middle eighties that the necessary 
cash 'for a very modest beginning' of the smallest farm in the 
North West is ^^240 to ;^28o.3 

^ PefFer, op. cit., pp. 58 ff. 2 ibid., p. 6. 

^ 'Agricultural Competition in North America' {Die landwirtschaftliche 
Konkurrenz Nordamerikas) Leipzig, 1887, p. 431. 

401 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

This revolution of American agriculture after the 'Great War' 
was not the end. It was only the beginning of the whirlpool in 
which the farmer was caught. His history brings us automati- 
cally to the second phase of the development of capitalist 
accumulation of which it is an excellent illustration. — Natural 
economy, the production for personal needs and the close 
connection between industry and agriculture must be ousted 
and a simple commodity economy substituted for them. Capit- 
alism needs the medium of commodity production for its 
development, as a market for its surplus value. But as soon as 
simple commodity production has superseded natural economy, 
capital must turn against it. No sooner has capital called it 
to life, than the two must compete for means of production, 
labour power, and markets. The first aim of capitalism is to 
isolate the producer, to sever the community ties which protect 
him, and the next task is to take the means of production away 
from the small manufacturer. 

In the American Union, as we have seen, the 'Great War' 
inaugurated an era of large-scale seizure of public lands by 
monopolist capitalist companies and individual speculators. 
Feverish railroad building and ever more speculation in railway 
shares led to a mad gamble in land, where individual soldiers 
of fortune and companies netted immense fortunes and even 
entire counties. In addition a veritable swarm of agents lured 
the vast flow of emigrants from Europe to the U.S.A. by blatant 
and unscrupulous advertising, deceptions and pretences of 
every description. These immigrants first settled in the Eastern 
States along the Atlantic seaboard, and, with the growth of 
industry in these states, agriculture was driven westward. The 
'wheat centre' which had been near Columbus, Ohio, in 1850, 
in the course of the subsequent fifty years shifted to a position 
99 miles further North and 680 miles further West. Whereas in 
1850 51-4 per cent of the total wheat crop had been supplied 
by the Eastern States, in 1880 they produced only 13-6 per cent, 
71-7 per cent being supplied by the Northern Central and 9 per 
cent by the Western States. 

In 1825, the Congress of the Union under Monroe had 
decided to transplant the Red Indians from the East to the West 
of the Mississippi. The redskins put up a desperate resistance; 
but all who survived the slaughter of forty Red Indian cam- 

402 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST PEASANT ECONOMY 

paigns were swept away like so much rubbish and driven Hke 
cattle to the West to be folded in reservations like so many sheep. 
The Red Indian had been forced to make room for the farmer 
— and now the farmer in his turn was driven beyond the 
Mississippi to make way for capital. 

Following the railway tracks, the American farmer moved 
West and North- West into the land of promise which the great 
land speculators' agents had painted for him in glowing colours. 
Yet the most fertile and most favourably situated lands were 
retained by the companies who farmed them extensively on 
completely capitalistic lines. All around the farmer who had 
been exiled into the wilderness, a dangerous competitor and 
deadly enemy sprang up — the 'bonanza farms', the great capit- 
alist agricultural concerns which neither the Old World nor the 
New had known before. Here surplus value was produced with 
the application of all the resources known to modern science 
and technology. 

'As the foremost representative of financial agriculture we 
may consider Oliver Dalrymple, whose name is to-day known 
on both sides of the Atlantic. Since 1874 he has simultaneously 
managed a line of steamers on the Red River and six farms 
owned by a company of financiers and comprising some 75,000 
acres. Each one is divided into departments of 2,000 acres, 
and every department is again subdivided into three sections 
of 667 acres which are run by foremen and gangleaders. 
Barracks to shelter 50 men and stable as many horses and mules, 
are built on each section, and similarly kitchens, machine sheds 
and workshops for blacksmiths and locksmiths. Each section is 
completely equipped with 20 pairs of horses, 8 double ploughs, 
12 horse-drawn drill-ploughs, 12 steel-toothed harrows, 12 
cutters and binders, 2 threshers and 16 wagons. Everything is 
done to ensure that the machines and the living labour (men, 
horses and mules) are in good condition and able to do the 
greatest possible amount of work. There is a telephone line 
connecting all sections and the central management. 

'The six farms of 75,000 acres are cultivated by an army of 
600 workers, organised on military lines. During the harvest, the 
management hires another 500 to 600 auxiliary workers, assign- 
ing them to the various sections. After the work is completed in 
the fall, the workers are dismissed with the exception of the 

403 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

foreman and lo men per section. In some farms in Dakota and 
Minnesota, horses and mules do not spend the winter at the 
place of work. As soon as the stubble has been ploughed in, they 
are driven in teams of a hundred or two hundred pairs 900 
miles to the. South, to return only the following spring. 

'Mechanics on horseback follow the ploughing, sowing and 
harvesting machines when they are at work. If anything goes 
wrong, they gallop to the machine in question, repair it and get 
it moving again without delay. The harvested corn is carried 
to the threshing machines which work day and night without 
interruption. They are stoked with bundles of straw fed into the 
stokehold through pipes of sheet-iron. The corn is threshed, 
winnowed, weighed and filled into sacks by machinery, then it 
is put into railway trucks which run alongside the farm, and goes 
to Duluth or Buffalo. Every year, Dalrymple increases his land 
under seed by 5,800 acres. In 1880 it amounted to 25,000 acres.^ 

In the late seventies, there were already individual capitalists 
and companies who owned 35,000-45,000 acres of wheat land. 
Since the time of Lafargue's writing, extensive capitalist agricul- 
ture in America has made great strides in technique and the 
employment of machinery. ^ 

1 Lafargue, op. cit., p. 345. 

2 The Thirteenth Annual Report of the Commissioner of Labour (Wash- 
ington, 1899) tables the advantages of machinery methods over hand 
methods so far achieved as follows: 





Labour time per unit 


Type of work 


Machine 


Hand 




hrs. 


min. 


hrs. 


min. 


Planting small corn 


— 


327 


ID 


55 


Harvesting and threshing small corn 


I 




46 


40 


Planting corn 


— 


37-5 


6 


15 


Cutting corn 


3 


4-5 


5 


— 


Shelling corn 


— 


3-6 


66 


40 


Planting cotton 


I 


3 


8 


48 


Cultivating cotton 


12 


5 


60 


— 


Mowing grass (scythe v. mower) 


I 


0-6 


7 


20 


Harvesting and baling hay 


1 1 


3-4 


35 


30 


Planting potatoes 


I 


2-5 


15 


— 


Planting tomatoes 


I 


4 


10 


— 


Cultivating and harvesting tomatoes 


134 


5-2 


324 


20 



404 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST PEASANT ECONOMY 

The American farmer could not successfully compete with 
such capitalist enterprises. At a time when the general revolu- 
tion in the conditions of finance, production and transport com- 
pelled him to give up production for personal needs and to 
produce exclusively for the market, the great spreading of 
agriculture caused a heavy fall in the prices of agricultural 
products. And at the precise moment when farming became 
dependent on the market, the agricultural market of the Union 
was suddenly turned from a local one into a world market, and 
became a prey to the wild speculations of a few capitalist 
mammoth concerns. 

In 1879, a notable year for the history of agricultural con- 
ditions in Europe as well as in America, there began the mass 
export of wheat from the U.S.A. to Europe.^ 

Big Business was of course the only one to profit from this 
expanding market. The small farmer was crushed by the com- 
petition of an increasing number of extensive farms and became 
the prey of speculators who bought up his corn to exert pressure 

^ Wheat exports from the Union to Europe: 

Tear Million bushels Tear Million bushels 

1868-9 17-9 1885-6 577 

1874-5 71-8 1 890- 1 55-1 

1879-80 i53"2 1899-1900 loi-g 

(Juraschek's Uebersichten der Weltwirtschaft, vol. vii, part i, p. 32). 

Simultaneously, the price per bushel wheat loco farm (in cents) declined as 
follows: 

1870-9 105 1896 73 

1880-9 83 1897 81 

1895 51 1898 58 

Since 1899, when it had reached the low level of 58 cents per bushel, the 
price is moving up again: 

1900 62 1903 78 

1901 62 1904 92 

1902 63 
(Ibid., p. 18). 

According to the 'Monthly Returns on External Trade' {Monatliche Nach- 
weise über den Auswärtigen Handel), the price (in marks) per 1,000 kg., was in 
June 1912: 

Berlin 227-82 London 170-96 

New York 178-08 Odessa i73'94 

Mannheim 247-93 Paris 243-69 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

on the world market. Helpless in the face of the immense capit- 
alist powers, the farmer got into debt — a phenomenon typical 
for a declining peasant economy. In 1890, Secretary Rusk of 
the U.S. Department of Agriculture sent out a circular letter 
with reference to the desperate position of the farmers, saying: 

'The burden of mortgages upon farms, homes, and land, is 
unquestionably discouraging in the extreme, and while in some 
cases no doubt this load may have been too readily assumed, 
still in the majority of cases the mortgage has been the result 
of necessity. . . . These mortgages . . . drawing high rates of 
interest . . . have to-day, in the face of continued depression of 
the prices of staple products, become very irksome, and in many 
cases threaten the farmer with loss of home and land. It is a 
question of grave difficulty to all those who seek to remedy the 
ills from which our farmers are suffering. At present prices the 
farmer finds that it takes more of his products to get a dollar 
wherewith to buy back the dollar which he borrowed than it 
did when he borrowed it. The interest accumulates, while the 
payment of the principal seems utterly hopeless, and the very 
depression which we are discussing makes the renewal of the 
mortgage most difficult.'^ 

According to the census of May 29, 1891, 2-5 million farms 
were deep in debt; two-thirds of them were managed by the 
owners whose obligations amounted to nearly ^^440,000. 

'The situation is this: farmers are passing through the "valley 
and shadow of death"; farming as a business is profitless; values 
of farm products have fallen 50 per cent since the great war, and 
farm values have depreciated 25 to 50 per cent during the last 
ten years; farmers are overwhelmed with debts secured by mort- 
gages on their homes, unable in many instances to pay even the 
interest as it falls due, and unable to renew the loans because 
securities are weakening by reason of the general depression; 
many farmers are losing their homes under this dreadful blight, 
and the mortgage mill still grinds. We are in the hands of a 
merciless power; the people's homes are at stake.'^ 

Encumbered with debts and close to ruin, the farmer had no 
option but to supplement his earnings by working for a wage, or 
else to abandon his farm altogether. Provided it had not yet 

^ Peffer, op. cit., part i, 'Where We Arc', chap, ii, 'Progress of Agricul- 
ture', pp. 30- 1 . 2 Ibid., p. 4. 

406 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST PEASANT ECONOMY 

fallen into the clutches of his creditors like so many thousands of 
farms, he could shake from off his feet the dust of the 'land of 
promise' that had become an inferno for him. In the middle 
eighties, abandoned and decaying farms could be seen every- 
where. In 1887, Sering wrote: 

'If the farmer cannot pay his debts to date, the interest he has 
to pay is increased to 12, 15 or even 20 per cent. He is pressed 
by the banker, the machine salesman and the grocer who rob 
him of the fruits of his hard work . . . He can either remain on 
the farm as a tenant or move further West, to try his fortunes 
elsewhere. Nowhere in North America have I found so many 
indebted, disappointed and depressed farmers as in the wheat 
regions of the North Western prairies. I have not spoken to a 
single farmer in Dakota who would not have been prepared to 
sell his farm.^ 

'The Commissioner of Agriculture of Vermont in 1889 re- 
ported a wide-spread desertion of farm-lands of that state. He 
wrote: "... there appears to be no doubt about there being in 
this state large tracts of tillable unoccupied lands, which can be 
bought at a price approximating the price of Western lands, 
situated near school and church, and not far from railroad 
facilities. The Commissioner has not visited all of the counties 
in the State where these lands are reported, but he has visited 
enough to satisfy him that, while much of the unoccupied and 
formerly cultivated land is now practically worthless for cultiva- 
tion, yet very much of it can be made to yield a liberal reward 
to intelligent labour." '^ 

The Commissioner of the State of New Hampshire issued a 
pamphlet in 1890, devoting 67 pages to the description of farms 
for sale at the lowest figures. He describes 1442 farms with 
tenantable buildings, abandoned only recently. The same has 
happened in other districts. Thousands of acres once raising 
corn and wheat are left untilled and run to brush and wood. 

In order to resettle the deserted land, speculators engaged in 
advertising campaigns and attracted crowds of new immigrants 
— new victims who were to suffer their predecessors' fate even 
more speedily. 

A private letter says: 'In the neighbourhood of railroads and 
markets, there remains no common land. It is all in the hands 

^ Sering, op. cit., p. 433. 2 Peffer, op. cit., pp. 34 f. 

407 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

of the speculators. A settler takes over vacant land and counts 
for a farmer; but the management of his farm hardly assures 
his livelihood, and he cannot possibly compete with the big 
farmer. He tills as much of his land as the law compels him to 
do, but to make a comfortable living, he must look for additional 
sources of income outside agriculture. In Oregon, for instance, 
I have met a settler who owned i6o acres for five years, but 
every summer, until the end of July, he worked twelve hours a 
day for a dollar a day at road-making. This man, of course, also 
counts as one of the five million farmers in the 1890 census. 
Again, in the County of Eldorado, I saw many farmers who 
cultivated their land only to feed their cattle and themselves. 
There would have been no profit in producing for the market, 
and their chief income derives from gold-digging, the felling and 
selling of timber, etc. These people are prosperous, but it is not 
agriculture which makes them so. Two years ago, we worked 
in Long Canon, Eldorado County, living in a cabin on an allot- 
ment. The owner of this allotment came home only once a year 
for a couple of days, and worked the rest of the time on the 
railway in Sacramento. Some years ago, a small part of the 
allotment was cultivated, to comply with the law, but now it is 
left completely untilled. A few acres are fenced off with wire, 
and there is a log cabin and a shed. But during the last years 
all this stands empty; a neighbour has the key and he made us 
free of the hut. In the course of our journey, we saw many 
deserted allotments, where attempts at farming had been made. 
Three years ago I was offered a farm with dwelling house for 
a hundred dollars, but in a short time the unoccupied house 
collapsed under the snow. In Oregon, we saw many derelict 
farms with small dwelling houses and vegetable gardens. One 
we visited was beautifully made: a sturdy block house, fashioned 
by a master-builder, and some equipment; but the farmer 
had abandoned it all. You were welcome to take it all without 
charge.'^ 

Where could the ruined American farmer turn? He set out 
on a pilgrimage to follow the wheat centre and the railways. 
The former had shifted in the main to Canada, the Saskat- 
chewan and the Mackenzie River where wheat can still thrive 
on the 62nd parallel. A number of American farmers followed 
^ Quoted by Nikolayoii, op. cit., p. 224. 
408 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST PEASANT ECONOMY 

— and after some time in Canada, they suffered the old fate.^ 
During recent years, Canada has entered the world market as 
a wheat-exporting country, but her agriculture is dominated to 
an even greater extent by big capital than elsewhere. ^ 

In Canada, public lands were lavished upon private capit- 
alist companies on an even more monstrous scale than in the 
United States. Under the Charter of the Canadian Pacific Rail- 
way Company with its grant of land, private capital perpetrated 
an unprecedented act of robbing the public. Not only that the 
company was guaranteed a twenty years' monopoly of railway- 
building, not only that it got a building site of about 713 miles 
free of charge, not only that it got a 100 years' state guarantee 
of the 3 per cent interest on the share capital of £m. 20 — to 
crown it all, the company was given the choice of 25 million 
acres out of the most fertile and favourably situated lands, not 
necessarily in the immediate vicinity of the permanent way, as 
a free gift. All future settlers on this vast area were thus at the 
mercy of railway capital from the very outset. The railway 
company, in its turn, immediately proceeded to sell off 5 million 
acres for ready cash to the North- West Land Company, an 

^ 49,199 people immigrated to Canada in 1902. In 19 12, the number of 
immigrants was more than 400,000 — ^138,000 of them British, and 134,000 
American. According to a report from Montreal, the influx of American 
farmers continued into the spring of the present year [1912]. 

^ 'Travelling in the West of Canada, I have visited only one farm of less 
than a thousand acres. According to the census of the Dominion of Canada, 
in 1 88 1, when the census was taken, no more than 9,077 farmers occupied 
2,384,337 acres of land between them; accordingly, the share of an in- 
dividual (farmer) amounted to no less than 2,047 acres — in no state of the 
Union is the average anywhere near that' (Sering, op. cit., p. 376). In 
the early eighties, farming on a large scale was admittedly not very 
widely spread in Canada. But already in 1887, Sering describes the 'Bell 
Farm', owned by a limited company, which comprised no fewer than 
56,700 acres, and was obviously modelled on the pattern of the Dalrymple 
farm. In the eighties, Sering, who regarded the prospects of Canadian com- 
petition with some scepticism, put the 'fertile belt' of Western Canada at 
three-fifths of the entire acreage of Germany, and estimated that actually 
only 38,400,000 acres of this were arable land, and no more than 15,000,000 
acres at best were prospective wheat land (Sering, op. cit., pp. 337-8). The 
Manitoba Free Press in June 1912, worked out that in summer, 19 12, 
11,200,000 acres were sown with spring wheat in Canada, as against 
19,200,000 acres under spring wheat in the United States. (Cf Berliner Tage- 
blatt, Handels Zeitung, No. 305, June 18, 1912.) 

409 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

association of British capitalists under the chairmanship of the 
Duke of Manchester. The second group of capitaHsts which was 
Hberally endowed with pubHc lands was the Hudson Bay Com- 
pany, which was given a title to no less than one-twentieth of 
all the lands between Lake Winnipeg, the U.S. border, the 
Rocky Mountains, and Northern Saskatchewan, for renouncing 
their privileges in the North-West. Between them, these two 
capitalist groups had gained possession of five-ninths of all the 
land that could be settled. A considerable part of the other lands 
was assigned by the State to 26 capitalist 'colonising companies'. ^ 
Thus the Canadian farmer was practically everywhere ensnared 
by capital and capitalist speculation. And still mass immigration 
continued — not only from Europe, but also from the United 
States! 

These are the characteristics of capitalist domination on an 
international scale. Having evicted the peasant from his soil, it 
drives him from England to the East of the United States, and 
from there to the West, and on the ruins of the Red Indians' 
economy it transforms him back into a small commodity pro- 
ducer. Then, when he is ruined once more, he is driven from the 
West to the North. With the railways in the van, and ruin in the 
rear — capital leads the way, its passage is marked with universal 
destruction. The great fall of prices in the nineties is again 
succeeded by higher prices for agricultural products, but this 
is of no more avail to the small American farmer than to the 
European peasant. 

Yet the numbers of farmers are constantly swelling. In the 
last decade of the nineteenth century they had grown from 
4,600,000 to 5,700,000, and the following ten years still saw an 
absolute increase. The aggregate value of farms had during the 
same period risen from ;{^ 150,240,000 to ;;(^330,36o,ooo.2 We 
might have expected the general increase in the price of farm 
produce to have helped the farmer to come into his own. But 
that is not so; we see that the growing numbers of tenant farmers 
outstrip the increase in the farming population as a whole. In 
1880, the proportion of tenant farmers amounted to 25-5 per 
cent of the total number of farmers in the Union, in 1890 it was 

^ Sering, op. cit., pp. 361 ff. 

^ Ernst Schultze, '^Das Wirtschaftsleben der Vereinigten Staaten', Jahrb. f. 
Gesetzg-, Verw. u. Volkswirtschaft igi2, no. 17, p. 1724. 

410 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST PEASANT ECONOMY 

28-4 per cent, in 1900 35-3 per cent, and in 1910 372 per 
cent. 

Though prices for farm produce were rising, the tenant farmer 
was more and more rapidly stepping into the shoes of the in- 
dependent farmer. And although much more than one-third of 
all farmers in the Union are now tenant farmers, their social 
status in the United States is that of the agricultural labourer in 
Europe. Constantly fluctuating, they are indeed wage-slaves of 
capital; they work very hard to create wealth for capital, getting 
nothing in return but a miserable and precarious existence. 

In quite a different historical setting, in South Africa, the 
same process shows up even more clearly the 'peaceful methods' 
by which capital competes with the small commodity producer. 

In the Cape Colony and the Boer Republics, pure peasant 
economy prevailed until the sixties of the last century. For a 
long time the Boers had led the life of animal-tending nomads; 
they had killed off or driven out the Hottentots and Kaffirs with 
a will in order to deprive them of their most valuable pastures. 
In the eighteenth century they were given invaluable assistance 
by the plague, imported by ships of the East India Company, 
which frequently did away with entire Hottentot tribes whose 
lands then fell to the Dutch immigrants. When the Boers spread 
further East, they came in conflict with the Bantu tribes and 
initiated the long period of the terrible Kaffir wars. These god- 
fearing Dutchmen regarded themselves as the Chosen People 
and took no small pride in their old-fashioned Puritan morals 
and their intimate knowledge of the Old Testament; yet, not 
content with robbing the natives of their land, they built their 
peasant economy like parasites on the backs of the Negroes, 
compelling them to do slave-labour for them and corrupting 
and enervating them deliberately and systematically. Liquor 
played such an important part in this process, that the pro- 
hibition of spirits in the Cape Colony could not be carried 
through by the English government because of Puritan opposi- 
tion. There were no railways until 1859, and Boer economy in 
general and on the whole remained patriarchal and based on 
natural economy until the sixties. But their patriarchal attitude 
did not deter the Boers from extreme brutality and harshness. 
It is well known that Livingstone complained much more about 
the Boers than about the Kaffirs. The Boers considered the 

411 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

Negroes an object, destined by God and Nature to slave 
for them, and as such an indispensable foundation of their 
peasant economy. So much so that their answer to the aboli- 
tion of slavery in the English colonies in 1836 was the 'Great 
Trek', although there the owners had been compensated with 
^3,000,000. By way of the Orange River and Vaal, the Boers 
emigrated from the Cape Colony, and in the process they drove 
the Matabele to the North, across the Limpopo, setting them 
against the Makalakas. Just as the American farmer had driven 
the Red Indian West before him under the impact of capitalist 
economy, so the Boer drove the Negro to the North. The 'Free 
Republics' between the Orange River and the Limpopo thus 
were created as a protest against the designs of the English 
bourgeoisie on the sacred right of slavery. The tiny peasant 
republics were in constant guerilla warfare against the Bantu 
Negroes. And it was on the backs of the Negroes that the battle 
between the Boers and the English government, which went on 
for decades, was fought. The Negro question, i.e. the emancipa- 
tion of the Negroes, ostensibly aimed at by the English bour- 
geoisie, served as a pretext for the conflict between England and 
the republics. In fact, peasant economy and great capitalist 
colonial policy were here competing for the Hottentots and 
Kaffirs, that is to say for their land and their labour power. 
Both competitors had precisely the same aim: to subject, expel 
or destroy the coloured peoples, to appropriate their land and 
press them into service by the abolition of their social organisa- 
tions. Only their methods of exploitation were fundamentally 
different. While the Boers stood for out-dated slavery on a petty 
scale, on which their patriarchal peasant economy was founded, 
the British bourgeoisie represented modern large-scale capitalist 
exploitation of the land and the natives. The Constitution of the 
Transvaal (South African) Republic declared with crude pre- 
judice: 'The People shall not permit any equality of coloured 
persons with white inhabitants, neither in the Church nor in the 
State.'i 

In the Orange Free State and in the Transvaal no Negro was 
allowed to own land, to travel without papers or to walk abroad 
after sunset. Bryce tells us of a case where a farmer, an English- 
man as it happened, in the Eastern Cape Colony had flogged 

^ Article 9. 
412 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST PEASANT ECONOMY 

his Kaffir slave to death. When he was acquitted in open court, 
his neighbours escorted him home to the strains of music. The 
white man frequently maltreated his free native labourers after 
they had done their work — to such an extent that they would 
take to flight, thus saving the master their wages. 

The British government employed precisely the opposite 
tactics. For a long time it appeared as protector of the natives; 
flattering the chieftains in particular, it supported their autho- 
rity and tried to make them claim a right of disposal over their 
land. Wherever it was possible, it gave them ownership of tribal 
land, according to well-tried methods, although this flew in the 
face of tradition and of the actual social organisation of the 
Negroes. All tribes in fact held their land communally, and even 
the most cruel and despotic rulers such as the Matabele Chief- 
tain Lobengula merely had the right as well as the duty to allot 
every family a piece of land which they could only retain so 
long as they cultivated it. The ultimate purpose of the British 
government was clear: long in advance it was preparing for 
land robbery on a grand scale, using the native chieftains them- 
selves as tools. But in the beginning it was content with the 
'pacification' of the Negroes by extensive military actions. Up 
to 1879 were fought 9 bloody Kaffir wars to break the resistance 
of the Bantus. 

British capital revealed its real intentions only after two im- 
portant events had taken place: the discovery of the Kimberley 
diamond fields in 1869-70, and the discovery of the gold mines 
in the Transvaal in 1882-5, which initiated a new epoch in the 
history of South Africa. Then the British South Africa Company, 
that is to say Cecil Rhodes, went into action. Public opinion in 
England rapidly swung over, and the greed for the treasures 
of South Africa urged the British government on to drastic 
measures. South Africa was suddenly flooded with immigrants 
who had hitherto only appeared in small numbers — immigra- 
tion having been deflected to the United States. But with the 
discovery of the diamond and gold fields, the numbers of white 
people in the South African colonies grew by leaps and bounds: 
between 1885 and 1895, 100,000 British had immigrated into 
Witwatersrand alone. The modest peasant economy was forth- 
with pushed into the background — the mines, and thus the 
mining capital, coming to the fore. The policy of the British 

413 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

government veered round abruptly. Great Britain had recog- 
nised the Boer RepubHcs by the Sand River Agreement and the 
Treaty of Bloemfontein in the fifties. Now her political might 
advanced upon the tiny republics from every side, occupying 
all neighbouring districts and cutting off all possibility of expan- 
sion. At the same time the Negroes, no longer protected 
favourites, were sacrificed. British capital was steadily forging 
ahead. In 1868, Britain took over the rule of Basutoland — only, 
of course, because the natives had 'repeatedly implored' her to 
do so.^ In 1 87 1, the Witwatersrand diamond fields, or West 
Griqualand, were seized from the Orange Free State and turned 
into a Crown Colony. In 187g, Zululand was subjected, later to 
become part of the Natal Colony; in 1885 followed the subjec- 
tion of Bechuanaland, to be joined to the Cape Colony. In 1888 
Britain took over Matabele and Mashonaland, and in 1889 
the British South Africa Company was given a Charter for both 
these districts, again, of course, only to oblige the natives and 
at their request.^ Between 1884 and 1887, Britain annexed St. 
Lucia Bay and the entire East Coast as far as the Portuguese 
possessions. In 1894, she subjected Tongaland. With their last 
strength, the Matabele and Mashona fought one more desperate 
battle, but the Company, with Rhodes at the head, first liqui- 
dated the rising in blood and at once proceeded to the well- 
tried measure for civilising and pacifying the natives: two large 
railways were built in the rebellious district. 

The Boer Republics were feeling increasingly uncomfortable 
in this sudden stranglehold, and their internal affairs as well 
were becoming completely disorganised. The overwhelming 
influx of immigrants and the rising tides of the frenzied new 

^ 'Moshesh, the great Basuto leader, to whose courage and statesmanship 
the Basutos owed their very existence as a people, was still alive at the time, 
but constant war with the Boers of the Orange Free State had brought him 
and his followers to the last stage of distress. Two thousand Basuto warriors 
had been killed, cattle had been carried off, native homes had been broken 
up and crops destroyed. The tribe was reduced to the position of starving 
refugees, and nothing could save them but the protection of the British 
government which they had repeatedly implored' (C. P. Lucas, A Historical 
Geography of the British Colonies, part ii, vol. iv (Geography of South and East 
Africa), Oxford, 1904, p. 39). 

2 'The Eastern section of the territory is Mashonaland where, with the 
permission of King Lobengula, who claimed it, the British South Africa 
Company first established themselves' (ibid., p. 72). 

414 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST PEASANT ECONOMY 

capitalist economy now threatened to burst the barriers of the 
small peasant states. There was indeed a blatant conflict be- 
tween agricultural and political peasant economy on the one 
hand, and the demands and requirements of the accumulation 
of capital on the other. In all respects, the republics were quite 
unable to cope with these new problems. The constant danger 
from the Kaffirs, no doubt regarded favourably by the British, 
the unwieldy, primitive administration, the gradual corruption 
of the volksraad in which the great capitalists got their way by 
bribery, lack of a police force to keep the undisciplined crowds 
of adventurers in some semblance of order, the absence of labour 
legislation for regulating and securing the exploitation of the 
Negroes in the mines, lack of water supplies and transport to 
provide for the colony of 100,000 immigrants that had suddenly 
sprung up, high protective tariffs which increased the cost of 
labour for the capitalists, and high freights for coal— all these 
factors combined towards the sudden and stunning bankruptcy 
of the peasant republics. 

They tried, obstinately and unimaginatively, to defend them- 
selves against the sudden eruption of capitalism which engulfed 
them, with an incredibly crude measure, such as only a stubborn 
and hide-bound peasant brain could have devised: they denied 
all civic rights to the uitlanders who outnumbered them by far 
and who stood for capital, power, and the trend of the time. 
In those critical times it was an ill-omened trick. The mis- 
management of the peasant republics caused a considerable 
reduction of dividends, on no account to be put up with. Mining 
capital had come to the end of its tether. The British South 
Africa Company built railroads, put down the Kaffirs, 
organised revolts of the uitlanders and finally provoked the Boer 
War. The bell had tolled for peasant economy. In the United 
States, the economic revolution had begun with a war, in South 
Africa war put the period to this chapter. Yet in both instances, 
the outcome was the same: capital triumphed over the small 
peasant economy which had in its turn come into being on the 
ruins of natural economy, represented by the natives' primitive 
organisations. The domination of capital was a foregone con- 
clusion, and it was just as hopeless for the Boer Republics to 
resist as it had been for the American farmer. Capital officially 
took over the reins in the new South African Union which 

415 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

replaced the small peasant republics by a great modern state, 
as envisaged by Cecil Rhodes' imperialist programme. The new 
conflict between capital and labour had superseded the old one 
between British and Dutch. One million white exploiters of 
both nations sealed their touching fraternal alliance within the 
Union with the civil and political disfranchisement of five 
million coloured workers. Not only the Negroes of the Boer 
Republics came away empty-handed, but the natives of the 
Cape Colony, whom the British government had at one time 
granted political equality, were also deprived of some of their 
rights. And this noble work, culminating under the imperialist 
policy of the Conservatives in open oppression, was actually to 
be finished by the Liberal Party itself, amid frenzied applause 
from the 'liberal cretins of Europe' who with sentimental pride 
took as proof of the still continuing creative vigour and greatness 
of English liberalism the fact that Britain had granted complete 
self-government and freedom to a handful of whites in South 
Africa. 

The ruin of independent craftsmanship by capitalist com- 
petition, no less painful for being soft-pedalled, deserves by 
rights a chapter to itself. The most sinister part of such a 
chapter would be out- work under capitalism; — but we need not 
dwell on these phenomena here. 

The general result of the struggle between capitalism and 
simple commodity production is this: after substituting com- 
modity economy for natural economy, capital takes the place of 
simple commodity economy. Non-capitalist organisations pro- 
vide a fertile soil for capitalism; more strictly: capital feeds on 
the ruins of such organisations, and although this non-capitalist 
milieu is indispensable for accumulation, the latter proceeds at 
the cost of this medium nevertheless, by eating it up. Histori- 
cally, the accumulation of capital is a kind of metabolism 
between capitalist economy and those pre-capitalist methods of 
production without which it cannot go on and which, in this 
light, it corrodes and assimilates. Thus capital cannot accumu- 
late without the aid of non-capitalist organisations, nor, on the 
other hand, can it tolerate their continued existence side by side 
with itself Only the continuous and progressive disintegration 
of non-capitalist organisations makes accumulation of capital 
possible. 

416 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST PEASANT ECONOMY 

The premises which are postulated in Marx's diagram of 
accumulation accordingly represent no more than the historical 
tendency of the movement of accumulation and its logical con- 
clusion. The accumulative process endeavours everywhere to 
substitute simple commodity economy for natural economy. 
Its ultimate aim, that is to say, is to establish the exclusive and 
universal domination of capitalist production in all countries 
and for all branches of industry. 

Yet this argument does not lead anywhere. As soon as this 
final result is achieved — in theory, of course, because it can 
never actually happen — accumulation must come to a stop. 
The realisation and capitalisation of surplus value become im- 
possible to accomplish. Just as soon as reality begins to corres- 
pond to Marx's diagram of enlarged reproduction, the end of 
accumulation is in sight, it has reached its limits, and capitalist 
production is in extremis. For capital, the standstill of accumu- 
lation means that the development of the productive forces is 
arrested, and the collapse of capitalism follows inevitably, as 
an objective historical necessity. This is the reason for the con- 
tradictory behaviour of capitalism in the final stage of its 
historical career: imperialism. 

Marx's diagram of enlarged reproduction thus does not con- 
form to the conditions of an accumulation in actual progress. 
Progressive accumulation cannot be reduced to static inter- 
relations and interdependence between the two great depart- 
ments of social production (the departments of producer and 
consumer goods), as the diagram would have it. Accumulation 
is more than an internal relationship between the branches of 
capitalist economy; it is primarily a relationship between capital 
and a non-capitalist environment, where the two great depart- 
ments of production sometimes perform the accumulative pro- 
cess on their own, independently of each other, but even then 
at every step the movements overlap and intersect. From this 
we get most complicated relations, divergencies in the speed and 
direction of accumulation for the two departments, different 
relations with non-capitalist modes of production as regards 
both material elements and elements of value, which we cannot 
possibly lay down in rigid formulae. Marx's diagram of accumu- 
lation is only the theoretical reflection of the precise moment 
when the domination of capital has reached its limits, and thus 

A.c. 417 o 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

it is no less a fiction than his diagram of simple reproduction, 
which gives the theoretical formulation for the point of depar- 
ture of capitalist accumulation. The precise definition of capit- 
alist accumulation and its laws lies somewhere in between these 
two fictions. 



418 



CHAPTER XXX 
INTERNATIONAL LOANS 

THE imperialist phase of capitalist accumulation which 
implies universal competition comprises the industrialisa- 
tion and capitalist emancipation of the hinterland where 
capital formerly realised its surplus value. Characteristic of this 
phase are: lending abroad, railroad constructions, revolutions, 
and wars. The last decade, from 1900 to 19 10, shows in parti- 
cular the world-wide movement of capital, especially in Asia 
and neighbouring Europe: in Russia, Turkey, Persia, India, 
Japan, China, and also in North Africa. Just as the substitution 
of commodity economy for a natural economy and that of 
capitalist production for a simple commodity production was 
achieved by wars, social crises and the destruction of entire social 
systems, so at present the achievement of capitalist autonomy 
in the hinterland and backward colonies is attained amidst wars 
and revolutions. Revolution is an essential for the process of 
capitalist emancipation. The backward communities must shed 
their obsolete political organisations, relics of natural and simple 
commodity economy, and create a modern state machinery 
adapted to the purposes of capitalist production. The revolu- 
tions in Turkey, Russia, and China fall under this heading. The 
last two, in particular, do not exclusively serve the immediate 
political requirements of capitalism; to some extent they carry 
over outmoded pre-capitalist claims while on the other hand 
they already embody new conflicts which run counter to the 
domination of capital. These factors account for their immense 
drive, but at the same time impede and delay the ultimate 
victory of the revolutionary forces. A young state will usually 
sever the leading strings of older capitalist states by wars, which 
temper and test the modern state's capitalist independence in 
a baptism by fire. That is why military together with financial 
reforms invariably herald the bid for economic independence. 
The forward- thrusts of capital are approximately reflected in 
the development of the railway network. The permanent way 

419 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

grew most quickly in Europe during the forties, in America in 
the fifties, in Asia in the sixties, in AustraHa during the seventies 
and eighties, and during the nineties in Africa,^ 

PubUc loans for railroad building and armaments accompany- 
all stages of the accumulation of capital: the introduction of 
commodity economy, industrialisation of countries, capitalist 
revolutionisation of agriculture as well as the emancipation of 
young capitalist states. For the accumulation of capital, the loan 
has various functions: (a) it serves to convert the money of non- 
capitalist groups into capital, i.e. money both as a commodity 
equivalent (lower middle-class savings) and as fund of con- 
sumption for the hangers-on of the capitalist class; {b) it serves 
to transform money capital into productive capital by means 
of state enterprise — railroad building and military supplies; (c) 
it serves to divert accumulated capital from the old capitalist 
countries to young ones. In the sixteenth and seventeenth cen- 
turies, the loan transferred capital from the Italian cities to 
England, in the eighteenth century from Holland to England, 
in the nineteenth century from England to the American 
Republics and Australia, from France, Germany and Belgium 
to Russia, and at the present time [191 2] from Germany to 

^ The Permanent Way (in kilometres). 



Tear 


Europe 


America 


Asia 


Africa 


Australia 


1840 


2,925 


4,754 


— 


— 


— 


1850 


23,405 


16,064 


— 


— 


— 


i860 


51,862 


53,955 


1,393 


455 


376 


1870 


104,914 


93,193 


8,185 


1,786 


1,765 


1880 


168,983 


1 74,666 


16,287 


4,646 


7,847 


1890 


223,869 


331,417 


33,724 


9,386 


18,889 


1900 


283,878 


402,171 


60,301 


20,114 


24,014 


1910 


333,848 


526,382 


101,916 


36,854 


31,014 



Accordingly, the increase was as follows: 



1840/50 


0/ 
/o 

710 


0/ 

/o 

215 


0/ 
/o 


% 


% 


1850/60 


121 


257 


— 


— 


— 


1860/70 


102 


73 


486 


350 


350 


1870/80 


61 


88 


99 


156 


333 


1880/90 


32 


89 


107 


104 


142 


I 890/ I 900 


27 


21 


79 


114 


27 



420 



INTERNATIONAL LOANS 

Turkey, from England, Germany and France to China, and, 
via Russia, to Persia. 

In the Imperialist Era, the foreign loan played an outstanding 
part as a means for young capitalist states to acquire independ- 
ence. The contradictions inherent in the modern system of 
foreign loans are the concrete expression of those which char- 
acterise the imperialist phase. Though foreign loans are in- 
dispensable for the emancipation of the rising capitalist states, 
they are yet the surest ties by which the old capitalist states 
maintain their influence, exercise financial control and exert 
pressure on the customs, foreign and commercial policy of the 
young capitalist states. Pre-eminently channels for the invest- 
ment in new spheres of capital accumulated in the old countries, 
such loans widen the scope for the accumulation of capital; ^ut 
at the same time they restrict it by creating new competition for 
the investing countries. 

These inherent conflicts of the international loan system are 
a classic example of spatio-temporal divergencies between the 
conditions for the realisation of surplus value and the capitalisa- 
tion thereof. While realisation of the surplus value requires only 
the general spreading of commodity production, its capitalisa- 
tion demands the progressive supercession of simple commodity 
production by capitalist economy, with the corollary that the 
limits to both the realisation and the capitalisation of surplus 
value keep contracting ever more. Employment of international 
capital in the construction of the international railway network 
reflects this disparity. Between the thirties and the sixties of the 
nineteenth century, railway building and the loans necessary for 
it mainly served to oust natural economy, and to spread com- 
modity economy — as in the case of the Russian railway loans in 
the sixties^ or in that of the American railways which were built 
with European capital. Railway construction in Africa and 
Asia during the last twenty years, on the other hand, almost 
exclusively served the purposes of an imperialist policy, of 
economic monopolisation and economic subjugation of the back- 
ward communities. As regards Russia's railroad construction in 
Eastern Asia, for instance, it is common knowledge that Russia 
had paved the way for the military occupation of Manchuria 
by sending troops to protect her engineers working on the Man- 
churian railway. With the same object in view, Russia obtained 

421 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

railway concessions in Persia, Germany in Asia Minor and 
Mesopotamia, and Britain and Germany in Africa. 

In this connection, we must deal with a misunderstanding 
concerning the capital investments in foreign countries and the 
demand of these countries for capital imports. Already in the 
early twenties of the last century, the export of British capital to 
America played an important part, being largely responsible for 
the first genuine industrial and commercial crises in England in 
1825. Since 1824, the London stock exchange had been flooded 
with South American stocks and shares. During the following 
year, the newly created states of South and Central America 
raised loans in London alone for more than ^20,000,000, and in 
addition, enormous quantities of South American industrial 
shares and similar bonds were sold. This sudden prosperity and 
the opening up of the South American markets in their turn 
called forth greatly increased exports of British commodities 
to the Latin Americas. British commodity exports to these 
countries amounted to ;^2, 900,000 in 1821 which had risen to 
5(^6,400,000 by 1825. 

Cotton textiles formed the most important item of these 
exports; this powerful demand was the impetus for a rapid 
expansion of British cotton production, and many new factories 
were opened. In 182 1, raw cotton to the value of ;^m. 129 was 
made up in England, and in 1826 the amount had risen to 
£m. 167. 

The situation was thus fraught with the elements of a crisis. 
Tugan Baranovski raises the question: 'But from where did the 
South American countries take the means to buy twice as many 
commodities in 1825 as in 182 1? The British themselves supplied 
these means. The loans floated on the London stock exchange 
served as payment for imported goods. Deceived by th,e demand 
they had themselves created, the British factory-owners were 
soon brought to realise by their own experience that their high 
expectations had been unfounded. '^ 

He thus characterises as 'deceptive', as an unhealthy, abnormal 
economic phenomenon the fact that the South American demand 
for English goods had been brought about by British capital. 
Thus uncritically he took over the doctrine of an expert with 

^ Tugan Baranovski, Studies on the Theory and History of Commercial Crises 
in England, p. 74. 

422 



INTERNATIONAL LOANS 

whose other theories he wished to have nothing in common. The 
opinion had been advanced already during the RngHsh crisis 
of 1825 that it could be explained by the 'singular' development 
of the relations between British capital and South American 
demand. None other than Sismondi had raised the same ques- 
tion as Tugan Baranovski and given a most accurate description 
of events in the second edition of his Nouveaux Principes: 

'The opening up of the immense market afforded by Spanish 
America to industrial producers seemed to offer a good oppor- 
tunity to relieve British manufacture. The British government 
were of that opinion, and in the seven years following the crisis 
of 18 18, displayed unheard-of activity to carry English com- 
merce to penetrate the remotest districts of Mexico, Columbia, 
Brazil, Rio de la Plata, Chile and Peru. Before the government 
decided to recognise these new states, it had to protect English 
commerce by frequent calls of battleships whose captains had a 
diplomatic rather than a military mission. In consequence, it 
had defied the clamours of the Holy Alliance and recognised the 
new republics at a moment when the whole of Europe, on the 
contrary, was plotting their ruin. But however big the demand 
afforded by free America, yet it would not have been enough 
to absorb all the goods England had produced over and above 
the needs of consumption, had not their means for buying Eng- 
lish merchandise been suddenly increased beyond all bounds by 
the loans to the new republics. Every American state borrowed 
from England an amount sufficient to consolidate its govern- 
ment. Although they were capital loans, they were immediately 
spent in the course of the year like income, that is to say they 
were used up entirely to buy English goods on behalf of the 
treasury, or to pay for those which had been dispatched on 
private orders. At the same time, numerous companies with 
immense capitals were formed to exploit all the American mines, 
but all the money they spent found its way back to England, 
either to pay for the machinery which they immediately used, 
or else for the goods sent to the localities where they were to 
work. As long as this singular commerce lasted, in which the 
English only asked the Americans to be kind enough to buy 
English merchandise with English capital, and to consume them 
for their sake, the prosperity of English manufacture appeared 
dazzling. It was no more income but rather English capital 

423 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

which was used to push on consumption: the EngHsh them- 
selves bought and paid for their own goods which they sent to 
America, and thereby merely forwent the pleasure of using 
these goods. '1 

From this Sismondi drew the characteristic conclusion that 
the real limits to the capitalist market are set by income, i.e. by 
personal consumption alone, and he used this example as one 
more warning against accumulation. 

Down to the present day, the events which preceded the crisis 
of 1825 have remained typical for a period of boom and expan- 
sion of capital, and such 'singular commerce' is in fact one of 
the most important foundations of the accumulation of capital. 
Particularly in the history of British capital, it occurs regularly 
before every crisis, as Tugan Baranovski himself showed by the 
following facts and figures: the immediate cause of the 1836 
crisis was the flooding of the American market with British 
goods, again financed by British money. In 1834, U.S. com- 
modity imports exceeded exports by £m. 1-2 but at the same 
time their imports of precious metal exceeded exports by 
nearly j£m. 3-2. Even in 1836, the year of the crisis itself, their 
surplus of imported commodities amounted to £m. 10-4, and 
still the excess of bullion imported was £m, i. This influx of 
money, no less than the stream of goods, came chiefly from 
England, where U.S. railway shares were bought in bulk. 
1835/6 saw the opening in the United States of sixty-one new 
banks with a capital of /^m. 10-4, predominantly British. Again, 
the English paid for their exports themselves. The unprecedented 
industrial boom in the Northern States of the Union, eventually 
leading to the Civil War, was likewise financed by British 
capital, which again created an expanding market for British 
industry in the United States. 

And not only British capital— other European capitals also 
made every possible effort to take part in this 'singular com- 
merce'. To quote Schaeffle, in the five years between 1849 and 
1854, at least £m. 100 were invested in American shares on the 
various stock exchanges of Europe. The simultaneous revival of 
world industry attained such dimensions that it culminated in 
the world crash of 1857. — In the sixties, British capital lost no 

^ Sismondi ,' JVouveaux Principes . . ., vol. i, book iv, chap, iv : 'Commercial 
Wealth Follows the Growth of Income', pp. 368-70. 

424 



INTERNATIONAL LOANS 

time in creating similar conditions in Asia as well as the United 
States. An unending stream was diverted to Asia Minor and 
East India, where it financed the most magnificent railroad pro- 
jects. The permanent way of British India amounted in i860 
to 844 miles, in 1870 to 4,802 miles, in 1880 to 9,361 miles and 
in 1890 to 16,875 rniles. This at once increased the demand for 
British commodities. No sooner had the War of Secession come 
to a close, than British capital again flowed into the United 
States. It again paid for the greater part of the enormous rail- 
road constructions in the Union during the sixties and seventies, 
the permanent way amounting in 1850 to 8,844 miles, in i860 
to 30,807 miles, in 1870 to 53,212 miles, in 1880 to 94,198 miles, 
and in 1890 to 179,005 miles. Materials for these railways were 
also being supplied by England — one of the main causes for the 
rapid development of the British coal and iron industries and 
the reasons why these industries were so seriously affected by 
the American crises of 1866, 1873 and 1884. What Sismondi 
considered sheer lunacy was in this instance literally true: the 
British with their own materials, their own iron etc., had built 
railroads in the United States, they had paid for the railways 
with their own capital and only forwent their 'use'. In spite of 
all periodical crises, however, European capital had acquired 
such a taste for this madness, that the London stock exchange 
was seized by a veritable epidemic of foreign loans in the middle 
of the seventies. Between 1870 and 1875, loans of this kind, 
amounting to ^vci. 260, were raised in London. The immediate 
consequence was a rapid increase in the overseas export of 
British merchandise. Although the foreign countries concerned 
went periodically bankrupt, masses of capital continued to flow 
in. Turkey, Egypt, Greece, Bolivia, Costa Rica, Ecuador, Hon- 
duras, Mexico, Paraguay, Peru, St. Domingo, Uruguay, and 
Venezuela completely or partially suspended their payments of 
interest in the late seventies. Yet undeterred by this, the fever 
for exotic state loans burst out again at the end of the eighties 
— the South American states and South African colonies were 
lent immense quantities of European capital. In 1874, for in- 
stance, the Argentine Republic borrowed as much as ^ra. 10 
and the loan had risen to £m.. 59 by 1890. 

England built railways with her own iron and coal in all these 
countries as well, paying for them with her own capital. In 1885, 

425 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

the Argentine permanent way had been 1,952 miles, in 1893 it 
was 8,557 miles. 

Exports from England were rising accordingly: 





1886 


1890 




£^' 


£m. 


Iron 


21-8 


31-6 


Machinery 


10 


16-4 


Coal 


9 


19 



British total exports (mainly to the Argentine) amounted to 
£m.. 4*7 in 1885 and to £m. 10-7 a mere four years later. 

At the same time, British capital flowed into Australia in 
the form of state loans. At the end of the eighties the loans 
to the three colonies Victoria, New South Wales and Tasmania 
amounted to £m. 112, ^^m. 81 of which were invested in rail- 
way construction. The permanent way of Australia extended 
over 4,900 miles in 1880, and over 15,600 miles in 1895. 

Britain, supplying capital and materials for these railways, 
was also embroiled in the crises of 1890 in the Argentine, Trans- 
vaal, Mexico, Uruguay, and in that of 1893 in Australia. 

The following two decades made a difference only in so far 
as German, French and Belgian capital largely participated 
with British capital in foreign investments, while railway con- 
struction in Asia Minor had been financed entirely by British 
capital from the fifties to the late eighties. From then on, Ger- 
man capital took over and put into execution the tremendous 
project of the Anatolian railway. German capital investments in 
Turkey gave rise to an increased export of German goods to that 
country. 

In 1896, German exports to Turkey amounted to £m. 1-4, 
in 191 1 to ;^m. 5-65. To Asiatic Turkey, in particular, goods 
were exported in 1901 to the value of /^m. o-6 and in 191 1 to the 
value of ;(^m. 1-85. In this case, German capital was used to a 
considerable extent to pay for German goods, the Germans 
forgoing, to use Sismondi's term, only the pleasure of using 
their own products. 

Let us examine the position more closely: 

Realised surplus value, which cannot be capitalised and lies 

426 



INTERNATIONAL LOANS 

idle in England or Germany, is invested in railway construction, 
water works, etc. in the Argentine, Australia, the Cape Colony 
or Mesopotamia. Machinery, materials and the like are supplied 
by the country where the capital has originated, and the same 
capital pays for them. Actually, this process characterises capit- 
alist conditions everywhere, even at home. Capital must pur- 
chase the elements of production and thus become productive 
capital before it can operate. Admittedly, the products are then 
used within the country, while in the former case they are used 
by foreigners. But then capitalist production does not aim at 
its products being enjoyed, but at the accumulation of surplus 
value. There had been no demand for the surplus product 
within the country, so capital had lain idle without the possi- 
bility of accumulating. But abroad, where capitalist production 
has not yet developed, there has come about, voluntarily or by 
force, a new demand of the non-capitalist strata. The consump- 
tion of the capitalist and working classes at home is irrelevant for 
the purposes of accumulation, and what matters to capital is 
the very fact that its products are 'used' by others. The new con- 
sumers must indeed realise the products, pay for their use, and 
for this they need money. They can obtain some of it by the 
exchange of commodities which begins at this point, a brisk 
traffic in goods following hard on the heels of railway construc- 
tion and mining (gold mines, etc.). Thus the capital advanced 
for railroad building and mining, together with an additional 
surplus value, is gradually realised. It is immaterial to the situa- 
tion as a whole whether this exported capital becomes share 
capital in new independent enterprises, or whether, as a govern- 
ment loan, it uses the mediation of a foreign state to find new 
scope for operation in industry and traffic, nor does it matter if 
in the first case some of the companies are fraudulent and fail 
in due course, or if in the second case the borrowing state finally 
goes bankrupt, i.e. if the owners sometimes lose part of their 
capital in one way or another. Even the country of origin is not 
immune, and individual capitals frequently get lost in crises. 
The important point is that capital accumulated in the old 
country should find elsewhere new opportunities to beget and 
realise surplus value, so that accumulation can proceed. In the 
new countries, large regions of natural economy are open to 
conversion into commodity economy, or existing commodity 

427 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

economy can be ousted by capital. Railroad construction and 
mining, gold mining in particular, are typical for the invest- 
ment of capitals from old capitalist countries in new ones. They 
are pre-eminently qualified to stimulate a brisk traffic in goods 
under conditions hitherto determined by natural economy and 
both are significant in economic history as mile-stones along 
the route of rapid dissolution of old economic organisations, of 
social crises and of the development of modern conditions, that 
is to say of the development of commodity economy to begin 
with, and further of the production of capital. 

For this reason, the part played by lending abroad as well 
as by capital investments in foreign railway and mining shares 
is a fine sample of the deficiencies in Marx's diagram of accumu- 
lation. In these instances, enlarged reproduction of capital 
capitalises a surplus value that has already been realised (in so 
far as the loans or foreign investments are not financed by the 
savings of the petty bourgeoisie or the semi-proletariat) . 1 1 is 
quite irrelevant to the present field of accumulation, when, 
where and how the capital of the old countries has been realised 
so that it may flow into the new country. British capital which 
finds an outlet in Argentine railway construction might well in 
the past have been realised in China in the form of Indian opium. 
Further, the British capital which builds railways in the Argen- 
tine, is of English origin not only in its pure value-form, as 
money capital, but also in its material form, as iron, coal and 
machinery; the use-form of the surplus value, that is to say, 
has also come into being from the very beginning in the use- 
form suitable for the purposes of accumulation. The actual 
use-form of the variable capital, however, labour power, is 
mainly foreign: it is the native labour of the new countries 
which is made a new object of exploitation by the capital of the 
old countries. If we want to keep our investigation all on one 
plane, we may even assume that the labour power, too, has the 
same country of origin as the capital. In point of fact new dis- 
coveries, of gold mines for instance, tend to call forth mass 
emigration from the old countries, especially in the first stages, 
and are largely worked by labour from those countries. It might 
well be, then, that in a new country capital, labour power and 
means of production all come from the same capitalist country, 
say England. So it is really in England that all the material 

428 



INTERNATIONAL LOANS 

conditions for accumulation exist — a realised surplus value as 
money capital, a surplus product in productive form, and lastly- 
labour reserves. Yet accumulation cannot proceed here: Eng- 
land and her old buyers require neither railways nor an ex- 
panded industry. Enlarged reproduction, i.e. accumulation, is 
possible only if new districts with a non-capitalist civilisation, 
extending over large areas, appear on the scene and augment 
the number of consumers. 

But then, who are these new consumers actually; who is it 
that realises the surplus value of capitalist enterprises which are 
started with foreign loans; and who, in the final analysis, pays 
for these loans? The international loans in Egypt provide a 
classical answer. 

The internal history of Egypt in the second half of the nine- 
teenth century is characterised by the interplay of three pheno- 
mena: large-scale capitalist enterprise, a rapidly growing public 
debt, and the collapse of peasant economy. Until quite recently, 
corvee prevailed in Egypt, and the Wall and later the Khedive 
freely pursued their own power policy with regard to the con- 
dition of landownership. These primitive conditions precisely 
offered an incomparably fertile soil for the operations of Euro- 
pean capital. Economically speaking, the conditions for a mone- 
tary economy had to be established to begin with, and the state 
created them by direct compulsion. Until the thirties, Mehemet 
Ali, the founder of Modern Egypt, here applied a method of 
patriarchal simplicity: every year, he 'bought up' the fellaheen's 
entire harvest for the public exchequer, and allowed them to 
buy back, at a higher price, a minimum for subsistence and seed. 
In addition he imported cotton from East India, sugar cane 
from America, indigo and pepper, and issued the fellaheen with 
official directions what to plant and how much of it. The 
government again claimed the monopoly for cotton and indigo, 
reserving to itself the exclusive right of buying and selling these 
goods. By such methods was commodity exchange introduced in 
Egypt. Admittedly, Mehemet Ali also did something towards 
raising labour productivity. He arranged for dredging of the 
ancient canalisation, and above all he started the work of the 
great Kaliub Nile dams which initiated the series of great capit- 
alist enterprises in Egypt. These were to comprise four great 
fields: (i) irrigation systems, in which the Kaliub works built 

429 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

between 1845 and 1853 take first place — quite apart from 
unpaid forced labour, they swallowed up £m. 2-5 and incident- 
ally proved quite useless at first; (2) routes for traffic — the most 
important construction which proved ultimately detrimental 
to Egypt being the Suez Canal; (3) the cultivation of cotton, 
and (4) the production of sugar cane. With the building of the 
Suez Canal, Egypt became caught up in the web of European 
capitalism, never again to get free of it. French capital led the 
way with British capital hard on its heels. In the twenty years 
that followed, the internal disturbances in Egypt were coloured 
by the competitive struggle between these two capitals. French 
capital was perhaps the most peculiar exponent of the European 
methods of capital accumulation at the expense of primitive 
conditions. Its operations were responsible for the useless Nile 
dams as well as for the Suez Canal. Egypt first contracted to 
supply the labour of 20,000 serfs free of charge for a number of 
years, and secondly to take up shares in the Suez Company to 
the tune of £m. 3-5, i.e. 40 per cent of the company's total 
capital. All this for the sake of breaking through a canal which 
would deflect the entire trade between Europe and Asia from 
Eg)'pt and would painfully affect her part in this trade. These 
;^m. 3-5 formed the nucleus for Egypt's immense national debt 
which was to bring about her military occupation by Britain 
twenty years later. In the irrigation system, sudden transforma- 
tions were initiated: the ancient sakias, i.e. bullock-driven 
water-wheels, of which 50,000 had been busy for 7 months in 
the year in the Nile delta alone, were partially replaced by 
steam pumps. Modern steamers now plied on the Nile between 
Cairo and Assuan. But the most profound change in the 
economic conditions of Egypt was brought about by the cultiva- 
tion of cotton. This became almost epidemic in Egypt when, 
owing to the American War of Secession and the English cotton 
famine, the price per short ton rose from something between 
£'^0 and ;;{^40 to ;(^200-;{^250. Everybody was planling cotton, 
and foremost among all, the Viceroy and his family. His estates 
grew fat, what with large-scale land robbery, confiscations, 
forced 'sale' or plain theft. He suddenly appropriated villages 
by the score though without any legal excuse. Within an in- 
credibly short time, this vast demesne was brought under 
cotton, with the result that the entire technique of Egyptian 

430 



INTERNATIONAL LOANS 

traditional agriculture was revolutionised. Dams were thrown 
up everywhere to protect the cotton fields from the seasonal 
flooding of the Nile, and a comprehensive system of artificial 
irrigation was introduced. These waterworks together with con- 
tinuous deep ploughing — a novel departure for the fellah who 
had until then merely scratched his soil with a plough dating 
back to the Pharaohs — and finally the intensive labours of the 
harvest made between them enormous demands on Egypt's 
labour power. This was throughout the same forced peasant 
labour over which the state claimed to have an unrestricted 
right of disposal; and thousands had already been employed on 
the Kaliub dams and the Suez Canal and now the irrigation and 
plantation work to be done on the viceregal estates clamoured 
for this forced labour. The 20,000 serfs who had been put at the 
disposal of the Suez Canal Company were now required by the 
Khedive himself, and this brought about the first clash with 
French capital. The company was adjudged a compensation of 
£m. 3-35 by the arbitration of Napoleon III, a settlement to 
which the Khedive could all the more readily agree, since the 
very fellaheen whose labour power was the bone of contention 
were ultimately to be mulcted of this sum. The work of irriga- 
tion was immediately put in hand. Centrifugal machines, steam 
and traction engines were therefore ordered from England and 
France. In their hundreds, they were carried by steamers from 
England to Alexandria and then further. Steam ploughs were 
needed for cultivating the soil, especially since the rinderpest 
of 1864 had killed off all the cattle, England again being the 
chief supplier of these machines. The Fowler works were ex- 
panded enormously of a sudden to meet the requirements of the 
Viceroy for which Egypt had to pay.^ 

^ Engineer Eyth, a representative of Fowler's, tells us: 'Now there was 
a feverish exchange of telegrams between Cairo, London and Leeds. — 
"When can Fowler's deliver 150 steam ploughs?" — Answer: "Working to 
capacity, within one year." — "Not good enough. Expect unloading Alex- 
andria by spring 150 steam ploughs." — ^A.: "Impossible." — The works at 
that time were barely big enough to turn out 3 steam ploughs per week. 
N.B. a machine of this type costs /;"2,500 so that the order involved £m. 375. 
Ismail Pasha's next wire: "Quote cost immediate factory expansion. Viceroy 
willing foot bill." — You can imagine that Leeds made hay while the sun 
shone. And in addition, other factories in England and France as well were 
made to supply steam ploughs. The Alexandria warehouses, where goods 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

But now Egypt required yet a third type of machine, cotton 
gins and presses for packing. Dozens of these gins were set up in 
the Deha towns. Like EngUsh industrial towns, Sagasis, Tanta, 
Samanud and other towns were covered by palls of smoke 
and great fortunes circulated in the banks of Alexandria and 
Cairo. 

But already in the year that followed, this cotton speculation 
collapsed with the cotton prices which fell in a couple of days 
from 270?. per pound to 150?., i2d., and finally 6d/. after the cessation 
of hostilities in the American Union. The following year, Ismail 
Pasha ventured on a new speculation, the production of cane 
sugar. The forced labour of the fellaheen was to compete with 
the Southern States of the Union where slavery had been 
abolished. For the second time, Egyptian agriculture was turned 
upside down. French and British capitalists found a new field 
for rapid accumulation. 18 giant sugar factories were put on 
order in 1868-9 with an estimated daily output of 200 short 
tons of sugar, that is to say four times as much as that of the 
greatest then existing plant. Six of them were ordered from 
England, and twelve from France, but England eventually 
delivered the lion's share, because of the Franco-German war. 
These factories were to be built along the Nile at intervals of 
6-2 miles (10 km.), as centres of cane plantations of an area corn- 
destined for the vice-regal estates were unloaded, were crammed to the roof 
with boilers, wheels, drums, wire-rope and all sorts of chests and boxes. The 
second-rate hostelries of Cairo swarmed with newly qualified steam plough- 
men, promoted in a hurry from anvil or share-plough, young hopefuls, fit for 
anything and nothing, since every steam plough must be manned by at least 
one expert pioneer of civilisation. Wagonloads of this assorted cargo were 
sent into the interior, just so that the next ship could unload. You cannot 
imagine in what condition they arrived at their destination, or rather any- 
where but their destination. Ten boilers were lying on the banks of the Nile, 
and the machine to which they belonged was ten miles further. Here was a 
little heap of wire-rope, but you had to travel another 20 hours to find the 
appropriate pulleys. In one place an Englishman who was to set up the 
machines squatted desolate and hungry on a pile of French crates, and in 
another place his mate had taken to native liquor in his despair. EfTendis and 
Katibs, invoking the help of Allah, rushed to and fro between Siut and 
Alexandria and compiled endless lists of items the names of which they did 
not even know. And yet, in the end, some of this apparatus was set in 
motion. In Upper Egypt, the ploughs belched steam — civilisation and pro- 
gress had made another step forward' {Lebendige Kräfte, 7 Vorträge ans dem 
Gebiete der Technik, Berlin, 1908, p. 21). 



INTERNATIONAL LOANS 

prising lo sq. km. Working to full capacity, each factory required 
a daily supply of 2,000 tons of sugar cane. Fellaheen were driven 
to forced labour on the sugar plantations in their thousands, 
while further thousands of their number built the Ibrahimya 
Canal. The stick and kourbash were unstintingly applied. 
Transport soon became a problem. A railway network had to 
be built round every factory to haul the masses of cane inside, 
rolling stock, funiculars, etc., had to be obtained as quickly as 
possible. Again these enormous orders were placed with English 
capital. The first giant factory was opened in 1872, 4,000 camels 
providing makeshift transport. But it proved to be simply im- 
possible to supply cane in the quantities required by the under- 
taking. The working staff was completely inadequate, since the 
fellah, accustomed to forced labour on the land, could not be 
transformed overnight into a modern industrial worker by the 
lash of the whip. The venture collapsed, even before many of 
the imported machines had been installed. This sugar specula- 
tion concluded the period of gigantic capitalist enterprise in 
Egypt in 1873. 

What had provided the capital for these enterprises? Inter- 
national loans. One year before his death in 1863, Said Pasha 
had raised the first loan at a nominal value of ;^m. 3-3 which 
came to £vn.. 2*5 in cash after deduction of commissions, dis- 
counts, etc. He left to Ismail Pasha the legacy of this debt and 
the contract with the Suez Canal Company, which was to 
burden Egypt with a debt of £vci. 1 7. Ismail Pasha in turn 
raised his first loan in 1864 with a nominal value o^ £m. 5-7 
at 7 per cent and a cash value of £m. 4-85 at 8:| per cent. What 
remained of it, after £m.. 335 had been paid to the Suez Canal 
Company as compensation, was spent within the year, swal- 
lowed up for the greater part by the cotton gamble. In 1865, 
the first so-called Daira-loan was floated by the Anglo-Egyptian 
Bank, on the security of the Khedive's private estates. The 
nominal value of this loan was £vcv. 3-4 at 9 per cent, and its 
real value £m.. 2-5 at 12 per cent. In 1866, Fruehling & Goschen 
floated a new loan at a nominal value of £v[\. 3 and a cash 
value o{ £v!\. 2. The Ottoman Bank floated another in 1867 of 
nominally £m.. 2, really -£m.. 1-7. The floating debt at that time 
amounted to £m.. 30. The Banking House Oppenheim & Neffen 
floated a great loan in 1868 to consolidate part of this debt. Its 

433 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

nominal value was ^m. 1 1 -g at 7 per cent, though Ismail could 
actually lay hands only on ^^m. 7-1 at 13^ per cent. This money 
made it possible, however, to pay for the pompous celebrations 
on the opening of the Suez Canal, in presence of the leading 
figures in the Courts of Europe, in finance and in the demi-monde, 
for a madly lavish display, and further, to grease the palm of 
the Turkish Overlord, the Sultan, with a new baksheesh of 
jQm. I. The sugar gamble necessitated another loan in 1870. 
Floated by the firm of Bischoffsheim & Goldschmidt, it had a 
nominal value of ;^m. 7-1 at 7 per cent, and its cash value was 
£m. 5. In 1872/3 Oppenheim' s floated two further loans, a modest 
one amounting to £m. 4 at 14 per cent and a large one of 
£m. 32 at 8 per cent which reduced the floating debt by one- 
half, but which actually came only to ;^m. 1 1 in cash, since the 
European banking houses paid it in part by bills of exchange 
they had discounted. 

In 1874, a further attempt was made to raise a national loan 
of £m. 50 at an annual charge of 9 per cent., but it yielded 
no more than £m. 3-4. Egyptian securities were quoted at 
54 per cent of their face value. Within the thirteen years 
after Said Pasha's death, Egypt's total public debt had 
grown from £m. 3-293 to £m.. 94-110,^ and collapse was 
imminent. 

These operations of capital, at first sight, seem to reach the 
height of madness. One loan followed hard on the other, the 
interest on old loans was defrayed by new loans, and capital 
borrowed from the British and French paid for the large orders 
placed with British and French industrial capital. 

While the whole of Europe sighed and shrugged its shoulders 
at Ismail's crazy economy, European capital was in fact doing 
business in Egypt on a unique and fantastic scale — an incredible 
modern version of the biblical legend about the fat kine which 
remains unparalleled in capitalist history. 

In the first place, there was an element of usury in every 
loan, anything between one-fifth and one-third of the money 
ostensibly lent sticking to the fingers of the European bankers. 
Ultimately, the exorbitant interest had to be paid somehow, but 
how — where were the means to come from? Egypt herself was 

^ Cf. Evelyn Baring, Earl of Cromer, Egypt Today (London, 1908), vol. i, 
p. II. 

434 



INTERNATIONAL LOANS 

to supply them; their source was the Egyptian fellah — peasant 
economy providing in the final analysis all the most important 
elements for large-scale capitalist enterprise. He provided the 
land since the so-called private estates of the Khedive were 
quickly growing to vast dimensions by robbery and blackmail 
of innumerable villages; and these estates were the foundations 
of the irrigation projects and the speculation in cotton and sugar 
cane. As forced labour, the fellah also provided the labour 
power and, what is more, he was exploited without payment and 
even had to provide his own means of subsistence while he was 
at work. The marvels of technique which European engineers 
and European machines performed in the sphere of Egyptian 
irrigation, transport, agriculture and industry were due to 
this peasant economy with its fellaheen serfs. On the Kaliub 
Nile dams and on the Suez Canal, in the cotton plantations and 
in the sugar plants, untold masses of peasants were put to work; 
they were switched over from one job to the next as the need 
arose, and they were exploited to the limit of endurance and 
beyond. Although it became evident at every step that there 
were technical limits to the employment of forced labour for 
the purposes of modern capital, yet this was amply compensated 
by capital's unrestricted power of command over the pool of 
labour power, how long and under what conditions men were 
to work, live and be exploited. 

But not alone that it supplied land and labour power, peasant 
economy also provided the money. Under the influence of 
capitalist economy, the screws were put on the fellaheen by 
taxation. The tax on peasant holdings was persistently increased. 
In the late sixties, it amounted to -£2 5^. per hectare^ but not a 
farthing was levied on the enormous private estates of the royal 
family. In addition, ever more special rates were devised. 
Contributions of is. 6d. per hectare had to be paid for the 
maintenance of the irrigation system which almost exclusively 
benefited the royal estates, and the fellah had to pay is. ^.d.for 
every date tree felled, gd. for every clay hovel in which he lived. 
In addition, every male over 10 years of age was liable to a head 
tax of Gi'. 6d. The total paid by the fellaheen was £m. 2-5 under 
Mehemet AH, £m.. 5 under Said Pasha, and £m. 8-15 under 
Ismail Pasha. 

The greater the debt to European capital became, the more 

435 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

had to be extorted from the peasants.^ In 1869 all taxes were 
put up by 10 per cent and the taxes for the coming year collected 
in advance. In 1870, a supplementary land tax of 8s. per 
hectare was levied. All over Upper Egypt people were leaving 
the villages, demolished their dwellings and no longer tilled 
their land — only to avoid payment of taxes. In 1876, the tax 
on date palms was increased by 6d. Whole villages went out to 
fell their date palms and had to be prevented by rifle volleys. 
North of Siut, 10,000 fellaheen are said to have starved in 1879 
because they could no longer raise the irrigation tax for their 
fields and had killed their cattle to avoid paying tax on it.^ 

Now the fellah had been drained of his last drop of blood. 
Used as a leech by European capital, the Egyptian state had 
accomplished its function and was no longer needed. Ismail, the 
Khedive, was given his conge; capital could begin winding up 
operations. 

Egypt had still to pay 394,000 Egyptian pounds as interest on 
the Suez Canal shares for £^^- 4 which England had bought in 
1875. Now British commissions to 'regulate' the finances of 
Egypt went into action. Strangely enough, European capital 
was not at all deterred by the desperate state of the insolvent 
country and offered again and again to grant immense loans 
for the salvation of Egypt. Cowe and Stokes proposed a loan 
of £m. 76 at 9 per cent for the conversion of the total debt. 
Rivers Wilson thought no less than £m. 1 03 would be necessary. 
The Credit Fonder bought up floating bills of exchange by the 
million, attempting, though without success, to consolidate the 
total debt by a loan of ;^m. 91. With the financial position grow- 
ing hopelessly desperate, the time drew near when the country 

^ Incidentally, the money wrested from the Egyptian fellah further fell, 
by way of Turkey, to European capital. The Turkish loans of 1854, 1855, 
1871, 1877 and 1886 were based on the contributions from Egypt which 
were increased several times and paid direct into the Bank of England. 

* 'It is stated by residents in the Delta', reports The Times of March 31, 
1879, 'that the third quarter of the year's taxation is now collected, and the 
old methods of collection applied. This sounds strangely by the side of the 
news that people are starving by the roadside, that great tracts of counti-y 
are uncultivated, because of the physical burdens, and that the farmers have 
sold their cattle, the women their fmeiy, and that the usurers are filling 
the mortgage offices with their bonds, and the courts with their suits of 
foreclosure' (quoted by Th. Rothstein, EgypCs Ruin, 19 10, pp. 69—70). 

436 



INTERNATIONAL LOANS 

and all her productive forces was to become the prey of Euro- 
pean capital. October 1878 saw the representatives of the 
European creditors landing in Alexandria. British and French 
capital established dual control of finances and devised new 
taxes; the peasants were beaten and oppressed, so that payment 
of interest, temporarily suspended in 1876, could be resumed 
in 1877.1 

Now the claims of European capital became the pivot of 
economic life and the sole consideration of the financial system. 
In 1878, a new commission and ministry were set up, both with 
a staff in which Europeans made up one half In 1879, the 
finances of Egypt were brought under permanent control of 
European capital, exercised by the Commission de la Dette Pub- 
lique Egyptienne in Cairo. In 1878, the Tshifliks, estates of the 
viceregal family, which comprised 431,100 acres, were con- 
verted into crown land and pledged to the European capitalists 
as collateral for the public debt, and the same happened to the 
Daira lands, the private estates of the Khedive, comprising 
485, 1 3 1 acres, mainly in Upper Egypt; this was, at a later date, 
sold to a syndicate. The other estates for the greatest part fell to 
capitalist companies, the Suez Canal Company in particular. 
To cover the cost of occupation, England requisitioned ecclesi- 
astical lands of the mosques and schools. An opportune pretext 
for the final blow was provided by a mutiny in the Egyptian 
army, starved under European financial control while European 
officials were drawing excellent salaries, and by a revolt engin- 
eered among the Alexandrian masses who had been bled white. 
The British military occupied Egypt in 1882, as a result of 
twenty years' operations of Big Business, never to leave again. 
This was the ultimate and final step in the process of liquidating 
peasant economy in Egypt by and for European capital. ^ 

^ *This produce', wrote the correspondent of The Times from Alexandria, 
'consists wholly of taxes paid by the peasants in kind, and when one thinks of 
the poverty-stricken, overdriven, under-paid fellaheen in their miserable 
hovels, working late and early to fill the pockets of the creditors, the punctual 
payment of the coupon ceases to be wholly a subject of gratification' (quoted 
by Rothstein, op. cit., p. 49). 

2 Eyth, an outstanding exponent of capitalist civilisation in the primitive 
countries, characteristically concludes his masterly sketch on Egypt, from 
which we have taken the main data, with the following imperialist articles of 
faith: 'What we have learnt from the past also holds true for the future, 

437 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

It should now be clear that the transactions between Euro- 
pean loan capital and European industrial capital are based 
upon relations which are extremely rational and 'sound' for the 
accumulation of capital, although they appear absurd to the 
casual observer because this loan capital pays for the orders 
from Egypt and the interest on one loan is paid out of a new 
loan. Stripped of all obscuring connecting links, these relations 
consist in the simple fact that European capital has largely 
swallowed up the Egyptian peasant economy. Enormous tracts 
of land, labour, and labour products without number, accruing 
to the state as taxes, have ultimately been converted into Euro- 
pean capital and have been accumulated. Evidently, only by 
use of the kourbash could the historical development which would 
normally take centuries be compressed into two or three decades, 
and it was just the primitive nature of Eg^-ptian conditions 
which proved such fertile soil for the accumulation of capital. 

As against the fantastic increase of capital on the one hand, 
the other economic result is the ruin of peasant economy to- 
gether with the growth of commodity exchange which is rooted 
in the supreme exertion of the country's productive forces. 
Under Ismail's rule, the arable and reclaimed land of Egypt 
grew from 5 to 6-75 million acres, the canal system from 45,625 
to 54,375 miles and the permanent way from 256-25 to 1,638 
miles. Docks were built in Siut and Alexandria, magnificent 
dockyards in Alexandria, a steamer-service for pilgrims to 
Mecca was introduced on the Red Sea and along the coast of 
Syria and Asia Minor. Egypt's exports which in 1861 had 
amounted to ^^4,450,000 rose to ;^m. 14-4 in 1864; her imports 
which under Said Pasha amounted to £m. i-2 rose under Ismail 
to between ;^m. 5 and £m.. 5-5. Trade which recovered only in 
the eighties from the opening up of the Suez Canal amounted 
to £m. 815 worth of imports and £m.. 12-45 worth of exports 

Europe must and will lay firm hands upon those countries which can no 
longer keep up with modern conditions on their o\vn, though this will not 
be possible without all kinds of struggle, when the diflerence between right 
and wrong will become blurred, when political and historical justice will 
often enough mean disaster for millions and their salvation depend upon 
what is politically wrong. All the world over, the strongest hand will make 
an end to confusion, and so it will even on the banks of the Nile' (op. cit., 
p. 247). Rothstein has made it clear enough what kind of 'order' the British 
created 'on the banks of the Nile'. 

438 



INTERNATIONAL LOANS 

in 1890, but in 1900 the figures were £m. 144 for imports and 
£m. 12-25 for exports, and in 191 1 — £m. 27-85 for imports and 
£m. 26-85 for exports. Thanks to this development of com- 
modity economy which expanded by leaps and bounds with the 
assistance of European capital, Egypt herself had fallen a prey 
to the latter. The case of Egypt, just as that of China and, more 
recently, Morocco, shows militarism as the executor of the 
accumulation of capital, lurking behind international loans, 
railroad building, irrigation systems, and similar works of 
civilisation. The Oriental states cannot develop from natural to 
commodity economy and further to capitalist economy fast 
enough and are swallowed up by international capital, since 
they cannot perform these transformations without selling their 
souls to capital. Their feverish metamorphoses are tantamount 
to their absorption by international capital. 

Another good recent example is the deal made by German 
capital in Asiatic Turkey. European capital, British capital in 
particular, had already at an early date attempted to gain 
possession of this area which marches with the ancient trade 
route between Europe and Asia.^ 

In the fifties and sixties, British capital built the railway 
lines Smyrna-Aydin-Diner and Smyrna-Kassaba-Alasehir, 
obtained the concession to extend the line to Afyon Karahisar 
and also leased the first tract for the Anatolian railway Ada- 
Bazar-Izmid. French capital gradually came to acquire in- 
fluence over part of the railway building during this time. In 
1888, German capital appeared on the scene. It took up 60 per 

1 Already in the early twenties of the last century, the Anglo-Indian 
government commissioned Colonel Chesney to investigate the navigability 
of the River Euphrates in order to establish the shortest possible connection 
between the Mediterranean and the Persian Gulf, resp. India. After detailed 
preparations and a preliminary reconnaissance in winter 1831, the expedi- 
tion proper set out in 1835/7. I^ due course, British staff and officials investi- 
gated and surveyed a wider area in Eastern Mesopotamia. These efforts 
dragged on until 1866 without any useful results for the British government. 
But at a later date Great Britain returned to the plan of connecting the 
Mediterranean with India by way of the Gulf of Persia, though in a different 
form, i.e. the Tigris railway project. In 1879, Cameron travelled through 
Mesopotamia for the British government to study the lie of the land for the 
projected railway (Max Freiherr v. Oppenheim, Vom Mittelmeer zum Per- 
sischen Golf durch den Hauran, die Syrische Wüste und Mesopotamien, vol. ii, 
pp. 5 and 36). 

439 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

cent of the shares in the new merger of international interests, 
negotiated principally with the French capitalist group repre- 
sented by the Banque Ottomane. International capital took up 
the remaining 40 per cent.^ The Anatolian Railway Company, 
a Turkish company, was founded on the 14th Redsheb of the 
year 1306 (March 4, 1889) with the Deutsche Bank for principal 
backer, to take over the railway lines between Ada-Bazar and 
Izmid, running since the early seventies, as also the concession 
for the Izmid-Eskisehir-Angora line (525 miles). It was further 
entitled to complete the Ada-Bazar-Scutari line and branch 
lines to Brussa, in addition to building the supplementary net- 
work Eskisehir-Konya (278 miles) on the basis of the 1893 con- 
cession, and finally to run a service from Angora to Kaisari 
(264 miles). The Turkish government gave the company a state 
guarantee of annual gross earnings amounting to ;^4i2 per km. 
on the Ada-Bazar line and of ;;{^6oo per km. on the Izmid- 
Angora lines. For this purpose it wrote over to the Administration 
de la Dette Publique Ottomane the revenue from tithes in the sand- 
shaks of Izmid, Ertoghrul, Kutalia and Angora, with which to 
make up the gross earnings guaranteed by the government. For 
the Angora-Kaisari line the government guaranteed annual 
gross earnings of 775 Turkish pounds, i.e. £']i2 per km., and 
604 Turkish pounds, i.e. approximately ;^550, provided, in the 
latter case, that the supplementary grant per km. did not exceed 
219 Turkish pounds (;^200 a year). The government was to 
receive a quarter of the eventual surplus of gross earnings over 
the guaranteed amount. The Administration de la Dette Publique 
Ottomane as executor of the government guarantee collected the 
tithes of the sandshaks Trebizonde and Gumuchhane direct and 
paid the railway company out of a common fund which was 
formed of all the tithes set aside for this purpose. In 1898, the 
Eskisehir-Konya maximum grant was raised from 218 to 296 
Turkish pounds. 

In 1899, the company obtained concessions to build and run 
a dockyard at Ada-Bazar, to issue writs, to build corn-elevators 
and storerooms for goods of every description, further the right 
to employ its own staff for loading and unloading and, finally, 
in the sphere of customs policy, the creation of a kind of free 
port. 

^ S. Schneider, Die Deutsctie Bagdadbahn (1900), p. 3. 
440 



INTERNATIONAL LOANS 

In 1 90 1, the company acquired a concession for the Baghdad 
railway Konya-Baghdad-Bazra-Gulf of Persia (1,500 miles) 
which connects with the Anatolian line by the Konya-Aregli- 
Bulgurlu line. For taking up this concession, a new limited com- 
pany was founded which placed the order of constructing the 
line, at first to Bulgurlu, with a Building Company registered in 
Frankfort-on-the-Main. 

Between 1893 and 19 10, the Turkish government gave addi- 
tional grants— ^1,948,000 for the Ada-Bazar-Angora line and 
1,800,000 Turkish pounds for the Eskisehir-Konya line — a total 
of /^3, 632, 000.^ Finally, by the concession of 1907, the company 
was empowered to drain the Karavirar Lake and to irrigate the 
Konya plain, these works to be executed within six years at 
government expense. In this instance, the company advanced 
the government the necessary capital up to ^^780,000 at 5 per 
cent interest, repayable within thirty-six years. In return the 
Turkish government pledged as securities: (i) an annual sum 
of 25,000 Turkish pounds, payable from the surplus of the tithes' 
fund assigned to the Administration de la Dette Publique Ottomane 
to cover the railway grants and other obligations; (2) the 
residual tithes over the last 5 years in the newly irrigated 
regions; (3) the net proceeds from the working of the irrigation 
systems, and (4) the price of all reclaimed or irrigated land that 
was sold. For the execution of this work, the Frankfort company 
had formed a subsidiary company Tor the irrigation of the 
Konya plain' with a capital of ^{^m. 5-4 to take this work in hand. 

In 1908 the company obtained the concession for extending 
the Konya railway as far as Baghdad and the Gulf of Persia, 
again with inclusion of a guaranteed revenue. 

To pay for this railway grant, a German Baghdad railway 
loan was taken up in three instalments of ;{^m. 2-16, ;^m. 4-32 
and ;^m. 4-76 respectively, on the security of the aggregate 
tithes for the vilayets Aydin, Baghdad, Mossul, Diarbekir, Ursa 
and Alleppo, and the sheep-tax in the vilayets Konya, Adana, 
Aleppo, etc.2 

The foundation of accumulation here becomes quite clear. 

^ Saling, Börsenjahrbuch jgii/12, p. 221 1. 

2 Saling, op. cit., pp. 360-1. Engineer Pressel of Wuerttemberg, who as 
assistant to Baron v. Hirsch was actively engaged in these transactions in 
European Turkey, neatly accounts for the total grants towards railway- 

441 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

German capital builds railways, ports and irrigation works in 
Asiatic Turkey; in all these enterprises it extorts new surplus 
value from the Asiatics whom it employs as labour power. But 
this surplus value must be realised together with the means of 
production from Germany (railway materials, machinery, etc.). 
How is it done? In part by commodity exchange which is 
brought about by the railways, the dockyards, etc., and nurtured 

building in Turkey which European capital WTested from the Turkish 
government: 





Length Paid guarantee 
in km. in francs 


3 lines in European Turkey 

Turkish permanent way in .Asia completed 

before 1900 
Commissions and other costs connected with 

the guaranteed railway grants paid to the 

A.D.P.O. 


18888 
2313-2 


33>099.352 
53,811,538 

9,351,209 


Total 


96,262,099 



All this refers only to the period before 1899; not until that date were the 
revenue grants paid in part. The tithes of no less than 28 out of the 74 sand- 
shaks in Asiatic Turkey had been pledged for the revenue grants, and with 
these grants, between 1856 and 1900, a grand total of 1,576 miles of rails 
had been laid down in Asiatic Turkey. Pressel, the expert, by the way gives 
an instance of the underhand methods employed by the railway company 
at Turkish expense; he states that under the 1893 agreement the Anatolian 
company promised to run the railway to Baghdad via Angora, but later 
decided that this plan of theirs would not work and, having qualified for the 
guarantee, left the line to its fate and got busy with another route via 
Konya. 'No sooner have the companies succeeded in acquiring the Smyrna- 
Aydin-Diner line, than they will demand the extension of this line to 
Konya, and the moment these branch lines are completed, the companies 
will move heaven and earth to force the goods traffic to use these new routes 
for which there are no guarantees, and which, more important still, need 
never share their takings, whereas the other lines must pay part of their 
surplus to the government, once their gross revenue exceeds a certain 
amount. In consequence, the government will gain nothing by the Aydin 
line, and the companies will make millions. The government will foot the 
bill for practically the entire revenue guarantee for the Kassaba-Angora 
line, and can never hope to profit by its contracted 25 per cent share in the 
surplus above ;^6oo gross takings' (W. V. Pressel, Les Chemins de Fer en 
Turquie d'Asie (Zurich, 1900), p. 7). 

442 



INTERNATIONAL LOANS 

in Asia Minor under conditions of natural economy. In part, 
i.e. in so far as commodity exchange does not grow quickly 
enough for the needs of capital, by using force, the machinery 
of the state, to convert the national real income into commodi- 
ties; these are turned into cash in order to realise capital plus 
surplus value. That is the true object of the revenue grants for 
independent enterprises run by foreign capital, and of the col- 
lateral in the case of loans. In both instances so-called tithes 
(ueshur), pledged in different ways, arc paid in kind by the 
Turkish peasant and these were gradually increased from about 
12 to i2| per cent. The peasant in the Asiatic vilayet must pay 
up or else his tithe would simply be confiscated by the police and 
the central and local authorities. These tithes, themselves a 
manifestation of ancient Asiatic despotism based on natural 
economy, are not collected by the Turkish government direct, 
but by tax-farmers not unlike the tax-collectors of the ancien 
regime; that is to say the expected returns from the levy in each 
vilayet are separately auctioned by the state to tax-farmers. They 
are bought by individual speculators or syndicates who sell the 
tithes of each sandshak (district) to other speculators and these 
resell their shares to a whole number of smaller agents. All these 
middlemen want to cover their expenses and make the greatest 
possible profit, and thus, by the time they are actually collected, 
the peasants' contributions have swollen to enormous dimen- 
sions. The tax-farmer will try to recoup himself for any mistake 
in his calculations at the expense of the peasant, and the latter, 
nearly always in debt, is impatient for the moment when he can 
sell his harvest. But often, after cutting his corn, he cannot start 
threshing for weeks, until indeed the tax-farmer deigns to take 
his due. His entire harvest is about to rot in the fields, and the 
tax-farmer, usually a grain merchant himself, takes advantage 
of this fact and compels him to sell at a low price. These tax- 
collectors know how to enlist the support of the officials, especi- 
ally the Muktars, the local headmen, against complaining 
malcontents. 1 

Along with the taxes on salt, tobacco, spirits, the excise on 
silk, the fishing dues, etc., the tithes are pledged with the Conseil 
de r Administration de la Dette Publique Ottomane to serve as security 
for the railway grant and the loans. In every case the Conseil 

^ Charles Moravitz, Die Türkei im Spiegel ihrer Finanzen (1903), p. 84. 

443 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

reserves to itself the right to vet the tax-farmers' contracts and 
stipulates for the proceeds of the tithe to be paid directly into 
the coffers of its regional offices. If no tax-farmer can be found, 
the tithes are stored in kind by the Turkish government; the 
warehouse keys are deposited with the Conseil which then can 
sell the tithes on its own account. 

Thus the economic metabolism between the peasants of Asia 
Minor, Syria and Mesopotamia on the one hand and German 
capital on the other proceeds in the following way: in the 
vilayets Konya, Baghdad, Bazra, etc., the grain comes into being 
as a simple use-product of primitive peasant economy. It im- 
mediately falls to the tithe-farmer as a state levy. Only then, in 
the hands of this latter, does it become a commodity, and, as 
such, money which falls to the state. This money is nothing but 
converted peasant grain; it was not even produced as a com- 
modity. But now, as a state guarantee, it serves towards paying 
for the construction and operation of railways, i.e. to realise 
both the value of the means of production and the surplus value 
extorted from the Asiatic peasants and proletariat in the build- 
ing and running of the railway. In this process further means of 
production of German origin are used, and so the peasant grain 
of Asia, converted into money, also serves to turn into cash the 
surplus value that has been extorted from the German workers. 
In the performance of these functions, the money rolls from the 
hands of the Turkish government into the coffers of the Deutsche 
Bank, and here it accumulates, as capitalist surplus value, in 
the form of promoters' profits, royalties, dividends and interests 
in the accounts of Messrs. Gwinner, Siemens, Stinnes and their 
fellow directors, of the shareholders and clients of the Deutsche 
Bank and the whole intricate system of its subsidiary companies. 
If there is no tax-farmer, as provided in the concessions, then 
the complicated metamorphoses are reduced to their most 
simple and obvious terms: the peasant grain passes immediately 
to the Administration de la Dette Publique Ottomane, i.e. to the 
representatives of European capital, and becomes already in its 
natural form a revenue for German and other foreign capital: 
it realises capitalist surplus value even before it has shed its use- 
form for the Asiatic peasant, even before it has become a com- 
modity and its own value has been realised. This is a coarse and 
straightforward metabolism between European capital and 

444 



INTERNATIONAL LOANS 

Asiatic peasant economy, with the Turkish state reduced to its 
real role, that of a political machinery for exploiting peasant 
economy for capitalist purposes, — the real function, this, of all 
Oriental states in the period of capitalist imperialism. This busi- 
ness of paying for German goods with German capital in Asia 
is not the absurd circle it seems at first, with the kind Germans 
allowing the shrewd Turks merely the 'use' of their great works 
of civilisation — it is at bottom an exchange between German 
capital and Asiatic peasant economy, an exchange performed 
under state compulsion. On the one hand it makes for progres- 
sive accumulation and expanding 'spheres of interest' as a pre- 
text for further political and economic expansion of German 
capital in Turkey. Railroad building and commodity exchange, 
on the other hand, are fostered by the state on the basis of a 
rapid disintegration, ruin and exploitation of Asiatic peasant 
economy in the course of which the Turkish state becomes more 
and more dependent on European capital, politically as well as 
financially.^ 

1 'Incidentally, in this country everything is difficult and complicated. If 
the government wishes to create a monopoly in cigarette paper or playing 
cards, France and Austro-Hungary immediately are on the spot to veto the 
project in the interest of their trade. If the issue is oil, Russia will raise 
objections, and even the Powers who are least concerned will make their 
agreement dependent on some other agreement. Turkey's fate is that of 
Sancho Panza and his dinner: as soon as the minister of finance wishes to do 
anything, some diplomat gets up, interrupts him and throws a veto in his 
teeth' (Moravitz, op. cit., p. 70). 



445 



CHAPTER XXXI 

PROTECTIVE TARIFFS AND 
ACCUMULATION 

IMPERIALISM is the political expression of the accumulation 
of capital in its competitive struggle for what remains still 
open of the non-capitalist environment. Still the largest part 
of the world in terms of geography, this remaining field for the 
expansion of capital is yet insignificant as against the high level 
of development already attained by the productive forces of 
capital; witness the immense masses of capital accumulated in 
the old countries which seek an outlet for their surplus product 
and strive to capitalise their surplus value, and the rapid 
change-over to capitalism of the pre-capitalist civilisations. On 
the international stage, then, capital must take appropriate 
measures. With the high development of the capitalist countries 
and their increasingly severe competition in acquiring non- 
capitalist areas, imperialism grows in lawlessness and violence, 
both in aggression against the non-capitalist world and in ever 
more serious conflicts among the competing capitalist countries. 
But the more violently, ruthlessly and thoroughly imperialism 
brings about the decline of non-capitalist civilisations, the more 
rapidly it cuts the very ground from under the feet of capitalist 
accumulation. Though imperialism is the historical method for 
prolonging the career of capitalism, it is also a sure means of 
bringing it to a swift conclusion. This is not to say that capitalist 
development must be actually driven to this extreme: the mere 
tendency towards imperialism of itself takes forms which make 
the final phase of capitalism a period of catastrophe. 

Classical economics, in its period of storm and stress, had had 
high hopes of a peaceful development of the accumulation of 
capital and of a trade and industry which can only prosper in 
times of peace, evolving the orthodox Manchester ideology of 
the harmony of interests among the world's commercial nations 
on the one hand, and between capital and labour on the other. 
These hopes were apparently justified in Europe by the short 

446 



PROTECTIVE TARIFFS AND ACCUMULATION 

period of Free Trade in the sixties and seventies, which was based 
upon the mistaken doctrine of the English Free Traders that the 
only theoretical and practical condition for the accumulation of 
capital is commodity exchange, that the two arc identical. As 
we have seen, Ricardo and his whole school identified accumu- 
lation and its reproductive conditions with simple commodity 
production and the conditions of simple commodity circulation. 
This was soon to become even more obvious in the practices of 
the common Free Trader. The special interests of the exporting 
Lancashire cotton manufacturers in Manchester determined the 
entire line of argument of the Cobden League. Their principal 
object was to get markets, and it became an article of faith: 
'Buy from foreign countries and thus in turn sell our industrial 
product, our cotton goods, on the new markets.' Cobden and 
Bright demanded Free Trade and cheaper foodstuffs in particular 
in the interest of consumption; but the consumer was not the 
worker who eats the bread, but the capitalist who consumes 
labour power. 

This teaching never expressed the interests of capitalist 
accumulation as a whole. In England herself it was given the 
lie already in the forties, when the harmony of interests of the 
commercial nations in the East were proclaimed to the sound of 
gunfire in the Opium Wars which ultimately, by the annexation 
of Hongkong, brought about the very opposite of such harmony, 
a system of 'spheres of interest'.^ On the European Continent, 

1 And not only in England. 'Even in 1859, a pamphlet, ascribed to Dier- 
gardt of Viersen, a factory owner, was disseminated all over Germany, 
urging that country to make sure of the East-Asiatic markets in good time. 
It advocated the display of military force as the only means for getting 
commercial advantages from the Japanese and the Eastern Asiatic nations 
in general. A German fleet, built with the people's small savings, had been 
a youthful dream, long since brought under the hammer by Hannibal 
Fischer. Though Prussia had a few ships, her naval power was not impressive. 
But in order to enter into commercial negotiations with Eastern Asia, it was 
decided to equip a ship. Graf zu Eulenburg, one of the ablest and most 
prudent Prussian statesmen, was appointed chief of this mission which also 
had scientific objects. Under most difficult conditions he carried out his com- 
mission with great skill, and though the plan for simultaneous negotiations 
with the Hawaiian islands had to be given up, the mission was otherwise 
successful. Though the Berlin press of that time knew better, declaring 
whenever a new difficulty was reported, that it was only to be expected, 
and denouncing all expenditure on naval demonstrations as a waste of the 

447 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

Free Trade in the sixties did not represent the interests of indus- 
trial capital, because the foremost Free Trade countries of the 
Continent were still predominantly agrarian with a compara- 
tively feeble development of industry. Rather, the policy of Free 
Trade was implemented as a means for the political reconstruc- 
tion of the Central European states. In Germany, under Bis- 
marck and Manteuffel, it was a peculiarly Prussian lever for 
ousting Austria from the Bund and the Zollverein and to set up the 
new German Empire under Prussian leadership. Economically 
speaking, the mainstays of Free Trade were in this case the 
interests both of commercial capital, especially in the Hansa 
towns to whom international trade v/as vital, and of agrarian 
consumers; among industry proper, it was otherwise. The iron 
industry was won over only with difficulty and in exchange for 
the abolition of the Rhine tolls. But the cotton industry in 
Southern Germany remained irreconcilable and clung to pro- 
tective tariffs. In France, 'most favoured nations' clause' agree- 
ments, the basis of the Free Trade system all over Europe, were 
concluded by Napoleon III without the consent, and even 
against the will, of parliament, industrialists and agrarians, who 
constituted an absolute majority, being in favour of protective 
tariffs. The government of the Second Empire only took the 
course of commercial treaties as an emergency measure — Britain 
accepted it as such — in order to get round political opposition in 
France and to establish Free Trade behind the back of the legis- 
lature by international action. The first principal treaty between 
England and France simply rode rough-shod over public opinion 
in France.^ Two imperial decrees abolished the old system of 
French protective tariffs which had been in force from 1853 to 

taxpayers' money, the ministry of the new era remained steadfast, and the 
harvest of success was reaped by the ministry that followed' (W. Lotz, 
Die Ideen der deutschen Handelspolitik, p. 80). 

^ Following on the preliminary discussion between Michel Chevalier and 
Richard Cobden on behalf of the French and English governments, 'official 
negotiations were shortly entered upon and were conducted with the greatest 
secrecy. On January i, i860, Napoleon III announced his intentions in a 
memorandum addressed to M. Fould, the Minister of State. This declaration 
came like a bolt from the blue. After the events of the past year, the general 
belief was that no attempt would be made to modify the tariff system 
before 1861. Feelings ran high, but all the same the treaty was signed on 
January 23' (Auguste Devcrs, La politique commerciale de la France depiiis i860. 
Schriften des Vereins für Sozialpolitik, vol. 51, p. 136). 

448 



PROTECTIVE TARIFFS AND ACCUMULATION 

1862. With scant observance of the formaHties they were 'rati- 
fied' in 1863. In Italy, Free Trade was a prop of Cavour's policy, 
depending as it did on French support. Under pressure of 
public opinion, an inquiry was made in 1870 which revealed 
that those most intimately concerned were hostile to the policy of 
Free Trade. In Russia, finally, the tendency towards Free Trade 
in the sixties was but the first step towards creating a broad 
basis for commodity economy and industry on a large scale, 
coming at the same time as the abolition of serfdom and the 
construction of a railway network.^ 

Thus the very inception of an international system of Free 
Trade shows it to be just a passing phase in the history of 
capitalist accumulation, and it shows up the fallacy of attribut- 
ing the general reversion to protective tariffs after the seventies 
simply to a defensive reaction against English Free Trade. ^ 

^ Between 1857 and 1868, the revision along liberal lines of the Russian 
tariffs and the ultimate writing-off of the insane system ofkantrin with regard 
to protective tariffs were a manifestation and corollary of the progressive 
reforms which the disastrous Crimean wars had made inevitable. But the 
reduction of customs duties reflected the concern of the landowning gentry 
who, both as consumers of foreign goods and as producers of grain for export, 
were interested in unrestricted commerce between Russia and Western 
Europe. The champion of agrarian interests, the 'Free Economic Associa- 
tion' stated: 'During the last sixty years, between 1822 and 1882, agriculture, 
Russia's largest producer, was brought to a precarious position owing to four 
great setbacks. These could in every case be directly attributed to excessive 
tariffs. On the other hand, the thirty- two years between 1845 and 1877 
when tariffs were moderate went by without any such emergency, in spite 
of three foreign wars and one civil war [meaning the Polish insurrection of 
1863 — R. L.], every one of which proved a greater or less strain on the 
financial resources of the state' {Memorandum of the Imperial Free Economic 
Association on Revising Russian Tariffs (St. Petersburg, 1890), p. 148). As late 
as the nineties, then, the scientific spokesman of the Free Trade Movement, 
the said 'Free Economic Association', had to agitate against protective 
tariffs as a 'contrivance to transplant' capitalist industry to Russia. In a 
reactionary 'populist' spirit, it denounced capitalism as a breeding ground 
for the modern proletariat, 'those masses of shiftless people without home or 
property who have nothing to lose and have long been in ill repute' (p. 191). 
This is proof enough that until most recent times the Russian champions of 
Free Trade, or at least of moderate tariffs, did not to any appreciable extent 
represent the interests of industrial capital. Cf also K. Lodyshenski: The 
History of the Russian Tariffs (St. Petersburg, 1886), pp. 239-58. 

2 This is also the opinion of F. Engels. In one of his letters to Nikolayon, 
on June 18, 1892, he writes: 'English authors, blinded by their patriotic 

A.C. 449 P 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

Such an explanation is vitiated by the fact that both in 
Germany and France the leaders in the reversion to protective 
tariffs were the agrarian interests, that the measures were 
directed not against British but against American competition, 
and that not England but Germany constituted the chief 
danger to the rising home industry in Russia, and France to 
that in Italy. Nor was Britain's monopoly the cause for the 
world-wide depression which prevailed since the seventies and 
induced the desire for protective tariffs. We must look deeper 
for the reasons responsible for the change of front on the ques- 
tion of protective tariffs. The doctrine of Free Trade with its 
delusion about the harmony of interests on the world market 
corresponded with an outlook which conceived of everything 
in terms of commodity exchange. It was abandoned just as soon 
as big industrial capital had become sufficiently established in 
the principal countries of the European Continent to look to 
the conditions for its accumulation. As against the mutual 
interests of capitalist countries, these latter bring to the fore 
the antagonism engendered by the competitive struggle for the 
non-capitalist environment. 

When the Free Trade era opened, Eastern Asia was only just 
being made accessible by the Chinese wars, and European 
capital had but begun to make headway in Egypt. In the 
eighties the policy of expansion became ever stronger, together 
with a policy of protective tariffs. There was an uninterrupted 
succession of events during the eighties: the British occupation 

interests, completely fail to grasp why the whole world so stubbornly rejects 
England's example of free trade and adopts in its place the principle of 
protective tariffs. Of course, they simply dare not admit even to themselves 
that the system of protective tariffs, by now almost universal, is merely a 
defensive measure against English free trade which was instrumental in per- 
fecting England's industrial monopoly. Such a defence policy may be more 
or less reasonable — in some cases it is downright stupid, as for instance in 
Germany who under the system of free trade had become a great industrial 
power and now imposes protective tariffs on agricultural products and raw 
materials, thus increasing the cost of her industrial production. In my view 
this universal reversion to protective tariffs is not a mere accident but the 
reaction against England's intolerable industrial monopoly. The form which 
this reaction takes, as I said before, may be wrong, inadequate and even 
worse, but its historical necessity seems to me quite clear and obvious' 
[Letters of Karl Marx and Frederick Engels to Nikolayon (St. Petersburg, 
1908), p. 71). 



PROTECTIVE TARIFFS AND ACCUMULATION 

of Egypt, Germany's colonial conquests in Africa, the French 
occupation of Tunisia together with the Tonkin expedition, 
Italy's advances in Assab and Massawa, the Abyssinian war 
and the creation of a separate Eritrea, and the English con- 
quests in South Africa. The clash between Italy and France 
over the Tunisian sphere of interest was the characteristic pre- 
lude to the Franco-Italian tariff war seven years later, by which 
drastic epilogue an end was made to the Free Trade harmony of 
interests on the European Continent. To monopolise the non- 
capitalist areas at home and abroad became the war-cry of 
capital, while the free-trade policy of the 'open door' specifically 
represented the peculiar helplessness of non-capitalist countries 
in the face of international capital and the natural equilibrium 
which was aimed at by its competition in the preliminary stage 
of the partial or total occupation of these areas as colonies or 
spheres of interest. As the oldest capitalist Empire, England 
alone could so far remain loyal to Free Trade, primarily because 
she had long had immense possessions of non-capitalist areas 
as a basis for operations which afforded her almost unlimited 
opportunities for capitalist accumulation. Until recently, she 
had thus in fact been beyond the competition of other capitalist 
countries. These, in turn, universally strove to become self- 
sufficient behind a barrier of protective tariffs; yet they buy one 
another's commodities and come to depend ever more one upon 
another for replenishing their material conditions of reproduc- 
tion. Indeed, protective tariffs have by now completely lost their 
use for technical development of the productive forces, all too 
often being the instrument for the artificial conservation of 
obsolete productive methods. The inherent contradictions of an 
international policy of protective tariffs, exactly like the dual 
character of the international loan system, are just a reflection 
of the historical antagonism which has developed between the 
dual interests of accumulation: expansion, the realisation and 
capitalisation of surplus value on the one hand, and, on the 
other, an outlook which conceives of everything purely in terms 
of commodity exchange. 

This fact is evidenced particularly in that the modern system 
of high protective tariffs, required by colonial expansion and 
the increasing inner tension of the capitalist medium, was also 
instituted with a view to increasing armaments. The reversion 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

to protective tariffs was carried through in Germany as well as 
in France, Italy, and Russia, together with, and in the interests 
of, an expansion of the armed services, as the basis for the 
European competition in armaments which was developing at 
that time, first on land, and then also at sea. European Free 
Trade, with its attendant continental system of infantry, had 
been superseded by protective tariffs as the foundation and 
supplement of an imperialist system with a strong bias towards 
naval power. 

Thus capitalist accumulation as a whole, as an actual his- 
torical process, has two different aspects. One concerns the 
commodity market and the place where surplus value is pro- 
duced — the factory, the mine, the agricultural estate. Regarded 
in this light, accumulation is a purely economic process, with its 
most important phase a transaction between the capitalist and 
wage labourer. In both its phases, however, it is confined to 
tlie exchange of equivalents and remains within the limits of 
commodity exchange. Here, in form at any rate, peace, property 
and equality prevail, and the keen dialectics of scientific analysis 
were required to reveal how the right of ownership changes in 
the course of accumulation into appropriation of other people's 
property, how commodity exchange turns into exploitation and 
equality becomes class-rule. 

The other aspect of the accumulation of capital concerns the 
relations between capitalism and the non-capitalist modes of 
production which start making their appearance on the inter- 
national stage. Its predominant methods are colonial policy, 
an international loan system — a policy of spheres of interest — 
and war. Force, fraud, oppression, looting are openly displayed 
without any attempt at concealment, and it requires an effort 
to discover within this tangle of political violence and contests 
of power the stern laws of the economic process. 

Bourgeois liberal theory takes into account only the former 
aspect: the realm of 'peaceful competition', the marvels of 
technology and pure commodity exchange; it separates it 
strictly from the other aspect: the realm of capital's blustering 
violence which is regarded as more or less incidental to foreign 
policy and quite independent of the economic sphere of capital. 

In reality, political power is nothing but a vehicle for the 
economic process. The conditions for the reproduction of capital 

452 



PROTECTIVE TARIFFS AND ACCUMULATION 

provide the organic link between these two aspects of the 
accumulation of capital. The historical career of capitalism can 
only be appreciated by taking them together. 'Sweating blood 
and filth with every pore from head to toe' characterises not 
only the birth of capital but also its progress in the world at 
every step, and thus capitalism prepares its own downfall under 
ever more violent contortions and convulsions. 



453 



CHAPTER XXXII 

MILITARISM AS A PROVINCE 
OF ACCUMULATION 

MILITARISM fulfils a quite definite fianction in the history 
of capital, accompanying as it does every historical 
phase of accumulation. It plays a decisive part in the 
first stages of European capitalism, in the period of the so-called 
'primitive accumulation', as a means of conquering the New 
World and the spice-producing countries of India. Later, it is 
employed to subject the modern colonies, to destroy the social 
organisations of primitive societies so that their means of pro- 
duction may be appropriated, forcibly to introduce commodity 
trade in countries where the social structure had been unfavour- 
able to it, and to turn the natives into a proletariat by compel- 
ling them to work for wages in the colonies. It is responsible for 
the creation and expansion of spheres of interest for European 
capital in non-European regions, for extorting railway con- 
cessions in backward countries, and for enforcing the claims of 
European capital as international lender. Finally, militarism is 
a weapon in the competitive struggle between capitalist coun- 
tries for areas of non-capitalist civilisation. 

In addition, militarism has yet another important function. 
From the purely economic point of view, it is a pre-eminent 
means for the realisation of surplus value; it is in itself a pro- 
vince of accumulation. In examining the question who should 
count as a buyer for the mass of products containing the capit- 
alised surplus value, we have again and again refused to con- 
sider the state and its organs as consumers. Since their income 
is derivative, they were all taken to belong to the special cate- 
gory of those who live on the surplus value (or partly on the 
wage of labour), together with the liberal professions and the 
various parasites of present-day society ('king, professor, prosti- 
tute, mercenary'). But this interpretation will only do on two 
assumptions: first, if we take it, in accordance with Marx's 

454 



MILITARISM AS PROVINCE OF ACCUMULATION 

diagram, that the state has no other sources of taxation than 
capitaHst surplus value and wages, ^ and secondly, if we regard 
the state and its organs as consumers pure and simple. If the 
issue turns on the personal consumption of the state organs (as 
also of the 'mercenary') the point is that consumption is partly 
transferred from the working class to the hangers-on of the 
capitalist class, in so far as the workers foot the bill. 

Let us assume for a moment that the indirect taxes extorted 
from the workers, which mean a curtailment of their consump- 
tion, are used entirely to pay the salaries of the state officials and 
to provision the regular army. There will then be no change in 
the reproduction of social capital as a whole. Both Depart- 
ments II and I remain constant because society as a whole still 
demands the same kind of products and in the same quantities. 
Only V as the commodity of 'labour power' has changed in value 
in relation to the products of Department II, i.e. in relation to 
the means of subsistence. This y, the same amount of money 
representing labour power, is now exchanged for a smaller 
amount of means of subsistence. What happens to the products 
of Department II which are then left over? Instead of the 
workers, the state officials and the regular army now receive 
them. The organs of the capitalist state take over the workers' 
consumption on the same scale exactly. Although the condi- 
tions of reproduction have remained stable, there has been a 
redistribution of the total product. Part of the products of 
Department II, originally intended entirely for the consump- 
tion of the workers as equivalent for v, is now allocated to the 

^ Dr. Renner indeed makes this assumption the basis of his treatise on 
taxation. 'Every particle of value created in the course of one year is made 
up of these four parts: profit, interest, rent, and wages; and annual taxation, 
then, can only be levied upon these' (Das arbeitende Volk und die Steuern, 
Vienna, 1909). Though Renner immediately goes on to mention peasants, 
he cursorily dismisses them in a single sentence: 'A peasant e.g. is simultane- 
ously entrepreneur, worker, and landowner, his agricultural proceeds yield 
him wage, profit, and rent, all in one. ' Obviously, it is an empty abstraction 
to apply simultaneously all the categories of capitalist production to the 
peasantry, to conceive of the peasant as entrepreneur, wage labourer and 
landlord all in one person. If, like Renner, we want to put the peasant into a 
single category, his peculiarity for economics lies in the very fact that he 
belongs neither to the class of capitalist entrepreneurs nor to that of the wage 
proletariat, that he is not a representative of capitalism at all but of simple 
commodity production. 

455 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

hangers-on of the capitahst class for consumption. From the 
point of view of social reproduction, it is as if the relative surplus 
value had in the first place been larger by a certain amount 
which is added on to the consumption of the capitalist class and 
its hangers-on. 

So far the crude exploitation, by the mechanism of indirect 
taxation, of the working class for the support of the capitalist 
state's officials amounts merely to an increase of the surplus 
value, of that part of it, that is to say, which is consumed. The 
difference is that this further splitting off of surplus value from 
variable capital only comes later, after the exchange between 
capital and labour has been accomplished. But the consumption 
by the organs of the capitalist state has no bearing on the 
realisation of capitalised surplus value, because the additional 
surplus value for this consumption — even though it comes about 
at the workers' expense — is created afterwards. On the other 
hand, if the workers did not pay for the greater part of the state 
officials' upkeep, the capitalists themselves would have to bear 
the entire cost of it. A corresponding portion of their surplus 
value would have to be assigned directly to keeping the organs 
of their class-rule, either at the expense of production which 
would have to be curtailed accordingly, or, which is more prob- 
able, it would come from the surplus value intended for their 
consumption. The capitalists would have to capitalise on a 
smaller scale because of having to contribute more towards the 
immediate preservation of their own class. In so far as they shift 
onto the working class (and also the representatives of simple 
commodity production, such as peasants and artisans) the prin- 
cipal charge of their hangers-on, the capitalists have a larger 
portion of surplus value available for capitalisation. But as yet 
no opportunities for such capitalisation have come into being, no new 
market, that is to say, for the surplus value that has become 
available, in which it could produce and realise new commod- 
ities. But when the monies concentrated in the exchequer by 
taxation are used for the production of armaments, the picture 
is changed. 

With indirect taxation and high protective tariffs, the bill 
of militarism is footed mainly by the working class and the 
peasants. The two kinds of taxation must be considered separ- 
ately. From an economic point of view, it amounts to the fol- 

456 



MILITARISM AS PROVINCE OF ACCUMULATION 

lowing, as far as the working class is concerned: provided that 
wages arc not raised to make up for the higher price of foodstuffs 
— which is at present the fate of the greatest part of the working 
class, including even the minority that is organised in trade 
unions, owing to the pressure of cartels and employers' organisa- 
tions^ — indirect taxation means that part of the purchasing 
power of the working class is transferred to the state. Now as 
before the variable capital, as a fixed amount of money, will put 
in motion an appropriate quantity of living labour, that is to 
say it serves to employ the appropriate quantity of constant 
capital in production and to produce the corresponding amount 
of surplus value. As soon as capital has completed this cycle, it 
is divided between the working class and the state: the workers 
surrender the state part of the money they received as wages. 
Capital has wholly appropriated the former variable capital in 
its material form, as labour power, but the working class retains 
only part of the variable capital in the form of money, the state 
claiming the rest. And this invariably happens after capital has 
run its cycle between capitalist and worker; it takes place, as it 
were, behind the back of capital, at no point impinging direct 
on the vital stages of the circulation of capital and the produc- 
tion of surplus value, so that it is no immediate concern of the 
latter. But all the same it does affect the conditions for the repro- 
duction of capital as a whole. The transfer of some of the pur- 
chasing power from the working class to the state entails a 
proportionate decrease in the consumption of means of sub- 
sistence by the working class. For capital as a whole, it means 
producing a smaller quantity of consumer goods for the working 
class, provided that both variable capital (in the form of money 
and as labour power) and the mass of appropriated surplus 
value remain constant, so that the workers get a smaller share 
of the aggregate product. In the process of reproduction of the 
entire capital, then, means of subsistence will be produced in 
amounts smaller than the value of the variable capital, because 
of the shift in the ratio between the value of the variable capital 

^ It would go beyond the scope of the present treatise to deal with cartels 
and trusts as specific phenomena of the imperialist phase. They are due to 
the internal competitive struggle between individual capitalist groups for a 
monopoly of the existing spheres for accumulation and for the distribution of 
profits. 

457 P* 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

and the quantity of means of subsistence in which it is reahsed, 
with the money wages of labour remaining constant, according 
to our premise, or at any rate not rising sufficientiy to offset the 
increase in the price of foodstuffs. This increase represents the 
level of indirect taxation. 

How will the material relations of reproduction be adjusted? 
When fewer means of subsistence are needed for the renewal of 
labour power, a corresponding amount of constant capital and 
living labour becomes available which can now be used for pro- 
ducing other commodities in response to a new effective demand 
arising within society. It arises from the side of the state which 
has appropriated, by way of tax legislation, the part wanting of 
the workers' purchasing power. This time, however, the state 
does not demand means of subsistence (after all that has already 
been said under the heading of 'third persons', we shall here 
ignore the demand for means of subsistence for state officials 
which is also satisfied out of taxes) but it requires a special kind 
of product, namely the militarist weapons of war on land and 
at sea. 

Again we take Marx's second diagram of accumulation 
as the basis for investigating the ensuing changes in social 
reproduction: 

I. 5,oooc+i>oooz;+ijOOOi^=7,ooo means of production 
IL i,430c+ 285^+ 285^=2,000 means of subsistence 

Now let us suppose that, owing to indirect taxation and the 
consequent increase in the price of means of subsistence, the 
working class as a whole reduces consumption by, say, a 100 
value units of the real wages. As before, the workers receive 
ijOOoy + 2852; = 1,28527 in money, but for this money they only get 
means of subsistence to the value of 1 185. The 100 units which 
represent the tax increase in the price of foodstuffs go to the 
state which receives in addition military taxes from the peasants, 
etc., to the value of 150 units, bringing the total up to 250. This 
total constitutes a new demand — the demand for armaments. 
At present, however, we are only interested in the 100 units 
taken from the workers' wages. This demand for armaments to 
the value of 100 must be satisfied by the creation of an appro- 
priate branch of production which requires a constant capital of 
7 1 5 and a variable capital of 14-25, assuming the average 

458 



MILITARISM AS PROVINCE OF ACCUMULATION 
organic composition outlined in Marx's diagram. 

71-5^+ i4"25y+ 14-255^100 weapons of war 

This new branch of production further requires that 71-5 
means of production be produced and about 13 means of sub- 
sistence, because, of course, the real wages of the workers are 
also less by about one-thirteenth. 

You could counter by saying that the profit accruing to 
capital from this new expansion of demand is merely on paper, 
because the cut in the actual consumption of the working class 
will inevitably result in a corresponding curtailment of the 
means of subsistence produced. It will take the following form 
for Department II: 

7i-5c+i4-25y+ 14-255= 100 

In addition, Department I will also have to contract accord- 
ingly, so that, owing to the decreasing consumption of the work- 
ing class, the equations for both departments will be: 

I. 4,949c +989-75^+989-755=6,928-5 
II. 1,358-5^+270-75^+270-755=1,900 

If, by the mediation of the state, the same 100 units now call 
forth armament production of an equal volume with a corre- 
sponding fillip to the production of producer goods, this is at 
first sight only an extraneous change in the material forms of 
social production: instead of a quantity of means of subsistence a 
quantity of armaments is now being produced. Capital has won 
with the left hand only what it has lost with the right. Or we 
might say that the large number of capitalists producing means 
of subsistence have lost the effective demand in favour of a small 
group of big armament manufacturers. 

But this picture is only valid for individual capital. Here it 
makes no difference indeed whether production engages in one 
sphere of activity or another. As far as the individual capitalist 
is concerned, there are no departments of total production such 
as the diagram distinguishes. There are only commodities and 
buyers, and it is completely immaterial to him whether he pro- 
duces instruments of life or instruments of death, corned beef or 
armour plating. 

Opponents of militarism frequently appeal to this point of 

459 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

view to show that military supplies as an economic investment 
for capital merely put profit taken from one capitalist into the 
pocket of another.^ On the other hand, capital and its advo- 
cates try to overpersuade the working class to this point of view 
by talking them into the belief that indirect taxes and the 
demand of the state would only bring about a change in the 
material form of reproduction; instead of other commodities 
cruisers and guns would be produced which would give the 
workers as good a living, if not a better one. 

One glance at the diagram shows how little truth there is in 
this argument as far as the workers are concerned. To make 
comparison easier, we will suppose the armament factories to 
employ just as many workers as were employed before in the 
production of means of subsistence for the working class. 1,285 
units will then be paid out as wages, but now they will only 
buy 1,185's worth of means of subsistence. 

All this looks different from the perspective of capital as a 
whole. For this the 100 at the disposal of the state, which repre- 
sent the demand for armaments, constitute a new market. 
Originally this money was variable capital and as such it has 
done its job, it has been exchanged for living labour which pro- 
duced the surplus value. But then the circulation of the variable 
capital was stopped short, this money was split off, and it now 
appears as a new purchasing power in the possession of the 
state. It has been created by sleight of hand, as it were, but still 
it has the same effects as a newly opened market. Of course for 

^ In a reply to Vorontsov, Professor Manuilov, for example, wrote what 
was then greatly praised by the Russian Marxists: 'In this context, we must 
distinguish strictly between a group of entrepreneurs producing weapons of 
war and the capitalist class as a whole. For the manufacturers of guns, rifles 
and other war materials, the existence of militarism is no doubt profitable 
and indispensable. It is indeed quite possible that the abolition of the system 
of armed peace would spell ruin for Krupp. The point at issue, however, 
is not a special group of entrepreneurs but the capitalists as a class, capitalist 
production as a whole.' In this connection, however, it should be noted that 
'if the burden of taxation falls chiefly on the working population, every 
increase of this burden diminishes the purchasing power of the population 
and hence the demand for commodities'. This fact is taken as proof that 
militarism, under the aspect of armament production, does indeed 'enrich 
one group of capitalists, but at the same time it injures all others, spelling 
gain on the one hand but loss on the other' ( Vesnik Praia, Journal of the 
Law Society (St. Petersburg, 1890), no. i, 'Militarism and Capitalism'). 

460 



MILITARISM AS PROVINCE OF ACCUMULATION 

the time being capital is debarred from selling lOO units of con- 
sumer goods for the working class, and the individual capitalist 
considers the worker just as good a consumer and buyer of com- 
modities as anyone else, another capitalist, the state, the peasant, 
foreign countries, etc. But let us not forget that for capital as a 
whole the upkeep of the working class is only a necessary evil, 
only a means towards the real end of production: the creation 
and realisation of surplus value. If it were possible to extort 
surplus value without giving labour an equal measure of means 
of subsistence, it would be all the better for business. To begin 
with indirect taxation has the same effects as if — the price of 
foodstuffs remaining constant — the capitalists had succeeded in 
depressing wages by a hundred units without detracting from 
the work performed, seeing that a lower output of consumer 
goods is equally the inevitable result of continuous wage cuts. If 
wages are cut heavily, capital does not worry about having to 
produce fewer means of subsistence for the workers, in fact it 
delights in this practice at every opportunity; similarly, capital 
as a whole does not mind if the effective demand of the working 
class for means of subsistence is curtailed because of indirect 
taxation which is not compensated by a rise in wages. This may 
seem strange because in the latter case the balance of the vari- 
able capital goes to the exchequer, while with a direct wage cut 
it remains in the capitalists' pockets and — commodity prices 
remaining equal — increases the relative surplus value. But a 
continuous and universal reduction of money wages can only 
be carried through on rare occasions, especially if trade union 
organisation is highly developed. There are strong social and 
political barriers to this fond aspiration of capital. Depression of 
the real wage by means of indirect taxation, on the other hand, 
can be carried through promptly, smoothly and universally, and 
it usually takes time for protests to be heard; and besides, the 
opposition is confined to the political field and has no imme- 
diate economic repercussions. The subsequent restriction in the 
production of means of subsistence does not represent a loss of 
markets for capital as a whole but rather a saving in the costs 
of producing surplus value. Surplus value is never realised by 
producing means of subsistence for the workers — however neces- 
sary this may be, as the reproduction of living labour, for the 
production of surplus value. 

461 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

But to come back to our example: 

I. 5,oooc+ 1, GOOü-j- 13000^=7,000 means of production 
II. 1,430^+ 285^+ 285^=2,000 means of subsistence 

At first it looks as if Department II were also creating and 
realising surplus value in the process of producing means of sub- 
sistence for the workers, and Department I by producing the 
requisite means of production. But if we take the social product 
as a whole, the illusion disappears. The equation is in that case: 

6,430^+1,2851;+ 1,285^=9,000 

Now, if the means of subsistence for the workers are cut by 
100 units, the corresponding contraction of both departments 
will give us the following equations: 

I- 4.949^ +989-75^'+989-75'f=6,928-5 
II- i,358-5f+27o-75^+27o-75^= 1,900 

and for the social product as a whole: 

6,307-5^+ i>26o-5y+ i,26o-5:f=8,828-5 

This looks like a general decrease in both the total volume of 
production and in the production of surplus value — but only if 
we contemplate just the abstract quantities of value in the com- 
position of the total product; it does not hold good for the 
material composition thereof. Looking closer, we find that noth- 
ing but the upkeep of labour is in effect decreased. Fewer means 
of subsistence and production are now being made, no doubt, 
but then, they had had no other function save to maintain 
workers. The social product is smaller and less capital is now 
employed — but then, the object of capitalist production is not 
simply to employ as much capital as possible, but to produce as 
much surplus value as possible. Capital has only decreased 
because a smaller amount is sufficient for maintaining the 
workers. If the total cost of maintaining the workers employed 
in the society came to 1,285 units in the first instance, the 
present decrease of the social product by 171* 5 — the difference of 
(9,000 —8,828-5) — comes off this maintenance charge, and there 
is a consequent change in the composition of the social product: 

6,43oc+ 1 , 1 1 3-5^+ 1 ,285^=8,828-5 
462 



MILITARISM AS PROVINCE OF ACCUMULATION 

Constant capital and surplus value remain unchanged, and 
only the variable capital, paid labour, has diminished. Or — in 
case there are doubts about constant capital being unafTccted — 
we may further allow for the event that, as would happen in 
actual practice, concomitant with the decrease in means of sub- 
sistence for the workers there will be a corresponding cut in 
the constant capital. The equation for the social product as a 
whole would then be: 

6,307-5^+ 1,2361;+ 1,285^=8,828-5 

In spite of the smaller social product, there is no change in 
the surplus value in either case, and it is only the cost of main- 
taining the workers that has fallen. 

Put it this way: the value of the aggregate social product may 
be defined as consisting of three parts, the total constant capital 
of the society, its total variable capital, and its total surplus 
value, of which the first set of products contains no additional 
labour, and the second and third no means of production. As 
regards their material form, all these products come into being 
in the given period of production — though in point of value the 
constant capital had been produced in a previous period and is 
merely being transferred to new products. On this basis, we can 
also divide all the workers employed into three mutually ex- 
clusive categories: those who produce the aggregate constant 
capital of the society, those who provide the upkeep for all the 
workers, and finally those who create the entire surplus value for 
the capitalist class. 

If, then, the workers' consumption is curtailed, only workers 
in the second category will lose their jobs. Ex hypothesi, these 
workers had never created surplus value for capital, and in con- 
sequence their dismissal is therefore no loss from the capitalist's 
point of view but a gain, since it decreases the cost of producing 
surplus value. 

The demand of the state which arises at the same time has the 
lure of a new and attractive sphere for realising the surplus 
value. Some of the money circulating as variable capital breaks 
free of this cycle and in the state treasury it represents a new 
demand. For the technique of taxation, of course, the order of 
events is rather different, since the amount of the indirect taxes 
is actually advanced to the state by capital and is merely being 

463 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

refunded to the capitalists by the sale of their commodities, as 
part of their price. But economically speaking, it makes no dif- 
ference. The crucial point is that the quantity of money with the 
function of variable capital should first mediate the exchange 
between capital and labour power. Later, when there is an ex- 
change between workers and capitalists as buyers and sellers of 
commodities respectively, this money will change hands and 
accrue to the state as taxes. This money, which capital has set 
circulating, first fulfils its primary function in the exchange with 
labour power, but subsequently, by mediation of the state, it 
begins an entirely new career. As a new purchasing power, be- 
longing with neither labour nor capital, it becomes interested in 
new products, in a special branch of production which does not 
cater for either the capitalists or the working class, and thus it 
offers capital new opportunities for creating and realising sur- 
plus value. When we were formerly taking it for granted that 
the indirect taxes extorted from the workers are used for paying 
the officials and for provisioning the army, we found the 'saving' 
in the consumption of the working class to mean that the 
workers rather than the capitalists were made to pay for the 
personal consumption of the hangers-on of the capitalist class 
and the tools of their class-rule. This charge devolved from the 
surplus value to the variable capital, and a corresponding 
amount of the surplus value became available for purposes of 
capitalisation. Now we see how the taxes extorted from the 
workers afford capital a new opportunity for accumulation 
when they are used for armament manufacture. 

On the basis of indirect taxation, militarism in practice works 
both ways. By lowering the normal standard of living for the 
working class, it ensures both that capital should be able to 
maintain a regular army, the organ of capitalist rule, and that 
it may tap an impressive field for further accumulation.^ 

We have still to examine the second source of the state's pur- 
chasing power referred to in our example, the 150 units out of 

1 Ultimately, the deterioration of the normal conditions under which 
labour power is renewed will bring about a deterioration of labour itself, it 
will diminish the average efficiency and productivity of labour, and thus 
jeopardise the conditions for the production of surplus value. But capital 
will not feel these results for a long time, and so they do not immediately 
enter into its economic calculations, except in so far as they bring about more 
drastic defensive measures of the wage labourers in general. 

464 



MILITARISM AS PROVINCE OF ACCUMULATION 

the total 250 invested in armaments. They differ essentially 
from the hundred units considered above in that they are not 
supplied by the workers but by the petty bourgeoisie, i.e. the 
artisans and peasants. (In this connection, we can ignore the 
comparatively small tax-contribution of the capitalist class 
itself.) 

The money accruing to the state as taxes from the peasant 
masses — as our generic term for all non-proletarian consumers 
— was not originally advanced by capital and has not split off 
from capital in circulation. In the hand of the peasant it is the 
equivalent of goods that have been realised, the exchange value 
of simple commodity production. The state now gets part of the 
purchasing power of the non-capitalist consumers, purchasing 
power, that is to say, which is already free to realise the surplus 
value for capitalist accumulation. Now the question arises, 
whether economic changes will result for capital, and if so, of 
what nature, from diverting the purchasing power of such strata 
to the state for militarist purposes. It almost looks as if we had 
come up against yet another shift in the material form of repro- 
duction. Capital will now produce an equivalent of war materials 
for the state instead of producing large quantities of means of 
production and subsistence for peasant consumers. But in fact 
the changes go deeper. First and foremost, the state can use the 
mechanism of taxation to mobilise much larger amounts of pur- 
chasing power from the non-capitalist consumers than they 
would ordinarily spend on their own consumption. 

Indeed the modern system of taxation itself is largely respon- 
sible for forcing commodity economy on the peasants. Under 
pressure of taxes, the peasant must turn more and more of 
his produce into commodities, and at the same time he must 
buy more and more. Taxation presses the produce of peasant 
economy into circulation and compels the peasants to become 
buyers of capitalist products. Finally, on a basis of commodity 
production in the peasant style, the system of taxation lures 
more purchasing power from peasant economy than would 
otherwise become active. 

What would normally have been hoarded by the peasants 
and the lower middle classes until it has grown big enough to 
invest in savings banks and other banks is now set free to con- 
stitute an effective demand and an opportunity for investment. 

465 



HISTORICAL CONDITIONS OF ACCUMULATION 

Further the multitude of individual and insignificant demands 
for a whole range of commodities, which will become effective 
at different times and which might often be met just as well by 
simple commodity production, is now replaced by a compre- 
hensive and homogeneous demand of the state. And the satis- 
faction of this demand presupposes a big industry of the highest 
order. It requires the most favourable conditions for the produc- 
tion of surplus value and for accumulation. In the form of 
government contracts for army supplies the scattered pur- 
chasing power of the consumers is concentrated in large quan- 
tities and, free of the vagaries and subjective fluctuations of 
personal consumption, it achieves an almost automatic regu- 
larity and rhythmic growth. Capital itself ultimately controls 
this automatic and rhythmic movement of militarist production 
through the legislature and a press whose function is to mould 
so-called 'public opinion'. That is why this particular province 
of capitalist accumulation at first seems capable of infinite ex- 
pansion. All other attempts to expand markets and set up opera- 
tional bases for capital largely depend on historical, social and 
political factors beyond the control of capital, whereas produc- 
tion for militarism represents a province whose regular and pro- 
gressive expansion seems primarily determined by capital itself. 

In this way capital turns historical necessity into a virtue: the 
ever fiercer competition in the capitalist world itself provides a 
field for accumulation of the first magnitude. Capital increas- 
ingly employs militarism for implementing a foreign and 
colonial policy to get hold of the means of production and 
labour power of non-capitalist countries and societies. This same 
militarism works in a like manner in the capitalist countries to 
divert purchasing power away from the non-capitalist strata. 
The representatives of simple commodity production and the 
working class are affected alike in this way. At their expense, 
the accumulation of capital is raised to the highest power, by 
robbing the one of their productive forces and by depressing the 
other's standard of living. Needless to say, after a certain stage 
the conditions for the accumulation of capital both at home and 
abroad turn into their very opposite — they become conditions 
for the decline of capitalism. 

The more ruthlessly capital sets about the destruction of non- 
capitalist strata at home and in the outside world, the more it 

466 



MILITARISM AS PROVINCE OF ACCUMULATION 

lowers the standard of living for the workers as a whole, the 
greater also is the change in the day-to-day history of capital. 
It becomes a string of political and social disasters and convul- 
sions, and under these conditions, punctuated by periodical 
economic catastrophes or crises, accumulation can go on no 
longer. 

But even before this natural economic impasse of capital's 
own creating is properly reached it becomes a necessity for the 
international working class to revolt against the rule of capital. 

Capitalism is the first mode of economy with the weapon of 
propaganda, a mode which tends to engulf the entire globe and 
to stamp out all other economies, tolerating no rival at its side. 
Yet at the same time it is also the first mode of economy which 
is unable to exist by itself, which needs other economic systems 
as a medium and soil. Although it strives to become universal, 
and, indeed, on account of this its tendency, it must break down 
— because it is immanently incapable of becoming a universal 
form of production. In its living history it is a contradiction in 
itself, and its movement of accumulation provides a solution to 
the conflict and aggravates it at the same time. At a certain 
stage of development there will be no other way out than the 
application of socialist principles. The aim of socialism is not 
accumulation but the satisfaction of toiling humanity's wants by 
developing the productive forces of the entire globe. And so we 
find that socialism is by its very nature an harmonious and 
universal system of economy. 



467 



INDEX 



Abstinence, 43, 102, 108, 118, 150, 
235. 240, 280, 334 

Accumulation, its impossibility re- 
spective unrestricted possibility 
23, i88f., 198fr., 216, 237, 268, 
303, 311, 325 

— primitive, 161, 272, 364, 369^, 

454 

Africa, 352, 363^, 382, 386; South, 
411fr., 420, 451 

Algeria, under French rule, 371, 
377flr.; under Turkish rule, 378 

Allard, General, 381 

Amer'ca, 290, 352, 420, 422, 428; 
United States of, 173, 293ff., 
297. 307^; 357f-» 362f., 379. 
396, 398, 402, 404f., 409flr., 
424ff., 432; States of South, 
420, 422ff. 

American Civil War (War of Seces- 
sion), 35 7f., 363, 396, 398f., 
402, 424f., 430 

Anton, G., 385 

Arabs, 377, 380, 382fF. 

Asia, 247, 290, 42off., 443flr., 450 

Australia, 420, 426f. 

Baring, E., Earl of Cromer, 434 

Barter, 213, 2i5f., 222, 229 

Bastiat-Schultze, F., 238, 268 

Bentham, J., 372 

Bergmann, 2 1 1 

Bismarck, 448 

Blackhouse, E. T., 392, 394 

Blanc, L., 227 

Bland, L. O., 392, 394 

Blanqui, 227 

Boer Republics, 411, 4141!. 

— War, 415 
Bouding, 3i9f. 
Brandt, M. V., 392 
Bright, 447 



Brissot, 265 
Bruce, General, 391 
Bryce, J., 363, 412 
Buecher, Prof., 307f. 
Bulgakov, 275, 298-310, 311, 313, 
315» 317» 320, 324fr. 

Cabet, 227 

Cameron, 439 

Canada, 4o8f. 

Capital and income (Marx), 108 ; 

(Rodbertus), 262fr. ; (Say), 56; 

(Sismondi), 179fr., 215, 423; 

(Adam Smith), 53f., 58fr., 74fr., 

83 

— circulating, 37, 57fr., 64, 74fr., 

83» 85f., I56r, 166, 183fr., 259, 

354 

— constant, 13^., 18L, 22L, 38, 44, 

5 1- 53» 64, 72r, 83, 85f., 88, 94r, 
97, loofr., 109fr., 123fr., 137, 
141, 143, 147, 149, 153, 156fr., 
187fr., 200, 208, 236, 256, 258, 
298f., 302, 304r., 336f., 339, 
.■^44» 354ff-» 359> 361, 365^-. 458, 
463 
definition of, 37, 72, 76f. 

— fixed, 19, 50, 53, 57fr., 74fr., 83, 

85fr., III, 140, 147, 158, 166, 
184fr., 259, 341, 354 

— national (per se), 54, 263 

— productive, 43f., 97, 140, I48f., 

157, 163, 420 

— total social, 31, 49f , 53f, 59, 65, 

79, 83, 86, 88, 96r, 10 1, 103, 
io7r, iio, 118, 147, 156, 169, 
180, 341, 349f. 

— variable, 14, 18L, 22, 38, 44, 74!., 

85» 94ff-> 99» loi» 105, 109fr., 
ii4ff., 123, 125fr., 134, 137, 
151fr., 156, 159, 161, l82f., 
185fr., 207, 209, 234, 253, 256, 



469 



INDEX 



258, 302, 3065 334> 336, 344> 
346, 350, 354f-> 357» 359ff-> 
365f., 428, 457f., 460, 463f., 
definition, 37, 77; in relation to 
surplus value, 252, 258, 337; in 
relation to constant capital, 
111,303, 317, 321,337, 339f. 

Cavour, 449 

Chartist movement, 227, 267 

Chemishevski, 273 

Chesney, Colonel, 439 

Chevalier, M., 448 

China, 41, 247, 289, 353. 373. 386ff., 
419, 428; Dowager Empress 
of, 392ff. 

Class antagonism, 181 

— rule, 78, 452, 456, 464 

— society, 41 
Cobden, R., 447f. 

Colonial policy, 185, 247, 363^, 

369flF., 419, 425, 45if., 454, 466 

English in India, 88, 247, 371, 

374f-> 383 
French in North Africa, 371, 

380, 382 
Commodity economy, see Economy 

— Exchange, 8if., 85, 93f., 97fr., 

118, i29f., i93f., 233, 270, 386, 
428, 438, 443, 452, 454 

— surplus, i95ff., 276-83 
Communism, 263, 369, 378, 384 
Compensation, theory of, 203 
Competition, 21, 23, 40, 46, 48, 191, 

202, 205, 207, 209, 230, 242, 
259> 283, 297, 332, 342, 344, 
368, 416, 419, 446, 450, 457, 
466; 'peaceful — ', 386, 452 

Contradictions latent in capitalism, 
202, 218, 227f, 239, 271, 286fT. 

Corn Laws, 231 

Corvee, 33, 39, 42, 84, 369, 395 

Crises, 14, 35f., 41, 46, i03f., 173, 

I76f., 191, 194, 199, 20lff.,2II, 

213, 216, 218, 222, 227f., 232, 
235ff., 244fr., 261, 268, 272, 
274, 28if , 286, 298, 305, 312fr., 
3i8f., 323f, 332, 342, 346f, 
419, 422, 424, 426, 428, 467 



Crusoe, Robinson, 179, 182, 185, 
261fr. 

Dalrymple, Oliver, 403f., 409 
Declining wage rate, 20L, 229, 241, 

244, 25of , 253, 258f. 
Delamarre, Abbe, 393 
Demand and supply (production), 

36, 46, 133, i92f., 195, 200, 

206, 2X2, 220fr., 230f., 242, 248, 
324 

— effective, 20, 34, 39, 131, 134, 

i55> i64f., i93f., 286, 329, 458, 

461, 465f 
Devers, A., 448 
Dialectical approach, 69, 205, 209, 

265, 366 
Diehl, Prof., 228f , 256, 266f. 
Division of Labour, 79, 104, I28f, 

148, i93> 233, 278, 297, 307f., 

3i9> 32 if. 
Duehring, 194 

East India Company, 375f., 386f., 
41 1 

Economics, bourgeois, 31, 49, 51, 
68f., 106, 108, 112, 137, 170, 
i73f-> 1775 179. 181, i89f., 209, 
215, 218, 244, 268, 271, 279f, 
295' 3io> 325^-; classical, 35, 57, 
65, 67ff., 105, io8f., 179, i88f., 
200, 203, 208, 210, 216, 227fT., 

237. 238-252, 254, 256, 258, 266, 

279' 325> 383» 446; vulgar, 35f., 
81, 108, 177, 21 if., 320 
Economy, commodity, 368fT., 386- 
394, 402, 417, 4i9f , 42 7f., 449, 

465 

— natural, 42, 255, 293, 368-385, 

386, 402, 415, 417, 419, 427, 

443 

— peasant, handicrafts and 

domestic industries, 41, 289, 
296, 358, 369» 374» 395-418, 
435» 438, 444^-' 465 

— rural, 272 

Egypt> 41 > 20 1 f., 353, 358, 425, 
429fr., 450f. 



470 



INDEX 



Elgin, Lord, 39 if. 

Engels, Friedrich, 95, 102, 154, 166, 

168, 194, 228, 241, 250, 275, 

288fr., 294, 449f. 
England, i73ir., 191, 2i8f., 227fr., 

241, 245, 277, 286, 293, 297, 

307f-, 3i3> 316, 318» 352, S.')?» 
366f., 391, 393, 410, 412, 420fr., 
447fr. 

English cotton industry, 297, 342, 
352, 357f-> 362, 422 

Exploitation, 77, siiY., 46, 73r., 108, 
116, iBifT, 196, 220, 228, 241, 
247, 255, 334, 343f., 358fr., 364, 
374, 386, 428, 445, 451, 456 

Eyth, Engineer, 431, 437 

Family Associations, 374, 377, 38or 
Feudal system, 210, 293, 365, 368f., 

38 if. 
Foreign trade, 136, 205f., 236, 246, 

282, 297, 306, 309, 313, 350; 

see also market 
Fowler's Works, 431 
France, 174, 177, 191, 214, 218, 227, 

291, 296, 379, 391, 393, 420f., 

43if., 445, 448fr. 
Franke, O., 373, 393 
Free Trade, 205, 238, 242, 447fr. 

General public (grand public), 135, 

295, 298 
Germany, 173, 271, 296f., 308, 366f., 

420fr., 427, 442, 448fr. 
Gold, production of, 99fr., 141, 154, 

30 if. 
Great Britain, see England 
Gros, 392 

Hangers-on of the capitalist class, 
of. also Third persons, 14, 8if , 
112, i34f., 222f, 295, 332f, 
350, 420, 454fr., 464 

Hanotaux, A., 378 

Hansen, 26 

Harmony, doctrine of, 173, 177, 200, 
203f, 21 iff., 228f, 238, 271, 
305.' 325^-. 446f. 



Harrod, ig 
Hermann, 243 
Herodotus, 88f., 372 
Hcrtzen, 273 
Hicks, 28 
Hobson, 21, 314 

Ilyin, v., 189, 275, 287, 303, 309, 

317. 320 
Imperialism, 28, 320, 368, 4i6ff., 

421, 445f,452 
India, 4if, 72, 88, 247, 286, 308, 

352f , 365, 37iff-5 380, 387, 425, 

428,454 
Indian famine, 376, 382 

— mutiny, 247, 374 

Industrial reserve army, /j, 108, 

III, 361 
Intelligentsia, 273fr. 
Ismail Pasha, 33, 431fr., 438 
Issayev, Prof, 275 
Italy, 173,449fr. 

Japan, 247, 353 

Kablukov, Prof, 275 
Kaffir, 4 1 1 ff. 

— Wars, 411, 413 
Kalecki, 23 
Kant, I., 326 
Kareyev, 274 

Kautsky, K., 228, 267, 318fr. 
Keynes, Lord, 2of., 26 
Kirchmann, v., 227-37, 238, 244, 

248, 250, 252f, 26of, 266, 

268, 309f, 351, 366 
Kovalevski, M., 373, 375f , 384 

Labour, abstract and concrete, 
67fr., 72. 105 

— intellectual and material, 77 

— paid and unpaid, 37fr., 55, 62, 

65ff-, 7i> 73. 75> 98, 322f , 343 

— past and present, 66f , 70, 75, 80, 

88f. 

— problem. 363^ 



471 



INDEX 



Labour, progressive productivity 
of, its capitalist and general 
social expression, 258, 32 if., 

335f-> 349> 357 
Lafargue, 39g, 404 
Laissez-faire, 173, 238, 274 
Lassalle, F., 228 
Lavrov, P., 274 

Lenin, Vladimir Ilyich, see Ilyin 
Letournaux, A., 378 
Lexis, 266 
Leyden, V. v., 377 
List, F., 307 
Livingstone, Dr., 41 1 
Loans, international, 387, 419-45, 

45 if, 
Lodyshenski, K., 449 
Lotz, W., 448 
Lucas, C. P., 414 
Luxury goods, 81, 102, 163, 1978"., 

208, 235fr., 260, 277 

MacCulloch, J. R., 177, 189, 191- 

202, 203, 2o6f, 211, 220, 222, 
229, 233, 264, 335 

Maine, Sir Henry, 373f. 

Malthus, p^, 181, 2X1, 217, 219-23, 

229, 298, 305, 309, 350 
Manuilov, Prof, 275, 460 
Market, internal and external, 236, 

246, 277f, 283fF., 292, 294f, 

299, 3o6ff., 316 

— concept revised, 366 

— problem of, 229f , 235, 277, 284, 

289, 3iiff., 345ff. 
Marx, K., 13I, 16 ff., 31, 36f , 43, 49, 
51, 54, 60, 62ff., 76-92, 95, 99fr., 
120-38, i39-54> i55ff-> 189. 

203, 205, 212, 215, 2i7f, 220, 
223, 228, 233, 241, 243f , 255f , 
258, 264, 268, 274f , 28if , 287, 
295, 298-310, 31 if , 3i6ff., 320, 
324f, 329ff., 348, 350f, 357, 
359ff., 417; his diagram of 
capitalist reproduction, 84, 97, 
99fT., 104, 113, ii8f, 127, 274, 

298-3'0> 31 1> 417, 428, 455; liis 
diagram of enlarged reproduc- 



tion, 120-138, 304/., 3i3ff., 
318, 323f, 329-47, 348, 353f, 
359. 361, 417» 458ff.; his dia- 
gram of simple reproduction, 
76, 92, 103, 107, 112, 114, 173, 
264, 299, 351, 361, 418 

Marxism, 272fr., 310, 326; 'legalist', 
275> 292, 294, 303, 305f , 317, 
323, 324-6, 460; 'orthodox', 
318 

Mehemet Ali, 429, 435 

Mehring, F., 228, 266f. 

Mikhailovski, Prof, 274 

Militarism, 27, 248, 276, 282, 298, 

309, 350. 371. 439> 454-67 
Mill, James, 191, 212, 22off., 372f, 

375, 383 
Mill, John Stuart, 279 
Money, as form of pure value, 38f , 

43f , 76, 140 

— circulation, 20, 50,93-106, i39ff., 

148, 193, 213, 300ff., 324 

— sources, i44ff., 151fr., 156, I58ff., 

30off. 
Monroe, President, 402 
Moravitz, C, 443, 445 
Most Favoured Nations Clause, 

448 

Napoleon Bonaparte, 173 

Napoleon III, 431, 448 

Negroes, 3621^., 41 iff. 

Neo-Marxists, 291 

Neo-Mercantilism, 296 

Nikolayon, 275, 284-91, 292f, 299, 
309, 351, 366, 408 

Non-capitalist strata necessary for 
accumulation, sigf , 35iff-,357> 
359> 36iff-, 368, 386, 416, 427, 
429, 446, 450, 452, 466 

Nyok Ching Tsur, Dr., 395 

Obshchina, 273, 288, 290 

Opium Wars, 27, 247. 387, 391, 393, 

447 
Oppenheim, M. v., 439 
Ort, 23 if, 248, 252 



472 



INDEX 



Over-production, 91, 104, 149, 195, 
iggf., 213, 221, 235, 250, 252, 
254,279,281^,298,324,342 

Owen, Robert, i74f., 191, 240 

Palikao, Count, 392 

Pan-Germans, 247 

Peasantry, 27; their expropriation, 

288, 296, 362, 364, 369, 374f. 
Peel, Sir Robert, 245 
Peffer, Senator, 396, 398, 40of., 4o6f. 
Physiocrats, 31, 49, 51, 56f., 62, 

68, 71, 106, 233 
Planned economy, 78f., i03f., 128fr., 

195= 248, 312, 323 
Plekhanov, Prof., 272, 275 
Population increase, /j, 41, 78, 91, 

107, i33f-.239, 36of.,37i 
Populism, 272ff., 283, 286fr., 303, 

306, 309, 317,' 325, 351 
Positivism, 326 
Pressel, Engineer, 44 if 
Primitive social organisations, 32, 

39, 4if, 72, 362, 368fr., 377, 

415, 428, 454 
Private enterprise, 79, 103, 248 
Production, and consumption, 45f , 

204, 211, 218, 244, 253, 260, 

304f., 324, 326, 343, 349 

— for social requirements, 37, 42, 

129, 133, 139» 220, 260, 285, 
304f, 316 

— its two departments, 16, 18^., 25, 

2J, 83fr., 95ff., 99, 102, 114fr., 
123fr., 127fr., 137, 233, 299, 

323, 334. 336, 339ff-, 353> 355, 
417, 434 

— capitalist, as creation of surplus 

value, 37fr., 42, 78, 84, 107, 

343, 367, 427 
as end in itself, 311, 3i6f, 

320, 333, 346 
its universal domination, 2i6f , 

331, 333, 348, 351, 353, 361, 

365, 410, 417, 467 
Productive consumption, 236f., 316 
Profit, of enterprise, 38, 232, 234 

— motive, 34, 305, 322f 



Profit, rate, 17, 23I, yrß, 167; (de- 
clining) 259, 320, 326, 338, 343f , 

367 
Progress, 28, 79, 89, i3of., 204, 216, 
245, 249, 258f, 274, 296, 320, 

323, 339 
Property, ownership, 214, 248f , 265, 
38of,4i3 

— communal, 77, 248, 289, 379, 

381 

— in land, 256, 262, 264^, 370 
vested in Sovereign, 372r, 

38of 

— private, iq6, 240, 322, 378, 380, 

382 fr. 
Proudhon, 137, 227, 241, 264^ 
Punjab Alienation Act, 376 

Quesnay, 31, 48fr., 57, 62, I04f, 

21 1 

Railway construction, 289, 353, 398, 
402, 409, 419fr., 425fr., 439, 445 

Renner, K., 455 

Rent, 38, 50fr., 57fr., 64, 68, 135, 
181, 254f , 257, 266 

Rentier, 223, 254 

Reproduction, enlarged, ij, 40fr., 
80,89fr., 102, 107-19, 151, 155, 
169, 184, 197, 209, 268, 300, 
303, 312, 3i7f , 329, 335, 339f., 

351,353,355,429 

— simple, 13, 15, 75, 41, 48, 98, 102, 

104, I07r, II2f, 115, I27f, 

130, 139, i43ff-, 155^-, j6ofr., 
165, 169, 187, 190, 197, i99f, 
298, 300, 302, 312, 317, 329, 

334,338,348,351,354 

— transition from simple to en- 

larged, 123, i44f, 147, 150, 
i62f., 318; see also Marx 

Rhodes, Cecil, 4i3f , 416 

Ricardo, D., 53f , 57, 62, 67f , i05f , 
logf , 179, 181, 189, 191, 194fr., 
203-10, 211, 215fr., 229f , 232f., 
237, 24of., 243fr., 248, 254, 257, 
261, 266, 268, 271, 279fr., 305, 
324f., 345f , 350, 366, 383, 447 



473 



INDEX 



'Right to Work', 227, 229f. 
Roberts of Kandahar, Lord, 374 
Rodbertus, 22L, 54, 227ff., 237, 238- 

51, 252-68, 271, 274, 28if., 351 
Rothstein, Th., 436ff. 
Rozet, A., 385 
Rusk, Secretaiy, 406 
Russia, 167, 173, 27 if., 275ff., 283f , 

287fF., 297, 308, 326, 357, 

419fr., 445, 449f., 452 

St. Simon, 191 

Said Pasha, 433ff. 

Saling, 441 

Saving, lyL, 20E., 22L, 27, 163, 236f., 

239, 26of , 265f 
Say, J. B., 53ff-, 62f, i77fF., 189, 

191, 204, 206, 210, 211-18, 

2I9f.,222, 229ff.,237, 248, 254, 
257, 264, 266, 268, 279, 305, 

324f-, 3355 366 

Schaeffle, Prof., 293, 295, 307, 424 

Scheibert,J., 388, 390 

Schmoller, Prof, 293, 295ff. 

Schneider, S., 440 

Schultze, E., 410 

Sering, 401, 407, 409f 

Severance of labour power from the 
means of production, 181, 210, 
402 

— of agriculture and trade (indus- 
try), 369, 395f. 

Simmons, A. M., 398 

Simons, 363 

Sismondi, 24, 35, 53, 115, 173-90, 
191-202, 203-10, 211-18, 2I9f , 

222f, 227ff., 237, 240, 245, 

248ff., 256, 260, 264, 268, 271, 
274, 28if , 287f , 292, 309, 312, 

3i7> 342, 35off., 3^5^; 423ff- 
Skvortsov, Prof, 275 
Slavery, 33, 39, 72f , 84, 161, 209f , 

241, 243, 255f, 359, 363, 36g, 

379,400,412,432 
Slavophiles, 273, 276 
Smith, Adam, 36, 48, 5off., 83, i05f , 

io8fT., 166, 169, 180, 185, 

187IT., 191, 2iof, 215, 228, 



23of, 233, 256f., 260fr., 264, 
266, 271, 346, 351, 383 

Socialism, 228f., 266, 274, 325f, 
467; English, 244; Utopian, 
217; and Marx's analysis, 131 

Sombart, Prof, 308 

Spheres of interest, 445, 447, 452 

State as consumer, 223, 454fr., 458, 
460, 463, 466 

Struve, Peter v., 275, 292-97, 298, 
307, 309ff., 325f , 350 

Suez Canal, 33, 43of , 433, 435fr. 

Surplus value, 14, 18L, 38, 62, 78, 
logfT., 128, 135, 139, 141, 
i85fT., 199, 207, 220, 234f., 253, 
255ffv 265ff., 298, 30 if, 310, 
317, 332ff., 342f, 350, 353f, 
357f-> 365ff-, 454> 456, 463, 466; 
its capitalisation, 108, ii2ff., 

132, 136, 140? 142, i46f, i5if-. 
163, 165, 170, 184, 188, 196, 
198, 237, 33of , 338, 34of , 345, 

355» 357» 359fv 3^7, 41 7, 421, 
428, 446, 451, 456, 464; its con- 
sumption, I59ff., 169, 197, 254, 
298, 303, 348, 354; 'destruc- 
tion', 28 if, 310, 344; defini- 
tion, 37f , 77; realisation, 98fT., 
132, i39> 142, i55ff-» 165, 170, 
200, 205fr., 278, 292f , 300, 303, 
309f , 329, 34if , 346, 351, 355, 
359» 365» 386, 417, 419, 421, 
426, 428f , 442, 444, 451, 454, 
46 if.; contradiction between its 
production and realisation, 345, 

365 
Sweezy, 13, 21 

Tariffs, protective, 231, 297, 399, 

446-53» 456 
Taussig, 399f. 
Taxation, 369, 373f , 379, 381, 383, 

394. 396, 399» 435<r-» 443» 455. 

458, 464^, indirect, 455fr., 46of., 

463f 
Tax collector, 372f , 443f 
'Third Persons', 135, 159, 292-7, 

298, 305, 348, 350, 458 



474 



INDEX 



'Three World Empires', 292-7 

Timur (Tamerlane), 375 

Tooke, 156 

Trade Unions, 271, 461 

Tucker, Josiah, 2 1 i 

Tugan Baranovski, Prof., 23, 210, 

275> 303. 30'J; 310, 311-23, 

324n"., 330, 335f., 346, 366, 

422 fr. 
Turkey, 353, 385, 419, 425^, 436, 

439, 442, 445 

Unemployment, 177, 208, 240, 282 
Usury, 373, 377, 381, 383f. 
Utopianism, 249, 262, 264, 268, 288, 
291 

Value, problem of pure, 35f. 

— Marx's theory of, 66, 68, 105, 281 

— Ricardo's theory of, 68, 105 

— Rodbertus' theory of, 24off., 256, 

259 



Value, Adam .Smith's theory of, 62, 

64fT., i05f. 
— relationships and material points 

of view, 8if., 105, 1 12, 264, 336, 

354>4i7 
Victoria, Queen, 393 
Violence, 371, 446, 452 
Vorontsov, V., 24, 274f, 276-83, 

287, 29 iff., 299, 303, 309r, 350, 

366, 460 

Wagner, Prof, 256, 266f., 293, 295, 

297, 307 
Warren, Count, 375 
Wilson, H. H., 372f 
Wilson, James, 376 
World (international) Conmierce, 

205, soyf-, 359 
World Market, 200, 202, 205, 296f , 
308 

^adruga, 378 



475 



UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA LIBRARY 

Los Angeles 
This book is DUE on the last date stamped below. 



REC'D LD-URl 



MAR 1 IWt 



nU 



PRION 



,!iM I'i 






D C.i APR 9 '98 
vHL DEC 18 "99 



^^^^^ 



VM 



AC NOV n 1 2001 



QL APR 1 7 199! '^'-'^ ^"^ oct ? 5 m 
4WKMAR0 5 



1995 
19«) 



^^^'Hm 



"OVo 1 



?m 



315 



l|!l|ll||li|i|[|ilil|i|ii|i|i|iii||ii|f '' 



L 005 829 024 8 



